2013-08-30 00:00:00
Star Café – Super Retro Cafe with Delicious Tomato Noodle Soup
[Hong Kong] You cannot imagine the excitement when I finally found this café, this very old-looking place which looks transported back in time to the 1970s. When I watched TVB dramas when I was young, this is the kind of café where Carol Cheng would meet Chow Yun Fatt for breakfast.There are retro Coca Cola posters all around, yellow faded newspaper reviews pasted haphazardly with dried-up tape,  an altar, Nissin noodles cardboard boxes, a square boxy silver television playing the news, rusty weighing machine, a toilet roll hanging out next to the door, a two-door ancient fridge …. Everything is old, old old!If Royston Tan was a Hong Konger, he would make a documentary out of Star Café.Finding Star Café is a challenge. Look out for Dadol Hotel sign, get to Champagne Court beside the Mira Hotel, go to the basement where you will past by a doughy-looking Moon Spring Foot Massage shop.What do people come here for? Tomato noodles.Star Café is famed for their tomato noodles, made with fresh noodles and eggs. The lady boss seemed a little apologetic and I understood in my half-baked Cantonese that the noodles would need at least 10 minutes to prepare. This is Hong Kong mind you – no instant noodles take that long to be served. Not during morning rush hour.When the Tomato Beef Noodles (HK$28, $4.50) was served, I knew I would never look at these ketchup noodles the same way again. Why so delicious?!The bowl of Nissin noodles was covered in bright-red sauce, you know it has to be prepared fresh on-the-spot. The sauce was unexpectedly refreshing, without that extreme sour-tangy aftertaste. Okay, draw-back is that it can get gooey and some may find it tough to stomach that many tomatoes.I actually went back again. Milk tea and ham egg sandwich were superb. How do the Hong Kongers make such simple things taste so good?Star Café 星座冰室
36 Basement Champagne Court Block A 16 Kimberley Road (Next to Mira Hotel)
Tsim Sha Tsui, Kowloon, Hong Kong Tel: +852 2724 4408
MTR: Tsim Sha Tsui (Exit B2)
尖沙咀金巴利道16-20號香檳大廈地庫36號舖
Opening Hour: 8:00am-9:00pmOther Hong Kong Entries
Australian Diary Company (Hong Kong)
Bing Sutt G.O.D Starbucks (Hong Kong)
Mak’s Noodles (Hong Kong)
Tim Ho Wan (Hong Kong)
Ho Hung Kee (Hong Kong)
2013-08-28 00:00:00
Singapore Mooncake Guide 2013 – The Large, The Pretty & The Butt
The Mooncake competition is officially on. The mid-autumn festival which symbolizes togetherness and bonding, has turned into a match of sorts – to see which mooncake is better, cuter, prettier, weirder and only perhaps tastier. (Go for your traditional Da Zhong Guo if you want tastier, the traditional baked mooncakes have less calories than the snowskin anyway.)Take a walk around Takashimaya Square basement 2, or some of the other malls such as Junction 8, IMM, Jcube, Nex, VivoCity, Change Alley, Century Square, AMK Hub, Square 2, Vivocity where there are mini-mooncake fairs to have a look. Then you will know what I mean.Here are some mooncakes for your consideration. I took a bite out of every single one. My mum too. And we mean what we say.G.O.D’s Butt Mooncake
This Butt Mooncakes by Hong Kong’s Goods of Desire G.O.D ($52 for a box of four) have made waves in all local papers and my instagram feed. There is no young local celebrity I followed who did not receive a box of this. (If you are a local celeb but didn’t receive it, emmm… get more attention on social media bah.)They are shaped like buttocks (posterior is a better word) because they resemble the mid-autumn’s full moon. Giving a box of this is a joke. Your friends would love it. Your boss would question your taste. Your mother-in-law would think otherwise – so don’t give it to her. My mum said they looked ugly, the taste wasn’t fantastic fantastic, but they make a cute gift anyway.Grand Hyatt’s Lychee Martini Truffle Mooncake
Grand Hyatt, you win. When your mooncakes arrived in a pretty tiffany-blue coloured acrylic gift box box, I am sold already. You make mooncakes look more luxurious.At $62 for 8 pieces (expensive, but when I went Taka there was still an early bird discount), there are 3 new snowskin flavours are added to the collection; Green Tea with Sake Truffle, Yam with Coconut Truffle and White Lotus with XO Truffle. You can mix and match flavours. As I am a calorie watcher, I loved the size actually. There are some flavours which particularly made my mum go “Wow, ho chiak!” – The Champagne Truffle and Lychee Martini Truffle. I agree with her on that.Man Fu Yuan’s Pulot Hitam Mooncake
Intercontinental Man Fu Yuan’s anticipated new creation is inspired by one of our favourite local desserts, the Pulot Hitam. We know they worked for ice cream, but would they for mooncakes. Actually, not quite sold. My Pulot Hitam snow skin mooncake melted faster than other flavours, and my mum thought they tasted “weird”.She much preferred the other flavours which I agree too. The Green Tea Paste infused with Jasmine tea, White Lotus with Macadamia Nuts and Sesame Paste all worked well ($53.80 for 4 pieces). Special mention that they have created a new range of low sugar white lotus seed paste mooncakes, made with 50 percent less sugar, all coming with a classic elegant long packaging. Makes a suitable corporate gift.TWG’s Gold Leaves Scarlet Red Mooncake
TWG Tea offers a set of two mooncakes paired with their Longevity Haute Couture Tea at S$78 and a set of four tea infused mooncakes at S$52. You know when you buy a TWG mooncake, you are not exactly looking at receiving something traditional. The colours are already shocking – plain white, dark black, purple and scarlet red covered with gold leaves. Decadence!The scarlet red Snowskin Mooncake is filled with white chocolate mousse and crunchy chocolate pearls encasing a refreshing yuzu marmalade in a white chocolate heart. Infused with longevity tea. The downside? The black colouring stained my mum’s fingers while cutting, and they were tough to wash off.Marina Mandarin’s 8 Treasures Baked Mooncake
This big 6½ inch 8 Treasures 8-yolk Baked Mooncake ($68 for box of 1) from Marina Mandarin Peach Blossoms perhaps want to prove that the bigger the better. This looks like a discus or a body pump weight, and is heavy.The lotus paste was smooth and not too sweet.  If you are a traditional baked mooncake lover and if size matters to you, then this will be your choice. Eat it like a birthday cake, get the whole family down to cut the mooncake together. This makes good family bonding.Other Related Entries
Peninsula Mooncakes from Hong Kong
5 Best Mooncakes 2012
2013-08-27 00:00:00
One Ocean Seafood – How a Zhi Char Place Can Be Creative, Fast & Good
A Zhi Char stall always have to churn out a huge variety of a la carte dishes, in the shortest time, and the whole process of cooking and frying always seem so time-consuming.There are sometimes hundreds of choices on the menu, and a popular zhi char stall can dish out tasty, hot, and fresh food items in minutes. With the Labour Movement pushing for competitiveness and productivity, some zhi char stalls could be real life examples of how to do it cheaper than restaurants, better than hotels and faster than food deliveries.Plus, customers would always want to try new varieties of zhi char food.  I love all these experiments that the stalls are taking, whether it is East meets West, or when strange impossible items are added to already familiar-tasting dishes. Otherwise, there won’t be the birth of Coffee Pork Ribs, Wasabi Prawns, Mango Chicken, XO Fish Soup, and Laksa Crabs – some have become ‘staples’ in many stalls.I made my way to One Ocean Seafood, located at Toa Payoh Industrial Park near Braddell. Yes it is ulu, but still enjoys relatively brisk businesses even on weekday nights. (It is related to other Ocean zhi char stalls you see around.)We had the Salted Egg Golden Flake Prawns ($25) and Golden Mashed Potato Roll ($12), both with mashed potato in their ingredients.Some would think that the prawn dish was the usual cereal prawn because the base was still crispy and flaky. Actually no! The ‘golden flake’ is prepared by a mashed potato mix and salted egg, which brings a twist to the dish.I would never have expected that the deep fried Mashed Potato Roll was made by that same instant mashed potato mix. If you are thinking it is the same version you can buy in supermarkets – not really. Chef Yap from Ocean uses the industry pack catered for large scale cooking which is still made by sustainably grown real potatoes from Germany.The benefits? He can add the potatoes for some ‘Western’ slant to the usual Asian dishes, which customers would appreciate the novelty, and the dish would have a consistent quality and taste every time.This would be ideal for speed, especially when washing, cooking, peeling and mashing potatoes would take up too much time, increasing the risk of kitchen accidents in the rush to meet the deadline of dinner crowd arriving, and using up precious space in the fridge. By making food preparation “easier, smarter and safer”, as labour chief Lim Swee Say calls it, the chefs can focus on making creative dishes that would keep diners coming back.Taking about Western twists, there is an unusual Italiana Scallop ($18) with has fresh plump scallops fried with wok hei, yet you can taste a hint of Italian herbs. This feels like having scallop pasta sans the pasta. Using these these herbs not only spruce out the original taste of the scallop, the dish can be prepared quickly as the herbs are already pre-packed.Chef Yap also stretches the use of each ingredient. This Italian herb could be found in some of his other cooked dishes, helping to lower food cost minimise wastage.When it comes to frying some Chinese cuisines such as vegetables, most Chinese chefs would need to use soup stock as a base. However, preparation of such stock can take up to 8 hours as there is a need to prepare the ingredients for making the stock, blanch, rinse and boil the meat with other ingredients for hours.Ocean’s Seafood Spinach with Scallop Broth ($18) uses concentrated scallop bouillon as its base, which makes an otherwise ordinary vegetable dish have a lingering of rich seafood aftertaste.Some tips I learnt from the zhi char stall on how they work easier, smarter and safer:
- The same ingredient is featured in a variety of dishes to minimise wastage.
- A zhi char stall does not need to be too fixed in its menu – to use what is in season and experiment to allow more flexibility and innovation in dishes.
- Food is highly perishable and by proper planning, chefs can avoid overstocking or overbuying (and thus saving kitchen space.)
- It is okay to use mixes as long as the quality is consistent. This saves on preparation time and reduces unnecessary movement in the kitchen which is a common cause of kitchen accidents.
- Prices can be lowered as chefs save on food and recipe cost, and in turn focus on creating the dishes.Some may argue that everything needs to be prepared from scratch. What is your take on this?One Ocean Seafood Restaurant
1002 Toa Payoh Industrial Park #01-1407, Singapore 319074
Opening Hours: 11am-2:30pm, 5:30pm – 11pm (Daily)Other Locations
Ocean Seafood Woodlands Blk 892C Woodland Drive 50 #01-02 S(730892)
Ocean Seafood AMK Blk 107, Ang Mo Kio Ave 4, S(560107)
Ocean Seafood Serangoon Blk 151 Serangoon North Ave 2 S(550151)
Ocean Seafood Hougang Blk 435A Hougang Avenue 8, S(530435)
2013-08-26 00:00:00
Outpost 903 Gastrobar – Charming Gastropub Opened by Presenter Lin Youyi
If there is one word to describe MediaCorp host Lin Youyi (Iriana Halim), it would be “persistent”.  Few may know that she lost in a radio DJ competition (it was Christina Lin Peifen who won in the end.) But she pushed on with her sunshine smile and eloquence to be the Best Current Affairs Presenter for Good Morning Singapore at Star Awards, and also become one of the few current affairs host to cross over to variety.Plus her studies at UniSIM. All these happening while she is managing her restaurant Outpost 903 Gastrobar at Bukit Timah.Youyi wanted to play a part of every detail and menu item of Outpost 903, creating an industrial chic charm with hints of retro, almost like you are entering a factory-bar.The birth of Outpost 903 Gastrobar was no easy feat. The location itself is a rare single-storey shophouse built around 1902, and needed some convincing to secure. When asked about the water tank feature hanging at the top of the roof, Youyi proudly said that she personally got it. That is persistence.Outpost 903 Gastrobar (so named because it is on 903 Bt Timah Road) has recently undergone a menu revamp. The menu can be said to be Western, but with frequent touches of Asian/Singaporean influences, such as Cripsy Pork Belly ($18), a refreshing Rockmelon Salad ($14) Minced Pork Spaghetti ($14), Golden Beancurd ($8) and Herbal Chicken ($18 – weekends only) which all seem all belonging to a zhi char restaurant, yet has Western style preparation methods.Yes, the thick slab of pork belly with a sweetish sauce comes served with mashed potato and salad. Some goes for the Herbal Chicken, a long dish of chicken thighs marinated in herbs with a special thicken herbal sauce served on side. Imagine the herbal soup your mum makes made concentrated into a sauce.My favourite dish of the day? An Outpost Carbonara ($16) of fettuccine pan-fried in bacon oil and creamy white sauce topped with egg yolk and parmesan flakes. There is a certain type of carbonara I fancy – the sauce cannot be too thick or watery, the egg must be half cooked, and it shouldn’t be too cheesy. This version falls nicely into it. Yums. (Check out the #instavideo on @DanielFoodDiary which also made it to POP page.)The shocker dish of the day is the WTF ($32). It is “What The Fish”, a crispy whole grouper with the fish meat filleted off to both sides and served in two styles – one was Thai, one was more Chinese.I asked Youyi if her ang mo customers could accept this, after all, I hear some saying they don’t take the whole fish like THAT – in whole. She said, surprisingly some would take the bone and fins to eat with beer, because they are deep fried till it is so crispy.The food may not be the most polished or typical of a bar menu, but most were quite hearty and pleasant-tasting. What is really charming about this place is the whole ambience and décor, which makes it a chill-out place to spend your weekends with good friends.Outpost 903 Gastrobar
903 Bukit Timah Road Singapore 58960 Tel: +65 6468 4903
Opening Hours: 5:00pm – 12:00am (Mon, Wed-Thurs), 5:00pm – 2:00am (Fri), 3:00pm – 2:00am (Sat), 10:00am – 12:00am (Sun)Other Related Entries
The Ascot (The Grandstand)
Two Face (Tiong Bahru)
Omakase Burger (The Grandstand)
Cocotte (Wanderlust Hotel)
Grub (Bishan Park)
2013-08-23 00:00:00
Brasserie Les Saveurs – St Regis Welcomes New Chef de Cuisine + Vouchers Giveaway!
Dining at St Regis Singapore’s signature restaurant Brasserie Les Saveurs makes you feel like you are in Europe – chandeliers on high ceilings, grand-looking furniture, luxurious decors and a musical fountain just outside the windows.On the weekend I was there, dinner became more enchanting with live jazz singing, a dining ‘luxury’ I do not see often nowadays except during wedding dinners. I feel myself being transported back to Europe, where live piano-playing and singer is common even in the mid-tier restaurants.Enhancing the French experience, Brasserie Les Saveurs just welcomed a new Chef de Cuisine Antoine Bonnet, with more than 20 years of culinary experience, and expertise in contemporary French cuisine.A 6 Course Degustation Delight Menu would set you back by $128, $208 per person with wine pairing, which to me is a worthwhile ‘investment’ if you need a special place for a romantic anniversary or birthday dinner.We also hear that people do pop the “Will you marry me question?” at Brasserie Les Saveurs. There are two VIP booths if you are really planning of doing it here.Chef Antoine Bonnet’s interpretation on the dishes appears to be generally classical, with a light touch of modernity. I was generally more impressed with the seafood dishes. The Bouillabaisse Facon Les Saveurs ($19) is an ensemble of seafood stew slow-simmered with fennel and saffron. The stew was of the right consistency and balance, appropriately bringing out the succulence of the fresh seafood.The Le Homard Thermidor ($75 for ala carte), Boston lobster flamed with cognac, had a flavoured layered taste with mushroom béchamel sauce and the gratinee gruyere giving it a robust cheesy savour. This is a tasting portion, and the ala carte version does present the Boston lobster in its grandeur.Other dishes we had included a Salade Nicoise ($36 for ala carte), Foie Gras Poele ($26), pan-seared duck foie gras with green apple and rhubard compote, “sauternes” reduction and brioche toast and Filet Mignon Sauce Au Poivre ($48), grilled tenderloin beef with truffles mashed potatoes, tiny green beans and peppercorn sauce.Some people would assume French cuisine is all about being light, precise and elegant. Brasserie Les Saveurs presents a new menu which is generally richer with heavier flavours, in my humble opinion an in-between between the traditional French and nouvelle cuisine.Brasserie Les Saveurs
The St. Regis Singapore, 29 Tanglin Road Tel: + 65 6506 6866
Opening Hours: 6:30am – 11:00pm Daily, 12:00pm – 2:30pm (Sunday Brunch)Starwood Preferred Guest (SPG) by Starwood Hotels & Resorts Worldwide has a “Triple Benefits” dining offers for members. Till Sep 2013, SPG members will enjoy three exclusive benefits whenever they dine at one of 650 participating restaurants and bars in Starwood Hotels & Resorts around the globe. Membership is free.SPG Triple Benefits at Brasserie Les Saveurs St Regis 
•	15% discount on food for lunch or dinner
•	Additional 10% off the tab for a second visit
•	Complimentary glass of house wine with meal any day of the weekDanielFoodDiary.com will be giving away 2 pairs of vouchers for you to enjoy Brasserie Les Saveurs’s “JJ Business Lunch Experience” at The St Regis Singapore. All you need to do is to 
a) Join as an SPG member at the following link 
b) Comment below with your membership number
(Results will be annouced 30 Aug)Other Related Entries
La Brezza (St Regis)
2013-08-22 00:00:00
Play Kitchen – Actor Host Ben Yeo Opens Pasta Stall at Jurong Point
Actor and host Ben Yeo is one lucky man. Who could recall that his enter into showbiz was by being talent-spotted while shopping at Orchard? 10 years later, he is one of MediaCorp’s most popular male artistes (won an award in 2012), an author, father of two and now co-owner of Play Kitchen.Out of the many local artistes that I met or interviewed, Ben Yeo must be one of the friendliest and down-to-earth. There is no air about him. He once appeared on my radio programme years back as part of a Channel U ensemble, and I am surprised he still remembers me.Ben is no stranger to food, having hosted a range from I Cook For You, My Yummy Lunchbox, Food Mania, Food Apprentice, and $2 Wonderfood, which by far is one of my favourite local TV food programmes.His new foray into food business is through persuasion by colleagues and fans, therefore the birth of “Play Kitchen”, a humble stall selling pastas at Jurong Point’s Kopitiam (not to be confused with Feast at JP2).The menu includes Asian inspired pasta items such as Smoked Duck Breast Penne ($7.90), Black Pepper Sirloin Aglio Oilio Spaghetti, and Sambal Belacan Grilled Fish Aglio Olio ($8.90). That is restaurant quality pasta at food court prices.I was surprised to see that the chef behind the food court stall is Kelvin Chua, who used to be from the now-defunct Indulge Café at Cathay. Because I did like the food at Indulge, just that it was rather inaccessible.My favourite fish was a popular-with-kids Suckling Chicken Steak with Aglio Olio Spaghetti ($8.90), with the top of the chicken ski remaining ‘suckling-pig-like’ thin and crisp, while the bottom is juicy  with a specially made black pepper sauce.Ben’s Play Kitchen is so called because he is a playful person and wants his chefs to have a fun time preparing dishes in a happy atmosphere, and he loves to ‘play’ and experiment with food concepts– creating the birth of a Hei-bee Clams Spaghetti ($7.90) inspired by a similar Asian dish often eaten in Kuala Lumpur.Play Kitchen’s version can easily beat many of the pasta places at similar price points. Its not the traditional kind, and would get some getting used to. Even so, Ben added that the uncle aunties were very supportive and enjoyed these new versions of ‘noodles’.Its unique taste, al-dente texture and family-friendly variety should be a hit with customers.  I thought I had space for only one, I almost finished three pastas. Congratulations Ben and Kelvin!Play Kitchen
Jurong Point 1 Level 3 Kopitiam Food Court, Singapore 648886
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 11:00pm DailyOther Related Entries
Pizza Hut (City Square Mall)
Malioboro Soft Bone Chicken (Jurong Point)
Da Paolo Bistrobar (Rochester Park)
The Manhattan Pizza Co (Orchard Central)
Covelli Italian Bistro & Wine Bar (Orchard Central)
2013-08-21 00:00:00
Common Man Coffee Roasters – Possibly One of The Best Eggs Benedict in Town
The latest talk-of-the-town café is definitely Common Man Coffee Roasters. Why won’t it be, with a joint partnership between Harry Grover of 40 Hands who started that indie cafe wave in Singapore since 3 years ago, Australia’s Five Senses Coffee and The Spa Spirit Group.The Spa Esprit Group has that extra Midas touch, making seemingly ordinary things and services look hip and fashionable. Just look at Tiong Bahru Bakery, Skinny Pizza, 40 Hands and their beauty services Browhaus.While being very new, Common Man Coffee Roasters was packed during the weekends, with pumping music, a coffee counter like a bar and coffee lovers who seem to be the usual Robertson Quay type. The cock décor in the middle, serves to remind us of Kiasu Coffee at 100AM, also owned by them.Despite being called ‘Common Man’ and wanting to making the cafe “more accessible to the greater public”, the prices are not very ‘common man’. The Organic Eggs Benedict goes for $24, Full Breakfast $26, Common Man Rib-eye burger at $28, Boneless chicken $25 and desserts such as churros, mango panna cotta and crème caramel at $12 – possibly one of the highest ranged around.I decided I have enough of the usual poached eggs with bacon and sausage and went for the Organic Eggs Benedict ($24) with two poached eggs on top of tender braised ox cheeks and lightly toasted artisanal sourdough toast.These eggs oozed, and Oh-my-goodness, the combination with the rich melting tender-licious cheeks makes Common Man’s version a class of their own. After taking the first bite, I told myself “This is possibly one of the best eggs ben I had in Singapore” and told my friend You-Must-Have-This.  I just had too many lousy eggs ben, and THIS was different.I was recommended the Turkish Common Man Breakfast ($25), not usually a common choice. Unsuspectingly, I cut open the ‘ball’ in the middle and out busted bright yellow yolk. I really didn’t know that phyllo-wrapped thing with crispy feta which looked like a Cantonese dim sum yam ball is actually soft-boiled egg. (Check out my #instavideo on @DanielFoodDiary).This breakfast dish is refreshing; especially when the cucumber and tomatoes were fresh with a hint of sweetness, and olives, hummus and pita bread served on side exactly reminding me of my meals in IstanbulSkip the dessert though. My Crème caramel drowned in caramel sauce and I could not bear to finish it in its extreme sweetness, despite telling myself I am going to pay $12 for this.Harry Grover saw me and made a cup of filtered coffee ($6) personally. I joked that if I took a instavideo of his good looking face, loads of girls would click likes…and YES, it landed on popular page that day. (And thank you Harry, who usually is deep-in-thought and serious, for a cheeky smile.)The coffee was aromatic, strong yet bright, slightly fruity without being sour (I like). The texture is very light, almost like tea, and leaves a pleasant after taste. Indeed the coffee master at work.Common Man Coffee Roasters is one of the few cafes around which does serve both good coffee and food. A pity about the desserts and the price, which came up to a 3 figure sum! The people will come packing anyway.Common Man Coffee Roasters
22 Martin Road #01-00 Singapore 239058, Tel: +65 6836 4695
Opening Hours: 8am – 7pm DailyOther Cafe Entries
Department of Caffeine (Duxton Road)
Craft Bakery Café (Holland Village)
Flock Café (Tiong Bahru)
Jewel Café + Bar (Rangoon Road)
Tiong Bahru Bakery (Raffles City)
2013-08-20 00:00:00
Bull and Butcher – Competent Steakhouse, Can Do with Some Beefing Up
Admittedly, for a restaurant called “Bull and Butcher”, I did expect much more from the steak dishes. Though this new steakhouse at the freshly-renovated Plaza Singapura (taking over the old Café Cartel) does have a range of appetisers, soups (such as the Baked Onion Soup) and sides that leaves a deeper impression on the taste buds.I like the interior. It has a brickwall and woody country edge that makes you feel like you are in a traditional Australian steakhouse, though there are furniture, a wall and elements which suggest modern and sleek.Prices of the meats are mid-range when compared to your down-town or hotel steak restaurants, with a 280 grams Australian Wagyu Beef Tenderloin priced at $75, Australian 150 Day Grain Fed Ribe Eye at $38, and Argentinean Grass Fed Sirloin at a more wallet-friendly $29.Recommended the off-the-menu Petit Tender ($28 for 160gram), I did not know how to answer when I was asked by the waiter if I enjoyed the charcoal grilled meat.I think I said “It was okay”, when in mind, it was probably “ordinary” and nothing to shout about – could be a tad more flavoursome, a tad juicer, a tad tenderer. (I had eaten it on its own without any sauce.) Of course he gave a puzzled look when the two of us could not even finish a petit piece.Bull and Butcher’s Braised Australian Beef Cheek ($38) was smoking hot, generous in portions and a pleasure to savour down with the mashed potato and sauce. It did not have the ‘beefy’ after taste, and almost quite easily tore apart with a push of the fork and knife. (Check my #instavideo @DanielFoodDiary for evidence)The PR recommended me the Creamed Spinach ($8) even though I was hesitant and asked if they had a more photogenic dish. We had it in the end, and turned out it was the best item of the day, considering I was never a fan of creamy vegetables.Crowd seems sparse for a weekday lunch, though my sense is more people would come night time to enjoy some desserts like the Pear and Chocolate Crumble ($12) and Banana Toffee Pie ($12) along with pitches of beer.Bull and Butcher
Plaza Singapura, #01-32/33/35, 68 Orchard Road, Singapore 238839 (Dhoby Gaut MRT), Tel: +65 63383820 http://www.bullandbutcher.com.sg/ https://www.facebook.com/bullandbutchersg
Opening Hours: 11.30am-10pm  (Sun-Thurs), 11.30am-11pm (Fri, Sat and PH)Other Related Entries
Wooloomooloo Steakhouse (Raffles City)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
Hogs Breath Café (Chijmes)
Morganfield’s (The Star Vista)
The Ascot (The Grandstand)
2013-08-19 00:00:00
Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen – The Volcano Ramen Opens at Liang Court
Traditionalist ramen lovers would frown upon Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen aka the Volcano Ramen, while those who likes a bit of fun and freshness tossed up together should go for this.Originating from Osaka Japan, Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen has quickly replaced Kraze Burger at Liang Court (and one wonders why a Korean burger joint would even want to set business at a predominantly Japanese mall). Its first branch locally is at Novena Square 2.This whole idea of Volcano ramen is quite gimmicky. Ramen soup is poured into a preheated 300 stone bowl with noodles and ingredients inside, and then covered with a conical lid. Then hot steam would come out from the top of the lid, thus the ‘volcanic eruption’.There are four basic flavours: Shoyu, Kaisen-shio, miso and curry ($15.00 for small, $18.00). Get the large and share with a friend (unless you came alone). It even comes with a bowl of rice, so don’t finish all your broth yet. (They won’t refill it – this is not bak kut teh.)I tried a few different broths, and the curry worked best for me. The noodles tend to be flatter, like another version of our flat Hokkien mee, and gets soggy after immersing in the stone bowl. The texture of the noodles goes better with curry gravy and since the bowl helps it start hot, the curry noodles remains quite ‘aromatic’ throughout the meal.If I have miso tonkotsu ramen, I would prefer my noodles thin and springy, more to the kyushu style.As I was there on the week of its opening, the service lapses were obvious. Wrong orders, service staff forgetting orders (3 different people asked for my order 7 times – my friend almost wanted to leave), items for big groups coming at long time difference apart.Plus, the space is rather crumped, and tables small. If two people would order curry volcanoes, that’s it. You would smell like one.The Matcha Shiratama with Ice Cream ($8) is a Japanese ice kachang volcano. Okay, I am more picky about matcha items, so this syrupy thing won’t get a pass from me.The Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen experience still remains an entertaining one. I feel that this ‘volcano’ thing sometimes overshadow other offerings on the menu, such as the usual Shoyu or Karamiso Ramen ($12.00) which is on par with some of the other ramen shops in Singapore.Tonkatsu Kazan Ramen
Liang Court, #01-09/10  Tel: +65 6397 6636
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm DailyOther Ramen Entries
Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen (Novena Square 2)
Menzo Butao (Marina Square)
Ramen Kagetsu Arashi (The Star Vista) 
Keisuke Tonkotsu King Four Seasons (Bugis Village)
Menya Sanji (Orchid Hotel, Tanjong Pagar)
2013-08-16 00:00:00
Saigon Lotus – Satisfying Vietnamese Pho at Marina’s Square Dining Edition
Seems like Vietnamese cuisine in creeping into popularity in Singapore, with Nam Nam Noodle Bar  and shops at Joo Chiat such as Long Phung leading the pack.Need more pho? In a manner of months, more and more small outlets such as Saigon Lotus (Marina Square), Wrap & Roll (The Star & Ion Orchard), So Pho (JEM), Sen Bar & Restaurant (Geylang Road), Pho Hanoi (Serangoon North Ave 1), Saigon Vietnamese Delicacy (Geylang Road) are sprouting all over the island.I needed dinner at Marina Square’s Dining Edition, and was ‘attracted’ to a gaudy orange, yellow, red, and yellow colour-schemed Saigon Lotus, opened by Vietnamese-Australian owner Nguyen Hien Trung who has been in Singapore for 4 years. (Okay, another reason why I chose there was because the other restaurants were crowded and this was empty.)Compared with some of the more contemporary snazzier looking counterparts, Saigon Lotus’s décor, menu and waitresses’ uniform all had this rather olden back-to-the-past take, and does feel I am transported back to Ho Chi Minh city.The set meal of 1 entrée, a bowl of noodles and drink at $18.30 nett is rather wallet-friendly considering this is within a shopping mall. Traditional Vietnamese drip coffee, yes!I was not expecting much due to some previous disappointments at local Vietnamese restaurants, but Saigon Lotus’s Sliced Beef Pho was a generous portion of gratifying comforting bowl of soup noodles that could almost match up to those I tried at Vietnam.The beef remained tender and not over-cooked, and the broth was light and satisfying with an authentic touch. The pho is not the best, but good enough for me when I am not fussy.Other than pho, Saigon Lotus sells a range of other types of home-style noodles that may not be as commonly known here such as the Hu Tieu ($11.00 soup, $11.50 dry), a Vietnamese Pork Noodles soup with rice or egg noodles topped with sliced pork, quail egg, prawns and herbs.They have other interesting choices such as Nem Nuong ($7.00) a starter of Vietnamese style grilled pork patties, Mi Vit Tiem, a braised duck egg noodle soup less known outside of Vietnam, and Canh Chua Ca ($25, serves 3-4), fish served in spicy-sweet tamarind broth and is topped with a myriad of chopped pineapple, okra, tomatoes, bean sprouts, coriander and Vietnamese basil.If you are familiar with Vietnamese food, Saigon Lotus is one who probably offers more of the authentic dishes that could not be found at other restaurants here. But you know, for a restaurant to succeed, it is not always about the food.Saigon Lotus
The Dining Edition, Marina Square, 6 Raffles Boulevard, 02-100A/100B, Tel: +65 6337 4648
Opening Hours: 11am to 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Nam Nam Noodle Bar (Raffles City)
2013-08-15 00:00:00
The Kitchen Table – W Hotel’s Buffet Restaurant Impresses with Service
A friend was showing photos from her staycation at W Hotel and that was met with “wooos” and “wahss” of envious, which is probably one of the hippest and coolest hotels in Singapore (and most would said Taipei as well).The Kitchen Table at Sentosa, W Hotel’s buffet restaurant serves up “Food from the Heart”, with 6 live cooking stations of international selection. Surprisingly, there was a huge proportion of Asian and local cuisines such as Chili Flower Crabs, Laksa, Hokkien Mee ,Tandoors dishes and an assortment of Dim Sum when I was there.Known for a high ‘hipster’ quotient, The Kitchen Table does not disappoint in the creative and stylish aspect, with oversized giant tables hanging from the ceilings (to reflect on its name), rubber ducky pepper shakers, psychedelic coloured glasses, and water containers like flowering water cans.My favourite section was the Italian pasta where there are bowls and bowls of pasta of various sorts, seafood and ingredients, 4 types of sauces where you would customise a personalised Italian dish cooked a-la minute to your liking. Plus, the chef was sincere in a shy type of way, but was still happy enough to entertain my many questions.I usually do not expect much about the local street foods served in hotel buffets. To me, there are usually placed there for the tourists, and are muted in taste to suit the Westerners.To The Kitchen Table’s credits, they actually prepare the local dishes quite satisfactory (for hotel buffet standards). For once, I did not expect to see Chilli (flower) Crabs with tender deep fried mantou, and that was quickly swept up, by me. (And I was wondering why it was left there untouched for a long while, because in most other hotel buffets, that would be the first to go. Ah… the foreigners do not go for that.)The Hokkien mee with generous ingredients and sauce, tasted quite hawker-authentic. But some of the other dishes, such as the Laksa, was not as spicy or milky as I wished for, most likely muted down.I could imagine some patrons would feel that The Kitchen Table could have a bigger space and wider selection, piled with trays and trays of food for its weekend brunch price.They are possibly going for quality more than quantity. Sashimi pieces are freshly cut, served in limited slices. The sushi comes in pairs placed in square bright coloured boxes. Pizzas are wood-fired one by one. Desserts are served in small cups and glasses.So while this buffet does not give the impression of wide, massive and huge, it suits those wishing to have a lazy afternoon taking bite sized portions of everything.Service is one of the best I experienced in recent times locally. There is always someone walking around with a dim sum tray, pizza plate, or serving shots of special concoction (I had a yummy wasabi shake shot.) When you ask for something, you would be met with a smile. At the live stations, the chefs would earnestly cook a beautifully plated dish to your preference.Prices: Breakfast SGD48++, Lunch SGD65++, Dinner SGD65++.The Kitchen Table
W Hotel, 21 Ocean Way, Tel: + 65 6808 7268
Opening Hours:  6:00am – 11:00pm (Mon-Fri), 6:00am – 12:00am (Sat-Sun)Starwood Preferred Guest (SPG) by Starwood Hotels & Resorts Worldwide has a “Triple Benefits” dining offers for members. Till Sep 2013, SPG members will enjoy three exclusive benefits whenever they dine at one of 650 participating restaurants and bars in Starwood Hotels & Resorts around the globe. Membership is free.SPG Triple Benefits at The Kitchen Table
•	15% discount on food for lunch or dinner
•	Complimentary glass of house wine with meal any day of the week
•	Additional 10% off the total food bill with six or more guests
In addition, SPG members enjoy one for one exclusive benefits of dining at the kitchen table every Tuesday night![Giveaway Ended] DanielFoodDiary.com will be giving away 2 pairs of vouchers for you to enjoy “Food From The Heart” buffets at W Singapore. All you need to do is to 
a) Join as an SPG member at the following link 
b) Comment below with your membership number, and whether you would want the lunch or dinner vouchers.
(Results will be annouced 20 Aug)
2013-08-14 00:00:00
Lime – Awesome Sunday Brunch at PARKROYAL on Pickering
Before you even step in Lime, the new restaurant at PARKROYAL on Pickering, you would face rows and rows of desserts, cakes, pies and pastries neatly laid out. And they all call out to you “Come eat me because I am so pretty”.Like a child in a candy store, I got a little too excited as I went trigger-happy with their spread during their Sunday brunch. The brunch features an impressive line-up of culinary delights such as an array of twelve European Cheeses, and three sections of live stations. There is also an option of free flow Piper Heidsieck Champagne.The energy is positive and infectious, ceilings are high which makes the restaurant look open and spacious.  Service staff was friendly and personable, while they would move from table to table with freshly prepared pizzas.I have decided that I do not have the space to finish everything, and went straight for the live stations. Out of the Asian, European and Seafood sectors, I was informed that the fresh seafood with plates of freshly cut sashimi, sushi, lobsters, prawns and oysters was the most popular among customers. (Okay, not my favourite section as I am picky about my sashimis.)Surprisingly, I liked the Asian section most. While the Chef’s Wok Creation, a plate of seafood and vegetables fried in sambal chilli on the spot was more sweet than spicy, the other dishes such as Stir-fried Chicken with Curry Leaves, Black Pepper Beef Fillet and Braised Pork Belly were all consistently brilliant choices.While some other cooked food items end up to be rather cold and unappetizing looking after some time, Lime’s Asian renditions all feel, taste and look freshly cooked with some wok hei.If you are up for some Western food, Lime’s carving station offers a selection of roasted meats including US Prime Rib, Guinea Fowl and Rack of Lamb.  Otherwise, the chefs can cook poached eggs, pastas, risottos and pan-seared Foie Gras on the spot.The guy in front of me ordered 12 pieces of Foie Gras, and the chef was quick-witted enough to first serve me the 2 pieces I needed, topped with apple compote and passionfruit pulps. The Foie Gras was not of the best grade, though still good enough to make you feel you got your money’s worth.My advice is, it is impossible to finish all the food. Just take those you really like, and spend the time lazing and enjoying your company. Otherwise, you would end up rushing through the meal and feel bloated which really defeats the purpose.Lime’s vibes make it so conducive to just take it easy, it is crowded yet does not feel hurried.  So just chat-chat, sip the champagne, and take small bites of that awesome blackforest cake.Price of Lime’s Sunday Brunch 
$68++ per person including free flow fresh juices, soft drinks, coffee and tea
$98++ per person including free flow Piper Heidsieck Champagne and selected Red/White House Wine, fresh juices, soft drinks, coffee and tea.Lime PARKROYAL on Pickering
3 Upper Pickering St, (Chinatown MRT) Tel: +65 6809 8899
Opening Hours: 6.30am – 12.00am (Sun – Thurs), 6.30am – 2.00am (Fri, Sat, Eve of PH)
Sunday Brunch: 12:00pm – 3:00pmOther Related Entries
Plaza Brasserie (PARKROYAL on Beach Road)
Silver Shell Café (Shangri La Rasa Sentosa)
Aquamarine (Marina Mandarin)
10 at Claymore (Pan Pacific Orchard)
Gordon Grill (Goodwood Park Hotel)
2013-08-13 00:00:00
Tamoya Udon Chinatown Point – Love The Udon, Not The Tempura
Udon, the thick Japanese wheat flour noodles, never really caught on the waves in Singapore like ramen or soba. That was before Tamoya Udon came along at Liang Court, and I know many who are converted fans and swear this is one of the best udon available locally.Tamoya’s udon propelled to fame after it won the “Best Udon Maker of Kagawa Prefecture” in a television champion show in Japan (We should have a show like this in Singapore for our noodle sellers).Since its opening in Singapore, I must have had it at least 4-5 times. Never regretted each time. And within months of coming to Singapore, they have already opened a bigger branch at Chinatown Point basement.Compared to the Liang Court first outlet where they are more Japanese expatriates, housewives and local executives, the branch at Chinatown seems to be frequented by families. They even have Chinese words scribbled over their menu in marker pen.Okay, I think that some aunties appear lost at what to do and what to order. So here are some of Tamoya’s offerings:Kake Udon ($4.80) – The most basic version. This is hot udon in rich ‘golden’ broth topped with thin sliced green onions. (I realised there is also free self-service top-up for the broth here)
Sanuki Bukkake Udon ($4.80) – Sanuki style with thicker soya-source flavour. Order this if you prefer something tastier and saltier.
Zaru Udon ($4.80) – Cold udon noodles topped with shredded nori, accompanied by a chilled dipping sauce
Kama-age Udon ($5.3) – Chewy, more ‘al dente’ noodles. This may take 10-15 min to serve.
Kare Udon ($8.80) – With Japanese curry gravyTamoya’s udon blends 3 types of different flour, and will change their combination ration by the seasons depending on the temperature and humidity. Thus, you would find it having more bite and chewiness unlike some others who can be soggy or just plain rubbery.Here’s how you order. (Just imagine that you are in a canteen)
Step 1: Choose the type of udon
Step 2: Pick your tempura sides
Step 3: Pay money
Step 4: Then add some condiments (there are green onions, ginger, grated radish, seafood and tempura flakes, but don’t be so greedy such that the condiments overtakes the taste of the broth.)
Step 5: Be friendly customers, and return the utensilsPreviously, I thought the tempura brought down the food quality a whole level, some were rather cold and dry after being left in the open for a while. They made an improvment! This Chinatown branch has increased the variety to include more fried vegetables, fish cake and chicken karaage, and fry in smaller quantities so that the tempura remains fresher and crisper.Of all the bowls I tried, my personal favourite is the Sanuki Udon with Beef ($10.80), slightly pricier, but the thinly sliced tender beef really brings out the flavour of the broth.Tamoya Udon Singapore たも屋うどん-シンガポール
Chiantown Point, 33 New Bridge Road, Basement 1 #48-49 (Chinatown MRT), Tel: + 65 6337 0301
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 9:30pm (last order)Other Japanese Restaurant Entries
Tamoya Udon (Liang Court)
Osaka Ohsho (Raffles City)
Nana’s Green Tea Café (Plaza Singapura)
Hifumi (Plaza Singapura)
Nirai Kanai Okinawan Restaurant (Liang Court)
2013-08-12 00:00:00
The Peninsula Mooncakes – Now Available In Singapore
Giving mooncakes is not only about the celebration of togetherness. Sometimes you really want to impress others and show your appreciation with the best tasting mooncakes with the most exquisite packaging.Many still say that the quality mooncakes you can get is from Hong Kong – more precisely The Peninsula Hotel’s (香港半岛酒店) Mini Egg Custard Mooncakes. They could produce up to half a million mooncakes during the mid-autumn and yet they were still sold out!Before you say “Let me fly to Hong Kong…”, you can actually get your hands on these celebrated Peninsula range of gourmet mooncakes right here in Singapore at the Takashimaya, Vivocity and Chervon House Mid-Autumn fairs.Three reasons to get these mooncakes:  They are yellow, cute and delectable.These light Mini Egg Custard Mooncakes are not the traditional usual brown colour, but in mid-orangey yellow, somewhat resembling the full moon. (Imagine singing “Yue liang dai biao wo de xin” while having them.) Based on the exclusive recipe originating from The Peninsula Hong Kong in 1986, these mooncakes are a contemporary take on the traditional filling of lotus seed paste and duck egg yolk.Talking about cute, these air-flown mooncakes are petite and weight about 40 grams compared to the regular size of 160 grams. They still pack a pack with its soft pastry shells, while you can easily finish one in a mouthful and feel not that guilty.Taste-wise, it’s the light delicate custard with a tinge of the salted duck egg yolk savour that will take you by surprise. Made from butter, coconut milk, eggs, condensed milk, corn starch, and wheat flour, they are soft, slightly creamy and sweetish delicious. Plus, you will not feel that heavy after consumption and are easy on the throat, whereas some other mooncakes can give you an itch on the throat.Dim Sum Chef Yip Wing Wah said that his secret is to get the pastry skin right – getting delicate but strong enough to withstand the baking process. He keeps to himself the exact proportions and nature of the ingredients he uses for the filling, admitting only that he follows a traditional recipe using duck eggs to produce the very best quality and flavour.Last year I told readers to “mai tu liao” and get them before it is too late. They wait too long, And it was sold out before they knew it. My advice this year would be the same – delay no more!Price List 
Mini Egg Custard Mooncakes (8 pieces) $46.00
Assorted Mini Mooncakes (4 mini-golden lotus seed paste mooncakes with egg yolk, 4 egg custard) – $51.00
Assorted Mooncakes (2 white lotus seed paste mooncakes with double yolks, 2 golden lotus seed paste mooncakes with double yolks) – $68.00
Chocolate Mooncakes with Assorted Nuts (9 pieces) – $53.00
Premium Mooncake (10 pieces) – $141.00Hong Kong Peninsula Mooncakes
Available: Takashimaya Basement 2 Event Hall, Vivocity Tangs Atrium Central Court,
Chervon House Change Alley Level One*This entry is brought to you by Star Express and The Peninsula Hong Kong*
2013-08-08 00:00:00
St Marc Café – A 2nd Dessert Café at Marina Square Dining Edition
I thought that St Marc’s chocolate Choro Cro was delicious, that’s before I tried their new strawberry version available at the new Marina Square Dining Edition section.It’s new, and limited strawberry Choro Cro ($2.60) was divine.St Marc Café is a 300 branch chain in Japan, its 2nd just opened at Marina Square. The signature Choco Cro ($2.40) is so named because it is a combination of chocolate and croissant, and is light and flakey with fillings of rich chocolate made of a blend of Ghana and Ecuador beans. Each piece is made of almost 20 layers and thus feels almost airy as you take every bite.My main reservation is that some pieces feel like they have been left on the shelf for a long time, and could be inevitably cold. Some of the ‘freshly-baked’ bread and sandwiches also look quite sad in the counter, and I am sure the Japanese in Japan won’t never allow that to happen.The strawberry daifuku comes with filling of a real strawberry, red beans (okay, I am bias since I like almost Anything with azuki red bean) and soft mocha. Plus a cooling matcha latte (the matcha could be more matcha though). Isn’t thing like the best combination ever?You can buy a box of 5 back, which comes in Japanese style cutesy packaging.I once said that the Little Fuji ($6.30) from St Marc Café at Vivocity, a freshly baked Danish with a mountain of vanilla ice cream and drizzling of caramel, is to live for.Their new version of Choco Banana Fuji ($7.30) just brings it up on another level, especially for those who feels that the caramel would have been too saccharine-sweet. Even though there is ice cream on the Danish, the pastry still remains quite fluffy with a light crunch.  Again, what could go wrong with chocolate, banana with soft serve?St Marc Café Marina Square
6 Raffles Boulevard, Marina Square  #02-105/184/185, Singapore 039594 ( City Hall MRT)
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pm DailyOther Japanese Cafe Entries
Saint Marc Café (Vivocity)
Dolce Tokyo (313 Somerset)
Nana’s Green Tea Café (Plaza Singapura)
Hoshino Coffee (Plaza Singapura)
5 Best Matcha Cafes in Singapore
2013-08-07 00:00:00
5 Stalls To Try At Hong Lim Market & Food Centre
“The more attractive the restaurant in Southeast Asia, the less likely it is to serve delicious food. There are, of course, exceptions to the rule, but they are shockingly scarce.” That is what Matt Goulding, the former food editor of Men’s Health, and the co-author of the New York Times bestselling series “Eat This, Not That” said.Sometimes, I have to agree with it.When he visited Singapore some months back and wanted a meal with me, I didn’t think twice. I wanted him to eat our Char Kway Tiao.We made our way to Hong Lim Market & Food Centre. Hong Lim has recently been known more for protests and speakers’ corner, but one mustn’t forget that the two storey food centre is a gathering of some of the best street food available in Singapore. Yet, it is often off the radar. People talk about Maxwell, Tiong Bahru, Newton, Chomp Chomp, but few yak about Hong Lim.Matt and I managed to gather some of the best food there from laksa, prawn noodles to tauhu goreng amidst the busy lunch crowd, one queued while the other ate and talked with some of the stall owners. Even though I did not cook any of the dishes, there was immense joy and pride while he took a mouthful of char kway tiao and said “This is freaking good stuff!”Outram Park Fried Kway Teow Mee #02-17, Opening Hours: 7am-3.30pm (Closed Sun & PH)
My optician used to be at Outram Park, and being short-sighted since the age of 5 meant I have been eating from this stall for a long long time. Uncle Ng used to sell at this corner coffeeshop (before that Metropole Cinema) where the entire space was filled with soot and smell. The entire plate was full of hum and pork lard which I would crunch to bits. It may explain for my obesity at primary school. Mr Ng Chin Chye has taken over the stall from his father.While it is not as smoky or oily than his father’s, his skills of executing a late of char kway teow full of wok hei cannot be undermined. He fries every plate individually, squeezing an exact 42 squeezes of a special mixture made of soy sauce and fish sauce. The result is dark black kway tiao almost evenly covered with moist egg, still smoking hot when served, still with some of those crispy pork lard.Tuck Kee Ipoh Sah Ho Fun #02-40, Opening Hours: 11am-3pm (Closed Sun)
Many come for their crayfish horfun, and it was sold out. We had the prawn and mushroom version instead, and found out that the winning combination is really the smooth thinner than usual horfun that would slide down as you eat, and the tasty sauce cooked with chicken bones and prawns. Instead of eating, you can slurp the noodles because it is soft, long yet not clumpy. Definitely one of the better versions around. But but but, the stall has recently been suspended by NEA due to roast infection. Yikes.Sungei Road Trishaw Laksa #02-66, Opening Hours: 10:30am-6:30pm Mon-Sat (Closed Sun) 
While I did not get clayfish from the last stall, I got it from this. The Asia Delight Laksa ($3/$4/$5.50 with crayfish) is also one of a kind. The gravy cooked using fresh coconut, scallops, dried oysters and dried prawns is rather sumptuous and flavourful, yet very very thin with texture like some chicken soup. It is not as ‘lemak’ (coconuty) or thick like the normal (unhealthier) ones, but taste is not compromised.Owner Mr Soo is also generous with the ingredients with fishcake, prawns, cockles, tau pok and slices of chicken added. He also has a strange, but rather appetizing fruit juice mee siam. Let’s be healthy.Ah Heng Curry Chicken Bee Hoon Mee #02-58
Heng Kee Curry Chicken Bee Hoon Mee downstairs are said to be the original and have a longer queue, but Ah Heng makes some calorie-worthy curry chicken noodles as well. You really don’t get good curry chicken noodles anywhere else but at Hong Lim.The chicken, like chopped Hainanese chicken,  is moist and tender, topped on a bowl of oily coconut-ty gravy. Plus generous portions of fish cake and taupok soaked within. While it is oily, it is not as heavy as the usual curries that it is possible to finish drinking. (I only said it is possible, but do go easy on them for the sake of your blood vessels.)Ji Ji Wanton Noodle Specialist, #02-48/49  Opening Hours: 8:00am – 7:00pm (Mon-Fri), 8:00am – 3:00pm (Sat) 
They have their own facebook page, and I saw a post where they exposed rude customers who did not pay for their meals. I say, good for them! Although Ji Ji have been around since 1965, they really propelled into fame when it won the “Favourite Hawker” in the wanton noodles category by a huge margin, beating all the usual suspects. I always go for their wanton noodles which has generous ingredients of char siew, wanton, mushrooms and even chicken slices. The very person who recommended me this stall, is actually my mother who never fails to ta-bao 3 packets home.Recently, I discovered that their soy sauce chicken wing and dumpling noodles are gems of their own. Their noodle texture is almost entirely different from all the other usual stalls, slightly thicker and moist. The last I visited, owner Auntie Lau says she had an operation and would be passing the business to her two daughters.Many stalls at Hong Lim continue to enjoy long queues. Some of which are Heng Kee Curry Chicken Bee Hoon Mee, High Street Tai Wah Pork Noodles, Ah Kow Mushroom Minced Pork Mee, and The Old Stall Hokkien Prawn Mee. Either their original bosses or children are holding the fort, so we have the assurance that these local delicacies are still in same hands, at least for a good number of years.Hong Lim Market & Food Centre
531A Upper Cross Street Singapore 051531 (8-10 min walk from Chinatown MRT)Other Related Entries
5 Stalls To Try at Maxwell Food Centre
2013-08-06 00:00:00
Tampopo Restaurant – The “Father of Tonkatsu” Pays Attention To Details
People know Tampopo as the Japanese restaurant serving ramen, sushi, tonkatsu and Kurobuta dishes. It is so named after the Dandelion flower, which stays strong and beautiful even in tough environments, and the Japanese comedy Tampopo, about a ramen seller who overcame all odds.“Staying strong despite all odds”, perhaps this can be used to describe Mr Takagi who started Tampopo as a small stall in Liang Court, and is now owner to a few restaurants.Few would know that Mr Takagi is a man of simple innovation, always looking out for new products to feature in his restaurant.He has the nickname of “Father of Tonkatsu” as he was the mastermind who brought tonkatsu out from Japan to Singapore way back in 1993. Same goes a new dish on its menu, layered Tonkatsu ($20.00-$23.00) pork which is popular in Yokohama, but seldom seen in Singapore.The usual tonkatsu involves frying the entire piece of breaded pork, while the layered cutlet lines thinly sliced pork together into a single cutlet and deep fried. The result – you don’t get a tough piece of meat and instead a lighter and leaner version which does not feel as heavy.Tampopo was also the first to introduce black pig kurobuta pork (which is known for its juiciness, flavour and tenderness) into Singapore in 2005. Prior to that Japan did not allow Berskhire pork to be exported to this part of the world.I like how simple things are added to the dishes to enhance the taste and even efficiency.Sometimes in other restaurants, we get fried items served on a separate dish, or worse within a soup dish where they would turn all soggy. Instead, the Fried Black Pig Koumi ($15.80) is served on top of a metal gauze attached to the ramen bowl. The fried pork still remains crisp, while all the ingredients are still served within the same bowl.A simple but smart way! Trust the Japanese to come up with that.7 years ago, Tampopo was already using a Point Of Sale system with a PDA device to enhance the ordering speed. Customers can request up to eight different preferences of their ramen (harder noodles, extra egg, no vegetables etc) and the order is sent directly to the kitchen via the PDA.The time saved in serving is more than 5 minutes. Time wastage is prevented in walking towards the kitchen to pass food order then to cashier passing the order chit. Hence the system has helped them to immediately attend the next customer without holding the previous customers’ order. The kitchen can also immediately prepare the order upon receiving.How many times have you ordered something until you found out much later it is sold out?At Tampopo, there would also be times when certain items are not available and the service staff may not be informed at the point of time especially peak period. The server can immediately inform the customer as the POS system has the “sold out” function.Many restaurants also have customer feedback forms to know where to improve. Guess where Tampopo prints their forms? At the back of the disposable chopsticks cover. That is both money and the trees saved!A few weeks back, labour chief Lim Swee Say created quite an online buzz revolving around the simple toothpicks – on how restaurants Din Tai Fung could be customer-centric in its attention to subtle things, from quality of food down to the finest details.Whether it is toothpicks, chopsticks cover, or metal gauze, that to me is paying attention to details. It’s the simplest things that make all that difference.Tampopo Restaurant Liang Court
#01-23/24 Liang Court 177 River Valley Road (10 min from Clarke Quay MRT) Tel: +65 6338 3186
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pm
2013-08-05 00:00:00
Nara Thai Cuisine – One of Bangkok’s Best, Opening in Singapore
[Bangkok, Thailand] Nara Thai Cuisine is the kind of restaurant for the richer Thais, which transforms the usual street food into posh versions, complete with beautiful and elegant plating. They are after all chosen as one of the Best restaurants in Thailand consistently, by Tatler Magazine that is.Nara restaurant was founded in 2003 by a group of female entrepreneurs, no wonder the lush royal purple colour scheme in the restaurant. The décor certainly combines a combination of traditional Thai extravagance meets modern chic. One thing about Thai restaurants, their attention to details from menu, service to setting is always top-notch.The customers at Central World seem to be a mixture of the well-to-do Thais from the higher society (you can see from their poise and dressing), expatriates and tourists.The cost of such dishes – Chicken Pandan (165 Baht, $6.70), Thai Fish Cakes (210 Baht, $8.50), Green Curry Chicken (220 Baht, $8.90), Phai Thai Noodles (190 Baht, $7.70). While the prices are considered reasonable in Singapore’s context, in relative dishes like this would have cost 30 to 40 Baht at a Bangkok food court.I had the Assorted Nara’s (300 Baht, $12.20), a platter of Crispy Fried Pork and Shrimp Wonton, Satay, Thai Fish Cakes, and Spring Rolls, complete with an orchid flower. In terms of the higher-scale restaurants in Bangkok (say those at Siam Paragon and Central World), Nara has one of the better offerings, with all the items quite appetising especially the satay.Though some may argue you can’t take street food out of the streets – it’s a different story all together.The other dishes such as Phad Thai Noodles (190 Baht, $7.70) and Green Curry Beef (220 Baht, $8.90) were decent choices, with some delicate final touches like the additional of crispy egg floss to the noodles which make the dish a little special than normal. The dishes are not as spicy and distinct as I would imagine to, most likely muted slightly to suit the palates of foreigners.Nara is most famous for its Sukothai Kuay Tiew, rice noodles in hot & spicy tom yum soup with roasted pork, pork ribs and shrimp balls so that is on my to-order list the next time.The good news for Singapore – Nara IS coming to Ion Orchard (replacing Burger King) in September. I won’t dare to imagine what the price is like, but I do hope they retain some of their magical touches.Nara Thai Cuisine
Level 7, Central World, Ratchadamri Road, Bangkok, Thailand (Nearest BTS Chit Lom) Tel: +662 613 1658-9
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pm
Other branches: Erawan Bangkok Lower Ground Floor, Eight Thonglor, Sukhumvit 55(Thonglor), WattanaOther Bangkok Entries
Nahm (Bangkok)
Greyhound Café (Bangkok)
MBK Foodcourt (Bangkok)
Platinum Fashion Mall Foodcourt (Bangkok)
2013-08-02 00:00:00
Craft Bakery & Café – 3 Inch Sin People Opens a Café at Holland Village
The 3 Inch Sin people who are known for their wondrously rich molten lava cakes have opened a new café at Holland Village.It is about time. Feels like Holland Village has a lot of ‘night places’ and dinner choices, and a chill-out café to to hang out for a coffee chat with friends and work on your laptop is always welcomed.They are about a week old, so probably still getting the hang of things. I immediately liked the vibes, nothing too pretentious, with rows of wholesome hand-crafted croissants, banana cakes and muffins on display in the shelf which reminds me of cafes in Australia.Food wise, it includes the usual salads, soups and sandwiches, though they also offer some mains such as Shepherd’s Pie ($13.60) Bacon Mac N Cheese ($12.50), Bangers and Mash ($17.00), Spicy Sausage in Arrabiata Sauce ($16.00) and Prawn Aglio Olio ($18.00).I thought to myself, “Other than molten lava cakes, this place needs some signature dishes. After all, people love some photogenic café food.”  And lady boss Celine pointed out to me The Craft Sandwich ($11.50) lost in the middle of menu. Yes.This Craft Sandwich consists of maple-candied bacon and green apple slaw on waffle grids. It was not as heavy as I would imagine to, and would make for perfect café food if there is a sunny side up in the middle. If you are a mustard lover, you would find the slaw mustardy-enjoyable.In celebration of their opening, they are offering a 1-for-1 deal on their mains and sandwiches during weekday lunches. So that’s a pretty good deal.Of course, you really shouldn’t leave this place till you tried the signature 3 Inch Sin Molten Cakes ($9.50) available in hazelnut, peanut butter, mint, caramelized banana and baileys. Their version really put many restaurants and cafes who offer the same thing to shame.I had the Caramelized Banana Molten Cake, and boy-oh-boy, it is so chocolaty-rich-potent you better share this temptation with your friends. Unless you want to get high on chocolates, which is kind of crafty.Craft Bakery & Café
24A Lorong Mambong Singapore 277183 (Holland Village, opp Haagen Dazs), Tel: +65 6467 7710Other Related Entries
3 Inch Sin (Millenia Walk)
Jewel Café + Bar (Rangoon Road)
Department of Caffeine (Duxton Road)
Flock Café (Tiong Bahru)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
2013-08-01 00:00:00
Bear Bites 熊の食 Singapore – Cute Taiwanese Bear Paw Burgers Arrives At Scape
Cute, cute, cute! From kitties to Minions, some Singaporeans would go all fuzzy over endearing adorable wide-eyed things that would sell off the shelves.The next that has arrived in Singapore at Scape are these Taiwanese-Chinese burgers Bear Bites 熊の食 with buns shaped and looking like a teddy bear paws. And you know you want to grab your hands (and your mouth) on one of those.First spotted it on Instagram with comments varying from “Sooooo cute”, to “Very cute” and “OMG cute”. I guess the vocabulary used to describe buns are limited. Let me go. They are “super cute”?The Bear Bites was first made popular in Taiwan’s Fengjia Night Market which is like THE street food market of Taiwan. The Taiwanese creator was touring Japan, spotted some Japanese type buns (which resembled our very own ‘kong bak pau’) and decided to create his own style with Western-meets-Asian ingredients. As for the bear paw print, it is iconic of Taiwan’s national animal – the Formosan Black Bear.Local friends Joseph and Benedict saw it being featured in a Taiwanese variety programme and decided to bring the brand to Singapore at the very youthful Scape.There are 3 simple steps to ordering the Bear Bites Burger
Step 1: Choose between Crispy Karaage Chicken and Oishi Fish Fillet
Step 2: Choose a bun – flavours include original milk, brown sugar, oat, yam, curry, squid ink and strawberry (seasonal)
Step 3: Choose a sauce – mushroom, tartar, Thai, honey mustard, black pepper, golden cheeseAt $7.80 for a chicken and $8.80 for fish set with drinks and fries (add $1 for cheese fries), the price is still quite youth-friendly, say compared to the fast-food restaurants.I personally thought the chicken set was the tastier of the two, with the meat chunkier and complements better with the soft pillow-like bun. Portion, at twice the size of a usual ‘kong-bak-pau’, is actually quite huge and makes for a filling meal.The fish was not as fresh and chunky as I would have loved it to, but still rather satisfying as it was not dry like some other places would offer. Warning: eating this would be a messy affair as the sauce would spill. Maybe a thicker less watery sauce would help.Only drawback is that it is at an outdoor area and you really got to watch up for falling ‘things’ at Somerset Orchard in the evening. There are things bear paws can’t drive away.Going to make a wild prediction. I guess these Bear Bites 熊の食 burgers are going to be quite popular and would start surfacing on your Instagram feed because everybody loves some photogenic food.And you would go, “Beary Cute”?Bear Bites Singapore
*Scape, 2 Orchard Link #02-42 (outdoor area behind Old Chang Kee), Somerset Singapore 237978
Opening Hours: 10:30am – 10:30pmOther Taiwanese Entries
Sweet Musings (The Star Vista)
Lee’s Taiwanese (JEM)
Hot Star Fried Chicken (City Square Mall)
Blackball (Star Vista) 
Bing Bian (Millenia Walk)
2013-07-31 00:00:00
Lee’s Taiwanese – Almost Close to Authentic Taste of Taiwan
You would hardly not take note of the décor of Lee’s Taiwanese if you are at Star Vista, gaudy red lanterns hanging down from the ceilings. The same flashy lanterns are the design feature at its new branch at JEM.The décor does remind your of the street nights of Taiwan (oh, how I miss Taiwan!), said to be inspired by the popular Keelung Temple Street night market.Opened by Taiwanese Fiona Lee, the food is quite authentically Taiwanese, which includes the soupy Beef Noodles, Mee Sua, Pork Belly Buns, Pan Fried Dumplings and ice desserts.I find the choices of Taiwanese food in Singapore quite limited, with not many eateries selling an extensive range of Taiwanese street food, most mainly restricted to kiosks offering fried chicken and bubble tea.First look at the menu “Wah, so expensive.” The Pig Intestines and Meat Ball Mee Sua is $10, and I am suddenly reminded of my Ah Zong Mian Xian  which is like NT50 for a big bowl ($2.10). Okay, this is Singapore  (rental, labour, the sauces are imported from Taiwan), so cannot compare.I got a Premium Set Meal at $18.80 which includes a main dish, appetizer and drink, as it seems more value-for-money. (After all the taxes, you are reminded you are paying close to $25 for mee sua, a small side and bubble tea.)Actually, while I was initially very skeptical, the Mee Sua really taste better than exepected. While the price is also ‘premium’, I thoroughly enjoyed the texture and taste which has hints of garlic, vinegar and some spices. It is not Ah Zong standard yet, but good enough for me.The pig intestines are braised till soft, with none of that appalling ‘pig smell’, and the pork balls add a bouncy savoury touch to the bowl. This is quite comfort food.The Braised Minced Pork Rice does remind me of those I had in some of the Taiwanese street markets, it has that simple home-cooked flavour. Not the best, though very close.Some of the stalls in Singapore would make the rice either too plain (not enough ingredients and sauce) or too salty, Lee Taiwanese hits the right note on making its dishes uncomplicated, with that close to authentic feel of Taiwan, though I can imagine some local customers may feel the dishes are not intense enough.Lee’s Taiwanese
JEM 50 Jurong Gateway Road #03-05/06 Singapore 609549 (Jurong East MRT), Tel: +65 6694 1588
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pm (Mon-Sun)The Star Vista 1 Vista Exchange Green #02-08 Singapore 138617 (Buona Vista MRT), Tel: +65 6694 4869
Opening Hours 11:30am-10:00pm  (Sun-Thurs), 11:30am-11:0pm (Fri-Sat, PH)Other Taiwanese Entries
Sweet Musings (The Star Vista)
Xi Men Ding (Vivocity)
Lu Gang Xiao Zhen (Ion Orchard)
Hot Star Fried Chicken (City Square Mall)
Blackball (Star Vista)
2013-07-30 00:00:00
Tsukada Nojo – Amazing Beauty Pot Opens 2nd Branch at Chinatown Point
Many could not believe that Tsukado Nojo indicated “closed” and “full house” at 7pm. There were still 3 more hours to closing. Well sir, I got my reservation at 5:30pm, and only managed to get in for my collagen soup after an hour’s wait.Moral of the story: Register your name at the counter, give them your number for them to sms, and come back after you are done with shopping. That would mean an hour or two. No queue but they are always full.Tsukada Nojo has opened its 2nd branch in Singapore after the Plaza Singapura branch got insanely popular. They are best known for their Bijin Nabe ($25 for 1 pax) – a “Beauty Pot” of collagen-rich organic chicken broth, and ingredients of prawns, fresh organic vegetables mushroom and chicken meatballs.For those who haven’t tried their Bijin Nabe, you may go “oh my goodness what is this” when you are first served with a pot with lumps of white smooth silky pudding.That big pile is fats, I mean collagen. And watch it melt-melt-melt into a boiling pot of divine chicken broth after heated. (Read: More collagen goodness)Having hotpot never seems this fun, and guilty. Half the time, I was thinking “Am I really going to eat that lump of white?”The broth is cooked using no ordinary chicken.  This is the Jidori chicken.Jidori what? The Jidori chicken is a valuable ‘brand chicken’ in Japan, raised organically with stringent quality standards. The soup is transported all the way from Japan – super. And it really tastes nutritious, rich and extremely flavourful.Of all the ingredients of prawns and vegetables (which are in small quantities but fresh), my favourite is the Tori Tsukune where chicken meatballs is scooped out a wooden spatula. I was in luck, because the waitress was a sweet kawaii Japanese girl, and super friendly.Tsukada Nojo’s Bijin Nabe cannot be your regular food though. Too much of a good thing may prove too lush. Some may say the broth is too salty and thick – but I still love it to bits. The meal simply makes me feel comforted and full of bliss, extremely satisfied.I am quite willing to wait an hour for this (anyway, you can always shop at Daiso downstairs). The Beauty pot is only available dinner-time. Please reserve early to avoid disappointment!Tsukada Nojo Bijin Nabe 美人锅
133 New Bridge Road #02-37 Chinatown Point Tel: +65 6444 8840 (Chinatown MRT)
Opening Hours: 11:30am-3:00pm, 5:00pm-10:00pmOther Related Entries
Danro Japanese Hotpot (NEX)
Shabu Sai (Orchard Central)
Teppei Japanese Restaurant (Orchid Hotel)
Sho Teppan (Ion Orchard)
Tamoya Udon (Liang Court)
2013-07-29 00:00:00
Menzo Butao – Ramen Shop at Marina Square’s New Dining Edition
Marina Square has recently undergone a $15 million with a dedicated food-restaurant section called The Dining Edition – featuring 16 mid-to-upscale restaurants and cafés.Several of these are new-to-local market brands like Lady M, Carnivore Appetite, Nuvo, Saigon Lotus, Shallots, Supreme Tastes Jiang Nan Cuisine and Hamanoya. Good excuse for Singaporeans to visit this slightly-forgotten mall.If you read this blog long enough, it isn’t hard to predict the first restaurant I would patronise would be a ramen shop. Menzo Butao is new ramen brand in Singapore, though its founder, Mr Yasuhiko Kurata is already well-known ramen producer in Japan with more than 23 branches  in Japan and overseas.Menzo Butao’s offerings at first glance feels suspiciously like Menya Musashi with three soup bases of Butaõ (White), Kuroõ (Black) and Akaõ (Red).The suspicion was confirmed when I found out that they were brought in by the same people behind Ajisen and Menya Musashi.Other than Hakata style ramen, which has the straight, thin, resilient noodles, they also offer the Hokkaido style which is thicker and curlier.I was recommended the Kuroō Taro Ramen ($14.90), which soup is said to be boiled for over 14 hours with pork bones from Kagoshima, and the black broth as fried shallots and vegetable oil added which makes it more fragrant.  I usually have no problem finish ramen broths, though this version felt a little heavy and ‘too-much’.The Hokkaido style Gyokai Seafood Ramen ($13.90) was passable, but forgettable. The soup lacked the warm ‘oomph’ and noodles could have been cooked slightly springier.Overall, Menzo Butao’s ramen is o-kay. The menu has a huge offering, with close to 30 variations of ramen. But correct me if I am wrong. To me, the better ramen shops in Singapore just serve a few items, and do each one really well.Menzo Butao
Marina Square #02-180 Tel: +65 6338 0840
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pm DailyOther Ramen Entries
Ramen Kagetsu Arashi (The Star Vista) 
Keisuke Tonkotsu King Four Seasons (Bugis Village)
Daruma Ramen House (TripleOne Somerset)
Menya Sanji (Orchid Hotel, Tanjong Pagar)
Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen (Novena Square 2)
2013-07-25 00:00:00
Sydney Fish Market – Fans of Seafood, This is a Must-Visit in Sydney
[Sydney, Australia] Blue skies, seagulls roaming free, sitting in the open having crispy freshhhhh fish and chips… If there is one place that I would go back to Sydney again, it would be the Sydney Fish Market.Established in 1966 and located on Blackwattle Bay, this is one of the largest working fishing port (after Japan) and wholesale fish market. And it includes a fresh seafood retail section and eateries where you can order fresh seafood and have them cooked on the spot – deep fried, grilled, fried or sashimi style.Maybe you would think it is just another fish market. But it is all about sights, sounds and can I add smell (?) that makes this one of the must-visits in Sydney.Our group was there early in the morning (10am – still not too early) to avoid the busy lunch-time crowd where tourists would flock to the area.There are many retailers such as Claudio’s, De Costi, Doyle’s, Nicholas Seafoods, but according to a friend who goes to Sydney every year – Peter’s Fish Market is one of the most vibrant and cooks the best seafood.You can just walk round and round like touring a supermarket where the colours and freshness of the seafood will really thrill you (at least for me). Prawns, clayfish, giant lobsters, oysters, salmon, scallops, sea urchins, squids, trouts, tunas, crabs… this is almost seafood haven. Look out for discounted rates!Prices are not too expensive as well, with a typical Fish and Chips or Mixed Seafood Grill costing about AUD$15 to $20. We had seen families ordering large-sized platters for AUD$50 which was stacked with chunks of fish like a jenga game.Sometimes we would wonder why the Westerners would go for the al fresco dining in perpetually hot summer Singapore (And we may laugh at them). Here, we get a bunch of Singaporeans and Asians choosing to sit at the outdoor area (while I noticed the Australians would see inside) where your fresh oysters could be attacked by flying seagulls. Mind you, they ‘attack’ in packs.Amidst the screams from the attack from birdies, your lunch could end up in the seagull’s beak, or you could literally find yourself in a shitty situation (seagull poop), but people still choose to sit outdoors. There is an unspeakable charm in feeling free and relaxed there and then. Oh no, I miss Sydney so so much.How To Get To Sydney Fish Market 
Catch the Metro Light Rail from Central Station, Haymarket or Darling Harbour to the Fish Market stop which is located across the road from the Market. Services run every 10 – 15 mins from 6:00 am to 11:00 pm (12:10 am Friday & Saturday) from Central and 6:00am to 11:20 pm (12:30 am Friday & Saturday) from Lilyfield.Behind the Scenes Tours are held every Monday, Thursday and Friday at 6.40 am – bookings are required to avoid disappointment (meet outside Doyle’s).Sydney Fish Market
Bank St Pyrmont (Fish Market Stop on Metro Light Rail), Blackwattle Bay N.S.W. 2009, Sydney Australia Tel: 02 9004 1100
Opening Hours: 7am – 4pm
2013-07-23 00:00:00
The Clan Restaurant – Quality Fine Dining Made More Affordable
The waiter at The Clan Restaurant asked, “Are you single?” I was a little surprised because my question was what starters he would recommend. And I replied both of us are single.“Then you should try the Oyster in 3 Ways. Single men should eat fresh oysters.”We nearly burst out laughing, but stopped in our tracks because the entire restaurant seemed a little quiet and tranquil, filled with romance in the air. With that said, this is one waiter who is candid, friendly, funny and very knowledgeable about the menu. Give him the ‘Funny Waiter of The Year’ award please.Before I go on, The Clan Restaurant is highly recommended. The 6 course degustation dinner menu is at $65.80++ (5 course lunch at $45.80++), and we are not even talking about some ordinary food.It is nestled in the conservation area of Bukit Pasoh, with an elegance décor, serving quite an elaborate menu of contemporary east-meets-west fusion cuisine, modern European dishes with Asian touches.I had a New Style Sashimi, which is a re-invention of the usual Japanese raw fish, with Hamachi drizzled with Ponzu Sauce & Orange Salsa. Kind of refreshing and makes an enjoyable starter with the blend of tastes.The Crab Bisque Cappuccino was served in a wine glass with a Prawn Twister, a rather frothy soup that strikes a smooth balance – not too seafoody, and not too light.The Clan’s Restaurant recommended main is the 48 Hours Beef Short Ribs served on top on Hoba Leaf with Pepperorn Sauce on a hot Lava Stone. Presentation was not the usual hot plate, and you may find it a challenge not to overcook the beef on an ashy leaf and some slices could get stuck on the stone. (Yikes!) We both thought it was the sauce that saved this dish.I thoroughly enjoyed the Lobster Crustacean Oil Pasta, one of the newer dishes on the menu – suitable al-dente-ness, generous servings of lobster, and the sauce not being overpowering.Having been to a few overpriced restaurants with disappointing food, The Clan Restaurant is indeed a fresh breath of air with its quality food, intimate ambience and attentive service.I know I have recommended a few date places, but this is really one respectable restaurant to have one of those birthday dinners with your husband/wife/boyfriend/girlfriend/prospective date/close friend.When I looked around, there must be at least 10 couples around, all dressed like they were attending their best prom night, 3 or 4 of whom were celebrating birthdays. I know because the sliced cake with candle keeps coming out.The table next to us was also celebrating a birthday. The girl (wife? girlfriend?) did not want to sing the birthday song to the guy (ohhhhh… …) and guess what, that same waiter who served us got down to sing it! Slightly awkward, but is this good service or what?The Clan Restaurant
18/20 Bukit Pasoh Road Singapore 089832 (Outram Park MRT) Tel: +65 6222 2084
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 2:30pm, 6pm – 11pm DailyOther Related Entries
Jaan (Swissotel the Stamford)
Masons (Gillman Village)
The Sleeping Rhino (Klapsons Hotel)
Jamie’s Italian Singapore (Vivocity)
The Ascot (The Grandstand)
2013-07-22 00:00:00
The Sleeping Rhino – Klapsons’ New Restaurant. Any Idea Why The Rhino Is Sleeping?
The choice to dine at The Sleeping Rhino was purely for its name, for it intrigues me enough. I wished there was a fanciful story – there’s wasn’t. T.S.R is a new casual bistro-styled restaurant at The Klapsons boutique hotel replacing Lucas, previously higher-end in its concept.Generally the vibes are good – the entrance is flushed with a bright purple hue, with lounge music and an urban-chic décor which reminds me of some of the cool-looking restaurants I have seen in Bangkok.Price is slightly on the high side. The mains such as Crispy Duck Confit ($32), Double-Cooked Pork Rib ($28.50), New York Striploin ($28), Blackened Snapper ($26), Arboria Risotto ($20.50) to the local dishes such as Claypot Herbal Chicken ($23), Lobster Hor Fun ($32) are all above $20.The less pricey items are the Classic Fish and Chips ($18.5) and Yang Chow Fried Rice ($17.50), though still a few dollars more than I wished to pay. Fortunately, I had the Palate Card which offered a 50% discount for two so it did not feel like a huge pinch.There was no indication on The Sleeping Rhino’s menu which were the recommended items so I asked the service staff, “Our signatures depends on what you like to eat. They are all good.” He was at least trying hard.For starters, we had the Crispy Chicken Wings ($13), the way it was cooked reminded me of the local ‘har cheong gai’, and it came with quite a tasty and addictive onion sambal chill. Great stuff.The Claypot Laksa ($18) felt disappointing on the first few bites, perhaps not in line with what was expected. While pot was very fragrant, the gravy was not ‘lemak’ (coconut-y) enough and felt too thin, as though the X-factor is missing from the pot. At least there were generous portions of mussels and prawns, and the flavours gradually grow on you.The Slow-Roasted Lamb Shank ($28) with couscous and seasonal vegetables was decent, cooked until they are almost-fall-apart tender, complimented by its rich sauce poured over.When you remember a restaurant for its catchy name more than its food, then they probably got something to worry about. The Sleeping Rhino has great vibes in a cool way, though the lack of some distinct signatures, matched with its slightly steep price may keep this rhino asleep.So anybody can make a good guess why the rhino is still sleeping?The Sleeping Rhino
15 Hoe Chiang Rd,Lucas, Tower Fifteen, Klapsons, The Boutique Hotel Singapore 089316 (Tanjong Pagar MRT), Tel: +65 6521 9001
Opening Hours: 7am – 10:30pm (Mon-Fri), 7am-11am, 6pm-10:30pm (Sat)Other Related Entries
PappaSan (Dorsett Hotel)
Madam Kwan’s (Vivocity)
Kopi Tiam (Swisstel The Stamford)
Prima Taste Kitchen (Centrepoint)
The Academy Bistro (Supreme Court)
2013-07-18 00:00:00
Jamie’s Italian Singapore – Great Vibes, Good Desserts, Some Okay Pastas
[Is it true that this is a case where Jamie Oliver the person is better known than his food? Perhaps.If you have not heard of Jamie Oliver (or James Trevor Oliver), he is a British celebrity chef, restaurateur, cooking show host, cook book author, and campaigner against processed foods in national schools.He is somebody I personally look up to. And that if one day I am influential enough to advocate healthy food in Singapore’s schools, I will.Jamie Oliver’s first restaurant in South-East Asia has opened at Singapore’s Vivocity. He is better known for his Italian dishes, many offered in this flagship store said to offer a taste of Italian traditions “peppered with twists of originality”.In line with Jamie Oliver’s beliefs, only free-range, sustainably sourced produce are used, and all pasta is made fresh daily onsite.I went during an off-peak hour and walked right in, though as I came out a long queue outside has formed. Online reservations are advised to be made via www.jamiesitalian.sg.This new restaurant is buzzling of energy, a rarer side of Singapore where finding people to work in F&B service line is a huge challenge. There is a 100-man team, and thus this place is full of Jamie’s staff walking about, filling waters, serving dishes, checking on customers. Service was excellent, staff were definitely well-trained.No chi chi high end pretense, it’s lively-casual, Absolutely loved the enthusiastic spirited vibes. If there is no haze, try going for the 40-seat al fresco dining area facing Resorts World on the other side.Recommended pastas include the Tagliatelle Bolognese ($15.00/$22.00), with beef and pork ragù and hints of Chianti and fragrant rosemary, and Prawn Linguine ($17.00/$25.00), with fried garlicky prawns and shaved fennel.The Tagliatelle Bolognese is easily the better tasting of the two, the minced meat evenly prepared not overpowering the pasta. You start to appreciate freshly-made pasta, still chewy but excludes that artificial springy bite. Better than average.Maybe it was expectations not met. I wished there were bigger prawns in the linguine. I wished the sauce was tangier. I wished it was a bigger portion (My fault, I ordered small though I finished in 4 quick successive bites.) I never imagined myself saying this at a Jamie Oliver’s, but I wished it was less oily.First bite off The Jamie’s Italian Burger ($27.50), I gave it a 10/10 – ohhhh, it was moist, juicy, huge, with a fragrant grain bun – I loved. Though on my subsequent bites, I noticed something amiss. Parts of the bun and wagyu steak patty were burnt, giving this slight ashy bitter savour which was really not satisfying.Save the best for last. The desserts – a Creamy Panna Cotta ($9) with fruit compote and medley of berries, was easily one of the best locally I had. The texture was smoothly rich, sliding down the throat with the berries adding an oomph.You know what? It does not really matter if the food was not too perfect, and seemed rather underwhelming. It is Jamie Oliver! People will still come.Jamie’s Italian Kitchen
1 Harbourfront Walk #01 165-167, VivoCity Singapore 098585 (Harbourfront MRT) Tel:  +65 6733 5500 Reservations: www.jamiesitalian.sg
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 11:00pmOther Italian Restaurant Entries
La Brezza (St Regis)
Limoncello Restaurant (Robertson Quay)
Da Paolo Bistrobar (Rochester Park)
il Cielo (Hilton Hotel Singapore) 
Pete’s Place (Hyatt Hotel)
2013-07-17 00:00:00
Single Origin Roasters – Here’s Where To Get Coffee At Sydney
[Sydney, Australia] My room-mate Kenny goes to Single Origin Roasters EVERY SINGLE DAY when we were in Sydney for Hillsong. In fact, I think we picked that hostel only because it was near Single Origin.“Don’t you want to try xxx and yyy café?”  My persuasion techniques do not seem to work well. It does not matter which award-winning café or barista I sprout out, or there are probably 10 other cafes at Surry Hills vicinity, Kenny just wants to go to Single Origin. No other cafes.For the record, the coffee (whichever we ordered) were top-notch with beautiful coffee-art, a layered taste of coffee at its finest with a whiff of aroma, it is confirm-guarantee-chop one of the best coffees I had ever. I can’t say it is the best in Sydney because I haven’t had that many cups.The boys, owners Dion and Emma Cohen founded the roasters in 2003, and have expanded the business with a 120kg roaster at a warehouse in Alexandria and a café in a serene Surry Hills. People have called their coffee ‘legendary’.They make their espresso extractions using eighteen gram baskets and modified “sawn-off” handles as they believed it was the best way to deliver a full-favoured cup.We sat on wooden seats laid on the street side, and did not seem quite to mind in the morning as it was 15 degrees celsius. The baristas were extremely funny and posed for me, rather amused at another Asian blogger wielding a mega-camera. “Why are you taking pictures of my food? Take a picture of me!”The winter breakfast offerings were lovely, from Bacon & Egg Sanga with Melted Cheddar (AUD$14.50) which comes with biodynamic egg, or Slow Poached Egg on Toast (AUD$4.00).The girls were all fans of the Banana Bread ($5.50), coming with espresso butter which really means Single Origin Roasters took Pepe Saya butter and added an espresso shot within. The result was a moist and fragrant, but expensive slide of bread. That’s not stopping the girls from taking (that) away every single day.One week has gone by, and I am really missing my coffee at Single Origin Roasters, sitting on the wooden stool watching the world go by. Kenny, it’s your fault.Single Origin Roasters
60-64 Reservoir St, Surry Hills NSW 2010, Sydney Australia (Central Station), Tel: +61 2 9211 0665
Opening Hours: 6:30am – 4:00pm Mon-Fri (Sat-Sun closed)
2013-07-16 00:00:00
Red House Seafood – Sweet Tangy Chilli Crab at Prinsep Street
The Gordon Ramsay vs Hawker Heroes cookoff rekindled my love for chilli crab, possibly one of Singapore’s most iconic dish presented to the world out there.Who’s the best is really subjective – some prefer ketchup-y, some egg-y, some with spiciness that ‘shioks’ down your throat. My guess is most would prefer our chilli crabs with generous servings of ‘chup’ (sauce) to pour over fragrant rice or dipped with ‘mantou’ (bun).Red House Seafood, which is established way back in 1976, just opened its third outlet at Prinsep Street. The family run business which first restaurant in a Upper East Coast Road, is quite known for its Crab in Red House Chiili Stew. While price of crabs is seasonal, a kilo of Sri Lankan Mud Crab will set you back by about $55-58.When presented, their crab sauce indeed abundantly covers the crabs, so much that you can probably dip two dozen ‘mantou’ and still find some leftover. If sweet tangy tomato-like sauce without much spiciness is your kind of thing, then you probably enjoy Red House’s version. Plus point: It does not become overly gooey or clog up even if you leave the dish there for a while.Crab meat was thick, sweet and fleshy, and you may find yourself in a finger-licking situation. Don’t struggle with using fork and knife, just use your hands when eating crabs!The Wok-Fried Crab tossed in Black Pepper on the other kind felt kind of ordinary, as the crab flesh felt kind of dried up and could be a lot juicier. Maybe it is just me. But more wok hei please.The dish that really got the entire table going “Yes” during the tasting was the Tiger Prawns with Signature Creamy Custard Sauce ($7 per 100grams). It was Yes for the delightful sauce which is one level up the usual cream-mayo, and would have been perfect if the prawns were not slightly overcooked.Red House Seafood at Prinsep Street has a décor not like the usual traditional Chinese restaurants, rather contemporary at parts with a huge space on the second storey for more private rooms. In relative terms, the price is a tad higher but the quality is there. It has afterall been around for close to 40 years.Red House Seafood
68 Prinsep Street Singapore 63366080, Tel: +65 6336 6080
Other branches: Blk 1204 East Coast Seafood Centre #01-05,
The Quayside 60 Robertson Quay #01-13
Opening Hours: 11:30am-2:30pm; 5pm-11pm (Mon to Fri), 11am-3pm; 5pm-11pm (Sat, Sun, PH)Other Chinese Restaurant Entries
Majestic Bay Seafood Restaurant (Gardens by The Bay)
The Boxing Crabs (Sentosa)
Putien (City Square Mall)
Peach Blossom (Marina Mandarin)
Min Jiang (Goodwood Park Hotel)
2013-07-15 00:00:00
Sushi Kou – $50 Omakase Meal? Make Your Bookings
Part of me is wondering if I added to the already long waiting list for an Omakase at Teppei. The first time I was there, my reservation for a $40 omakase was in a few days. I blogged it as my “favourite new restaurant of 2012” (You would probably land on this blog if you search Teppei on Google.)The last I knew, the wait list is 2 to 3 months. Gosh.And so I went two doors away, to a spanker cleaner Sushi Kou which just opened at Orchid Hotel, offering omakase at a ridiculously low price of $50.  Most omakase meals in Singapore would set you back by $100-$300. (Abe’s Diner’s omakase is $38 though.)If you are thinking “Teppei copycat”, Sushi Kou is really quite different. Teppei is vibrant, energetic with all the action in full view. Sushi Kou has a woody down-to-earth look with a 14-seater sushi counter, giving the vibes of a mid-high end Japanese restaurant.I chose to sit at the sushi counter. The choice is obvious. You can chat with the chef Naokatsu Koda who hails from Tokyo and also opened Rakuzen, and is very humorous and candid, providing explanations if you need to. (Ladies, he looks kind of good too in a Japanese way.)Chef Koda called me “a shy” as he saw me armed with a big camera “Only you I allow pictures. The rest no-no.”The $50 omakase is a 5-course meal which comes with soup and dessert.I wasn’t expecting much, until the Sashimi Moriaswase was served. Is THIS what I am getting? I would pay $50 for this alone! The salmon, maguro, and hirame were all thick fresh slices, beautifully plated with ebi and roe on ice. A piece of art with so much pride!The last time I had an Ayu Fish was at Ryugin and it is not commonly valuable in local restaurants. Chef personally taught us how to remove the bones (remove the entire thing from its tail), and enjoy the part-sweet-part-bitter fish.Just when I thought the meal could not get any more ‘exotic’, we were presented with a deep fried hamo fish tempura style. Never had it before? It is a seasonal summer delicacy from Kansai, called the pike eel and thus had a texture like a tougher piece of unagi. The hamo did not make me a fan, perhaps I was not used to the taste, so it was just-okay.Nevertheless, every dish was consistently pleasant, not the highest quality, but definitely a level better than all the average Japanese restaurants out there. $50 Omakase? $50 for all these? I can expect the word to spread around soon. Make your bookings!Sushi Kou
#01-16 Orchid Hotel, 1 Tras Link, Singapore 078867 (Tanjong Pagar MRT) Tel: +65 6444 8433
Opening Hours: 11:30am-3:00pm, 6:00pm – 10:30pmOther Japanese Restaurant Entries
Teppei Japanese Restaurant (Orchid Hotel)
Abe’s Diner
Waku Ghin (Marina Bay Sands)
Ryoshi Sushi Ikeikemaru (Liang Court)
Ezoca (Quayside Isle)
2013-07-12 00:00:00
LaBrezza – For a Romantic Italian Date Meal at St Regis
The age old question of “Where should I bring my date for dinner?” LaBrezza at St. Regis may not be your choice of a first day dinner (it’s too high class for the uncertainly in a partner) but could be one to celebrate important dates like month-saries and anniversaries.It has some elegant touches – set in a branded luxury hotel of St Regis, the restaurant is right next to a pool, has a semi-casual classic setting, serving fine trattoria-style Italian cuisine. Mamamia.Yet, the vibes do not feel overly high-end, comfortable enough for a business lunch at more affordable prices of $38++ or $48++.The all-new ala carte menu is created by Chef de Cuisine Stefano Arrigoni, a jovial man who brings about distinctive styles from various regions of Italy with some contemporary interpretations.There are some of the usual appetizing sounding dishes – Homemade Burrata filled with Tomato Datterino ($48), Mozzarella, Italian Sausage and Shaved Black Truffle thin-crust Pizza ($39), and Grilled Dutch Veal Rack marinated with Mediterranean Herbs ($46).Some of the dishes that may take your breath away… the Pan-seared Hokkaido Scallops wrapped in Pancetta with Truffled Angel Hair Pasta and Caviar Sauce ($32). The price jumped at me a little. I did find something chewing on the succulence of the scallop, but I wondered about the price for a long time as well.Reminder, this is St Regis.If you want to indulge, the Risotto ($38) that came in a striking dark-purple colour, cooked via distinctly rich and fragrant Barolo Wine, Sous Vide Oxtail and Sweet Saba Reduction, was every mouthful a pleasure of multi-layered tastes lingering in the tongue without being overly cloying. Never had purplish-coloured food taste this good.The Venezian Tiramisu with Bitter Dark Chocolate Flakes ($12) had a rather characteristic look and taste, not being overly-polished with retained some of the homely rustic feel. Always end with a sweet touch at the end of the date.Most of the dishes I had at La Brezza were above average, definitely better than the usual Italian restaurants. The price-point, personally felt disproportionate and could do with some minor reduction, perhaps the main thing stopping me from coming back again and again.I maintain, that La Brezza is the type of restaurant for that occasional date splurge.LaBrezza Restaurant
St Regis, 29 Tanglin Road Singapore 247911, Tel: +65 6506 6888
Opening Hours: 12pm – 10pm DailyOther Italian Restaurant Entries
il Cielo (Hilton Hotel Singapore) 
Pete’s Place (Hyatt Hotel)
Garibaldi (Purvis Street)
Da Paolo Bistrobar (Rochester Park)
Caffe B (Marina Bay Sands)
2013-07-11 00:00:00
Imperial Treasure Shanghai Cuisine – New Restaurant A Xiao Long Bao Above The Rest
I don’t always have faith in many dim sum restaurants, but always have confidence in Imperial Treasure’s dim sum offerings. For example, the Super Peking Duck branch at Paragon, they seldom do wrong.The chain just opened a new concept Imperial Treasure Shanghai at Ngee Ann City, taking over Coca steamboat restaurant. Its Chinese name is called “Yu Yuan”, also the name of the famous garden at the old city of Shanghai.You won’t miss the cocoon-like booth seats from afar, looking rather classy and elegant. I got to sit in one of the booths. The good is it provides a rather private dining experience. The bad? It’s very hot. And almost one of the few times I sweat throughout a meal. The waitress told us the seats behind were worse.Normally in most Chinese restaurants, you get one or two mediocre dishes at least. We were gladly surprised that out of 7-8 dishes were ordered, every single one was delicious and we couldn’t really fault any. (I had some additional stress as it was a birthday treat for a friend.)The Shanghai Steamed Pork Dumpling ($7.80 for 6 pieces) was almost in a perfect state – thinly wrapped, abundant flavoursome soup, fresh pork without the ‘porky-ness’, and it does not break easily. The skin was really delicate, suggesting the chefs were highly skilled. The three of us ordered two baskets in the end.Both Lamian we ordered – Lamian with Eight Treasure Spicy Sauce ($9) and Stewed Noodles in Soup with Shrimp ($12), were delicious as the finely hand-pulled noodles trickles down the throat. The former wich had more robust taste is my personal recommendation. This was better than the offerings are the usual branches.Since the cuisine is primary Shanghai, try some of their culturally authentic dishes such as Braised Meat Ball ($16) otherwise known as “Lion’s head”, or their Shanghainese Fried Rice where every grain is fragrant with no clumps. To me, fried rice is one of the hardest Chinese dish to perfect.I seldom sing such praises of Chinese restaurants in Singapore. Perhaps I had some bad experiences in the other known brands, and Imperial Treasure Shanghai Cuisine is indeed a xiao long bao, I mean a cut above the rest.Imperial Treasure Shanghai Cuisine
Takashimaya S.C., #04-22, 391 Orchard Road, Singapore 238872
sh_nac4@imperialtreasure.com, Tel: +65 6836 6909
Opening Hours: 11:30 – 3:00pm, 6:00pm – 10:30pm (Mon-Fri), 11:00am-2:30pm, 6:00pm-11:00pm (Sat), 10:30am-2:30pm, 6:00pm-11:00pm (Sun)Other Chinese Restaurant Entries
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
Imperial Treasure Steamboat Restaurant (TripleOne Somerset)
Crystal Jade Jiangnan (Vivocity)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (Beach Road)
Crystal Jade Pristine (Scotts Square)
2013-07-10 00:00:00
My SG Memory Bank – Old Chinese Restaurants in Singapore
The Singapore Memory Project SMP is a movement to capture and document precious memories related to Singapore, and hopefully these memories would be archives for future generations of Singapore.There is a SG Memory Bank on FaceBook where you can easily deposit your photo collection using pictures from Desktop, FaceBook itself or Instagram.Feeling nostalgic, I have decided to upload some 30 food photos from some of my favourite old Chinese restaurants in Singapore on the gallery – some of them are the most traditional Hokkien and Teochew restaurants.Why so? Because since papa is Hokkien and mummy is Teochew (that makes me half-Hokkien-half-Teochew), I grew up with some of these familiar foods, and many of these restaurants still contain the same kind of décor and old-school charm, which is perhaps fast disappearing.Of course going to these restaurants in the past was quite a luxury, perhaps only once or twice a year during birthdays and wedding dinners.  Rather celebratory of sorts, every moment there was usually a happy one and reminds me of the togetherness as one whole extended family – you know, when my ah gong and ah mum would gather all their grandchildren together.Steam Pomfret at Swa Garden Restaurant MacPherson Road. If your mother is a traditional Teochew, you would get steamed fish all the time for your celebratory family meals.I love love love all the authentic Hokkien Cuisine at Beng Hiang Amoy Street such as Kong Ba Bao, Black Hokkien Mee, Fish Maw Soup, Oyster Omelet and of course, Prawn Roll. People still hold wedding dinners here you know?My dad always brought me for Teochew Muay at Bt Ho Swee. There is a well-visited Teochew restaurant Mu Liang Zai Liang Kee, known for its afforable and delicious braised duck.Red House Seafood was established in 1976 (older than me) and one of its earlier signature dish is their barbecued squid.Talk about Ka-Soh, and most of the older generation would know it by its fresh fishhead noodles with generous servings.If you want to contribute to the SG Memory Bank, here’s how you submit your photo memories
Step 1: Visit SG Memory Bank on your smartphone or computer
Step 2: Access your Facebook / Instagram accounts or upload photos from your desktop
Step 3: Select your photos and edit your captions
Step 4: Upload!Do submit your photos because there is a weekly lucky draw for users to win $200 vouchers who submit 30 photos or more.Submit your Memories now!
2013-07-08 00:00:00
Quay – At Australian’s No.1 Restaurant, the Snow Egg & Eight Texture Chocolate Cake Steals The Thunder
[Sydney, Australia] There we were, at ‘undisputedly’ Australia’s Top Restaurant Quay – ranked 48th in the world,  on the coveted S.Pellegrino World’s 50 Best Restaurants list, awarded Restaurant of the Year in The Austalian Gourmet Traveller in 2013, held the coveted 3 Hat & 3 Star rating in The Sydney Morning Herald Good Food Guide & Australian Gourmet Traveller Restaurant Guide for 11 consecutive years.Quay is run by Peter Gilmore, one of Australia’s most celebrated chef, awarded Chef of the Year in The Sydney Morning Herald Good Food Guide 2012 and is a familiar face for those who watched Masterchef Australia.Setting was gorgeous at its extreme, with white clothed tables and fine cutlery spelling elegance, facing Australia’s and one of the world’s most iconic modern architectural wonder  – The Sydney Opera House. We possibly got one of the best table in the entire restaurant, and as the dark night sets, it almost felt impossibly romantic and peaceful.If only service was better. Not that there was any staff who was particularly rude or careless, but there was the sense of nonchalance and indifference. Perhaps it was because we did not order wines (asked three times if we wanted to drink anything, and we genuinely didn’t want to drink), perhaps we weren’t dressed to the nines, perhaps.Pardon our ignorance, but we wanted to know what ‘forbidden rice’, ‘yabbies velvet’,  ‘hapuka’, and ‘andalucia’ were or how they were cooked. We asked, one or two of them mumbled something (definitely looked impatient) and walked away.At AUD$225 per person for a tasting menu, or $175 for a 4-course set dinner, that meant the 6 of us would spend a bomb that is a 4-figure sum. We expected better.Back to the food, there were some truly outstanding dishes, such as the Congee of Northern Australian Mud Crab, Fresh Palm Heart, with an Egg Yolk Emulsion.This is the only dish that lasted in all Quay’s 11 years of history, and it is not difficult to understand why with a very 3-dimensional layered taste from a smoothly light egg emulsion at the top to the fresh crab meat submerged at the bottom.The other main courses that were memorable included the Red Claw Yabbies (a type of clayfish) with Garlic Scented Custard, poured over by a Yabby Velvet, Berkshire Pig Jowl with Maltoase Crackings, Prunes buried in the bottom with Cauliflower cream perfumed with Prune Kernel Oil, and the Pasture Raised Veal, with a thin layer of Bitter Chocolate Black Pudding,The desserts really saved the meals, with the Guava Snow Egg and Quay’s Eight Texture Chocolate Cake being the show stoppers.For those familiar with Masterchef, the making of Guava Snow Egg was in one of the final challenges, with its intricate execution being quite marvelling in how it was even created. The Snow Egg is a poached meringue resting on a bed of guava granite in a clear glass oval cup. As you break open the praline maltose ‘egg shell’ which is malt biscuit blown torch, you find a ‘yolk’ of custard apple ice-cream.  The sensation of layers tasted crazy!The Eight Texture Chocolate Cake was served spectacularly, when hot chocolate ganache was poured right through the circle of the round cake creating a hollow of sorts. Every bite was a pleasure, as you felt a combination of the other 7 chocolate elements playing in your mouth. Some would call it death-by-chocolate.  Eating a dessert never felt this dramatic.Beautiful setting. Some exciting dishes. Dramatic desserts. If only service was better.Quay Restaurant
Upper Level, Overseas Passenger Terminal, The Rocks, Sydney 2000 (10 min walk from Circular Quay)
Tel:  (61 2) 9241 4565 Email: reservations@quay.com.au
Opening Hours: 12pm – 2:30pm (Tues-Friday), 6:00pm – 10:00pm (Mon-Sun)Other World’s 50 Best Restaurants
Nijonryori Ryugin (Roppongi, Tokyo)
Les Créations de Narisawa (Tokyo, Japan)
Amber (Hong Kong)
Nahm (Bangkok, Thailand)
2013-07-04 00:00:00
Pizza Hut – Not Just Pizzas, But 12 Different Pasta Perfetto Dishes!
Pasta Hut? Wait, I was not seeing wrong. Before I walked into the restaurant at City Square Mall, I took a double take at the signage. It was “Pasta Hut” all right.  Did Pizza Hut decide not to sell pizzas anymore?Not quite so. It turned up that Pasta Hut was a special four-day branding promotion from Pizza Hut to tell their customers that “Hey, we sell pretty good pastas!”, and has expanded its pasta menu. For this promotion, there are a total of 12 delicious pasta choices!Pizza Hut  has been popular with many Singaporeans for its wide ranging choices of pizzas from Pan Pizzas, Stuffed Crust Pizzas and Cheese Bites Trio. (I still remember stuffing myself with its pizza buffet years ago.)Perhaps not as many know that they have quite a range of pasta choices, all made using the freshest ingredients by the dedicated cooks.Pizza Hut also now offers three brand new creations including Turkey Bacon Aglio Olio ($8.90), Roasted Chicken Leg Parchment ($14.90) and Baked Penne in Truffle Cream Sauce ($11.90), all at rather wallet-friendly prices.I went straight for the Baked Penne in Truffle Cream Sauce. The choice was obvious. The new pasta dish had three of my favourite features – truffle, cream sauce and its baked.Quick advice: Eat it while it is hot.As the penne was baked which somewhat reminds me of lasagne, the entire dish remained warm for a while with a distinct smell of drizzled truffle oil that wrapped around faintly every penne. (You may want to smell its aroma before eating.) The cream sauce was fortunately not too thick or thin, therefore you won’t feel too heavy even after indulging.For those who prefer something lighter, you can go for the Turkey Bacon Aglio Olio which has a slight tinge of spiciness which would appeal to those who like something more peppery and fiery. It was suitably Al Dente, cooked using Barilla pasta which is the world’s leading pasta maker.The Roasted Chicken Leg Parchment is quite a looker (whip out your cameras), portion is generous with a huge drumstick lying across, and two ladies may be able to share it.  The parchment paper helps to keep the heat in and for the spaghetti to absorb the seasoning more evenly. This also makes the chicken meat a lot more tender-licious-moist.Now for the good news: These 3 new pastas have been launched at all 25 dine-in Pizza Hut outlets and you will enjoy a free personal pan pizza with every pasta dish ordered.Two good things for the price of one? I am eyeing the Seafood Parchment Pasta next!Check out the Full Menu of Pizza Hut!Pizza Hut Singapore
Central:  Funan, Harboufront Centre, Lucky Plaza, Marina Sq, Plaza Singapura, City Square Mall
North: Ang Mo Kio Ave 6, Compass Point, Heartland Mall, Hougang Mall, Junction 8, NEX, Thomson Plaza, Toa Payoh Lor 6, North Pt, Causeway Pt
East: Bedok North St 1, Siglap, Tampines Mall, Changi Airport Terminal 1
West: Bt Panjang Plaza, Bt Timah Plaza, Choa Chu Kang, Clementi Ave 3, Jurong Pt II*This entry is brought to you by  Pizza Hut
2013-07-03 00:00:00
Old Chang Kee Launches Self Service System. Question Is: Will You Accept It?
Most Singaporeans should know Old Chang Kee, for their hot crispy curry puffs with chicken chunk fillings and glorious golden-yellow deep fried snack on sticks. Talking about their chicken wing, they always have something against my diet plans.Old Chang Kee has just launched Curry Times Tingkat at Alexandra Retail Mall (ARC, PSA Building), an all-day casual dining which is an offspring of Curry Times – and it has a self-service twist.Outside the restaurant, you will see two “ATM” – self service kiosks where you are supposed to order your own dishes, pay through NETS, and collect your own food! You may be thinking, “No OCK auntie to help me order, how?!”There are supposed 3 easy steps: Order, Pay and Collect. So I tried it on my own to check if it’s easier, faster and indeed smarter.1 – I went to the kiosk and made my order. That was easy because I knew what I wanted, and the menu came with clear pictures and pricing.2 – Get your NETs card ready and make payment (like those supermarkets self check-outs)3 – Collect your receipt which has a waiting number.4 – There were about 3-4 people in front of me, and woops, I got my Curry Chicken in 5 minutes at the collection point. That’s fast!5 – All right. I got to pack this myself. Shouldn’t be too difficult. Plastic bag, cutlery, serviettes, all checked!According to Old Chang Kee’s CEO Mr William Lim, this self-service concept helps to boost their space productivity, and reduce manpower cost through shared labour and adoption of new technology.Let’s compare this concept to a non-self-service restaurant, where there is a lot of staff movement within the dining area. As staff go back and forth from each table to take orders, serve food, collect payment, return change/credit card, clear table and so on, this requires more space to be allocated at the dining area for the high traffic.With the new self-ordering system, there is lesser movement which makes staff’s work easier and safer, and the restaurant layout can be planned more efficiently with more sitting capacity.Old Chang Kee has launched this self-service system. And the question is: Will customers accept it?He added that there are customers who go, ‘“Uh… why do I need to pack it myself?”, “I’m sure they will clear the table later…they have people to clear! (when it comes to clearing their own trays)”.To encourage customers, Old Chang Kee is providing a $3 off when they pay using NETS flash card to make payment. That’s a huge discount considering the meals are less than $10 each.Plus, there is additional savings for us customers as there is no service charge or tax imposed, and there will be reduced incorrect orders as we are the ones keying in our own orders. (I tried to make a ‘wrong’ order, don’t worry, can back-space and edit.)This system reminds me of Hong Kong’s Octopus Card system where you can make your payment at most supermarkets, convenience stores and small eateries (like cha chaan tengs) with a card – no hassle with coins and notes, especially convenient for tourists.I wonder when it would be possible when Singapore to move into such a system, where the EZ-link card becomes encompassing enough to be adopt by the SMEs, and when it comes to paying ‘smaller payments’, say like buying an OCK curry puff.Imagine paying for your curry puff with a card instead of digging for coins (which can take forever). Certainly easier for both the customers and service staff, and more hygienic and safer with the non-handling of coins.With staff being less involved at the cashier and manual transactions, they can keep up with their other daily operations such as maintenance of work area’s cleanliness and hygiene, maintenance of stock and records and have time to offer better service to the customers.The long-term reduction in manpower cost is then invested in training programmes for existing staff to upgrade and learn new skills.I also had a quick chat with Old Chang Kee’s chairman Mr Han Keen Juan who was really a jovial and friendly man, and asked if these machines would replace the aunties behind the counter one day in the future.He said, “Never”, “Old Chang Kee is all about that human touch, about meeting customers face-to-face, and that can never be replaced.”
2013-07-02 00:00:00
Flock Café – New Indie Café at Tiong Bahru Feels Real & Unpretentious
The question is: Does Tiong Bahru need another café? Or can it support another one? Flock Café is another café at the further end at Moh Guan, a walking distance near where the hipsters would hang out at Yong Siak.At least it can be truly called an indie café, whereas some of the other ‘indies’ are not exactly ‘independent’. Needs a bit of pushing though, as it is not in the limelight compared to the other Tiong Bahru cafes, or the district is just saturated.Flock Café is run by a family of four siblings. The good is you get a sense of a comforting, relaxed ambience where the crew could know the regulars by their first name. On the flipside, some of the finer sides of café such as serving and baristaring may not be as polished as the more commercial cafes.Décor is minimalist, part-industrial, part-you are feeling like at home with its clean white furniture with sky blue accents. The tables are placed at a distance such that you won’t exactly hear what the next table is conversing, and could be a chill-out place to quietly read a book.Weekend brunch was the standard fare, such as a poached eggs Big Breakfast ($19.90), Eggs Sally ($14.90)  Scrambled Eggs, Bacon & Croissant ($14.90) and Pancakes & Berries ($12.90).The poached eggs were decent fare, not bad such that it may warrant a repeat visit, but not so good that you must have it again.I thought the Flock’s Scrambled Eggs & Toast ($7.50, plus $3.50) fared slightly, done creamily with generous portions of eggs accompanied by sourdough bread lightly toasted.According to co-owner Edith, the word “Flock” represents groups of like-minded people coming together, be it friends and or family members who share a common interest in food, coffee or music.Flock Café does have a family-run feel. While its items and coffee (from Liberty) could be standard fare, its laid back and very unpretentious setting could win you over. Definitely feels more real than some of the other cafes in the same area.Flock Café
#01-25 78 Moh Guan Terrace Singapore (10-15 min walk from Tiong Bahru), Tel: +65 6536 3938
Opening Hours: 8am-6pm (Sun-Thurs), 8am – 10pm (Fri-Sat)Other Cafe Entries
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
The Orange Thimble (Tiong Bahru)
Social Haus (Tiong Bahru)
Drips Bakery Café (Tiong Poh Road)
Centre Ps (Tiong Bahru)
2013-06-28 00:00:00
JEM Food & Restaurants – Help! What’s There To Eat At JEM
JEM opened (or should I say didn’t open) with a bang and is now the most exciting thing to happen to Singaporeans staying in the West other than the hail. We are just so thrilled every time a new shopping mall opens. Never mind if all the shops are the same boring ones found elsewhere in town, this is our hobby, this is our pastime.This shopping mall is CROWDED day-in-day-out. It is as if the whole of Jurong do not need to work, and are all just window-shopping around or grabbing their buys from Robinsons, Uniqlo or H&M.JEM feels suspiciously like a very much bigger 313@Somerset upon walking around.  I checked, same developer – Lend Lease. It has almost a rectangular regular-shaped (thank goodness no more mazes like some of the other newer malls), and even young part-time stuff dressed in red polos located near electronic directories telling you where to go if you lost your way. Nice.Yes, 240 shops. You may lose your way.I must say I wished there were more new-to-market food brands, and not the usual few. My favourite floor was the basement with quite a variety of food kiosks and smaller eateries where you can get a quick bite from. Plus, it’s buzzing with energy.Here are some other restaurants which may catch your eye.Paris Baguette (#02-20)
When you have Korean plus European style bakes plus cakes plus desserts plus all-day breakfast which are all the hottest things in town, then you are almost quite a shoo-in for success. The Korean brand Paris Baguette is easily one of the most populated cafes at JEM, with most coming to try their Scrambled Egg Brioche Brunch and pretty looking cakes. The price is not that pretty though. (Read: Paris Baguette (Wisma Atria))Lee Taiwanese (#03-05)
First at The Star, now at JEM. Lee’s Taiwanese serves rather authentic Taiwanese fare and street food such as Beef Noodles, Mee Sua, Salt & Pepper Chicken and Pork Belly Rice. The rice came with generous portions of pork belly, drenched in dark sauce, and kind of reminds me of those I had in Taipei, except this would cost about 3 times more than over there.Haisosaetii (#B1-05)
One of the few new to Singapore brands available here. They sell freshly made nama chocolates in colourful pastel coloured boxes of yellow, pink, baby blue and violet (which may remind you of the other Japanese chocolate brand which starts with ‘R’.) The Japanese inspired cakes look like a must-try, especially the Azuki Red Bean Brownie Cheesecake and Opera Matcha Chocolate Cake.Gurney Drive (#04-27) 
Fans of Penang cuisine should be familiar with Gurney Drive, known to attract many tourists for their street food. Gurney Drive at JEM is more wallet-friendly than some of the other restaurants, with most dishes below $10. Some of my favourites here are the Penang Fried Koay Teow, Hokkien Prawn Noodles and the Assam Laksa, with the noodles specially imported from Penang. (Read: Gurney Drive Restaurant (Suntec City))Laksania (#03-09)
Sometimes I need an occasional indulgence, and that is Laksa. But this is not just about the traditional local style laksa we are familiar with, their laksa pastas, laska wings, and laksa satay (oh so love it) are some of the popular ones. And my recent found love – Laksa hotpot where you can dip meats into like a mini steamboat. Plus point, the gravy stays hot all the time.A directory of all the F&B outlets at JEM.Basement 1
8Tarts N Pastries, BBQ Express, Bee Cheng Hiang, Bengawan Solo, Bottles & Bottles, Burger King, Delifrance, EAT, Famous Amos, Four Leaves, Freshman, Gong Cha, Haisosaetti Chocolates, Han’s, Hong Kong Sheng Kee Dessert, Ichiban Boshi, Imperial Treasure Seafood Restaurant, KFC, Mr Bean, Old Chang Kee, Petit Provence, Pezzo, Polar Puffs & Cakes, Prima Deli, RamenPlay, Rumah Sayang, Shihlin Taiwan Street Snacks, Snax! By CP, So Pho, Tori Q, Xian De Lai, Ya Kun, Yoguru, YoshinoyaLevel 1
BreadTalk, LENAS, MADO, Marche Movenpick, McDonalds, Spageddies, Starbuck Coffee, The Coffee Tea & Tea Leaf, Toast BoxLevel 2
Baskin-Robbins, Din Tai Fung, McDonald’s, Paris Baguette, SaladWorks, The Soup SpoonLevel 3
Bangkok Jam, Earle Swensen’s Indo Box, Lee’s Taiwanese, Laksania, Lao Huo Tang, Shin Kushiya, Sogurt, Sushi TeiLevels 4 & 5
Ambush, Gurney Drive, Jack’s Place, PastaMania, Pepper Lunch, Xin Wang Hong Kong Café, Cookhouse by Koufu, Graffiti Café, MOS Burger, Umeya
2013-06-26 00:00:00
AmaSoy – How I Ended Up Helping to Create These Collagen Puddings
There is something about me and soy. I grew up drinking it, which is perhaps why people say “I am blessed with good skin”. That is really kind of strange for a guy to hear. Some people still call me the ‘Tau Hway Boy’ or ‘Tau Hway Blogger’ after a blogging incident last year.And now, there is AmaSoy.The story is very simple actually. Early this year I got to try AmaSoy when a friend recommended. I was as usual in my skeptical mood (huh, another one of those soy brands?) and became surprised at how smooth and slippery it tasted.  It really tasted good, especially when chilled… BUT the truth was I have never heard of AmaSoy.The founder told me that ‘Ama’ means ‘sweets’ in Japanese and also ‘grandmother’ in the Chinese dialect (Ah, a smart and catchy name.) After stumbling upon a delicious bowl of Tounyu soy pudding in Japan that also reminded of what she had with her grandma, she got a Japanese Chef to recreate that ultra-smooth texture and subtle taste after countless experiments.So how did I come in?I can’t remember exactly how and why, but made certain suggestions there and then (in my usual food blogger critique mode). “Since it is Japanese in flavour, why didn’t you have matcha, or even matcha with red bean?”One thing led to another, and we ended up creating and brain-storming several flavours together. Like several.I don’t say I am an expert in food, or cooking for that matter at all. All I knew was one simple rule. At the end of the day, the basis is simple – use only quality and fresh products, nothing artificial, nothing fake and the product will be good.So we ended up sourcing matcha all the way from Kyoto Japan to create the matcha soy puddings, and used real mangoes with diced mango fruits to create what I would call “Mango-Mango”.  I am sure you have your fair share of eating some desserts that tastes fake or cheap – I didn’t want that to happen.The Strawberry flavour was the most interesting ‘discovery’. We created a version with strawberry fruits, another with a jam-like texture seen in your strawberry cheesecakes.  Each version felt that there was something missing. Then we experimented with mixing the two up… and *tadah* a really special strawberry jam with strawberry fruit pudding.And AmaSoy now comes with both Collagen and Omega3 (DHA), probably the first pudding in Singapore (and perhaps the world).I am personally envious of older people who look so radiant with everlasting youth. So I casually asked this girl friend of mine her age and was totally shocked. Her actual age was 30+++ but she looked like she just graduated from Uni! “What’s your secret?!”And she said… Collagen.Turns out the boss of AmaSoy (who refuses to tell me her age, but I can make a wild guess from her years of experience) is also a fan of Collagen, and her skin is really supple and smooth, exactly like the Japanese tai-tais. No kidding.So presenting the AmaSoy Collagen soy puddings, the final product created after months of trying with the team and trying hundreds and hundreds of versions. I am not exaggerating about the amount of effort we put in.We also created a new Hokkaido soy milk series which is somewhat like your familiar soy milk drink, but added with a delicate silky texture of creamy Hokkaido milk. My personal favourite flavours? Azuki red bean and Matcha.As with any food products, there will be compliments. there will be criticisms. I do hope that you can give it a try and tell me what you think. The price is pretty affordable at $2 ($2.50 with toppings) considering what quality ingredients go inside.I am no food or marketing guru. I just tell myself that I have to believe – that if your product is good, it will take off.AmaSoy
Clementi – Clementi Ave 3 Blk 442 #01-93
Great World City #B1-16/17 (inside Food Junction)
Orchard – Ion Orchard #B4-64 Orchard Turn
Serangoon – Serangoon NEX, 23 Serangoon Central #02-04/06
Jurong – Jurong Point 2 #03-42/47 (Soy Puddings only)
Tampines – Tampines One, 10 Tampines Central 1, #04-15 (Soy Puddings only)
2013-06-25 00:00:00
Ramen Kagetsu Arashi – One of the Largest Ramen Chain Shop in Japan Opens at Star Vista
So many new ramen shops in Singapore, some are jumping on the ramen bandwagon, but how many can really make it. I now get a little skeptical when the shops say are “best…”, “most number of…”, “winner of…”, as the recent new shops have been less than satisfactory. (Read: 5 New & Best Ramen Places in Singapore)The latest to come to Singapore, Ramen Kagetsu Arashi which is established in 1992 has just opened shop at The Star Vista. It is one of the largest ramen chains in Japan with more than 260 outlets worldwide. (Read: The Star Vista’s Complete Food & Restaurant Guide )Ramen Kagetsu Arashi’s signature is the Arashi Genkotsu Ramen ($12.90), with a tonkotsu broth simmered with hours with pork marrow, body, fat and collagen. If you get ‘garlic’s breath’ after drinking, it’s because lots of garlic is added on its base.Some online reviews have said that service was bad. Actually, I found the service staff (a PRC girl) to be rather friendly and knowledgeable about the products… but, food arrival was too slow.We would have expected ramen shops to be fast and swift, and the group of us waited at least 20 to 30 minutes for a bowl of ramen, and the shop was only half-full then. (I have to apologize to my entire group of friends because I chose this restaurant and the whole lot of us were late for practice because the ramen took too long to come!)I also had the Arashi Toripaitan Ramen ($13.90) which had chicken broth but pork char siew. Comments on the ramen were divided. Some thought it was okay, and better than the one downstairs. (Cough cough, Menya Musashi.) The noodles were clearly overcooked and soggy, though broth wise I could live with the thickness and garlic-ness.One major minus point was the egg. I asked for the ajitsuke tamago soft-boiled egg, but the waitress said it could not be done unless I ordered the eggs ala-carte (???), as it was “impossible to divide the soft-boiled egg into halves”. So I landed up with the very hard-boiled version.Overall, Ramen Kagetsu Arashi will make do if I have a major ramen craving, but don’t come if you are rushing for time.Ramen Kagetsu Arashi
The Star Vista, 1 Vista Exchange Green #01-41, Buona Vista, Singapore 138617 (Buona Vista MRT) Tel: +65 63390335
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pm (Sun-Thurs),  11:30am – 11:00pm (Fri-Sat)Other Ramen Entries
Keisuke Tonkotsu King Four Seasons (Bugis Village)
Daruma Ramen House (TripleOne Somerset)
Menya Sanji (Orchid Hotel, Tanjong Pagar)
Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen (Novena Square 2)
Keishoken Ramen (Great World City)
2013-06-21 00:00:00
Café 2000 – International, Seafood & Barbeque Buffet Dinner at M Hotel
This is one of the times when I didn’t do research before going for a food tasting, and I was totally expecting some other kind of food at a place called “Café 2000”. You know the Western and European dishes. My bad.So I stepped into this restaurant at M Hotel and saw throngs of customers, spreads of food, and cooks behind live cooking stations. A very busy, lively setting. And oh… buffet.While Café 2000 is not one of those hotel restaurants that come to mind when you think about “buffet”, a quick browse shows that there is a quite a huge spread even though the restaurant space is not exactly big.Their strengths: They are huge on seafood, and it happens that they were having a crab buffet promotion when I was there (and it is still on). There were a few live-cooking stations, which I always enjoy and didn’t mind the short wait, where they churn out food from satay, pasta, to grilled meats.Café 2000 had about 5 to 6 types of crab on rotation, some available include Crab Meat Timbale on Egg & Caviar, Caribbean Crabmeat Pasta Salad & Pomegranate Seeds, Steamed Mud Crabs served with Black Vinegar & Shredded Ginger, Baked Sea Scallop with Crab Sabayon, Salted Egg Crabs and Butter Crabs.My favourite offering from the crab selection was surprisingly the Rendang Crab. It actually works. The chili crab had quite a dismal sweetish watery sauce. I would have liked more of the Steamed Crabs though (had a tiny one and it was sweet and juicy), but the portion was small, refilling time slow, and some other customer always beat me to taking away almost the entire tray.Some hits and misses. The food prepared by the live stations generally tasted better. (Satay was the best, grills were good, cakes decent.) But some of the other cooked dishes felt slightly cold and mediocre.Café 2000 is also popular for its Seafood and Barbeque Buffet Dinner served on Fridays and Saturdays, with a variety of grilled items and seafood, and selections of barbeque items like scallop, tiger prawns, fish, squid, black angus beef, and Italian pork sausage.International Buffet Dinner (from Sundays to Thursdays)
Adult: $50++
Child: $28++Seafood & Barbeque Buffet Dinner (Fridays, Saturdays, & Public Holidays)
Adult: $62++
Child: $32++Café 2000
M Hotel, 81 Anson Road, Singapore 079908 (Tanjong Pagar MRT), Tel: +65 6500 6112
Opening Hours: 6:30am-11:00pm DailyOther Buffet Entries
Plaza Brasserie (PARKROYAL on Beach Road)
Straits Café (Rendezvous Grand Hotel)
Silver Shell Café (Shangri La Rasa Sentosa)
Aquamarine (Marina Mandarin)
10 at Claymore (Pan Pacific Orchard)
2013-06-20 00:00:00
Sakae Sushi – How They Make Their Sushi Better and Faster
Don’t say I want to say, and this is based purely on my own observations, that Singaporeans are more tolerant towards bad food than bad service. If waiting time is long, or the food does not arrive after we’ve ordered it, we are likely to get a little frustrated. Perhaps it can be blamed on stress levels, the shorter lunch hours, and the need to make everything (including our dining) more efficient.So I am always quite impressed by how some of the Japanese restaurants do it – most are known to be fast, efficient, clean and prompt. Or as what we would like to say, they make things “Easier, Smarter and Safer”.So how do they do it? And does technology always save time?Sakae Sushi is known to be the first in Singapore to set up the kaiten conveyor belt sushi system way back in 1997. Their name “Sakae” actually means “growth”, hence the leaping frog mascot.What I like best about Sakae Sushi is that every table has a hot water tap for you to refill your tea. You don’t have to bother the service staff all the time, and there isn’t a need for someone just to walk around to pour water.With a computerised menu to order items and track spending, we don’t have to ask anymore “Just how much did we eat?” or wait impossibly long for the waiter to notice our waving hands.Question: Do you think it is possible for other types of restaurant, say your Chinese, casual Western eateries or fast food restaurants, to put such taps somewhere, and to provide hot and cold water options?Well, perhaps the first issue is – How much would it cost? Short term wise, there may be a need for some investment in the equipment, but in the long term it could result in more efficient service, and happier, ‘independent’ customers.Have you ever wondered how these sushi restaurants keep track of how fresh their sushi are, especially when it seems that some plates have been going round and round the restaurant for eternity?Then I found out that Sakae uses the Radio Frequency Identification (RFID) system! Wait, don’t they use such system in the military, passports, or tracking down of pets?Yes, apparently so under the sushi plates as well. There are RFID magnetic tags embedded beneath each sushi plate, and there is a centralised system and a smart “robotic arm” which would remove “expired plates”. So you do not have to worry about freshness. Raw food is cleared after an hour, and cooked food, after two hours.Plus, there is now a ‘second conveyor belt’ which allows ala-carte orders to be sent down exactly where the customers are sitting. So smart!Before this system was implemented, there would be chefs employed just to check whether the sushi is ‘expired’ or not. You can imagine it would be such a mundane and tedious job. Plus, the chefs could also miss out some ‘expired’ plates because identification was tough, so some sushi may become not that safe for consumption.So I asked if technology was replacing the jobs of the chefs. The answer was a big “NO.” Instead, the chefs are deployed for what they are supposed to do, focusing on food creation and preparation, not checking plates.As minor basic tasks are eliminated, the F&B staff can in turn interact with customers and serve them more promptly.While the RFID system may be costly at the moment for some smaller-scale F&B restaurants to implement (but never say never), these are differences they can make to really enhance customer service.What suggestions do you have for the newer F&B outlets to possibly implement?
2013-06-19 00:00:00
Founder Bak Kut Teh – Is This Jay Chou’s Favourite BKT?
Sometime back, I wrote a tongue-in-cheek post at HungryGoWhere on where to find the king of Mando pop Jay Chou in Singapore (and yes, he had a concert in Singapore 2 weeks back), and guess what…Seems like the abs-solutely lean and fit Jay Chou cannot resist a bowl of hot piping peppery Bak Kut Teh from Founder at Balestier for supper. (According to sources: Jay had Bak Kut Teh Ribs along with Pig’s Trotter, salted vegetable, jelly and coconut.)He loved it so much he ordered a take-away from the new Rangoon branch two days later. Not that it is hurting his waist-line one bit. (His abs should be my aim, but anyway…)Founder is one of Singapore’s most famous Bak Kut Teh shop, known for having its entire walls pasted with pictures of celebrities. Actually almost every Asian celeb I can recognize has been here, from mega-stars, Hong Kong actors, singers to MediaCorp artistes (Emil Chau, Sandra Ng, Lee Hom, S.H.E. Fann Wong etc).Founder’s Founder who was a pig farmer is said to have founded/created the dish based on trial and error, not based on any formula – which is why it is called Founder. He never wanted to open a branch to maintain the consistency of his BKT, but finally allowed his daughter to open her own at Rangoon Road.Competitor Ng Ah Sio is just a walk away, but that’s not stopping customers from packing the new Founder BKT.I would recommend the Founder Bak Kut The with Ribs combo ($8.00) where you can one entire long prime rib, along with some of its sides such as Tau Pok ($3.00), Peanut ($3.00), Tau Kee ($3.00) and You Tiao ($1.50).Their Bak Kut Teh is such comfort food! The soup was very hot (like warm-hot-hot), slightly sweet and very peppery, and I could not stop sipping it down, or dipping the crispy You Tiao down to absorb some of the stock. For once, the You Tiao actually tasted fresh and fluffy, whereas many other shops’ are cold and hard.No offence to The Founder, but I think your daughter Chui Chui did a really good job. In fact, I think I may have preferred dining at this Rangoon branch more than the Balestier branch – service better, cooler aircon, and the soup just feels warmer. (I ordered 3 soup refills, and they were all poured in a friendly manner.)The only draw-back that I have that would make it the perfect bowl is that the pork felt slightly tougher compared to some of my other favourite BKT brands.Biggest shock of my dinner. Owner Mdm Chua and her daughter Cathryn requested to take a photo with ME, “Emm… are you the fitness instructor who eats… to much?” Fortunately, I did not come in my baggy tees, shorts and slippers. Okay, I may possibly land up in one of Founder’s Wall of Fame. Lol.Founder Bak Ku Teh Rangoon Road 发起人肉骨茶餐馆
154 Rangoon Road, Singapore 218431 (10 min walk from Farrer Park MRT), Tel: +65 6292 0938
Opening Hours: 9:00am-10:30pm (Mon-Tues, Thurs-Sun, Closed Wed)Other Related Entries
BKT by Kong Kee (Far East Square)
Ipoh Lou Yau Bean Sprouts Chicken (Chinatown Pt)
Prima Taste Kitchen (Centrepoint)
Kok Sen Restaurant (Keong Siak Street)
Kopi Tiam (Swissotel The Stamford)
2013-06-18 00:00:00
Masons – Dine in a Pre-War Colonial Style Building
Masons, set in a colonial style building from 1935, soaked in quiet greenery is the kind of place that you would like to have a romantic dinner, anniversary date, or hold your afternoon wedding reception. It gave off that lovely type of vibes.A little bit of its history – the current building was built by the British army, and became one of the last British posts to fall to the Japanese. Verve’s owners (which coincidentally was one of the first restaurants I reviewed way back in time) took over the building and spent about a million to restore the building in its current splendour.Masons is located at Gillman Village, probably need someone to drive you here as it is situated just off the AYE near the Alexandra Retail Centre (Labrador Park MRT).It has a black-and-white European style in decor, with a spacious main dining room with classic looking tiles, some decorated with English Rose motifs. Those who preferred to drink and share a pizza would hang out in the alfresco verandah – I went during a weekend noon and was really serene and peaceful, especially when it rained slightly before the meal.Price is on the mid-high side, executive set lunch from $28 for two courses or $38 for three courses, and a newly introduced tasting menu ($98++) including some of their house favourites like Seared Foie Gras, Classic  Lobster Cognac Bisque, Seared Scallop, Grade 4 Wagyu Beef with Roasted Duck Breast and a dessert.For the price, as I did hear good things about the chef, I was perhaps expecting more from the food. For example, the Lobster Cognac Bisque was adequate, though could have been much richer and luxurious. Personal preference.Though I asked for a medium-well beef, it came slightly more done that I wished. While overall it was a delicious plate, as what was served were beef fillet the texture was on the dry side and felt it needed something with more moisture to balance off. (The Grade 4 250 gram Wagyu Beef fillet on ala carte would have been $90.)Dessert, a Rustic Lemon Tart with Raspberry Salad was absolutely wonderful, not too sweet and with a touch a tang.Service was excellent. The manager Yannick was polite and professional.  The meal overall felt good, especially dining in this beautiful and historic grounds. With starters already at $16 and above, the price point could have been lowered.Masons
8 Lock Road, #01-17, Singapore 108936, info@masons.sg, Tel: +65 6694 2216
Opening hours:  1130am – 11pm dailyOther Related Entries
Waterfall Café (Shangri-La Hotel)
Cocotte (Wanderlust Hotel)
Grub (Bishan Park)
Gordon Grill
The Ascot (The Grandstand)
2013-06-17 00:00:00
Eatplaylove – Pretty Blue Kids-Friendly Thai Café Is Great Place to Play & Love
When you have a café name like “Eat Play Love”, it has already half stolen my heart. With a pun on one of my recent favourite books Eat Pray Love by Elizabeth Gilbert, I admit I am one of the dreamy-eyed persons who yearn to travel wander-lustly and has a soft spot for beautiful things.What’s with the new Thai restaurants and their pretty décor? Last week I just visited vintage chic Thai restaurant Folks Collective, and Eatplaylove is another cutesy lovely eclectic Thai-Western café all painted in baby blue. (Pssssst… baby blue lover Xiaxue had her baby Dash’s first month celebration here.)First thing you noticed would be the number of families and children around. Ah… an extremely kids friendly place. At least they are not running around, but at the arts & craft corner where they can read books or play with free-flow arts material at $5 per hour during weekends (or $5 per two hours during weekdays).Yes, the design of Eatplaylove can be best described as ‘eclectic’ – what’s around include craft books, vintage décor, sellable stationaries, toys, retro utensils, all very wonderfully decorated. Kudos to the owners Jessica and Gayle.Though I must say food-wise, it may not be impressive in comparison. The Western fare, a Chicken Chop with Mushroom Sauce ($10.50) was rather dismal in its sauce with two thin slices of button mushroom, reminded me of my school canteen’s Western stall.I was initially excited to try the Mixed Platter ($12.50) which included the Mini Split Chicken Wings ($6.50 for 10 pieces when ordered separately), thinking it would remind me of the Greyhound experience. The wings were piping hot, looked the part, but the meat apparently wasn’t well-marinated, or perhaps not marinated at al.Sad to say, I had to return the Thai Fish Cakes because they arrived partly cold! At least they quickly changed for a new plate. (I seldom had to return food.)Perhaps I ordered the wrong dishes. The Thai Green Curry Chicken ($7.50) had diluted and sweet curry, steamed rice had too many broken grains, definitely not the best quality around.If you are not too fussy about the food, would like a beautiful café to hold children’s birthday parties, or somewhere to create crafts with your kids, then this is the place to Play and Love. Really a pity about the Eat.Eatplaylove
#01-07 Aliwal Arts Centre, 28 Aliwal Street (near Arab Street), Singapore 199918, Tel: +65 6445 6400
Opening Hours: 12:00pm-10:00 (Closed Tues)Other Thai Restaurant Entries
Folks Collective (China Square)
Spicy Thai – Thai Café  (Aljunied)
KHA (Martin Road)
Baan Tong Thai (Tiong Bahru)
Moojaa (Keong Siak Street)
2013-06-14 00:00:00
Malioboro – Fried Chicken So Soft You Can Eat The Bones
This may sound a little crazy. When someone says “I finished the entire chicken, you really can take it literally.” So having deep fried chicken is one thing, but finishing the chicken thoroughly INCLUDING the bones is another.Malioboro (Ayam Tulang Lunak) at Jurong Point is an Indonesian based restaurant which provides delicious soft bone chicken. Sure, I had soft bone chicken before but they usually came in small chunks, not the entire drumstick.The original restaurant first opened at Kuta Bali in 2000, named after a famous shopping street Jalan Malioboro in Yogyakarta. The restaurant eventual became a hit with locals and was quite popular in Bali, opening more than 20 branches, and just came to Singapore.Finding Malioboro at Jurong Point could be a little challenge. It is located inside the food court of Feast Kopitiam, right next to AmaSoy, Malaysian Boleh, nearer the side of the MRT entrance. Any usual customers would generally walk past the restaurant because it seemed a little intimidating and dark.But I say, walk in to try the chicken!If you must try only one dish, then it will be the Soft Bone Chicken with Salted Egg Sauce ($8.90). Okay, that is interesting, because I would generally associate salted egg yolk anything with Chinese dishes. Business manager Fanny revealed that the owner was Indonesian-Chinese, and added some of his family influence and creativity in to the dishes.Basically, salted egg yolk-anything would have already enhanced the flavours. It is the tenderness of the chicken meat which is quite astonishing. You literally pull the meat and bones apart with a push of the fork. Not exaggerating. That is because the chicken has been pressure-cooked for hours before deep-frying then cooking with the sauce.Okay, so I basically chewed and ate the whole drumstick bone like a dog. First taste is… strange. Really strange. Then, I started imagining the amount of calcium and iron that would enter my body. I would say the saltiness of the chicken meat and sauce, plus the slight bitterness of the body actually balances out quite nicely.Their other popular dish is the Crispy Soft Bone Chicken ($6.90) which is like Ayam Penyet. The only exceptions are you can eat the bones and the rice comes in a mini-conical shape inspired by the traditional Indonesian Nasi Tumpeng.There are Red Chilli and Green Chill versions as well (didn’t get to try that yet). Basically, MediaCorp Suria JUS!’s host Taufik finished the entire plate. Quoting him, “I never finished my food during filming. Sedap! This is my first time!”Malioboro Soft Bone Chicken
Feast Kopitiam @ Jurong Point Shopping Centre, 63 Jurong West Central 3, #03-39 (Boon Lay MRT)
Opening Hours: 11am-10pm DailyOther Indonesian Restaurant Entries
Indo Chilli (Zion Road)
Wong Solo (Far East Plaza)
Bayang (Clarke Quay)
RS Deli (Upper Thomson)
Seribu Sari (Rendezvous Grand Hotel)
2013-06-13 00:00:00
Tajimaya – The Ultimate Hokkaido Tokachi Beef Yakiniku Experience
Wagyu has almost become the extravagant default if you need some quality beef for a Japanese grill experience. How about Tokachi Beef? Never tried it? Then you won’t know what you are missing out.I was at Tajimaya, a Japanese charcoal grill Yakiniku restaurant at Vivocity, and was hugely intrigued about their Hokkaido Tokachi Beef Platter. (Plus it is a very photogenic plate.) It is said that Tajimaya’s Tokachi beef is air-flown directly from the subprefecture in Hokkaido, hailed as a tastier and healthier rival to the more commonly known wagyu.Really? Tajimaya Executive Chef Umehara Shigeo explained that Tokachi cows are fed a specially formulated, grass-based diet comprising sweet local meadow grass, straw and dent corns to produce meat of an extremely high quality, creating superb flavour and texture. The cows are said to be fed a blend of traditional herbs to increase their resistance and enhance the flavour of their meat!All in the mood for authentic Japanese yakiniku barbeque, we ordered a Hokkaido Tokachi Beef Season Menu for 2 ($198++, usual price $268++). The portions are generous, and the three of us were able to share this set.The special set comes with Kimuchi (Japanese kimchi starter), Kani Chawanmushi (which is really smooth) and Tajimaya Salad (cool and refreshing).The highlight is really the Beef Platter. When served, we almost could not take our eyes (and cameras) away from the bright and cheery-red beef slices with some finely dispersed evenly distributed creamy white marbling of the fats.Seeing is believing, but tasting makes it believable.There were the different cuts of Jo Rosu (loin), Karubi (short ribs), Zabuton (chuck eye roll, portion just behind the neck) and Sankaku (chuck short rib, meat just outside the ribcage), all 90 grams each.The good news is: everybody had their favourite part, though my preference went with the  longest rectangular shaped Sankaku for its intense marbling and tenderness while the cushion-like Zabuton also had an amazingly rich and luscious ‘buttery’ taste.Comparing the Tokachi with the other types of beef, the words ‘melt-in-your-mouth’ is really an understatement. Where I was most impressed was while it was already tender, the meats had a certain quality of bite and leanness you may not find in lower grade beefs.I know some customers are always afraid of barbecue because of the possible smoke and greasiness. Surprisingly, I think I still walked out of the restaurant smelling good, due to the high performance exhaust system.If you prefer Shabu Shabu, the restaurant next door Shabuya also offers the Hokkaido Tokachi Beef Season 7-course menu for 2 ($158++).   American Express holders are also entitled to a $10 discount and a complimentary bottle of Sake with each set purchased.The hands-on Japanese Yakiniku experience over charcoal grill is always fun while catching up with friends. Plus, Tajimaya has an amazing view of Sentosa and Resorts World Sentosa, especially magical looking under the mysterious night sky.Tajimaya Japanese Charcoal Grill Yakiniku and Shabuya Shabu Shabu
Vivocity, 1 Harbourfront Walk #01-102/103, Singapore 098585 (Harbourfront MRT), Tel: +65 6377 0070
Opening Hours: 12:00pm-3:00pm, 6:00pm-10:00pm (Mon-Fri), 11:30am – 4:00pm, 6:00pm-10:00pm (Sat, Sun, PH)[Giveaway Ended] Shabuya Weekend Buffet Giveaway
DanielFoodDiary.com will be giving away 2 sets of weekend buffet (worth $44.90 each) to 2 blessed readers to enjoy Shabuya’s Japanese Hotpot! Thank you to Creative Eateries Group.All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKE the FaceBook page of DanielFoodDiary.com
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET on twitter
Step 3: COMMENT below on the location of Shabuya (Do include your email add)
Results will be announced 24th June (Mon).
2013-06-12 00:00:00
Folks Collective – Hipster Thai Restaurant Is The Next Place To Check Out
Once in a while, you get a food place that people will talk about. Folks Collective is that restaurant. The power of the word-of-mouth, with friends leaving facebook wall messages telling me you MUST TRY Folks Collective.Folks Collective – a Thai fusion restaurant in the middle of CBD at China Square Central, selling set lunches at affordable prices, along with impeccable décor seems a straight formula for success.We got a little excited trying to find the place (#01-25 right next to Sushi Tei), and got even more when we saw the interior. “Wahhhh… So pretty!” In fact I was already anticipating with delight when the person picking up my phone reservation was a cheery polite Thai girl.Ignoring the CBD chatter where every other table is complaining about their bosses/clients/colleagues, Folks Collective feels exactly like in Bangkok. The restaurant is decorated in an eclectic Thai vintage style, no effort spared in putting in attention to every detail.  Most of the items are imported specially from Thailand. Staff is mainly Thai, courteous with a touch of humour.The Set Lunches are Raffles Place inexpensive at $9.90 per set, coming in red tiffin carriers that look way too cute. CBD lunches never felt this creative.We had Green Curry with Chicken, Minced Shrimp Omelette with Steamed Jasmine Rice, but taste-wise all felt under-whelming. Portions were small, temperature lukewarm, and gravy too watery and sweet. It may feed an O.L, but a young hungry executive would hardly feel full.The other dishes we ordered – Signature Folk Wings ($6.90), Glass Noodle Shrimps Salad ($7.90), Pad Thai Goong ($8.90) and Mango Stick Rice ($6.90) tasted rather okay-average, and seemed purposefully muted and sweetened to suit the local and expats’ taste buds.The Cereal Seafood ($20.90) with Soft-Shell Crab cooked in oatmeal, butter and curry leaves was well-executed though, not too oily with every bit of the oatmeal dry and crisp. I did feel the Thai flavours could be enhanced though.Perhaps it was because I came expecting more. After all the cooks were formerly from Thanying and Indochine, and the owner’s mum was already helming a Thai eatery at Shenton Way.Entering Folks Collective, it is easy to be distracted by its beauty and offer plus-points to the food unconsciously. With that said, this is only the soft launch period, and Folks Collective looks like the next place where hipsters will flock to.Folks Collective
China Square Central #01-25 (next to Sushi Tei, look out for baby blue walls), 20 Cross Street Singapore 048422 Tel: +65 6536 6739
Opening Hours: 10:30am – 11:00pm (Mon-Fri), 10am – 11:30ppm (Sat), Closed SundaysOther Thai Restaurant Entries
Spicy Thai – Thai Café  (Aljunied)
Baan Tong Thai (Tiong Bahru)
Sweet Salty Spicy (Rail Mall)
Moojaa (Keong Siak Street)
Thai Express (Plaza Singapura)
2013-06-11 00:00:00
Plaza Brasserie – Holy Crab, The Crab Buffet Is Back
After a successful run last year, the Plaza Brasserie Crab Buffet is back from now till 31 August 2013. That’s about 3 months for you to indulge in this All-You-Can-Eat Crab Buffet.When I go to a typical coffeeshop zhi char stall to have crabs, it would already cost at least $50 per person to devour some decent crabs.For Plaza Brasserie’s crab buffet which includes all their usual specialties from sushi, sashimi, deep fried calamari, dim sum, live cooking prata (durian or chocolate prata for that fact) and laksa, the price is $55++ for weekday dinners and $58++ for weekend dinners.I have been to some crab buffets, but Plaza Brasserie’s selection just gets bigger. 8 different crabs this time – not on rotational basis, you get them all.Other than the Singaporean favourite Chilli Crab and Black Pepper Crab, you can look forward to savouring new crab recipes – Crab with Tang Gui, Baked Crab, Nonya Curry Crab, Butter Crab, Stirred Fried Crab with Egg Yolk, Salted Egg Crab and XO Crabs.Some of the new line-up is created by their new Executive Sous Chef Ken Ang.My beloved crab for the day is easily the Stir-fried Crab with Salted Egg Yolk. While some customers may be picking out their favourite crab parts (pincers or claws) leisurely from the buffet table (faster can?), I was just going for the remnants of the salted egg yolk because there were the tastiest parts, especially when you try to lick the spicy-sweet-salty yolk encapsulating the crab shells.Tip of the day: Use your hands. You have to get your hands dirty when eating crabs!The ladies seem to flavour the Steamed Crab with Dang Gui and it is indeed less common to see herbal soupy style of crabs with wolfberries on the buffet table. Many of them go “It’s very ‘bu’” and go on downing the part-medicinal soup which they find very nutritious-tasting.Eating eight different crabs at one go, digging the meat and sucking all the ‘chup’… sounds pretty crab-citing all right.Buffet dinner (Mondays to Thursdays):  Adult $55++   Child $33++
Buffet dinner (Fridays to Sundays): Adult $58++  Child $35++[Giveaway Ended] Plaza Brasserie Crab Buffet Giveaway
DanielFoodDiary.com will be giving away 3 buffet dinner vouchers to 3 blessed readers to enjoy Plaza Brasserie’s Crab Buffet!All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKE the FaceBook page of DanielFoodDiary.com
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET on twitter
Step 3: COMMENT below on the crab you will attack first at the buffet table (Do include your email add)
Results will be announced 18th June (Tues).Plaza Brasserie
7500A Beach Road, PARKROYAL on Beach Road (Nearest MRT Bugis), Tel: +65 6505 5710 fb.prsin@parkroyalhotels.com
Opening Hours: 6am – 12am DailyOther Buffet Entries
Straits Café (Rendezvous Grand Hotel)
10 at Claymore (Pan Pacific Orchard)
Silver Shell Café (Shangri La Rasa Sentosa)
Aquamarine (Marina Mandarin)
5 Ways to Avoid Overeating at The Buffet Restaurant
2013-06-10 00:00:00
Spicy Thai – Thai Café – Mookata and Thai Zhi Char All In One Coffeeshop
“What? No air-con?” My heart dropped a beat. After walking 15 minutes from Aljunied MRT in search of authentic Thai food, covered in sniggering sweat, I found myself at a Blk 115 coffeeshop at with tables outside having Thai barbecue steamboat Mookata.Can you imagine Mookata without aircon?We all immediately ordered some Thai Iced Tea and Lemongrass drink, initially expecting a ‘café’ and landed up with a non-air-conditioned foodcourt/coffeeshop where every stall is owned by Spicy Thai-Thai Café. If you are familiar with Spicy Thai-Thai zhi char at Jalan Besar, yes, same owner.A friend highly recommended this place to me, “It’s steamboat, BBQ, ala carte all under one roof!”, “Their prawn cakes are super delicious… so plump and juicy and so cheap! Only $2 per piece!”, “His Red Ruby Dessert is own-made from scratch.” Same friend ah.Our table was recommended a rattle of dishes, Steamed Catfish (instead of the usual seabass), BBQ Pork Neck, Thai Mango Salad with Salted Egg, Green Curry Stir Fry Spaghetti, BBQ Chicken Wings, and Special Aloe Vera Lemongrass Jelly dessert.And the boring us ordered Stir Fried Phad Thai ($6), Green Curry with Chicken ($8), Stir Fried Kang Kong with Chilli ($8), Nam Tok Moo Grilled Pork Salad ($12) and Tom Yum Seafood Soup Clear ($14). We wanted to be… conventional.We all decided that the Thai Iced Tea would be the make-or-break. Woohoo, this tasted almost like those in Bangkok, except that it could do with more milk (we went to spot-check on the brand of evaporated milk at the counter and it was the ‘right’ brand). Spicy Thai-Thai Café uses tea leaves imported from Thailand and then add their freshly home-made pandan syrup.The Tom-Yum Soup is served in a traditional steamboat style, using charcoal to retain keep the broth simmering hot consistently instead of the commercialized way of using wax. I must say I was impressed. Hot – checked. Sour – checked. Spicy – definitely. Tom Yum Soup, pass.We all loved the Phad Thai, double the price of Thailand’s, but almost the same taste. Perhaps it was cooked in a zhi char style, you could sense the slight wok-hei in the noodles. It was evenly fried, slightly sweet, and best of all, served with crunchy beansprouts on the side – just the way I like it.Though we were divided on the Green Curry – some say the gravy is too thin and sweet, while the rest insist this is the way it should be, but all agreed it is still better than so many restaurants claiming they serve authentic Thai cuisine.We wondered why the owner would buy an entire coffeeshop selling entirely Thai food. “How to earn money like that?” I suspect that they are catching the Mookata wave, and their price-point at $35 which can be shared between two to four persons make it really affordable for the family.Spicy Thai – Thai Café is one the recent Thai eatery openings better than Singapore’s average and can make it. The question is – would Singaporeans travel all the way to Aljunied to eat spicy Thai food in sweat? Well, why not?Spicy Thai – Thai Café
Blk 115 Aljunied Ave. 2, #01-35  Singapore 380115 (Aljunied MRT), Tel: +65 6747 8558
Opening Hours: 11am – 12am DailyOther Thai Restaurant Entries
KHA (Martin Road)
Sweet Salty Spicy (Rail Mall)
Moojaa (Keong Siak Street)
Thai Express (Plaza Singapura)
First Thai (Purvis Street)
2013-06-07 00:00:00
The #CookForFamily Cooking Class Giveaway
To encourage more people to #CookForFamily, Daniel’s Food Diary will be giving away 2 Healthy Culinary Adventure classes (worth more than $100 each) with Chef Judy Koh at Creative Culinaire.The dishes that will be taught include: Wholemeal Canape with Smoked Salmon, Roast Chicken with Herb Potato and Flourless Chocolate Cake.All you need to do is
Step 1: LIKE CookForFamily
Step 2: SHARE the picture on Daniel’s Food Diary facebook page
Step 3: COMMENT there once you are done.Note: There is no advertisement or sponsorship involved in this (prizes are from me). This is purely an initiative for those who want to learn how to cook more dishes and bond with their family, and encourage more people to #CookForFamily through the sharing of recipes.
2013-06-07 00:00:00
Bornga – Celebrity Korean BBQ Opens New Outlet at Vivocity. Plus New Dishes
Many love Korean BBQ but the one thing we hate – smelling exactly like Korean BBQ the moment we walk out. The guys do not seem to mind as much, but I know ladies to do not want to get their hair and precious (insert brand) handbags with a grilled pork aroma after a lunch session.That was my main issue with Bornga at The Star Vista that it was very smoky, especially when it is packed during the evening hours.On this visit to Bornga’s new outlet at Vivocity, I noticed black exhaust tubs hanging around the ceiling, and they are actually quite classy modern looking. They can be retracted up and down till they are about an inch above the grill, not the big fat greyish type we see at some older Korean BBQ restaurants.  The ceiling is taller, the area seems more spacious, and yes, no more ‘aroma’-filled Bornga.Most customers would order Borgna’s signature meat, the Woo Samgyup ($28 for 200g) which is a patented recipe from Korean celebrity chef Paik Jong Won. The thinly sliced meats would arrive all pinkish and bright, and you would have thought it has not been marinated before. Most marinated bulgogi meats would have appeared covered in a dark-coloured sauce, while this unique Bornga dressing retains the meat’s natural colours.Exciting. There are three new pork dishes.The dish that deserves special mention is the Dwaeji Gohchujang BBQ ($36), which comprises of sweet-spicy pork slices first grilled, stir-fried with onions and served on a sizzling hot plate. This seasoning reminds me exactly of the Korean Dduk Bok Gi sans the rice cake, and I swept the sauce and onions clean with rice. Oh, it is slightly pricey, but at least this portion is good for sharing between four pax.I did notice a change in Bornga, that there are more (clearly) marinated meat offerings, and perhaps because customers prefer more flavourful sauce-covered meats.We all went for the Yangnyum Dwaeji Galbi ($33 for 250g) which consists of thicker slabs of pork ribs marinated with a dark brown special house sauce. This was yummy. While the Mansinjang Samgyupsal ($24 for 200g) tenderized but plainer looking pork belly somehow appeared to be less popular.Service was super pleasant surprisingly. There was a service staff (thank you Ken) who helped us lazy customers grill and cut the meats, and the grill plates are frequently changed after each round of barbecuing. He is local, but speaks some Korean. I am impressed. Kamsahamnida!Bornga
VivoCity, #02-123/124, 1 Harbourfront Avenue, Singapore 098585. Tel: +65 6376 8268
The Star Vista, #02-24, 1 Vista Exchange Green, Singapore 138617. Tel: +65 6694 4696
Opening Hours:  11:30am to 10.00pm DailyOther Korean Restaurant Entries
Bornga (The Star Vista)
Big Mama (Tiong Bahru)
Bonchon Chicken (Bugis+)
NeNe Chicken (The Star Vista)
Paris Baguette (Wisma Atria)
2013-06-06 00:00:00
Singapore’s Old School Cake Shops from the 60s – The Traditional and The Survivors
The 1960s reflects an important era, when Singapore gained her independence, and the decade was labelled the “Swinging Sixties” for the rise of popular culture, flamboyance and individual expressions.I decided to take a blogging trip back to the past, to document 5 old-school cake shops in Singapore that survived the test of time through the 60s, most of which were established in that era. From Clementi to Tiong Bahru to Bedok, these shops are still making cakes the traditional and difficult way – by hand.So why cakes? Simply because cakes evoke the most memories in me. I grew up making many cakes and kuehs with my ah-ma. We would spend hours kneading, delicately wrapping them, and giving them away to relatives. (We kept the burnt ones within our family.) Those were the times when we truly bonded and spent wonderful times together. Neighbours would reciprocate by giving their own recipes and creations.I don’t really see much of that happening anymore. Even if the modern confectionaries claim they sell traditional goodies, they are just not the same.Lek Lim Nonya Cake Confectionery, located at Bedok North, started back in 1967 in a simple kampong kitchen at Changi Village. Although the family is Teochew, owner Madam Sing learnt the skills of nonya cake making from her father’s Peranakan ‘shi-fu’. While she was initially happy making kueh for the kampong, her ‘Ang Ku Kueh‘ (red tortoise cake) became too popular in the 1980s precisely because Singapore had a baby boom, and many families ordered that as first month cakes for the newly born to symbolise blessings. She eventually opened her official shop in 1987 which, until today, has remained at the same location.The shop’s pride and joy is the ‘Jiu Ceng Gao‘, otherwise known as Kueh Lapis Sagu or Nine-Layered Cake ($1.40 each). I enjoyed eating this kueh layer by layer, and Lek Lim’s version made from tapioca flour, coconut milk, and flavoured with pandan is indeed aromatic, smoothly delicate and not too sweet. I did notice their version had ten layers, instead of the usual nine. Madam Sing explained that the traditional types would have white as a base, green (added by the Malays), red (added by the Peranakans) and a choice colour which distinguished the different families. She wanted to be different and added both blue and yellow because she fell in love with the colours of the butterfly flower.Lek Lim Nonya Cake Confectionery
Blk 84 Bedok North Street 4 #01-21, Singapore 460084 (Near Feng Shan Food Centre, Tanah Merah MRT, take bus no 14, 4 bus stops).
Opening Hours: 4:00am – 6:00pm (Mon-Sat), 4:00am – 2:00pm (Sun)Le Café’s lady boss Betty, still clothed in a 60s style of sleeveless dress and orange spectacles,  is proud that heavenly king Andy Lau had once ordered his Golden Horse awards celebration cake from her – and it was Le Cafe’s signature black forest cake. Le Café was established in 1949, and has been in same the Middle Road location for 60 odds years. But few would know they started off as a zhi char shop, and started selling cakes in the 60s when ‘Guo Da Li‘ (betrothal gift exchange) cakes became widely sought after.These ‘Guo Da Li’ cakes were traditionally given to the bride’s family two weeks before the wedding to be distributed to friends and relatives together with the invitation card. Even though Le Café’s pineapple balls and beancurd tarts have become extremely popular, they still continue to make these retro-licious Butter Cream Cakes ($7 for a box of 6) in their kitchen behind because they do not want to lose their traditions to modern day fads. While there are butter cakes sold in many places, few taste as old-school as Le Café’s.Le Café Confectionery & Pastry
264 Middle Road (Opposite Wilkie Edge behind Rochor Beancurd), Tel: +65 6337 2417
Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 10.30am – 7.00pm ; Sun & PH: 10.30am – 3.00pmSembawang Confectionery was first set up in Katong back in 1962, then at Thomson Road and was well-liked for its chicken pies, curry puffs and sausage rolls. However, popularity of these items went down due to the widespread opening of modern bread shops. Even then, the owner refused to be stingy on ingredients, while insisting on keeping prices low. He shared three formulas to keep his customers loyal: Use quality ingredients; make good food; and sell them cheaper than others.Its present location at Beach Road would zap you into a time machine back to the past, with its tiled flooring, red lanterns and sale of old-school cakes. Of course I was surprised to find the Traffic Light Cake ($1.20). I haven’t seen these since I left primary school. They are still soft and fluffy on the sponge, and thick and creamy on its top layer, exactly how I remember it used to taste like.Sembawang Confectionery
Blk 6, Beach Road #01-4869 Singapore 190006 (near Beach Road Army Market) Tel: +65 6295 3965)
Opening Hours 10:30am – 7:00pm DailyWhen asked the year Tiong Bahru Galicier was founded, owner Jenny Soh looked a little stunned (as if nobody ever asked that question before), “Before the world war, before I was born!” and laughed. She still had a photo dated 1975 of her old shop located at Orchard Road, and said she would have been a very rich woman had her shop not made way for the shopping centres.Fans of nonya cakes have to be careful stepping into Tiong Bahru Galicier. It sells so many old-fashioned kueh you would feel like buying the entire shop! Getting to know their products is an excellent food history lesson! Their variety include the orange Pandan Tapioca Cake (60 cents), Ondeh Ondeh (60 cents), Kueh Kosoi (70 cents), Kueh Ambon honeycomb cake ($1.20) and Kueh Salat (90 cents).  I must confess that I had never seen or tried a Lemper Udang ($1.20) until recently – a glutinous rice roll filled with spicy dried shrimp wrapped in a banana leaf. This is like nonya sushi meets bak zhang, and is so yummy being savoury and sweet at the same time.Tiong Bahru Galicier Pastry
55 Tiong Bahru Road #01-39 Singapore 160055 (5 min walk from Tiong Bahru Market) Tel: +65 6324 1686
Opening Hours: Tue-Sun 9am-9pm, Closed MonWhile Singapore gained her independence in 1965, Balmoral Bakery opened in December the same year, founded by Hainanese ‘Ah Kohs’ (big brothers) as a complement to the famed Balmoral Steak House at Holland Village which was frequented by the British armed forces. The owner then loved all things English, named his shop after a castle in Scotland, and sold English treats such as butter cake, rum balls and beef pies. Balmoral’s pastry chef picked up his baking skills at the cake section of Robinson’s Department Store, which was destroyed by fire in 1972.They moved to the current location at Sunset Way in 1984, and continued making items the way they were taught, to ensure quality and tastiness. During my visit, the shop seemed to be frequented by customers in their 40s and 50s, perhaps there to buy a piece of memory. Not many bakeries now sell the Cream Horn ($1.40 each), puff pastries filled with rich buttercream. I bought 3 Beef Pies ($2.00 each) back home, and it has been a long while since my mum would take the effort to walk into my room and tell me “That pie you bought is delicious!”. I took a bite, and was astonished by the crusty golden outer layer, and flavoursome fillings. I can fully believe that pies made by hand are truly the best.Balmoral Bakery
105 Clementi Road Street 12 (Sunset Way) #01-06 Singapore 120105, Tel: +65 6779 2064
Opening Hours: 9:00am – 8:00pm DailyReflection: The above blog entry was written to fulfil the criteria of the Singapore Blog Awards  themed challenge where we have to write about something about the 60s. It was a moving educational trip for me, to learn about the history of food, and how these shops have survived through the ages.Two things I have learnt from these cake shops in the 60s: Resilience and Optimism.Despite all the competition they are facing, despite the temptation to use technology and cheaper ingredients to make their cakes, they still insist on sticking by their guts and practices. The one person they couldn’t bear to cheat – the customer. The owners just continue to serve and give the best they could, and this sense of resilience is something I really respect them for.Many of these shops are facing the same problems others are facing: high rental and the lack of people taking over. The owners continue to remain optimistic about the future, as long as customers continue to appreciate their cakes. Cakes are indeed a happy food.One thing I feel relieved to see is that over at Lek Lim and Le Café, the children are back in the kitchen doing the baking with their parents, also updating their websites and seem ready to take over the business. At least I know that these pieces of Singapore’s history are in good hands.Vote for Daniel’s Food Diary for Singapore Blog Awards 2013!
2013-06-05 00:00:00
Australian Dairy Company – Long Queues, Short Service & Very Good Scrambled Eggs
[Hong Kong] At one of Hong Kong’s most popular and famous Hong Kong café (Cha Chaan Teng) Australia Dairy Company, expect attitudes, partly rude service, chaotic ambience, long queues, and a very good plate of scrambled eggs.This is my fourth visit to Australian Dairy Company at Jordan, the first three times they were closed. Lesson learnt: Come early to queue, don’t come during the first 8 days of Chinese New Year, and don’t come on Thursdays.At about 8am in the morning, there were about 20-30 odd people in front of us, but the line cleared swift and fast. Come alone and you are likely to get a seat pretty soon. It took us about 15 minutes to get in what we describe a ‘café war zone’.What’s the deal? “You mean that’s all they sell?” my friend exclaiming very puzzled, hoping there was a larger variety like what the other Hong Kong cafes offered.The morning set at HKD$28 consisted of a buttered toast, scrambled eggs, macaroni soup with ham and coffee or tea. The lunch set at HKD$33 offered similar items and had spaghetti with char siew. Rule of thumb: Don’t be fussy, don’t appear lost and just order. If not, you may get scolded something in Cantonese.We mumbled something in bad Cantonese. But the old waiter knew exactly what we wanted, quickly disappeared and returned throwing plates of scrambled eggs and toast on our tables – all happening in a span of 20 seconds. I am not sure to describe them as rude, plain busy, or just super at ease with customers. It’s a matter of perspective.And yes, the buttered toast was soft and aromatic, and eating it with the famed scrambled eggs in the middle is just evidence at how the simplest food on earth can taste so blissful. The eggs are fluffy and tasty, some say the secret ingredient is canned cream soups, while I also heard Hokkaido milk.I think frying it on high heat in the Chinese stove makes all that difference. Never mind if the sweat of the person frying seems to be dripping downwards. You won’t want to see.“You mean we woke up so early just to have this?” This same friend could not understand the fuss behind Australia Dairy Company. He says that even the Cold Steamed Milk Dessert (HKD$17) was milkier and smoother over at Yee Shun (just a street away). But the breakfast over there was nothing to shout about.The very moment we finished our desserts, we were hurried out. I left feeling satisfied, that I tasted one of the best scrambled eggs toast in Hong Kong, and went through the fanatical cha chaan teng experience.Australia Dairy Company 澳洲牛奶公司
G/F, 47-49 Parkes Street, Jordan, Hong Kong (MTR Jordan Exit C2)
佐敦白加士街47-49號地下
Opening Hours: 7:30am – 11:00pm (Closed Thursdays)Other Hong Kong Entries
Bing Sutt G.O.D Starbucks (Hong Kong)
Mak’s Noodles (Hong Kong)
Tim Ho Wan (Hong Kong)
Ho Hung Kee (Hong Kong)
Dim Sum Bar (Hong Kong)
2013-06-04 00:00:00
SHATEC Recipes – Celebrates 30 Years with Menu Created By Well-Known Alumni
During secondary school I took my first food related workshop with SHATEC – a food etiquette course which included a set-lunch. It was then when I learnt where to place my napkin, which fork and spoon to use, which glass to drink from. Am I right to say many diners do not know the right table manners and should attend such a course.Over the years, I have also dined at SHATEC’s full-fledged restaurants Petals, Charcoal to the present Recipes right opposite the Supreme Court. Always get more forgiving friends to dine with you there, because the service staff are all students, and students get nervous and fumble.If you give them the opportunity to learn, you appreciate their very sincere manner of attending. They are really there to learn and serve. Plus the meals are more affordable.Recipes will be serving a four course anniversary menu ($42) which comes with a complimentary glass of wine on the 7th and 14th of June. What is really special about this dinner menu is that it is fully created by SHATEC alumni, all of whom are familiar names in the F&B industry.Starter: Slow-Cooked Pork Belly with Apple Salsa created by Chef Randy Chow, Section Head/Culinary Arts at Temasek Poly (class of 1986)Soup: Mushroom Coffee with Crispy Cinnamon Roll with Prawn Paste created by Chef Eric Teo, the celebrity chef often appearing on Channel 8/U (class of 1986)Main Course – Sous Vide Chicken Breast in Smoked Oil, Fig Glazed Foie Gras, Caramelised Endive, Manchego Espuma, Thyme Jus, created by Chef Tony Khoo Executive Chef at the Mandarin Oriental Hotel (class of 1986)Dessert – Fondant Au Chocolat Created by Chef Pang Kok Keong, chef-owner of Antoinette and Pique Nique (class of 1993)The most memorable dish during the preview dinner was surprisingly the mushroom coffee served in a cup, which had a rather balanced blend of the two, also full of mushroom-y aroma.  Having higher expectations for the desserts, I wished it was something more complex. And some of the other chocolate lava flowed, mine didn’t.I also (kaypoh) took time to speak to 19 year old Joshua Choo, who left his engineering diploma course to sign up with SHATEC.Q: Why the switch from a diploma course to SHATEC? Especially when the F&B industry seems tougher in Singapore
A: Halfway through my diploma, I didn’t feel like wasting time doing something I didn’t like anymore. I asked myself what I really wanted to do in future. My friends and parents encouraged me to pursue my dreams and gave me the courage. If you enjoy doing something, you won’t find it a chore.Q: What do you learn most from SHATEC?
A: Working in Recipes and dealing with real life customers. Most of them are really nice and patient with us, and I enjoy talking to them.Q: What are your plans after graduation?
A: It was actually to be a bartender and hopefully to open my very own pub with like-minded friends. It is my dream and SHATEC is perhaps the place which can help me achieve it.Like some of the other SHATEC alumni Ignatius Chan, Simon Song, Justin Quek, Willment Leong, Chef Eric Teo and Chef Pang Kok Keong, I somehow have the feeling this very young and passionate Joshua Choo with an undescribable quiet energy would be the next person to look out for years later.RECIPES by SHATEC
The Treasury, 100 High Street, #01-03, Singapore 179434 (City Hall MRT, Opposite Supreme Court of Singapore) Tel: +65 6338 2798Other Related Entries
The Academy Bistro (Supreme Court)
Cocotte (Wanderlust Hotel)
Grub (Bishan Park)
Jewel Café + Bar (Rangoon Road)
Le Steak (Jalan Kayu)
2013-06-03 00:00:00
Time To Award Singapore Hawkers Their Own “Michelin Stars”
There has been some food buzz online questioning if Singapore hawker food is Michelin star worthy? It started with HungryGoWhere asking “Are Singapore hawkers not Michelin-worthy?”, followed by food blogging guru ieatishootipost questioning “Can Singapore Hawkers take on Michelin starred chefs?”.How should we even begin with this apples versus oranges comparison?Let’s start with the Michelin guide, started by a tire company (nothing related with food), that anonymously awards restaurants on a three-star system based on food quality, mastery of technique, personality and consistency of the food. Note that interior décor, table setting and service quality are not included in the rating criteria.1-star Michelin restaurant Tim Ho Wan and its barbecued pork bunsThe recent thrill that arrived to our sunny shores is the one-starred Michelin Tim Ho Wan Singapore, sending frenzied crowds to a 2-3 hour queue. Frankly, only their barbecued buns gave that orgasmic feeling when eaten. The rest of the dishes were okay-good but not exactly exceptional.So, if a shabby hole-in-the wall dim sum place in Mongkok can get one star, why not some of our Singapore food and restaurants? Some also seem to forget that even xiao long bao makers Din Tai Fung has one star for its branch at Tsim Sha Tsui.3-star Michelin restaurant Lung King Heen serves humble wanton noodles.The thing is Singapore is not one of the cities under the Michelin guide, unlike Hong Kong and Tokyo. We will NEVER get the Michelin star no matter how good our food is.The guide will award establishments with at least two to three culinary specialties. Even if the Michelin guide does come to Singapore, it would be the usual suspects such as Andre, Waku Ghin, Iggy’s, Jaan and Les Amis getting the stars. This is the rule of their game.So where do our humble Singapore hawkers stand, some spending their lifetime perfecting their craft of coming up with that one dish?While some of the more popular ones earn a tidy profit, most do not get much recognition. The skilful hawkers have few or no disciples they can pass their skills to; many choose to retire after rising costs of rental and labour force them to shut down.Singapore chicken rice can also be ‘atas’.There are some other problems I see that are against hawkers in Singapore going further ahead.1) There is no island-wide reputable recognition for them. Yes, they may have won some “hawker king” award here and there through voting or judging, but there is no single award which stands out from all the rest. If Japan’s “Ramen King” can be national pride and glory, why not our very own “Bak Chor Mee King”?2) There are celebrity chefs in Singapore, but not really celebrity hawkers. Can you name the chef who cooks the famous Tian Tian chicken rice?3) Few or no restaurants are bringing Singapore street food to atas high-end status. If a 3-star Michelin restaurant in Hong Kong can serve ‘simple’ fare such as wanton noodles and fried rice, why aren’t many fine dining restaurants “posh-ing” our Singapore food up?Perhaps it is time to upkeep, uphold and upmarket our Singapore hawkers – upkeep traditions, uphold our culinary heritage, and upmarket their status.Why not award our own “Michelin Stars”? If a tire company can award stars, perhaps our very own Telcos or the Singapore Tourism Board can honour the best hawkers and food with a one, two and three star system. This is also an opportunity to discover hidden gems that are present just near our doorsteps.Divine laksa with abalone, is this worthy of a star?How many you know can fry up char kway tiao with brilliant wok hei, hand-make popiah with the perfect skin and shape, or flip prata like a pro? These are all legitimate skills to be recognised.Singapore is always waiting for others to give her awards of any sorts, why not provide recognition for your own talents first? If we claim we want to save our hawkers, but is all talk but no action, nothing is going to really happen.So Dr Leslie Tay asked if a Michelin Star Chef like Gordon Ramsay can fry a plate of Char Kway Teow as good as Hillstreet’s Mr Ng? Well, even though Chef Ramsay has 14 stars under his belt, the answer is maybe (with no offence intended) no.Other Related Entries
Time To Have A Top 100 Restaurants List For Singapore
2013-06-02 00:00:00
Pierre Hermé – World Famous Macaron Boutique Opens at Hong Kong IFC
[Hong Kong] Pierre Hermé has opened in Hong Kong, and I won’t be surprised if people would be tempted to fly over to get their hands on a box of “The Picasso of Pastries”.I suspect that many Hong Kongers have sweet tooths, seeing the number of chocolate, dessert and macaron shops that are sprouting in the city. Ladurée  has already created quite a queue at Harbour City, and it is no doubt that macaron masters Pierre Hermé will enjoy huge popularity at ifc.Both my friend and I were not macaron persons, so we nosed around the shop wondering if we could just get one to try “Can just buy one or not ah?” We ended with the minimum order of 7 in a “Paris Landmark” box for HKD$210 (SGD$34.27).Minus the box, that is about $4.90 for one macaron!  (Could I have saved it for a bowl of wanton noodles?”Comparatively, the flavours are really quite exciting: Arabesque (Apricot & Crunchy Pistachio), Crème Brulee (Vanilla & Caramel Pieces), Imagine (Matcha Green Tea & Black Sesame Crisp), Infiniment Chocolat Porcelana (Pure Origin Venezuala Porcelana Dark Chocolate), Infiniment Rose (Rose & Rose Petals), Céleste (Passion fruit, Rhubarb & Strawberries) and Mogador (Milk Chocolate & Passion Fruit).No wonder most of the office executive are getting the “Tout e monde en parle” box of 24 at HKD$660 (SGD$107.70) to try the different combinations. They just buy them by the boxes as though they are free.The million dollar question is: Is Pierre Hermé better than Ladurée?The short answer to that is: Yes.On first bite, I felt that I preferred Ladurée’s crust, which is lighter and crisp while Pierre Hermé’s meringue disc was chewier and thicker, and even sweeter.But…if you just allow the macaron flavours to linger in your mouth, the explosion of sensations of Pierre Herme’s creamier ganache layer makes is all very thrilling to relish.Talk about creativity. My favourite macaron was a Japanese-inspired Imagine with combinations of Matcha Green Tea and Black Sesame Crisp, the balanced interplay of both tastes makes eating a macaron memorable and fun at the same time.So fans of macarons, is it Pierre Hermé or Ladurée for you?Macarons & Chocolats Pierre Hermé Paris
Shop 1019C, Podium Level One, ifc mall, Central, Hong Kong (MTR Central or Hong Kong station, walk to IFC Mall) Tel: +852.2833.5700
Opening Hours: 10am-9pm DailyOther Macaron Entries
Laduree (Tokyo)
Laduree Singapore (Ngee Ann City)
Au Chocolat (Marina Bay Sands)
Brunetti (Tanglin Mall)
Obolo Galeria (Rochester Mall)
2013-05-30 00:00:00
Mariko’s – Ramen Bar & Izakaya Named After A Manga Prostitute
A friend of mine avoids the hipsters’ area. To name a few – Tiong Bahru, Ann Siang, Duxton, and Keong Saik. To quote her, it’s where “pretentious people hang out and drink”. To each her own.Whether is a hipster/wannabe/fashionable/trendy area, it’s undeniable that Keong Saik is that one street which transformed from a former red-light district flanked with brothels, to a dining strip with a range of offerings from tapas joint, casual bars,  Thai style Mookata to awesome zhi char.New on the list is ramen bar and izakaya Mariko’s, well named after a fictional manga Japanese prostitute. Perhaps paying tribute to Keong Saik’s past.I really scaled the island for ramen, and find myself in this stylistic bar, almost empty except 4 or 5 customers on the weekday night. Mariko’s is the brainchild of the people behind Bartini at Club Street and British grub restaurant Retrospective just steps away.The idea of the décor is to recreate the feeling of walking down a back alley in Japan. While I don’t exactly get that impression, the visual impact is every strong as you are presented with an entirely different mood at every corner of such a small space. Full marks for the interior design. Gorgeous and makes you feel you are in a different space and land.Food is limited to mainly ramen, tempura and yakitoris, helmed by local chef Desmond Lim with more than 30 years of Japanese cuisine experience. My Tempura Moriawase ($22) of prawn, fish and vegetable tempura was crisp and great, though felt a tad pricey for its portion.I had both the Tonkotsu Ramen ($16) and Gyunyu Miso Ramen ($16) with chicken char siew and fish broth. The entire bowl feels like a modern and Western interpretation to the traditional Japanese style of ramen, and reminds me of the Wagamama chains overseas.The broth, while a lot thinner than usual, is still flavoursome. If you are used to the thick salty Keisuke and Menya Musashi, then this is quite the opposite. A pity the noodles were cooked too long and did not have a bouncy bite.Mariko’s could do with more Japanese style bar bites to go with its entire theme. It’s a lovely place, but would I come back here again for ramen? I am obviously not the target customer. I admit, I am so not a hipster.Mariko’s
4 Jiak Chuan Road (diagonal to Keong Saik Street), Tel:+65 6221 8262
Hours: 12pm-midnight (Mon-Thu), 12pm-1am (Fri-Sat)Other Ramen Entries
Keisuke Tonkotsu King Four Seasons (Bugis Village)
Daruma Ramen House (TripleOne Somerset)
Menya Sanji (Orchid Hotel, Tanjong Pagar)
Uma Uma Ramen (Forum Galleria)
Kitakata Rahmen Tamakichi (Orchard Plaza)
2013-05-29 00:00:00
DanielFoodDiary.com is Nominated for Best Food Blog of Singapore Blog Awards 2013!
Daniel’s Food Diary has been nominated as one of the top ten finalists in the  Best Food Blog category of Singapore Blog Awards 2013!This is the 3rd time Daniel’s Food Diary has been nominated. Never won before. So hope that this will be my blessed year!If you like what you have been reading and want to give a little support, here’s how you can vote.Step 1: Go to the following linkStep 2: Register if you have yet to.Step 3: Go to the Food categoryStep 4: Vote on Daniel’s Food Diary. Tah-dah!You can vote once a day EVERYDAY till 23rd June. I look forward to your support!Vote for Daniel’s Food Diary
2013-05-28 00:00:00
Shokudo Japanese Coffee House – New Revamped Menu Has Almost Something For Everyone
Unlike other Thai Express  brands Xin Wang, Poulet and Kiseki, Shokudo does not enjoy the same amount of success. I won’t be surprised if some gets it confused with the old marche-style Shokudo Japanese Bazaar at Raffles City.Yes, Shokudo Japanese Coffee House is the one at Orchard Cineleisure (right up the escalator) and Bugis Junction. A much-needed revamp to its menu has finally arrived.Flipping through its very extensive menu of over 130 items from starters, pizzas, pastas, hot stone rice, curry rice, maki, rosti, burger, hot plate, udon, dessert and drinks… all 14 pages of it,  this reminds me of a everything-also-sell Hong Kong café selection, but Japanese style.Some customers were ordering this mountain pile of rice, and I told myself “I must have this!” The Mount Fuji Curry Omu Rice ($16.80) is a show-stopper. Come on, rice wrapped with omelette topped with thick beef patty, covered in melting cheese with greens all soaked in Japanese curry? They should call this Mount Curry Eruption.The blend of thick Japanese curry and cheese together is an amazing pair, as if the plainest rice can also taste good with it. The patty is really thick and juicy, and I think it would take two of me to finish this.Seems like battered fish fillet burgers are the IN-thing now (spotted it at Grub and Department of Caffeine). Which teen can resist the Ryoshi Fish Burger ($10.80) which has this big slab of deep-fried fish across the bun with a sunny-side up sandwiched in between? Puts all the ‘tiny’ fish burgers to shame.One of my greatest weaknesses is chicken wings, so I can be a little bias on this. Shokudo’s new Yuzu Chicken Wings ($7.80) served with wasabi mayonnaise has such a deliciously sweet glaze with tender meat, it is clearly my favourite dish that day.Admittedly, some of the other items are the standard usual safe stuff – such as Unagi Mushroom Cheese Pizza ($14.80) and Seafood Avocado Carbonara Pasta ($15.80) – that should appeal still to the youths and masses. You get the sense that the new menu is trying to ‘play’ around with different versions of the same thing. The rosti alone has 5 different combinations.While they took away my previous Shokudo favourite which is a Squid Ink Curry Rice, this casual Japanese-western menu hits a right note as there is almost something to order for everyone. Think Hong Kong cafe, Japanese food.Shokudo Japanese Coffee House
Bugis Junction #01-53 (Bugis MRT) Tel: +65 6338 9216
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 11pm (Sun to Thurs), 11.30am – 12am (Fri & Sat, Eve of PH)Cathay Cineleisure Orchard #02-06A/B (Somerset MRT) Tel: +65 6736 0971
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 2am (Sun to Thurs), 11.30am – 3am (Fri, Sat & Eve of PH)Other Related Entries
Dolce Tokyo (313 Somerset)
Hoshino Coffee (Plaza Singapura)
Osaka Ohsho (Raffles City)
Nana’s Green Tea Café (Plaza Singapura)
Hifumi (Plaza Singapura)
2013-05-27 00:00:00
Halia – Afternoon Tea at Raffles Hotel? So Delightful
Never an afternoon tea person, but I could really learn to enjoy it. A familiar practice of the colonial days, afternoon tea was started by the wealthy class in England, and has taken a more popular form in Singapore made available in many hotels and tea houses.I digress and I ask, who goes for afternoon tea in Singapore – other than tai-tais (Japanese, Indonesia, Koreans.. okay I shouldn’t stereotype), friends having off-days together, and those who does not even need to work? Tell me. (‘Afternoon Tea’ is not to be confused with ‘High Tea’ which is originally considered the evening meal of working class, typically eaten between 5 pm and 7 pm.)Very aptly, the newly opened Halia Restaurant at Raffles Hotel has also started serving afternoon tea daily, and not just the weekends. This afternoon tea service is available from 3-5pm, at $35++ per person per set.Really, what better place to enjoy afternoon tea than at Raffles Hotel, still full of old colonial charm?Halia’s afternoon tea selection comes in a two-tier tea stand, with a mixture of sweet and savoury nibbles – which combined can be as filling than an actual meal.My favourite item there was actually an unassuming soft and light mini muffin. While most would be quite familiar with the sweet ones, the savoury version felt interesting enough with a light touch of saltiness with a pillow-like texture.Perhaps I do not have so much of a sweet tooth, I was not that excited about the cakey offerings, like Chocolate Royal, Green Tea Tiramisu, or even Macarons. I could gladly offer them up to others.Instead, I wanted to leave all room for the Scones, which goes very well with the seasonal jam and clotted cream. Halia’s version does not flip to the heavy or dense side and feels gently moist, partly because they are all freshly baked.This Afternoon Tea Service also comes with a choice of premium teas. And why not pick Halia’s signature drink – the Halia infusion, available hot or iced.Imagine this beautiful elegant setting, having a bite of a meringue tart while watching the world go back. I can get used to this. If only I do not need to work from 3-5pm.Halia at Raffles Hotel
#01-22/23, 1 Beach Road, Raffles Hotel, Singapore 189673 (City Hall MRT)
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pm, Afternoon Tea 3:00pm – 5:00pmOther Related Entries
MUSEO (Quayside Isle)
Wild Honey (Scotts Square)
Dolce Tokyo (313 Somerset)
5 Best Matcha Cafes in Singapore
2013-05-23 00:00:00
Shabu Sai – Japanese Shabu-Shabu & Sukiyaki Hotpot Buffet Opens At Orchard Central
It is really strange that Singaporeans really love their hotpot considering how warm the weather is. There was even a short queue outside newly-opened hotpot restaurant Shabu Sai at Orchard Central (right opposite Kiseki Buffet). Hotpot brings people together. Hotpot brings out gossips, I mean conversations.Nevermind its mildly offensive name when called in Hokkien, Shabu Sai is an all-you-can-eat, Japanese buffet restaurant, with Shabu-Shabu, Sukiyaki and sushi. All I know is the words ‘buffet’ and ‘meats’ can invite Singaporeans down in droves. (“Sai” means vegetables.)First impressions were positive. Loved its food presentation, quite artfully done with wooden Japanese labels. I got slightly excited at the variety of fresh vegetables, sushi, mini-chirashi dons and meat stuffed in bamboo. (The parent company also owns Chiso Zanmai and Hifumi -both known to offer budget Japanese food.)There are 7 soup bases to choose from, including some monthly specials such as Yuzu Salt Beauty which is their signature ‘Collagen’ soup and Spicy Kimchi. Talk about the C word, and ladies would delight how hotpot can bring beauty to faces. Not.At Shabu Sai, let me tell you which soup bases to try, and which to avoid big time.The Sukiyaki soup base is the safest choice, probably the broth that can bring out the tastes of the sliced US beef, South American pork and Brazilian chicken. The best things in the entire restaurant are these meats really, coming mid-thinly sliced in huge black square serving trays.People will be divided on the Curry Dashi soup base. This thick orangey soup totally reminds me of how my instant noodle (that M brand) would taste like if I pour many many packets of the curry powder within, except that Shabu Sai’s version is more concentrated.The rest? Tonkotsu Shoyu Soup was exceptionally salty, Yuzu Salt Beauty relentlessly salty, and Spicy Soup irrevocably salty.The Tomato soup is just weird (still salty) and Seaweed soup like seaweed added to plain water (the consolation is that it is not so salty). I thought it could only be me as I may have a lower tolerance, but every single one on the other table felt the M invasion.To give them the benefit of the doubt, I tried another pot and the supposed same soup was not THAT salty. Ah, the lack of consistency. Still I must have drunk at least 10 glasses of green tea because I was beyond thirsty, still feeling the same after I got home.A pity as the meats were indeed quite inviting. But soup should always be the main priority. There is free flow of drinks and soft serve ice cream at an additional $1.99++. You will probably need it.Updated: A friend went back to Shabu Sai and said the broth was quite comforting and delicious, especially the curry soup. She told me every restaurant deserves a 2nd chance.Weekday Lunch: Adult $16.99++, Child $9.99++
Weekday Dinner: Adult $24.99++, Child $9.99++
Weekend Lunch: Adult $19.99++, Child $9.99++
Weekend Dinner: Adult $29.99++, Child $9.99++Shabu Sai
Orchard Central, 181 Orchard Road, #08-09/10/11 (Somerset MRT), Tel: +65 6884 6760
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 3pm, 6pm – 10:30pm (Weekdays), 11:30am – 10:30pm (Weekends)Other Japanese Restaurant Entries
Danro Japanese Hotpot (NEX)
Kiseki (Orchard Central)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
Hifumi (Plaza Singapura)
Sho Teppan (Ion Orchard)
2013-05-22 00:00:00
Madam Kwan’s – Famous Nasi Lemak Restaurant Opens at Vivocity, and It’s Just As Good As Malaysia’s
“OMG. It’s Madam Kwan serving me!” I got a bit of a pleasant disbelief when I saw Madam Kwan herself passing me the menu, complete with her signature grin, mole under her lips, specs and khaki-coloured hat.  It was really her.“Thank you for coming. I hope you like our food.” She reminds me of my own grandmother, about the same height and has the same caring look. She is 80 this year.I rattled off a few of Madam Kwan’s must-haves without looking, those which I have space for – Nasi Lemak, Nasi Bojari, Sambal Belachan Kang Kong, Otak Otak and Chendol.  Until I noticed that the price was the almost the same as Malaysia’s, the only difference is theirs is in ringgit. Gasp. (Read: Review Madam Kwan’s in Malaysia)Several fans would swear by the Nasi Bojari ($18.90), a Madam Kwan created dish of tri-coloured red-yellow-white rice with assam prawns, beef rendang and deep fried chicken drumstick. This is modified from an original Indonesia dish meant for royalty.Wow. The entire combination is almost perfect, my only complaint is that it can get rather oily. The huge drumstick meat so lovingly tender-licious that simply comes off from its bones. I didn’t need to use hands. How does it even taste so awesome? Every mouthful gives you a slightly different flavour, the rice being both fluffy and dry at the same time (interesting combination), also well matched with the rendang. Give me more gravy please.The Nasi Lemak ($13.90 in Singapore, $16.90 ringgit in Malaysia – argh, high rental) with aromatic coconut steamed rice with chicken curry, sambal ikan bills, dried shrimp floss, hard boiled egg, acar and cucumber is comparable in taste to Malaysia’s. Give me a blind test, and I won’t be able to tell the difference. Let hope it stays this way, not only because the owner is in.While I probably had a better oilier more aromatic version of Nasi Lemak at some random stall in Malaysia, Madam Kwan manages to keep the standard consistent, and I liked that she has a variety of bite-sized side dishes as accompaniments. The only pity is that the chicken meats are too dry and tough to cut through.Loved loved loved the Otak Otak ($15.90), a version where you can finally taste chunks of fish in its thick square slab without being too floury and ‘fake-tasting’.Perhaps some may feel there is too much flavour somewhere. The Kang Kong ($10.90) was almost swimming in dried shrimps and oil. And the Chendol ($4.90) abundantly coconut-milky.  I am not complaining.Bill was over $80. Felt slightly faintly that the two persons paid so much for Nasi Lemak. Well, the dining ambience of Madam Kwan’s is much more pleasant at Vivocity. The branch at Malaysia was emm… a little noisy with floor full of shoe-print marks. You get what I mean.  Will come back soon for its Fish Head Curry!Other Related Entries
Madam Kwan’s (Malaysia)
Pappasan (Dorsett Hotel)
Kopi Tiam (Swisstel The Stamford)
Prima Taste Kitchen (Centrepoint)
Ipoh Lou Yau Bean Sprouts Chicken (Chinatown Pt)
2013-05-21 00:00:00
PappaSan – Chic Restaurant Selling Local Delights at Extravagant Prices
Don’t get me wrong. I am all for upping the status of Singapore street side food, making it more ‘atas’ and upmarket. While many are willing to pay bigger bucks for easier-to-prepare food, such as burgers and pastas, the same cannot be said local food such as satays and Hokkien mee – which can be quite labour intensive.We love our chicken rice, whether it is from the hawker centre at Tian Tian or a restaurant at Chatterbox.Newly opened Pappasan Restaurant at Dorsett Hotel (not to be confused with PappaRich) brings our favourite local food to another level. Make that two levels.For the ‘cheaper’ range, you get your ala carte offerings of Chicken Rice ($16.50), Ipoh Hor Fun Soup ($13.50), Signature Fried Koay Teow ($18.50) and Vegetarian Fried Rice ($12.00). You must be thinking if that is ‘cheap’, then what does it mean by ‘expensive.Be ready for the next dimension of Singapore local delights – Richman Fried Rice ($38.00, that is with Maine lobster), Richman Teochew Chicken Porridge ($38.00, it better comes with abalone and yes it does), and Richman Birthday MeeSua ($38.00, with Maine lobster and prawns).Just to make it a little more obvious, they named this series “Richman”. (I suggest if there is a dessert section, call it “Richtaitai”.)Objectively speaking (ignoring the price), the Pappasan Chicken Rice which uses poached 90 days farm chicken is quite tasty, though not the Chatterbox level yet. My favourite part was ironically not the chicken meat, but the fragrant rice – not the fluffy kind, drier but still flavourful. The specially homemade chilli sauce and dark soya sauce are winners as well.The Signature Fried Koay Teow ($18.50) was decent, but lacks the wok-hei and intensity of aromas that would match up to the usual hawker centre standards. The ingredients of fresh prawns and scallops from Queensland were generous though, and that is about it? AddingI had to send the chicken wings ($8) back because it was slightly bloody. And what is with the ordinary chilli sauce that feels it is off a bottle? Give me authentic sambal or use the chicken rice chilli at least.So I spent 60 over bucks eating 3 dishes of hawker food with 2 drinks. The relaxing ambience and chic décor earns it some points though. But Pappasan has to move beyond just attracting the occasional tourist and corporate clients. They have to do up a wider spectrum of local delights, and do them really well.Pappasan Restaurant
Dorsett Hotel 01-01, 333 New Bridge Road Singapore 088765 (Outram Park MRT), Tel: +65 6820 1316Other Related Entries
Kopi Tiam (Swisstel The Stamford)
The Academy Bistro (Supreme Court)
Prima Taste Kitchen (Centrepoint)
Ipoh Lou Yau Bean Sprouts Chicken (Chinatown Pt)
BKT by Kong Kee (Far East Square)
2013-05-20 00:00:00
KHA – This Is It. This Is The Taste Of Thailand.
KHA has a new chef. And all the difference it makes.Seriously, my main lament against Thai food in Singapore is not because it is not delicious, but that it is all watered and muted down – losing that main spirit of Thai cuisine. Thai food loves to be intense, perhaps the only type of cuisine in the world which can be so intensely sour, intensely spicy, sweet, and salty all at the same time.When I had my first bite of KHA’s Nahm Dtok Nuer ($22), a spicy grilled Wagyu beef salad with shallots, coriander, mint, lime, fish sauce and toasted rice dressing, I told myself “This is it. This is Thailand.” The starter was unapologetic at being immensely sour and spicy, certainly not with weak tummies.I told the new young Executive Chef Adam Cliff that the food and décor reminds me of Nahm. Nahm is considered Thailand’s top restaurant, 3rd in Asia and No. 32 in the world. In my mind, I actually thought some dishes tasted even better than Nahm’s.There was a quick moment of awkward silence. It was when Chef Adam Cliff told me that he used to under Thai food guru David Thompson, and has worked at Nahm London and Bangkok, Bo.lan Bangkok, and Sailors Thai in Sydney – some of the most renowned Thai restaurants around. No wonder the taste feels a little… familiar.Rather than the typical dishes that we get in central Thailand, the new chef introduces some ‘Isaan’ influences to the menu. Some of the best known Issan dishes – Som Dtum Malakor ($16, green papaya salad with a side of candied pork), Pla Phao Glua ($30, salt-crusted whole seabass stuffed with lemongrass) and different types of grills.Warning, Isaan cuisine is also known to be fiery hot, particularly sour, and may give that weird queasiness in your stomach. I think you know that feeling.The favourite KHA’s dish of the day has to be Gai Yung Esaan ($15) –  chicken thighs. marinated for 24 hours in garlic, pepper and coriander, grilled till crispy, served with jim jaew. With the outer layer slightly crisp, it was pulsating with flavours as you satisfyingly bite off chunks of tender meat like a savoury ice cream stick.Grills are obviously their strength. The Goong Golae ($29) –  whole tiger prawns smothered in dry red coconut curry, grilled over fire with fresh lime, puts all other grilled prawns I had to shame. Superiorly fresh with a tantalising bite of spice.I am obviously very excited by the new chef and new offerings of KHA, hopefully reviving or exceeding some of its former glory. It is not even very pricey to begin with for its quality and ambience, comparable with some of the so-called Thai restaurants in Singapore.My only wish is that they can continue to maintain that consistency and not give in to muting that authentic Thai taste. Because I can just imagine a lot who are not used to Thai food complaining that some of the dishes are too ‘powerful’ – too spicy, too sour, too much fish sauce.But that is when you can taste the passion of Thai food.KHA
Martin No. 38 38 Martin Road Singapore 239059, Tel: +65 6476 9000
Opening Hours: 12:00pm – 3:00pm, 6:00pm – 11:00pm (Daily)Other Thai Restaurant Entries
Sweet Salty Spicy (Rail Mall)
Moojaa (Keong Siak Street)
Thai Express (Plaza Singapura)
First Thai (Purvis Street)
Suan Thai Restaurant (Killiney Road)
2013-05-17 00:00:00
Gattopardo Italian Grill & Pizzabar – Sicilian Cuisine, Taste of Rustic Italy
Sicilian cuisine has always been unfamiliar ground to me. My main knowledge it that while it is predominantly Italian, it also has Spanish, Greek and Arab influences because Sicily only became part of Italy in 1860.Gattopardo Italian Restaurant & Pizzabar at Hotel Fort Canning is one place to appreciate authentic Sicilian cuisine to fuller aspects. After all, it is also named after a famous Sicilian novel by Giuseppe Tommasi di Lampedusa, helmed by Chef Lino Sauro who has more than 25 years of culinary experience.While the restaurant looks like a higher-end diner where you can go enjoy a romantic dinner date, there is still a rustic aura with its usage charcoal grill and wood-fired oven for baking their gourmet pizzas. Yes, you can have Sicilian BBQ on the Almerita Terrace where the chef would be cooking live from your table.I was there for a special 4-course Sicilian barbecue dinner ($158++ per person) organised by the Palate Club, where Chef Lino Sauro did an on-the-spot barbecue demonstration as though he was cooking for guests at home.There were some takeaways which I learnt about Sicilian cuisine. In Sicily, you appreciate the food for what it is.I was slightly surprised that the Fresh Scampi and Calamari was grilled only for a manner of seconds, where Chef Lino Sauro stressed that over-cooking would not allow you to relish its original goodness. After all in Sicily, its people eat fresh produces and seafood that is found within miles. Though it still felt a little ‘raw’ to me.Yes, seafood is a necessary part of the Sicilian diet where they can be found in abundance. Many of Gattopardo’s signatures are seafood based, including Amberjack with Sea Urchin Vinaigrette, Angel Hair Pasta with Grey Mullet “Bottarga” Roe and Sea Urchin. I had a Risone Pasta with Braised Octopus and Bone Marrow which I really enjoyed for the slight hint of seafoody-saltiness.Chef Lino always says you can’t hurry things in Sicilian cooking. And many of his dishes feel fresh and unprocessed. I had a Wagyu Beef with Pork Sausages. While sausages usually give the impression of being processed, his version felt like it was made right at home – very real, very simple.I know this sounds strange, but I needed to tune my mind to appreciate that very down-to-earth and original taste. I could very well imagine people criticising the food for being not complicated, not flavourful enough, not full in taste. Fair enough.The Sicilians probably believed a lot in celebration and feasting, as since at all the customers were having fun taking a watch at the barbecue while having Sicilian wine. Even though everyone was seated prim and proper in a dining setting, the mood was still jovial with lots of laughter. That is the Sicilian spirit.Gattopardo Italian Grill & Pizzabar
11 Canning Walk Hotel Fort Canning Singapore 178881 Tel: +65 63385498
Opening Hours: 12pm – 300pm, 630pm – 1130pmOther Italian Restaurant Entries
il Cielo (Hilton Hotel Singapore) 
Pete’s Place (Hyatt Hotel)
Garibaldi (Purvis Street)
Limoncello Restaurant (Robertson Quay)
Covelli Italian Bistro & Wine Bar (Orchard Central)
2013-05-16 00:00:00
Dear Singa, My Father Was The Most Courteous Principal. No, He Did Not Quit.
Dear Singa,My late dad, won the your award – the “Friend of Singa Award” in 1992 for being the “Most Courteous Principal Award” in recognition for his “courteous, considerate and caring character towards others”. If you remember, he was then the principal of Pearl Park Primary School.Did he win it because he was the meet-and-greet, and all smiling principal?From what I recall, he was far from it. He was like a typical strict and straight-faced Chinese teacher. He won because he was a non-quitter.For years, the primary school was plagued with problems of littering and discipline.  Despite the school having a few part-time cleaners, litter was everywhere –coming from both the students and public. He took the broom and swept the entire school himself.  The entire school.I remember then I felt slightly embarrassed that the head of a school would be seen sweeping the compound, “Papa, you should not be sweeping the floor. You are the principal. The workers should do it. Or make it compulsory for the students.”“If the principal doesn’t do it, who would?”He showed his version of being caring and considerate – to lead by example day-in-day-out. A year later, the school was spin and span. Students, and even teachers helped in keeping the area clean. I felt very proud that even the hawkers at the People’s Park district knew and were talking about it.He continued sweeping though. He did not quit.The primary school then was not known to be the best in academic students. In fact, there were the typical rude students with problems of discipline.He got to know every one of them personally. Every one of his delinquent students. He had an exercise book where he wrote them the names of all his students (In typical Chinese language fashion, that was how he remembered).Every now and there, I would find a stranger in my house – getting free tuition from my father because they were not performing well in school. You would have thought that all the students would be appreciative of that act, but I can say it is far from it.Many were disgruntled and still complained. But my father preserved and those who continued ended up improving for their examinations.He continued giving free tuition after he retired. He did not quit.Like you, my father was 30 years into his career and could have just taken the back-seat and let the teachers do the ‘work’. I am sure at many points in time, he was also tired.You gave my late-father the courtesy award because he showed by example what it really meant to be courteous: to care for others, even strangers from the bottom of the heart; to be generous in giving, even if people do not appreciate.I ask myself what my father would do if he were you and was “too tired to continue facing an increasingly angry and disagreeable society”.  He would have started from the basics, led by example and preserved.One thing for sure. He would not quit.Your friend,
Daniel(The writer has been a teacher for the last 11 years, knowing he has big shoes to fill. He will always remember what his Papa told him “帮助人的人 有永恒的快乐”. A person who helps others will get eternal happiness.)
2013-05-15 00:00:00
EZOCA – Almost Perfect Japanese Meal at Quayside Isle. And It’s Very Expensive.
What do you look for in a Japanese fine dining restaurant? Really nothing short of brilliant – Quality cuisine, freshness and skills, attention to details, premium service experience, and that unspeakable X-factor.EZOCA at Quayside Isle has almost all of that, especially when it comes to authenticness. As what EZOCA’s owner Katsutaka Kobayashi says, “Many Japanese restaurants in Singapore only look traditional, but when you look into the details, you will soon realise it is not”.The traditional sukiya style interior featuring imported red cedar is elegance and exemplified, simple yet bringing out a dignified zen Japanese feel. The restaurant was extremely beautfiful.Even though I felt slightly ridiculous wearing a jacket to Quayside Isle (where so many people are in berms and slippers), EZOCA really stands out from all the rest of the casual dining and tapas restaurants in that row.It is almost perfect. Almost.The food was more expensive than I imagined, where the first item on the menu – one piece of broiled tuna belly was already at $20. A sushi platter of 7 kinds and 1 roll is $82. Lunch sets starts at $75. In which case, I ordered a 5-course kaiseki at $175 per person which was more ‘value for money’.Otherwise the cuisine, prepared by Chef Shinji Morihara who used to helm Fairmont Singapore’s Inagiku, was outstandingly superb, with a few mind-blowing dishes. (On that note, I only went to Inagiku once because its food did not warrant its very high price then.)The starter is a humble Deep Fried Japanese Taro with Shrimp and Beancurd Skin Sticky Sauce ($28 when ordered ala carte), a wonderful blend of textures with a taste I can still vaguely recall. It is that impressionable.Mind you, the Grilled Japanese Unagi Bowl with Miso Soup with Pickles is $69 per bowl. It is freaking delicious, but it is still $69. The highlight is really the Japanese Koshihikari rice specially flown in from Ishikawa, and only Japanese mineral water is used to cook. It makes all that difference to the fluffiness, texture and taste. FYI, ordering the rice alone would have cost $16.Service was pleasant and polite, but it wasn’t top-notch. If food and price is first-rate, I would have correspondingly expected service to be swift, confident, and extremely attentive – whereas it felt like somebody was afraid to break a bowl anytime. Perhaps they are new.I can’t imagine its clientele though. Would Japanese businessmen and tai-tais go all way to the light-hearted Quayside Isle, brave some sweat, to indulge in a classy fine-dining meal? If you are up for a masterfully prepared Japanese cuisine, EZOCA could be your answer.EZOCA Japanese Cuisine
#01-12 Quayside Isle, 31 Ocean Way (Sentosa Cove) Singapore 098375
Opening Hours: 11:30am-3pm, 5:30pm-10pm (Tue-Sun), Closed MonOther Japanese Restaurant Entries
Waku Ghin (Marina Bay Sands)
LP+Tetsu (Tanglin Mall)
IKYU (Tiong Bahru)
Ito Kacho (Mandarin Gallery)
Japanese Dining SUN (CHIJMES)
2013-05-14 00:00:00
Jewel Café and Bar – OMG. Chic Café in the Heart of Little India
Artisanal coffee house Jewel Coffee opens its Café + Bar concept at Rangoon Road in the heart of Little India. I am very curious, why ‘Jewel’?Owner Adrian Khong replied in jest, “I was praying very hard for a name. Then while worshipping in Mandarin, I kept singing ‘Zhu-Ah, Zhu-Ah’ (stands for God). ‘Zhu-Ah’ sounds like ‘Jew-el’, that’s why the name. I got it from God!”Indeed, Jewel is blessed to have a successful first outlet at 1 Shenton Way, and a second 2nd-storey café with its own coffee roaster at the back.Food choices range from mains such as Miso Presa Iberico Pork ($34), Black Cod ($32), Southern Fried Chicken ($18), Rib-Eye Steak ($35), soups, salads, pastas, burgers and sandwiches. Initially, I can’t help feeling the price is about $5-$10 more than what I expected and would have been willing to pay. At least the prices are nett.The OMG Burger ($20) is quite a yummilicious crowd-pleaser. I loved the soft sesame brioche buns and fries by the way, strangely. The fillings look like the usual stuff at first – USDA beef patties, crispy bacon, sunny-side up (yes yes), lettuce, cheddar… and luncheon meat!Are my friends the only bunch that gets more excited over luncheon meat in a burger rather than beef? Apparently many others indeed went “OMG”. This is not the usual M*L*** luncheon meat but sourced after trying out 16 different brands. Talk about being over-spam-med.Jewel’s Umami Prawn Capellini ($22) feels like a cross-bred of Italian pasta, dry Japanese ramen and Singapore’s Hokkien mee. The thin pasta is not cooked the usual ‘Western’ way, but instead doused in prawn stock so that it would absorb the flavours like how Hokkien mee would have been cooked. The bonito flakes and seaweed add a Japanese flavour, and I like it precisely for being wetter than usual.If you are craving for some relaxing breakfast and lazy brunch, Jewel has a breakfast menu (try the bacon jam!) from 9am to 11am on weekdays, and till 3pm on weekends. Make your way to the second storey for comfy sofa seats and a view over-looking the entire café while the sunrays hit in from above.You could see the amount of effort Jewel takes in putting the place and food today. You do not feel that they are some quickly-assembled pieces like some cafes would offer. I would some of the offerings such as French Onion Soup ($8) and Miso Presa Iberico ($34) are not bad, if you do not judge the food by restaurant standards. The main thing lacking for me, perhaps, and ironically is an Oh-My-God moment.Jewel Café + Bar
129 Rangoon Road Singapore 218 407 (7-10 min walk from Farrer Park MRT) Tel: +65 6298 9216
Opening Hors: 9am – 10pm (Tues-Thurs, Sun), 9am – 12am (Fri-Sat), Closed MonOther Related Entries
Department of Caffeine (Duxton Road)
Cocotte (Wanderlust Hotel)
Grub (Bishan Park)
Dolce Tokyo (313 Somerset)
7 KICKstart BREWiches (Armenian Place)
2013-05-13 00:00:00
Ramen Keisuke Tonkotsu King – Four Seasons of Ramen at Bugis Village
The true Ramen Champion Keisuke Takeda does not repeat concepts and ramen. Not at all. From his signature Ebi Soba Prawn Ramen in Japan, to his other three Singapore branches – Crab Broth Ramen at Millenia Walk, Tontotsu King at Orchid Hotel and Tori King at 100AM Amara Hotel, every bowl of ramen is distinctly different.Even though the Tontotsu King branch at Orchid Hotel is insanely popular with constant queues, the “Ramen Revolutionist” chose to do something entirely different – a Four Seasons concept more suited to the younger crowd at Bugis Village. (Not to be confused with Four Seasons Hotel).Located at Bugis Village (near KFC) smacked in the middle of random clothing and toiletries shops, queuing outside here would have been a pedestrian nightmare though.I wonder why Four Seasons though, since Singapore is quite bloody summer hot all year around. Mr Keisuke is inspired by the four seasons in Japan, and also considered the palettes of a more adventurous customer base. The 56-seater shop is also beautifully transformed with decor and wall paintings presenting each season. Sit at Spring if you want to feel Chinese New Year, while winter is suitably isolated at the back.The Spring Ramen ($11.90) served in cherry blossom bowls (so pretty my eating partner wanted to bring one home) is intricately sprinked with basil and parmesan cheese to evoke the colours of spring. This is my least favourite bowl, slightly too thick and heavy, feeling somewhat like eating pasta.I immediately grabbed for some water after a first spoonful of Summer ($13.90). Must be reminded to mix fully the next time as the spicy meat miso is created with three difference types of chilli – Japanese shichimi, Cayenne pepper and Szechuan pepper. If you don’t take spicy, don’t even try. But, this bowl surprisingly grows on me. My second favourite bowl.Autumn ($12.90) is clearly my favourite, made with three assorted mushrooms to reflect the abundance of mushroom during the season. While a little heavy on the bonito, the entire broth feels tasty umami and easy to finish.If you are going for a taste closest to Tontotsu King, the Winter bowl ($10.90) is the most unadulterated, less complicated (or most boring) so you can appreciate the broth which is boiled for 11 hours overnight!If you ask me, I still prefer the Tontotsu King’s broth which feels more satisfying to finish to the last drop. The Four Seasons broth is about 1.5 times thicker (thus ‘jelat’) because it is cooked for 11 hours instead of the usual 8, and may have too many gimmicks to distract from a simple bowl of tonkotsu goodness.I mean, I still like this, easily better than the other ramens nearby. Who’s the champion again? Opps.Updated: Went back to have my fifth bowl of Tonkotsu King Ramen ($17.90) for all toppings. With stirred fried pork with ginger on top, it’s the best of the lot here. Slightly pricey though.Ramen Keisuke Tonkotsu King Four Seasons
158 Rochor Road Bugis Village (btw KFC and McDonalds) Singapore 188433 (Bugis MRT) Tel: +65 6333 5740
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 2:30pm, 5pm – 10:30pm (Mon-Fri), 11:30am – 10:30pm (Sun)Other Ramen Entries
5 New & Best Ramen Places in Singapore
Menya Sanji (Orchid Hotel, Tanjong Pagar)
Daruma Ramen House (TripleOne Somerset)
Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen (Novena Square 2)
Keishoken Ramen (Great World City)
2013-05-10 00:00:00
Department of Caffeine – So Many New Cafés, This Stands Out
Does Singapore need another coffee joint? The answer apparantly is YES. This new kid on a block is not exactly a stranger to the café scene as owner Andrew Lek is former barista from Strangers’ Reunion.Department of Caffeine, otherwise known as D.O.C, took over the defunct Broadway Café at Duxton Hill and upped its coolness factor by a thousand times. (Broadway used to serve Nespresso.) I am here because fellow café hoppers keep raving and raving about this place. Must check it out.My fellow coffee addict friend Gavin who tried almost every single indie cafe in Singapore thought that their Five Sense coffee beans makes for a very well-rounded cuppa – not too acidic, not too strong, almost tea-like. And he liked it especialy if it was pulled by Andrew Lek himself, though he acknowledged D.O.C has a good team of trainee baristas who are not too bad themselves.The semi-industrial woody ID, choice of music, display and magazines (somewhat reminding me of Maison Ikkoku’s tick all the right boxes – very clear about how they are targeting. The hip. (That’s you yah, I suppose.)Food wise, other than a mouth-watering looking Pulled Pork Sandwich ($13) and D.O.C Meatball Sandwich ($13), their salad offerings are fairly varied such as Moroccan Carrot Salad with Cashews, Raisins & Coriander, French Beans, Mangetout with Hazelnuts & Orange, and Roasted Beetroot with Baby Spinach. There is always something new.Their D.O.C Breakfast Platter ($18) of scrambled eggs, bacon wrapped meatloaf on toasted brioche served with tomato confit & cheese bocconcini is photogenic good stuff. Not mind-blowing yet, but one of the less common occasions where you felt every single item of the platter deserved to be there.Comparatively, the Mushroom Medley ($14) sautéed in white wine & herbs on brioche toast topped with sunny side up egg was not as exciting a medley I wished would be, on the dry side and felt it needed some kind of sauce to level it up.Department of Caffeine seems to be one of the fewer cafes who works hard for their food offering – the newcomer probably needs some time fine-tuning, but has a lot of potential.With so many cafes sprouting out, Department of Caffeine is one which stands out from the rest for its coolness quotient. I can’t pinpoint what it is exactly, but you would feel at ease here without the sense of it (or the customers) being over-pretentious (for the time being). Its small, its cosy, almost reminding me of some of Melbourne’s cafés,THIS is the next place to see and to be seen in. The rest can go to Ah Huat for all I care.Department of Caffeine
15 Duxton Road Singapore 089481 Tel:+65 6223 3426
Opening Hours: 10.30am – 7.30pm (Mon to Fri), 9.30am – 7.30pm (Sat to Sun)Other Cafe Entries
Maison Ikkoku (Kandahar Street)
7 KICKstart BREWiches (Armenian Place)
The Orange Thimble (Tiong Bahru)
Drips Bakery Café (Tiong Poh Road)
Pies & Coffee (Rochester Mall)
2013-05-08 00:00:00
Around The World with Power 98FM and DanielFoodDiary.com
Love Travel? Power 98FM and DanielFoodDiary.com is giving away not 1 but 4 pairs of air tickets by Tiger Airways to 4 different exciting destinations this month! Think about how much good food you can eat while traveling!Power98FM will also be giving away 5 sets of $60 Around The World Hampers to 5 blessed Daniel’s Food Diary readers.All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET on twitter
Step 3: Leave a comment below to name one of the 4 destinations in this Around The World giveaway
Remember to include your email. Results will be announced 14th May (Tues)There are 2 other ways to get into the draw –
On-Air – Tune in to Power 98FM all day and listen out for their announcements.On-Site  – Pick up a Power 98FM boarding pass from popular DJs at their weekly street invasion Date/Time/Venue/DJs
9th May 1200hrs Raffles Place Green (Outside MRT Station) DJs Young & Sonja
16th May 1200hrs Tampines Central (Outside MRT Station) DJs JK & Shareen
23rd May 1800hrs Orchard Road/ Somerset (Outside H&M) DJs Mike & JK
30th May 1200hrs Raffles Place Green (Outside MRT Station) DJs Young & CharmainePower 98FM is the only radio station in Singapore that sends their listeners around the world – Every Single Month.The 4 Destinations you may get to go this time include Cebu, Colombo, Bandung & Yogyakarta. All the best. I hope you win!*This post is brought to you by Power98FM. Love Life. Love Music.
2013-05-08 00:00:00
Cocotte – Officially One of My Favourite Brunch Places
You have to give it to Cocotte’s Head Chef Anthony Yeoh, young at 30-something, but creates some very creative and mouth-watering dishes. He not only innovates for the sake of being innovative and different, the dishes actually taste superb.Cocotte, which means ‘pot’ or emmm… ‘prostitute’ in French has offerings which is a melting pot of sorts. (Read: Cocotte at Wunderlust Hotel)There are few reasons why you may not like this place: its obscure location at Wanderlust Hotel, difficulty in parking at the Jalan Besar district; and the never-ending road-works around which makes navigation tougher than normal. But its quirky-hip meets country-side style décor and food makes it all worthwhile to come.Usually you get cheese or charcuterie served with Cornichons (tiny pickled cucumbers). At Cocotte, you get a scoop of Foie Gras Mousse ($14) which you spread like earth-coloured jam over the cornichons or bread. A twist to this well-known French delicacy, their Foie Gras Mousse is rich, buttery, delicate and yummy to the max.In a French restaurant, I would usually order a French Onion Soup to go along with some bread or Sandwich. Chef Anthony came up with something that combines the two – a French Onion Soup Sandwich ($10) with caramelized onion confit and melted gruyere cheese on top of a toasted country baguette.This is really combining the best of both worlds, and it is not as if it is very pricey.Chef explained that he came up with this because traditional French onion soup can be time-consuming to prepare for lunch-time crowd who wants a quick fix, inspiring him to re-create that same taste on a sandwich. Really one of the best memorable sandwiches I had in a long time.Other new offerings include the Asparagus and Fennel Salad ($16), Pan Fried Seabass with Saffron Aioli ($14) and Grilled Boneless Chicken Leg with Fresh Herb and Garlic Butter ($12).Not forgetting a new pastry and dessert counter that you will leave space such as their Blueberry Tarts ($4.95) and Crème Brulee ($9.00). My female friends always tell me they have a different stomach to digest desserts. I didn’t believe them till now.Cocotte
2 Dickson Road, Ground Level Wanderlust Hotel, Singapore 209494 (near Jalan Besar & Sungei Road), Tel: +65 6298 1188
Opening Hours: Lunch 1200-1430 (Mon-Sun), Dinner 1830-2230 (Mon-Thurs) and 1830-2300 (Fri-Sat, closed Sun dinners), Brunch 1130 – 1500 (Sat-Sun)Other Related Entries
Waterfall Café (Shangri-La Hotel)
Cocotte (Wunderlust Hotel)
The Royal Mail (Ascott Singapore)
The Ascot (The Grandstand)
MUSEO (Quayside Isle)
2013-05-07 00:00:00
IndoChili – Selamat Makan! Homely Indonesian Delights at Zion Road
Name me 5 Best Indonesian restaurants. Perhaps that came with a little difficulty. While we are almost familiar with our neighbours’ cuisine such as Ayam Panggang, Sate, Tahu Telor and Nasi Kampung, Indonesian restaurants are always considered less hip and under the radar locally.And how many can tell the difference between authentic Indonesian cuisine and our local Malay food?For family-style Indonesian food, I have been to IndoChili for quite a few times. Its location at Zion Road is ‘risky’, beside the popular (but standard-dropping) Nasi Padang River Valley. And the previous F&B occupants do not stay long.During my first visit, the food looked promising though service staff seemed bored at the lack of customers. But it generally got better each time I went.The creator of the dishes is Mdm Wahyuningsih, owner of Java Kitchen Group (you see them around in food courts) who is inspired by her own grandmother and God to create Indonesian cuisine that uses a lot of herbs and spices. Many of her food are indeed distinctly stronger in flavours, generally richer and fuller than the usual street side taste.My favourite dish here is definitely the Sate Ayam Madura ($7.80 for 5 pieces). Considered a heritage dish of Maduranese people, it consists of chicken skewer charcoal-grilled to bring out flavours and aroma.While our Singapore style sauce is usually dryer and shorter, this Indonesian version is meaty and much sweeter, because it is first glazed in glazed in sweet soy sauce then dipped in peanut sauce. I like both versions – though I suspect some may find this version needing to get used to because it feels heavier.Another I-think-must-have dish is the Tahu Telor ($8.80), a simple deep-fried beancurd with omelette, served with savoury sweet peanut sauce garnished with refreshing cucumber, bean sprout, carrot and crispy prawn crackers.Few actually do this dish well – too little sauce, unsatisfactory peanut sauce, soggy beancurd, ugly egg. Plenty of reasons to make mistakes. IndoChili’s Tahu Telor manages to balance the ingredient to sauce proportion, and got the egg’s texture all right – part-crispy, part-fluffy.Some of the other better dishes: a tradition Javanese royal dish of Tumpeng Mini ($9.80) – made of yellow rice set meal served with ayam bumbu rukak, perkede, potato peanut and pickles; a hearty thick Sop Buntu r ($14.80) oxtail soup; and East Javanese Ayam Bumbu Rujak ($8.80), a chicken thigh dish with amazing addictive gravy to sweep clean with jasmine rice.The restaurant however, is not packed all the time, perhaps due to a lack of awareness, and some inconsistency in food during the initial days. I think IndoChili deserves to be given a second or third chance, I am glad I did – and became a convert.Selamat Makan!IndoChili Giveaway! 
IndoChili will be giving away 4 sets of $25 vouchers to blessed Daniel’s Food Diary readers!All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET on twitter
Step 3: Leave a comment below, say name your favourite Indonesian dish and why
Remember to include your email. Results will be announced 10th May (Fri)IndoChili
54 Zion Road, Singapore 247779 (Opp Great World City) Tel: +65 6445 1766  info@indochili.com
Opening hours: 11.30am-10pm (Sun-Thu), 11.30am-10.30pm (Fri-Sat), closed on TueOther Indonesian Restaurant Entries
RS Deli (Upper Thomson)
Seribu Sari (Rendezvous Grand Hotel)
The Moluccas Rooms (Marina Bay Sands)
Bayang (Clarke Quay)
Wong Solo (Far East Plaza)
2013-05-06 00:00:00
GRUB – Cookyn’s Mervyn Phan Opens Restaurant at Bishan Park, and It’s Good
Private Chef Mervyn Phan of Cookyn Inc is probably an auntie and OL ‘killer’, I hear so many ladies raving about his cooking classes, mild-mannered personality, and some say good looks. So when he finally opens his own restaurant GRUB at Bishan Park, it is little wonder why it would pack.I think his students and fans are all there to support him – you better come early. Cannot reserve!Casual eateries at obscure locations is one of the IN things in Singapore, with GRUB surrounded by greenery housed in the middle of Bishan Park (nearer Sin Ming Ave). No wonder people say you need to own a car in Singapore.So ulu, but I don’t think people would even mind coming all the way here – the scenery is beautiful.After crossing a bridge from the carpark, you see families taking slow strolls, children playing with balloons, happy dogs being walked, and just an almost entire view of lush green. Very refreshing and relaxing for a weekend visit. Bring your children here – they don’t need to see that much concrete jungle anyway.GRUB serves, well, casual grub and family-friend hearty fare such as Grilled Chicken Leg ($15), Chilli Con Carne ($8), Grilled Steak and Fries ($18.50), Shimeiji Risotto ($10.50) and a Crispy Hake Fish Burger ($11) which everyone on Instagram is raving about. Plus it is not freaking expensive.There are brunch items during the weekends, with Liberty Coffee, Dammann Tea and a selection of craft beers.I found the food anything but grubby. In fact it feels polished, modern, and delightful.My friend and I were divided on the Truffled Egg Cocotte ($7) though, which he found to be “extremely nice”, while I thought the toasted focaccia felt a little ‘old’ and underwhelming.GRUB’s Pork Steak Burger ($12) is probably one of the best I had in Singapore, somewhat reminding me of &Made, but at a much more economical price. I was just lamenting days ago that many pork dishes are not prepared well in Singapore, usually dry, tough and overcooked. Theirs was really splendid.Most of their burgers look so salivating I-want-to-take-a-bite awesome anyway. Their pork steak is really juicy tender yummmmy, and the synergy with the sweet apple and chimichurri sauce just seals the deal for me.We should be proud of Hainanese boy Mervyn Phan who picked up cooking from watching his mother in the kitchen and numerous experimentations. Love this “never give up” attitude, plus we should support our local entrepreneurs.The food at GRUB is developed after trying more than 2000 recipes over the course of 3 years, with the recipes tried and tested by all the people who have done cooking classes with Cookyn.No doubt that some of the food and service would need some fine-tuning, but trust me. I expect GRUB to be of the restaurants to look out for.GRUB
510 Ang Mo Kio Ave 1 (Carpark along Sin Ming Ave, opposite Blk 408) Singapore 569983
Opening Hours: 5:30pm – 10:30pm (Tues – Fri), 9:00am – 2:30pm, 5:30pm – 10:30pm (Sat-Sun)Other Related Entries
The Ascot (The Grandstand)
Two Face (Tiong Bahru)
MUSEO (Quayside Isle)
Waterfall Café (Shangri-La Hotel)
Cocotte (Wanderlust Hotel)
2013-05-03 00:00:00
Abe’s Diner – Hidden Gem at Tiong Bahru. Omakase Dinner for $38
Yes, I know. Tiong Bahru is like THE happening district where there are so many hippie food joints. But I need to emphasize, for some of the places that are crowded, it may not mean that their food is good. Usually it’s all about branding. Vice versa. (Read: 5 Best New Food Places At Tiong Bahru )That is what I like about Abe’s Diner. Hidden, discrete, low-profile, quiet, understated, yet is all I can ask for in a small Japanese diner. It exactly reminds me of those hole-in-the-wall shops in Japan, well-hidden gems possibly serving Michelin-starred food and divine sushi.Abe’s Diner is located at 42 Eng Hoon Street diagonally opposite the fish head steamboat restaurant. No obvious signboard, opened only at night, not even on Sundays, and has few customers – generally Japanese for shochu and food.They have just introduced a Chef’s Omakase Course, with appetizers, sashimi,tempura, hashiyasume side dish, one main (fish or meat), rice, miso soup and dessert – all for $38.00 only!How reasonable is that. The appetizers of grilled eggplant, matcha tofu and jellied conger eel is a medley that highlights with its blend of intriguing tastes and texture, especially the cool eel jelly which is refreshingly delectable.The other dishes may not excite like some top-notch Japanese restaurant – it may not have the aesthetically gorgeous presentation or refined quality taste. It is not wow-wow spectacular.But what Abe’s Diner present is a very comforting unpretentious style of what the Japanese would serve their guests right at home. Yes, warm sincere Japanese home-cooked food.I have been a quiet returning customer for a few times, with Fried Chicken with Tartar Sauce ($10 for 6 pieces) and Chicken and Mushroom Cream Gratin ($13) being some of my regular orders.When I finished my tea at Abe’s Diner, the Japanese waitress immediately came to refill my teapot. This made me realize how much I miss good service, the Japanese style.Abe’s Diner
42 Eng Hoon Street, Singapore 169785 (Tiong Bahru MRT), Tel: +65 6222 1719
Opening Hours: 5:00pm -12:00amOther Japanese Restaurant Entries
Teppei Japanese Restaurant (Orchid Hotel)
IKYU (Tiong Bahru)
Yayoiken (Bugis+)
Osaka Ohsho (Raffles City)
Ryoshi Sushi Ikeikemaru (Liang Court)
2013-05-02 00:00:00
Lipton Moments – Shoot a Pic, Win a Trip to Bali!
Every single meal, at least one in my group of friend would whip up their phone to upload the food on the table, their ootd or both. Sometimes all of them. If you are an Instagram lover like myself, then you must take part in the Lipton Moments Singapore contest. (By the way, have you followed @DanielFoodDiary on Instagram yet?!)The #LiptonMomentsSg contest is to bring to life Lipton’s philosophy of enjoying positive moments. So it is not all only about tea-drinking, and not compulsory that your photos contain pictures of tea.You stand a chance to win a 3D2N Bali trip and weekly spa vouchers from Hyatt Hotel Singapore! Just follow these 3 easy steps.
Step 1: Take the photo
Step 2: Upload on Instagram or Lipton Singapore Facebook
Step 3: Hashtag it with #LiptonMomentsSgVery simple. Here are some of my pictures. Of course you do not have to include food in your entries. It’s just me.Who says you cannot appreciate tea like wine?Add colours to your life if you are feeling blue.Enjoying the morning with the sunny side up.Sit back, relax, and enjoy a snack once in a while.With each mouthful, you will get a sensation of bittersweet chocolate. That’s happiness.It is never too early to have some walnut mooncakes, especially when it is homemade.Of all the delicacies in the world, nothing beats the taste of Singapore.Like a muffin, like a sticky bun, it’s a scone.Simple things can make you feel like a tai-tai.Savour the high tea of life.Here are my personal 3 Tips to take better Instagram Pictures for this contest
Tip 1: Light is your best friend. Shooting in a dimly lit restaurant or club with a handphone won’t give you decent pictures.Tip 2: Take different angles, not just one. You may not know which works best, so the best is to experiment. My rule of thumb – try six photos and one should be good enough. The other five? Trash it.Tip 3: Tell a story with your picture. For this #LiptonMomentSg contest, shoot something positive and happy. That should earn you extra points.I hope you win. That would truly be a Lipton Moment!*This entry is brought to you by Lipton.
2013-05-01 00:00:00
The Boxing Crabs – Showstopping Pumpkin Crabs at Sentosa
At Sentosa, they love to put seafood restaurants near seafood themed attractions – there is Cat Cora’s Ocean Restaurant at S.E.A Aquarium and The Boxing Crab right behind Underwater World. Which really disturbs me for eating their kind after going gaga over the wonders of nature.While getting here can be a hassle, I will do (almost) anything for crabs. Especially Boxing Crab’s Braised Claypot Crab with Superior Broth and Pumpkin. They are really one of a yummy kind.The crabs are soused in a pumpkin-curry-salted egg yolk sauce, all umami thick, and orangey-yellow creamy, best dipped with a combination of deep fried mantou and fresh sweet flesh from the crab claws. Every mouthful turns out to be a little excitement – a touch of sweetness, a touch of mild curry spiciness.But But But, don’t finish all the sauce by yourself if you are minding the cholesterol.The Boxing Crab has also introduced a Mother’s Day Set Menu which I tried in advance. $328++ for 4 persons is pricey for me, though I think 5-6 can share with the huge portions given.Some of the highlights are a show-stopping (looks wise) Deep Fried Spiny Lobster Salad with chunky fleshes of lobster, and Braised Treasure Chicken in Lotus Leaf. The latter is really my kind of dish, while not exactly a photogenic piece, has some of my favourite ingredients of chicken pieces, Chinese chestnuts, mushrooms and carrots cooked in a savoury sauce that goes very well with plain rice. There is also a faint fragrance of the lotus leaf with every bite.The other dishes, the Homemade Water Chestnut Bean Curd with Spices Meat, and Stir Fried Sea Scallop and Prawn with Asparagus are just seafood restaurant standard satisfactory, while the Stir Vermicelli with Seafood is a let-down. So some hits and misses.Two factors are working against The Boxing Crab – too far and a tad steep. The crabs are about $70 per kg. which is way beyond prices in the main island. The good news is, they are offering a 1 for 1 crab promotion for the month of May. Pass me both the pumpkin and the chilli crab.The Boxing Crab
80 Siloso Beach, Sentosa (behind Underwater World), Singapore 098 969, Tel: +6274 7760
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 11:00pmOther Related Entries
Majestic Bay Seafood Restaurant (Gardens by The Bay)
Putien (City Square Mall)
Peach Blossom (Marina Mandarin)
Min Jiang (Goodwood Park Hotel)
Mellben (Pasir Ris)
2013-04-30 00:00:00
Sweet Musings – Taiwanese Cakes and Sweets at The Star Vista
Every time I go to Taiwan, I would lug back boxes of local snacks like pineapple cakes, sun cakes and varied types of prettily packaged sweets and chocolates. Well, you may say some are already available in Singapore, but the quality is just not quite the same with the exception of a few brands. (Read: Sophisca from Taiwan).Noticed this Japanese-looking new confectionary Sweet Musings at The Star Vista, which sells the popular pineapple cakes, Fu Bell cakes and Egg Rolls! You won’t miss this huge machinery at the side with chefs at work, churning out goodies which show that the Taiwanese delights are not imported, but made fresh within the stores.Everything from the artfully designed boxes, white outer packaging and look of the rectangular golden Pineapple Cake (each $2.50) immediately reminded me of SunnyHills at Raffles Hotel.The ‘Lao Ban Niang’ Erica Wang at Sweet Musings says that she uses only high quality imported ingredients, such as a gluten-free ‘super-light’ flour from Taiwan to achieve the texture she wants. On my first bite, I thought that the pineapple jam was slightly bitter, not as sweet as I imagined to, and the outer layer was not too crumbly, making eating a lot less messy.Perhaps I am used to the Sunny Hills version, I preferred their lighter sweet jam and buttery crunch slightly more. With that said, the Sweet Musings’ versions are still higher in quality and taste than the average brand, even those I bought from the Taiwan airports.The ‘Tai Yang Ping’ Sun Cake is one the most typical souvenirs people buy from Tai Chung. Some of the Sun Cakes I had could be flaky or too hard, almost like a flat rock. Sweet Musings’ Sun Cake ($2 per piece) has a soft pillow-like outer layer, with chewy maltose fillings. You can imagine a couple sharing this by the sunset, full of romance and gentleness – probably one of the best offerings at the store.Sweet Musings is like a real Taiwanese souvenir shop that you haven’t discovered yet – with Fluffy Honey Cake, Delicate Egg Pudding in Egg Shells, Panna Cotta Desserts, Mocha Mousse Cakes, Nougats (love this), 3Q cake and Taro cakes, full of little pretty snackish knick knacks to buy.Plus the down-to-earth sincere friendliness of the Lao Ban Niang is what I miss about Taiwan so so so much.Sweet Musings 一畝甜
The Star Vista Mall #02-05 (beside Buona Vista MRT Station)
Sweet Musings Facebook
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pmOther Taiwanese Entries
Blackball (Star Vista) 
Bing Bian (Millenia Walk)
Hot Star Fried Chicken (City Square Mall)
SunnyHills Singapore (Raffles Hotel)
Sophisca (Taiwan)
2013-04-29 00:00:00
Le Steak by Chef Amri – New Halal Steakhouse at Jalan Kayu
The telegenic Chef Amri is a regular face on MediaCorp’s Suria channel, and fans and viewers have been giving him support at his new restaurant at Jalan Kayu. With a ‘celebrity chef’ of sorts, Le Steak has been packing the crowd during the weekends.The truth is halal restaurants serving quality Western food at wallet-friendly prices is few and between, moreover one with Angus Beef, Fresh Shucked Live Oysters and Belgium Waffles. (Tell me if you know of any similar Halal Restaurants.)Le Steak’s offerings remind me of Astons: Grilled Chicken ($8.90), Grilled Fish ($9.90), specialty items Sirloin Steak ($14.90) and Ribeye ($16.90) all coming with two side dishes, and Aglio Olio ($7.90), Beef Burger with Fries ($12.90)Their premium cut is an Australian M6 Wagyu, and a reasonable price $45 considering its grade. I should not complain that it should be a thicker slab, for all the marbling and higher percentage of omega 3 and omega 6 fatty acids. The steak does look good, but the sides look sad.Anyway, we requested for it to be medium-well, and it was indeed well-prepared without being bloody or over-done. Eat it on its own to savour the full flavours of the beef, and the fats at the side which does linger in your mouth. Omph. I saw some customers adding almost the entire mini-jug of black pepper sauce to the wagyu…Nooooooo. The wagyu cow may have died in vain – eat it WITHOUT the sauces.Chef Amri is serious when he says he wants a family-friendly restaurant where items are affordable, almost food-court prices. The Live Oysters ($18 for 6) come in from Canada weekly over the weekends and are only available from Friday and Sunday.It appears that Le Steak’s desserts such as Lemon Curd Tart ($4.90), Belgium Waffles with Ice Cream ($7.90) and a newly introduced Crème Brulee ($6.50) evenly caramelised with raspberry within are a hit with customers too.Updates: Daniel’s Food Diary will be introducing Chef Amri’s Le Steak with Jus!’s host Taufik, 20th May Monday 8:30pm in their Makan Blog segment on Suria Channel. It’s my first on Suria. Catch us!Le Steak by Chef Amri
248 Jalan Kayu Singapore 799472 Tel: +65 6556 3588
Opening Hours: 3pm-11pm (Mon-Fri), 12pm-12am (Sat, eve PH), 12pm-11pm (Sun, PH)Other Related Entries
Poulet (Great World City)
Morganfield’s (The Star Vista)
Beanstro (Takashimaya)
Delicious (Scotts Square)
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
2013-04-25 00:00:00
Straits Café – Annyeonghaseyo! International Buffet with a Taste of Seoul
Annyeonghaseyo 안녕하세요! It is about time that hotel buffets include an element of Korea in their selection. After being bombarded constantly by Korean pop culture and PSY’s Gentlemen, I am all for having some ginseng Korean chicken and kimchi in a buffet.Straits Café at Rendezvous Grand Hotel Singapore which is known for its award-winning favourites like Laksa and Popiah, has invited guest chef Kim Hyun Jung from Lotte World a “A Taste of Seoul” as part of their international buffet till 12 May 2013. (Read: Seribu Sari at Rendezvous Grand Hotel)I was half envisaging some typical Korean favourites like Bibimbap, Bulgogi Beef, Tofu Stew, and Rice Cake – but got none of that. (So manage your expectations for that). Instead, there were some atypical but still authentically Korean dishes such as Korean Hot Spicy Chicken, Abalone Porridge, Korean Vermicelli Noodle and Beef Ribs.This is it. The a-ju ma-si-sseo-sseo-yo delicious grilled Beef Rib has an almost perfect marinate which is slightly salty and sweet, thinly sliced with a narrow layer of fats, and so evenly grilled such that it is not overcooked. Seoul marbled, seoul delicious, it’s possible to savour a few pieces.The Korean Ginseng Soup does not look like soup per-se as Japanese rice is added to cook, therefore the texture resembles porridge. After a spoonful, I was immediately brought back to my holiday in Jeju – this was exactly the taste I had. Not too flavourful, but yet plainer healthy-tasting with a twang of ginseng. Quick tip: add sea salt and spring onion if you prefer something more palatable to local taste.Dessert wise, there is a selection of cinnamon, green tea or custard rice ball served with hot honey citron tea. The tea is good stuff, also feeling distinctly Korean.My only reservation is the Korean selection could be much wider and varied, with more of the familiar favourites. If you are still hungry, just go for the local delights like the very lemak laksa – indeed one of the best around. I had two bowls.Straits Café Buffet Time and Pricing
Buffet Lunch (12pm to 2.30pm) – Monday to Saturday: $39++ per adult
Brunch Sunday and Public Holidays (11.30am to 2.30pm) – $45++ per adult
Buffet Dinner Monday to Thursday (6.30pm to 10pm) – $47++ per adult
Friday to Sunday and eve of public holidays (6.30pm to 10pm) – $50++ per adultStraits Café
9 Bras Basah Road Level 1 Rendezvous Grand Hotel Singapore (Bras Basah MRT), Tel: +65  6335 1771/7
Opening Hours: 7:00am to 10:30am (Breakfast), 12:00 noon to 2:30pm (Lunch), 6:30pm to 10:00pm (Dinner), 3:00pm to 5:30pm (High Tea on Sat, Sun & PH)Other Hotel Buffet Entries
Plaza Brasserie Seafood (PARKROYAL on Beach Road)
10 at Claymore (Pan Pacific Orchard)
Silver Shell Café (Shangri La Rasa Sentosa)
Aquamarine (Marina Mandarin)
5 Ways to Avoid Overeating at The Buffet Restaurant
2013-04-23 00:00:00
Daruma Ramen House – A Japanese Ramen Shop from… Hong Kong
New ramen shop Daruma Ramen House is actually not from Japan, but first set up in Hong Kong, re-created and updated by proprietor Charlie Chan. Before you feel too suspicious about its quality, Daruma is named one of the top 5 ramen restaurants in Hong Kong by Tatler, with endorsement from singer Eason Chan saying “You’ll know it when you taste it”. (Read: 5 New & Best Ramen Places in Singapore)Very brave. This new ramen shop went to the extent to opening two new outlets , one at TripleOne Somerset and the Greenwood Estate in Bukit Timah. Are these the best choice for location? Because both times I been to the Somerset branch, I was the only customer. With that said, the only restaurants that are packing customers there are Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong and the Imperial Treasure Steamboat Restaurant.There is no fuss to Daruma’s menu: just three choices of Shoyu, Spicy and Tonkotsu. Toppings varieties are barbeque pork, braised pork belly and the ultimate bowl with both meats and mentaiko. No peripherals like gyoza, yakitori and salads, yet.If in doubt, go for the Tonkotsu with braised pork belly, barbecued pork and mentaiko combination ($18). The broth is said to be cooked by boiling over 90 kilograms of premium pork bones imported from Holland for 8-10 hours every day.Hmm… Daruma’s broth was thinner than expected for that number of hours boiled, but at least it was still cloudy and not too salty. I can imagine those who keep complaining that the Japanese ramen soups are too oily, salty and thick would like this version.P.S. I hear that you can request for thicker broth as long as you asked for it. Did it for my second bowl, and that was more satisfying and to my preference.The Spicy Ramen ($18) may need some getting used to. It was not the hot-spiciness I was expecting, and had somewhat a ‘Chinese’ taste to it. The soup really tasted a lot better after dissolving the mentaiko within, adding a more layered dimension.The winner was really the braised pork belly which was unpredictably soft and tender, with lovely proportion of melt-in-your-mouth fats.I spotted Artease’s Iced Yuzu Passion Green Tea and Plum Apple Vinegar Tea being sold, and a fridge stored with Happy Boy Tau Hway. No doubt that I am a fan of both, but from a branding perspective, would any self-respecting Japanese ramen shops sell any of these? (So I hear that the boss is a friend of both brands.)Perhaps not the best and sensational out there, but the Daruma Ramen has a taste you may grow to like.Daruma Ramen House
TripleOne Somerset 111 Somerset Road, #02-15 Tel: +65 6235 6079
Greenwood Estate (Bukit Timah), 10 Greenwood Avenue, Tel: +65 62199 447
Opening Hours: 12pm – 3pm & 5pm – 10pm (Mon-Fri), 12pm – 10pm (Sat-Sun)Other Ramen Entries
Menya Sanji (Orchid Hotel, Tanjong Pagar)
Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen (Novena Square 2)
Keishoken Ramen (Great World City)
Kitakata Rahmen Tamakichi (Orchard Plaza)
Ramen Keisuke Tori King (Amara Hotel)
2013-04-22 00:00:00
One Harbour Road – Exquisite Hong Kong Dim Sum with a View to Beat
[Hong Kong] One Harbour Road is ranked No 15 in the Miele Guide 2003 that celebrates Asia’s finest restaurants, selected after four rounds of judging. Perhaps this restaurant has been out of the radar for many, but its reputation is enough for me to want to check it out.Located at the Grand Hyatt Hong Kong at Wan Chai, it has a view of all views to beat, facing the famous Victoria Harbour where you can see both Hong Kong island and Kowloon if you get the best spots.You may feel that you entered a film set upon entering the duplex restaurant, with a grandeur Shanghainese mansion feel, complete with the fully carpeted floors and plates each with a different floral design. I can just imagine this is where the rich and famous have their classic Cantonese cuisine.Service is also unparalleled – very attentive, individualized, and staff makes excellent suggestions based on your preference. I did notice all staff were male with the exception of a female manager, interestingly.I had the One Harbour Road Dim Sum Garden meant for two persons (HK$208, $33.14), one of the most gorgeous dim sum basket combination with eight pieces of delicate dim sum including Steamed Pork and Shrimp Dumpling with Crab Coral, Steamed Dumpling with Truffle, and Steamed Pork Dumpling with Baby Abalone.The presentation was flawless, and taste somewhere exquisite as it was piping-hot, fresh and tightly packed, though I did expect a more life-changing experience.One Harbour Road’s dim sum quality is definitely above average, perhaps one of the top ranked in Hong Kong itself, just that you get the feeling that this may not be the best of it all yet.The Baked Puff Pastry with Barbecued Pork and Sesame (HK$56, $8.90) would have been good enough if we had not had Tim Ho Wan the day before where the skin was much more crumbly thin, and the Pan-fried Rice Flour Rolls with Shredded Pork in Spicy Sauce ($95, $15.14) was highly satisfying for the first few bites with its insatiable fragrance till it got too oily to finish.Some of its other signature dishes include the Stir Fried Shredded Wagyu Beeg with Vegetables, Fried Rice with Abalone in Stone Bowl and Deep-fried black Mushrooms tossed with Cinnamon Blossoms. I also ordered a Stir Fried Egg Noodles with Beef which I heard about (but not available in its menu so I had the pork version), and proves to be a note-worthy choice.One Harbour Road impresses with its picturesque view and  thoughtful service, while perhaps I came with a larger than large expectations for its food.  I need to remind myself that this is the land of dim sum and roads to other choices are aplenty.One Harbour Road 港灣壹號
Grand Hyatt Hong Kong, 1 Harbour Road, Wan Chai, Hong Kong, Tel: +852 2584 7722
Opening Hours: 12:00-2:30pm, 6:30pm-10:30pm (Mon-Sat), 11:30am-2:30pm, 6:30pm-10:30pm (Sun)Other Hong Kong Entries
Tim Ho Wan (Hong Kong)
Dim Sum Bar (Hong Kong)
Mak’s Noodles (Hong Kong)
Ho Hung Kee (Hong Kong)
Tsim Chai Kee (Hong Kong)
2013-04-18 00:00:00
Lipton High Tea Bar – World’s First Pop-Up High Tea Bar with Treats from Canele
Largest tea brand in the world Lipton has just launched the world’s first pop-up high tea bar in Singapore, found at Plaza Singapura’s Level 1 main atrium. You won’t want to miss this very special High Tea.If only every shopping centre has a space like this. Imagine getting tired while shopping at PS, and you can just go to the ground level for some hot aromatic tea with desserts or pastries to relax with your friends. And these treats are not just any ordinary cakes, but from the very popular Canelé.You could be thinking that these high tea sets paired with sweet or savoury items must be quite expensive. Actually, all you need to do is to spend $25 at Plaza Singapura (which is really quite easy), or $15 worth of Lipton products to redeem the COMPLIMENTARY Lipton High Tea Set! Such good value.I do need to tell you, this is limited to the first 420 redemptions per day, from 11am to 8:30pm, till 21 April. So you do not want to wait too late!Excited already? The High Tea Sets include:Lipton Yellow Label Tea with Lemon MacaronsLipton Forest Fruit Tea with Chicken Mini BurgerLipton Citrus Tea with Traditional Salmon and Cucumber SandwichLipton Asian White Tea with Chestnut Cassis Sponge CakeLipton Blue Fruit Tea with Classic CheesecakeLipton Russian Earl Grey Tea with Le Chocolat CroustillantThe first three high tea sets are specially customized by Canelé Executive Pastry Chef Christophe Grilo and he personally recommends his macarons which does pair very well with the Lipton Yellow Label Tea.Of all the sweet selections, my favourite was the Le Chocolat Croustillant paired with Lipton’s Russian Earl Grey Tea, the cake being rich and luscious with Vanini Cocoa mousse layered with crispy chocolate praline. I like having chocolate cakes that is layered such that every bite becomes a mini adventure. There is even a gold foil at the side!If you crave a light savoury bite, you can try the Chicken Mini Burger paired with Lipton Forest Fruit Tea. My favourite part is surprisingly the bun which is lightly toasted and not overly tough. It helps that I am a fan of poached chicken with mayo as well. The paired tea is light and uplighting, and helps in making you feel cleansed after a savoury snack.Similar to wine-pairing, you can ask the service staff to recommend the most suitable tea to go along, or try the interesting interactive touch-screen tea menu. Tea-pairing is really a kind of art. If not, try the Lipton Blue Fruit Tea which has a refreshing slightly sweet balance of blackberry, blueberry and raspberry.When you are there, do remember to take some shots of your pretty tea sets and upload to Instagram with the hashtag #liptonmomentsSG. Will be looking forward to see your photos, plus you may stand a chance to win a 3D2N Bali trip!*This entry is brought to you by Lipton.
2013-04-17 00:00:00
Tamoya Udon – Finally, Some Decent Udon in Singapore
Spotted a new udon shop Tamoya Udon at a corner of Liang Court and its very Japanese vibes called me out to try it. Nope, never an udon person. Never had a decent bowl in Singapore at least – most were just fat, filling and heavy-going. Of course in Japan it is a different story all together. (Read: Sugamo Konaya Udon at Tokyo)Singaporeans love their ramen obviously, and their soba occasionally. But, udon? Maybe you should give Tamoya Udon a try.Tamoya, opened by udon champion Tamotsu Kurokawa, is one of the best known udon chain in the home of udon – the “Sanuki (Kagawa)” prefecture in Japan. Having been around for more than 10 year, this outlet in Singapore is its first overseas branch.I got a little confused at what to order at first, and because it is an assembly-line order-and-collect style, you better know what you want before you hold up the entire queue.There are a few udon types available hot and/or cold: The most basic Kake in clear broth topped with thinly slice green onions($4.80); the chilled Zaru accompanied with a thick dipping sauce ($4.80), thick and stiffer Sanuki type with thick soya sauce taste; ($4.80) and hot only thicker and chewy Kama-age style ($5.30). The Kama-age may take 10-15 min to serve as it is freshly made.After selecting the base udon type, you can top it with tempura, onigiri and deep-fried stick items, all very reasonably priced at $1-2.50.If you are a first timer, why not go for the basic Kake ($4.80)? It looks very plain, but that is when you can taste its real quality with the extra frills.The udon noodle, made from a proprietary flour mixture of 3 different flour, is very chewy with a lot of bite, and it does not make you feel overly bloated or full. The golden dashi broth is light yet very tasty. This really reminds me of what I had in Tokyo. Thumbs up.Loved the Beef Bukkake Udon ($10.80) which had a flavorsome sweet-salty stock that you would want to finish till the last drop. The Kama-Curry Udon ($10.80) was too thick and chewy for my liking, and did not helped that I combined it with curry which was also quite gooey.Tamoya’s tempura, which they claimed to be “extremely crunchy” could be crisp or cold and lackluster depending on your luck. Use your eyes to decide if they have been left out in the open for too long.This is a fast-food style udon restaurant, yet packed with Japanese families and executives at most times of the day. If you want to know if a Japanese restaurant is authentic and good enough, just check if there are Japanese inside. Won’t go wrong.Tamoya Udon たも屋うどん-シンガポール
#01-32, Liang Court 177 River Valley Road Singapore 179030 (Clarke Quay MRT), Tel: +65 6337 0301
Opening Hours: 11am – 9:30 pmOther Japanese Restaurants at Liang Court
Ryoshi Sushi Ikeikemaru (Liang Court)
Nirai Kanai Okinawan Restaurant (Liang Court)
Dulcet & Studio (Liang Court)
Saizeriya Ristorante (Liang Court)
Marutama Ra-Men (Liang Court)
2013-04-16 00:00:00
Ladurée Singapore – Famous Macaron Makers Arrives, and They Are Not Cheap
One of the world’s best known macaron makers Ladurée have arrived at Singapore, the first in Southeast Asia, and fans have been going gaga over these colourful little round things.Ladurée have opened a boutique and counter both at Takashimaya Shopping Centre, one on the second level (#02-09), and the other sandwiched between luxurious French brands Chanel and Louis Vuitton, very near to sister company PAUL Bakery. (Read: Laduree at Tokyo Shinjuku)The first level counter may have a shorter queue, but it is the physical store that can allow you to razzle dazzle at the prettiness of the interior design and merchandise of tote bags, chocolates, scented candles and keychains.Comparing Ladurée to the other queues of Tim Ho Wan Singapore and Jollibee, the queue is nothing. Actually, I shouldn’t even compare as Ladurée obviously attracts a niche market, mostly middle-upper class females.I was the only other guy in a queue of about 15, but queuing to buying took me about 30 minutes. The people in front were fortunately very decisive in what flavours they exactly wanted, but there were some mixed-up orders and a spoilt cashier which slowed things down.At $3.80 per piece, the small petite macarons are freaking expensive, because the average price of other brands is here about $2-$2.50 per piece.  No, they are not made of gold, and the gold-speckled chocolate macarons going happens to go for $7.60 per piece.I bought a Singapore edition box of eight at $38.00, that works out to be $4.75 per piece! Comparing this to the other cities such as Hong Kong (HK$23, $3.67), Paris (2€, $3.24), London (£1.40, $2.67), New York (USD$2.70, $3.34), Sydney (AUD$3.30, $4.25) and Tokyo (367 Yen, $4.65), the price is very slightly steeper, but mostly comparable. The macarons need to fly over, what do you think?Customers have to buy a minimum of six to get a box. But nothing is stopping ladies from buying boxes that ring up to hundreds of dollars on the register.According to the immaculate French service staff at the counter, the four most popular flavours are Salted Caramel, Pistachio, Vanilla and Rose Petal. (I bet she answered that question at least 5 dozen times a day.) The other regular flavours available are Orange Blossom, Coffee, Lemon, Strawberry Candy Marshmallow, Raspberry, Chocolate and Liquorice.The more exciting seasonal flavours are the dark yellow Chocolate Yuzu, and sea-blue Marie Antoinette. The Chocolate Yuzu was obviously my favourite, with creamy chocolate sandwiched between the airy light meringue with an addictive hint of yuzu. The other is the Salted Caramel.Ladurée is known to be the inventor of the double decker macaron, when Pierre Desfontaines, second cousin of Louis Ernest Ladurée took two simple macaron shells and joined them together with a delicious ganache filling.I would think Ladurée has the reputation and one of the most delicate, nicely-shaped and fuller-tasting macarons available in Singapore. But the very hot climate is working against them. Mine did not survive well being carried out in the open in a matter of minutes.One pop in the mouth and $3.80 is gone. I would get one or two only when I really want to pamper myself. Have you tried Ladurée macarons? Do you feel it warrants that price?Ladurée Singapore
#02-09 Takashimaya S.C., Ngee Ann City, 391 Orchard Road (Orchard MRT) Tel:+65 68847361
Opening hours: 10am-9.30pmOther Related Entries
Laduree (Tokyo)
PAUL Bakery (Ngee Ann City)
Au Chocolat (Marina Bay Sands)
Brunetti (Tanglin Mall)
Obolo Galeria (Rochester Mall)
2013-04-15 00:00:00
Loco Modern Tapas & Wine – Not Your Usual Tapas Bar
Loco Modern Tapas and Wine Bar has undergone quite a few changes despite being relatively new, all to meet the waves of challenges that come with F&B business.The addition of the word “Modern” to its name means it is not selling the traditional tapas dishes but moving towards small-sized plates like Nasi Lemak Sushi, Baked Escargots, Pork Cheeks and Angus Beef Tenderloin Cubes. And lunch sets. And main courses.And the addition of live music station 10 feet up on the 2nd storey ($10 drinks). And live dart machines at Dartslive on its 3rd.The location is lovely, right smack in the middle of Boat Quay. If you choose the al fresco dining area, you would be facing Express Place, The Parliament House and a faraway view of the Singapore Flyer. Pray that the weather is cool.Loco Modern Tapas’ “round the world” menu may be a little too extensive, so you may not be entirely confident what to order that would make the trip all worthwhile.Its Angus Beef Tenderloin Cubes ($15), though not on its chef recommendations, is worth a try. Evenly prepared and not too tough. The Chorizo Croquettas ($7 for 2 pieces) oozing out with melted cheese and chorizo fillings is well… okay-good, when eaten hot.Some of the other tapas dishes, like the Deep-Fried Baby Squid ($10) is dry and not flavorsome enough. The Sauteed Tiger Prawns with harissa, butter and parsley ($15) has a nice crunch due to its freshness, but you wished there was a more exciting taste and juicy-moisture for you to suck it up.For the food, chill-out vibes, and its reasonable price, Loco Modern Tapas and Wine is worth a try. Perhaps they were trying to do too many things at one go, and should focus on a few star tapas, and at least items that would appeal more to the after-office crowd.My take is, if the name is “Loco” which means crazy, then they should go for it. Do some ‘crazy’ items, and do them really well.Loco Modern Tapas and Wine
48 Boat Quay Singapore 049850 (Raffles Place MRT) Tel: +65 6535 2841
Opening Hours: 5pm-12am (Mon-Tues), 11:30am-12am (Wed-Thurs), 11:30-3am (Fri) 4:30p-2pm (Sat), Closed SundaysOther Related Entries
Salt Tapas & Bar (Raffles City)
Bomba Paella Bar (Martin Road)
Amuse by Armin Leitgeb (Orchard Hotel)
The Ascot (The Grandstand)
Two Face (Tiong Bahru)
2013-04-11 00:00:00
BKT by Kong Kee – Three Styles of Bak Kut Teh in One Shop
Rarely do you find a Bak Kut Teh shop selling three different types of styles. At BKT by Kong Kee (not to be confused with Pastor Kong Hee), there are the Teochew peppery style, darker Hokkien type, and dry Klang Bak Kut Teh.Decades ago, Hokkien and Teochew dishes would never be mixed. At least that is what my dad (a Hokkien) and mum (a Teochew) would tell me. But times are different.BKT by Kong Kee is a new air-conditioned (phew) restaurant at China Street Far East Square (next to Yakun), and they experienced a steady lunch crowd the day I was there Some customers may be familiar with Kong Kee Seafood Restaurant located at Geylang 31, popular for its white pepper crabs and deep sea giant grouper.The Teochew style Bak Kut Teh at $6.50 per claypot bowl is a reasonably priced lunch for the nearby CBD horde. The serving seems to be a ‘female’ size though, with the pot half the diameter of the usual, with four petite though tender pieces of ribs in each.I think it is filling enough if you order a few side dishes. But the claypot being small meant that the broth became lukewarm very fast under the aircon.The Teochew style is clearly not their forte – not peppery, not garlicky, and not kicky enough. My friend who works at Raffles Place commented he would rather walk to Song Fa at Clarke Quay for BKT.Their darker Hokkien version ($6.50) has a tastier and richer soup base, which gives a fuller experience. I normally do not go for the oiler and heavier Hokkien style, but this is manageable and actually light. Given the choice of two, pick this.Do note that the soup base for the Klang style is not refilled as the herbs, ribs and water are prepared in proportion. Otherwise, just request to add the Teochew soup base so that you can try both varieties.Fortunately, we also tried the Malaysian Klang Style Bak Kut Teh ($12 for a bigger claypot) which is the best dish of the lot, and changed my original impression entirely. This is created with an original secret recipe by their grandparents in Klang since 1965.This dry form of bak kut teh is cooked with dried chilies and pork belly, somewhat reminding me of Kung Pao chicken. The gooey thick gravy is actually prepared by a reduction of the original broth, often recommended locally in Malaysia as a hangover cure. Really.Service was prompt and staff quick in replenishing soups, one of the infrequent occasions where I do not sense arrogance in a BKT shop. To round-up: Yes to the dry BKT, okay for Klang version, no to the peppery style.BKT by Kong Kee
19 & 20 China Street, Far East Square, Singapore 049561 (next to Yakun, Raffles Place MRT), Tel: +65 6536 3023
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 10:00pm DailyOther Related Entries
Singapore Food Trail (Flyer)
Prima Taste Kitchen (Centrepoint)
Ipoh Lou Yau Bean Sprouts Chicken (Chinatown Pt)
Kok Sen Restaurant (Keong Siak Street)
Kay Lee Roast Meat Joint (Paya Lebar)
2013-04-10 00:00:00
Tim Ho Wan Singapore – Surprise! Just as Good, If Not Better Than Hong Kong’s
Yes Singapore. Tim Ho Wan, the cheapest One Michelin starred restaurant in the world has finally arrived at Plaza Singapura Atrium. There is so much anticipation, especially for its popular Baked Bun with BBQ pork which I agree is so splendid and the best I ever had. (Read about: Review of Tim Ho Wan Hong Kong)There are many reasons for Tim Ho Wan’s hype: Its famed Michelin star; Singaporeans are already familiar with the brand; it is known for a 2-hour queue over at its (just closed) Mongkok branch; and there are few mid-priced yet quality dim sum in Singapore.Talking about the Michelin guide, I mean even Din Tai Fung had a star in Hong Kong, but it is the fact that a grubby hole-in-the-wall eatery won consistently that amazes. (FYI, only its branch at (Read about: Sham Shui Po) has that one Michelin star currently.)No offence, but if you have tried the better dim sum restaurants at Hong Kong, you would feel that many places in Singapore are serving nonsense – poorly made un-fresh dim sum which is really an insult to discerning consumers.Before 10am in the morning on its Singapore’s opening day, there were already about 100 plus people in the queue!The first 3 customers said they were surprised to be first in line when they came about 8:45am, “People were just waiting around but nobody sat down on the chairs. We were the first!” The SMU students are fans of Tim Ho Wan, and also wanted to check out what the hype was about.Do not leave Tim Ho Wang until you tried all its Big 4 Heavenly Kings, the Baked Bun with BBQ pork, Vermicelli Roll with Pig’s Liver, Pan Fried Carrot Cake and Steamed Egg Cake.The Baked bun with BBQ pork ($4.50 for 3 pieces) more or less maintained its standard, best eaten hot and fresh where some of the char siew would ooze in fragrance and sauce. I did think that the crumbly skin was thicker, barbequed meat sweeter when compared to the Hong Kong version, and lost its ‘wow’ moment on me. (Tip: If you want to takeaway, toast but don’t microwave them.)Otherwise, the ‘chee cheong fun’ Vermicelli Roll with Pig’s Liver ($5.50) still remained as my second favourite, smooth and slides down your throat with an oomphness in the liver without the usual chewy texture. Plus it feels so good to eat this piping hot.My personal surprise item was the Steamed Egg Cake ($3.80), very similar to the Malay and Nonya kueh kueh, yet not overly heavy. The fluffy texture grows in you, like biting a soft cushion with a touch of caramelised sweetness.Some may be divided on the Pan fried Carrot Cake ($4.50 for 3 pieces). I like it for its whole pieces of radish that adds some bite, though there was a very slight hint of sourness that may throw fans off.Though not part of the Big 4 Heavenly Kings, the Deep Fried Spring Roll with Egg White ($4.20 for 3 pieces) is one of the few which left a deep impression – golden hot rolls crisp on the outside, wrapping smooth tasty sweet-salty crab meat. Not the usual radish, and indeed packs a bolt of surprise.Tim Ho Wan helmed by Chef Mak Kwai Pui (more affectionately known as Pui-Gor) is formerly from 3-star Michelin restaurant Lung King Heen, known to many as the top dim sum place in Hong Kong. The 100-seater Singapore branch is headed by a former dim sum chef from Marriott Hotel’s Wan Hao Chinese Restaurant.When asked what was his secret to delicious dim sum, Pui-Gor replied simply, “Serve only fresh dim sum. We make our dim sum only after the customers order.” Unlike some other restaurants he observed where dim sum are first made in central kitchens, refrigerated, and steamed upon ordering, Pui-Gor insisted on making every single piece fresh. No compromises. That is also why there is no less than 25 dim sum chefs in the kitchen!While my experience in Hong Kong landed up me saying “it was good, but not spectacular”, the branch in Singapore impresses for its price and quality. Yes, it is steeper when compared to Hong Kong prices, but it is hard to find appetizing dim sum for the price range of $4-5 per item in Singapore.Tim Ho Wan is one of the unique case where not only their signatures excite, its other selections contain more hits than misses. It is true, and a very basic princple – dim sum made fresh really taste so much better.Tim Ho Wan Singapore
68 Orchard Road #01-29A Plaza Singapura Singapore 238839 (Dhoby Gaut MRT) Tel:+65 6251 2000
Opening Hours: 10.00am – 10.00pm (First-come-first-serve basis; no reservations)Other Dim Sum Entries
Tim Ho Wan (Hong Kong)
Royal China (Raffles Hotel)
Yan Ting (St Regis)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
Old Hong Kong Legend (Raffles City)
2013-04-09 00:00:00
MUSEO – Art, Food & Tea at Quayside Isle
Dining at MUSEO Quayside Isle is not just about its food, but the entire concept and experience. MUSEO (pronounced ‘moo-zay-o’) means museum in Italian, quite an appropriate name since this is one of the more uncommon places which allow both art-jamming and food.Yes, it is opened by the same people behind Arteastiq Boutique Tea House at Mandarin Gallery, known for their extensive tea collective and social painting space.The process of traveling to MUSEO already feels like experiencing a holiday – coming to the picturesque Quayside Isle, watching private yachts parked at Sentosa Cove, and proceeding up to the second storey which feels part-club, part-gallery, part-restaurant. Gorgeous view by the way.The entire mood can momentarily make you feel extremely rich and luxurious. Or poor. Like who owns all these yachts?Loved its stylish black modern décor. Get the sofa seats next to the windows if you can. Nothing beats drinking tea and people-watching on a lazy afternoon. (Spotted Zoe Tay, Vivian Lai and Mark Lee.)The menu is quite extensive, or peculiar, whichever way you see it. There is a range of entrees, sandwiches, desserts and dietary cocktails. The recommended feature is a Mezzanine set, where you can customise by choosing 4 dishes at $39. They make good starters to share amongst a group of friends. (Mezzanine means ‘in the middle’ architecturally).Creatively served in mid-sized glass cups, I was recommended the Roast Pork Belly, Barbequed Squid, Deep Fried Silver Fish and Soft Shell Chilli Crabs, all named after Picasso’s masterpieces such as “Three Musicians” and “Joys of Life”. Wait, isn’t Picasso Spanish?I was somewhat expecting a more Italian or European savour to the dishes, though all four tasted rather Asian due to its accompanying sauces and preparation methods. Not that I minded it at all. The Pork Belly was good stuff (If I closed my eyes to eat, my mind will go “Cantonese sio bak”!).The main, such as Salmon & Red Pesto Spaghetti ($28) was also decent, the red capsicum pesto sauce was de-li-cious, but somehow doesn’t make you crave for more.  It’s the fish.Many come to MUSEO for its weekend High Tea Buffet ($48++ from 1.30pm to 5pm) with a range of more than 30 treats and dishes, perfectly complemented with specialty tea sets.There are many reasons to like MUSEO, especially if you are a tea and arts person who just want to unwind on your day off.[Giveaway Ended] MUSEO Mezzanine Sets Giveaway! 
MUSEO will be giving away 2 sets of Mezzanine with drinks (each valued at $58++) to 2 blessed Daniel’s Food Diary readers!All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET on twitter
Step 3: Leave a comment below, say what you may like about MUSEO
Remember to include your email. Results will be announced 16th April.MUSEO Quayside Isle
31 Ocean Way #01-22 Singapore 098375 (Harbourfront MRT), Tel: +65 6734 8066
Opening Hours: 2pm-1am (Mon-Thurs), 1:30pm-2am (Fri-Sat), 1:30pm-1am (Sun)Getting to Quayside Isle
Shuttle Bus: Board the complimentary Sentosa Bus 3 from the Beach Station Bus Interchange and alight at Sentosa Cove Village. Quayside Isle is an approximate 5-minute walk away. Shuttle bus services are available from 8am to 10.30pm at 30-minute intervals.MRT: Take the North-East Line or Circle Line and alight at the HarbourFront Station. From there, you may either go to the 3rd level of VivoCity shopping mall, transfer onto Sentosa Express or via the Sentosa Boardwalk.Other Related Entries
Beanstro (Takashimaya)
The Ascot (The Grandstand)
Ocean Restaurant (Resorts World Sentosa)
Gordon Grill
Au Chocolat (Marina Bay Sands)
2013-04-08 00:00:00
The #SgMemory Project – A Singapore Nostalgic Food Tour
When I was young, I remember the satay man would appear at 5pm below my flat at the going of his ‘honk’. Excitedly, I would pass a large milo tin down using a rope, with some money inside, and pull a packet of satay up to the 2nd floor where I stayed. Those were the times when fishball noodles were 50 cents, and the ding ding candy uncle was just outside my school with a chisel and metal container.Those were the days.I am glad that there is a Singapore Memory Project to capture and document precious moments and memories related to Singapore. Imagine showing these memories to your grandchildren! Ever since I heard about the project, I have been hashtagging my relevant instagram photos and tweets with #SgMemory. They do not need to be entirely retro items, because what is new today will be history tomorrow.While I love exploring new food and restaurants, there is still an ‘oldie’ in me which crave for old-school food. Perhaps that is why I was invited to lead (like a tour guide) a group of food bloggers on a Singapore Nostalgic Food Tour. Of course I need to thank my facebook & twitter followers because they made several of the suggestions.Zam Zam Restaurant
697-699 North Bridge Road (Bugis MRT) Tel: +65 6298 6320. Opening Hours: 8am – 11pm DailyZam Zam opposite the famous Sultan Mosque is popular with its Nasi Briyani and Murtabak. Do you know that they have been around since 1908? That makes it 105 years old!It was started in 1908 by Mr Abdul Kadir from Kerala South India and is currently run by his grandson. The name “Zam Zam” comes from the well which is drunk during the Haji pilgrimage and has special significance to the Muslims.The restaurant is supremely crowded, the service staff has a sense of arrogance, and note that you MUST order either a briyani ($6.80) or murtabak ($8.00) if you sit on the second level.  Some say the murtabak is the best in Singapore; while others may have said the standard has dropped. Still, how many restaurants in Singapore can say they have been around more than a century?Rich and Good Cake Shop
24 Kandahar St, Singapore 198887 (Bugis MRT), Tel: +65 6294 3324Rich and Good Cake Shop, relatively much younger at about 20 years, is known for its incredible swiss rolls. Run by Mdm Lily Liu, fans swear by its fluffy and soft swiss rolls, with a variety of fillings such as kaya, durian, mango, coffee, green tea, strawberry and blueberry.You will find the shop hidden at Kampong Glam (known as the Arab Quarters), with a rather ethnic and elegant architectural design. Basically, you join in a queue, go into the bakery, make your orders, and walk out with long peach coloured boxes containing swiss rolls best enjoyed with a cup of teh tarik.Seow Choon Hua Restaurant
33 Sultan Gate, Singapore 198481 (Bugis MRT), Tel:+65 6298 2720, Opening Hours: 10:00 am–10:00 pmHow many people still make Foo Chow fishballs the traditional way, by hands? This 70 years-old eatery still does. Come afternoon, you will see two aunties seated by the corner table, painstakingly wrapping each fishball with minced meat. There are four types of fish: ikan parang, grouper, red fish and yellow eel used for each. The result is an unevenly shaped bouncy fishball full of goodness as each bite comes with savoury pork within.I also wonder if women in confinement still take Red Wine Chicken with Mee Sua. It supposedly builds up the immune system and benefits health. All is know is, the men at the table all liked this dish. This version is not as heavy, rich and oily as some mother-in-laws would cook. You can also buy a bottle of their pre-mix to make at home.Tiong Bahru Galicier Pastry
55 Tiong Bahru Road #01-39 Singapore 160055 (Tiong Bahru MRT) Tel:+65 6324 1686. Opening Hours: 9:00am – 9:00pm (Tues – Sun)Tiong Bahru Galicier Pastry first opened in 1975 near Killiney Road till it gave way to urban modernization at Orchard. It moved to Tiong Bahru and started selling traditional Nonya kuehs taught by the grandmother.As owner Jenny Tan was introducing several of the kueh kueh, I am guilty to say I have never tried half of them. This is excellent food history lesson! Their variety include the orange Pandan Tapioca Cake (60 cent) Kueh Lapis (90 cents), Ondeh Ondeh (60 cents), Lemper Udang with sambal shrimp ($1.20), Kueh Kosoi (70 cents), Kueh Ambon honeycomb cake ($1.20) and Kueh Salat (90 cent).Most were so smooth and not overly sweet that we couldn’t stop eating! There is something about handmade cakes that factory-made ones cannot replace.My Home, My Library – Showcase of Treasure Moments
Our last stop was at Queenstown library for the ‘My Home, My Library’ exhibition national wide across 24 libraries in Singapore. As part of the Singapore Memory Project, these libraries are showcasing unforgettable memories and stories of people, places and events relating to their homes, neighborhood and libraries (till 29th April 2013).This is such a meaningful initiative, and if you want to be a part of it, you can:
- Share your memories at SingaporeMemory.SG web portal
- Download the free SGMemory iPhone app 
- Make your way to the libraries, Snap and Share your picture of the exhibition on Twitter or Instagram with the hashtag #SgMemory. You can win up to $200 shopping vouchers in the weekly Snap & Share contest!This is the Food Bloggers picture featuring Cuisine Paradise, Melicacy, Camemberu, and Keropokman. I want to see your version too! And oh, if you do come across some food representative of Singapore, other than hashtagging #SgMemory on Twitter and Instagram, tag @DanielFoodDiary as well. I want to try more nostalgic food!*Thank you to the Singapore Memory Project and Tribal DDB Singapore for the opportunity to lead this Nostalgic Food Tour.
2013-04-04 00:00:00
Pete’s Place – Serving Authentic Italian Cuisine For 40 Years
A fellow food blogger said that F&B in Singapore now is all about concept and marketing, not about taste. My reply was, the test of time will tell if the quality of the food is good.Pete’s Place at Hyatt Hotel is probably one of the few restaurants that have passed this test, having been around since 1973. That is 40 years!You may have never discovered its existence even if you been to Hyatt, because it is located on the basement with only a staircase leading to the Italian restaurant. The last time I been to Pete’s Place was 5 years ago, and it remains exactly like how I remembered it to be: trattoria-style décor with red-bricked walls, dark wood furniture, checked table cloth and picture frames with black and white photos. (Read: Pete’s Place review written 5 years ago)Pete’s Place specialises in authentic Italian cuisine from homemade pastas to wood-fired oven pizzas, just like how it started four decades ago. The salad buffet-stylee bar that features a healthy selection of greens is said to be very popular among the ladies.The restaurant has a current special of Lombardy cuisine till 12 April, helmed by guest chef Loris Pistillo from Spasso of Grand Hyatt Erawan Bangkok. This northern Italian region, which capital is Milan, has a more extravagant style of cuisine which is generally more buttery, creamy and cheesy.Rice is popular in Lombardy, often found in soups as well as risotti.It is no coincidence that my personal favourite dish of the lunch was the Pumpkin Risotto, Smoked Duck Ragù and Balsamic Glazed Shallots ($32). This risotto was also named “Best Risotto” at the Eurofood Mediterranean Fair in Bangkok in 2011. It was yellowish creamy – the way I like risotto to be done, yet not overly heavy and rich. Very balanced.The glistening glazed shallots cleverly add a touch of aroma and a mild yet vibrant flavour. This is the only dish which I finished all the way to the last bit.Although Chef Loris prefers to create savoury dishes, I particularly liked all his desserts, said to be inspired by what he eats back home since his childhood days. There is a sense of rustic simplicity without the frills and unnecessary embellishments, unlike many of the modern style desserts.Among the sweets such as the Milano Sponge Cake ($9) and Country Chocolate Pine Nut Cake ($12), I really enjoyed the Crunchy Butternut Tart ($9) which is fun and pleasurable to eat like a giant golden cookie.If these dishes and desserts can remind the Italians of home, you would get a similar sense of homeliness from the old-school décor, lively atmosphere, and impeccable friendly service from some of the older staff who has been working at Pete’s Place since its beginning.Pete’s Place
Hyatt Hotel 10-12 Scotts Road Singapore 228211 (Orchard MRT) Tel No:  +65 6732 1234
Opening Hours: 12:00 noon – 2:30 pm,  6:00 pm – 10:30 pmOther Italian Restaurant Entries
il Cielo (Hilton Hotel Singapore) 
Caffe B (Marina Bay Sands)
Covelli Italian Bistro & Wine Bar (Orchard Central)
Garibaldi (Purvis Street)
Da Paolo Bistrobar (Rochester Park)
2013-04-03 00:00:00
Madam Kwan’s – Recommended Best Nasi Lemak in Malaysia
[Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia] Madam’s Kwan Nasi Lamak is recommended as the best nasi lemak by the Ministry of Tourism Malaysia. This is really big deal, as the fragrant rice dish cooked in coconut milk is considered the national dish of the country.I finally made my way to KLCC to try this coveted dish, with this variation created by Madam Kwan Swee Lian who is now 80 years ago. While she handed the business operations over to her son, she is still going strong and oversees the central kitchen.Madam Kwan’s offers many Malaysian-style street food in a restaurant setting, with prices about 3-4 times what you would pay at a hawker stall. You may think twice about the price, but other customers reflect otherwise – the restaurant is always packed.Other than the nasi lemak, other popular dishes are the Nasi Bojari – a self-created tri-coloured rice dish with assam prawns, Assam Fish Head, Chicken Curry, Beef Rendang and otak otak.Okay. I did contemplate that the Nasi Lemak at $16.90 ringgit ($6.80) is slightly pricey considering this is Malaysia.The rice seems deceivingly simple, just fairly aromatic. Wishing it was warmer and more fragrant. However, its fluffy light grain with every rice distinct and not clumpy probably won it many fans. I can imagine there are better versions out there, but this is good enough for me.While the side accompaniments are not the usual ingredients I am used to (such as deep fried chicken and fried egg) its balanced combination is a result that is not too heavy and a joy to finish. I always feel kind of bloated after having nasi lemak, but Madam Kwan’s version is rather delightful. I especially liked the chicken curry gravy, sambal ikan bills and acar, and swiftly made a clean finish even though the tummy was already quite full to begin with.The other food such as the 6 pieces skewered barbequed Malaysian Satay ($13.90 ringgit) and Cendol dessert ($7.90) are splendid. The taste and presentation styles do remind me of PappaRich and Grandma’s (where the chef is originally from Madam Kwan’s), only a notch better in terms of first impressions.The main thing I did not like was the service, or lack of, and the cleanliness of the restaurant. There were like shoe prints and stains all over the floor, and you wonder if they even cleaned the restaurant that day.Good and bad news. Madam Kwan’s is going to open its first overseas outlet at Singapore’s Vivocity in May. But, the price of the signature nasi lemak is expected to be $12-$15. Before you scream daylight robbery, I can so predict the long queues all craving for a whiff of the coconut rice.Madam Kwan’s Restaurant (KLCC)
Suria Klcc Jalan Ampang, Parkson Suria KLCC, 50088 Kuala Lumpur, Federal Territory of Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia, Tel: +60 3-2026 2297
Other Branches: Bangsar Shopping Centre, Mid Valley, Empire Subang, Pavilion, Alamanda Putrajay, One Utama
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 10:30pm Daily
2013-04-02 00:00:00
Jollibee Singapore – Hands Down, One of the Best Fried Chicken
It seems like the “Boycott Jollibee” page has brought the fastfood group more hype and success than ever. Initially accused of discrimination in hiring and preference for Filipino staff, Jollibee Singapore turned around to say there are hiring 61 Singapore nationals and PR out of their 83 workers. (Read: Calls to Boycott Jollibee Singapore Ridiculous & Uncalled For)Naysayers have obviously never heard of them or tried their fried chicken. Which by the way, is very very yummy.After all, Jollibee is the largest fast food chain in the Philippines, with a network of 780 stores, and 92 other branches overseas. A Filipino friend said that this is the food that accompanies them as they grow up, and Jollibee always remind me of family and friends. (I wonder if there is an equivalent in Singapore.)Customers have been said to queue for at least an hour and a half till they lay their hands on the chicken. When I went on a quiet weekday afternoon at 4pm, I saw no crowd outside the 6th storey shop at Lucky Plaza and thought to myself, “Heng, the line is not too long.” Only to realize the vacant shop next door is used to contain the queue!With a capacity of 300, finding a seat is not much of a problem as most customers ta-bao (takeaway) chicken by the buckets.The moment of truth. Jollibee’s 2-piece Chickenjoy value meal ($6.60, $16 for 6 piece bucket) comes served with rice and a drink (Pepsi, no Coke) and is indeed like what it claims to be – crispylicious and juicylicious.Its deep fried golden outer layer goes crisp-crunch, especially addictive when you dip it in a specially-made gravy and pop the entire thing in your mouth. (This gravy kind of reminds me of the mashed potato sauce of its competitor though.) The inner meat remains very succulently juicy, yet not in an oily way.Their Double Yumburger with TLC value meal ($6.00), made with 100% pure beef patty and served with mayo and creamy cheese, is another front runner. While I am not that huge a fan of its bun, the patty is not overly dry and has a slight meaty tenderness which I enjoy.It is said that their sweet style spaghetti ($3.00) has changed its flavours to accustom to local palates. Taste-wise still feels too ‘kiddy’ for me. I would much prefer a more savoury touch, but it’s personal preference.Hopefully the queue will die down in a while though it doesn’t look like anytime soon. A second branch is already in the works. Jollibee’s Chickenjoy is highly satisfying, hands down one of the best fried chicken in Singapore. I am already salivating just thinking about it.Jollibee Singapore
6th Floor Lucky Plaza, Orchard Road, Singapore 238863 (Orchard MRT), Tel: +65 6735 5119
Opening Hours: 9:00am – 9:00pm DailyOther Fried Chicken Entries
NeNe Chicken (The Star Vista)
Bonchon Chicken (Bugis+)
Wingadees (Junction 10)
Hot Star Fried Chicken (City Square Mall)
Omakase Burger (The Grandstand)
2013-04-01 00:00:00
Omakase Burger – Verdict of The Best Burger in Singapore
Omakase Burger. So much hype. 8 Days says it’s “possibly the best burger in Singapore” and Straits Times says the burger “is king”.That means I have to make it all the way to The Grandstand (former Turf City) twice, to first fulfill my curiosity and then give it another chance.The name “Omakase” which means “I’ll leave it to you” or “entrust” may be slightly misleading because people may have expected the chef to be really innovative and prepare something different everything we go. That should be the way. I would like to try a “surprise” burger.Banker-turned-restaurateur Cheng Hsin Yao created this Omakase burger after a year and a half of experimenting. Their final product is a result of a patty made with blends of USDA Choice Grade beefs with no fillers, a bun created by a Japanese artisanal baker, specially imported American cheese, and a sauce comprising of 13 secret ingredients.You have to give credit to this man for trying.The moment of truth: The Omakase Cheeseburger ($13.90) was really juicy yummy, with the soft pillow-like bun making eating a lot easier (I hate dry hard buns). One firm bite and everything goes into your mouth without the mess, while you can enjoy the full blend of flavoursThe best part for me was the cheese, nicely enveloping the hand-ground beef patty.My happiness was a little short-lived because the portion was too small to truly satisfy my burger hunger. No doubt it was good, I won’t call it the best yet. Plus, with no offence intended, I probably tasted something similar to some burger joints in Japan.Their Oven-Baked Parmesan Chicken ($14.90) is also a specialty, where fresh chicken parts is breaded and baked with cheese coating and served with a raisin roll. While we were told to wait for 15 minutes as they only bake to order, ours came within 5.The outer skin which reeks of parmesan cheese is really crunchy, while the inner meat drips drips drips with oil all over. Their given serviette is not enough for the grease!  I don’t mind having this again though.Omakase Burger is possibly one the best burger in Singapore, though not the best (yet), and seems suit to be one of the many princes.Omakase Burger
200 Turf Club Road, The Grandstand #01-05, Singapore 287994 Tel: +65 6763 2698
Free shuttle services from Newton, Botanical Gardens and Toa Payoh MRT Station on hourly frequency
Opening Hours: 11.30am- 3,30pm, 5- 9.30pm (Mon- Thu), 11am – 10pm (Fri- Sun)Other Burger Entries Entries
Charly Ts (Katong 112)
Everything With Fries (Orchard Central)
Burger Shack (Bt Timah)
Swensen’s Burgers (Ion Orchard)
Rock & Ash (Marina Square)
2013-03-29 00:00:00
Bing Sutt – When Starbucks Meets G.O.D
[Hong Kong] If you are looking for the most characteristic and photogenic Starbucks in the world, you may want to make your way to Hong Kong’s Bing Sutt at Duddell Street.After all, this Starbucks which pays homage to the 1950s Hong Kong arts and culture, is a collaboration with Douglas Young’s unique concept store GOD. For those unaware, it does not mean LORD, but actually Goods of Desire – known for their retro, humorous and Eastern take on lifestyle products.Finding this Starbucks Concept Store is not too difficult, only about a 10 minute walk from Central MTR, a corner away from the luxurious brands shopping. If you are a Starbucks fan, it makes it all worthwhile.Oh, the shop is divided into two halves – the Western side and the Hong Kong side. At the entrance side, you get the ordering counter with typical Starbucks décor and seats. Very amusingly, I noticed that all the Westerners were sitting at this part of the café. None of the ‘gwai lo’ were on the other side.Then, the thrill begins: Over the top décor, tiled floors, signatures in traditional Chinese writing, fake bird cages on the ceiling, old toys in the glass cabinet, retro movie posters, and wooden sitting booths like how a traditional Hong Kong café looks like. Except that it is all recreated.And on this side, all Asians – Filipino domestic workers holding a meeting, ladies for a morning tea, and an occasional tourist like myself.Even the food offered had some East-West fusion twist: Rustic Bun and Thick Cut Butter (HKD$13), Coffee Paper Cake (HKD$13) and Coffee Egg Tart (HKD$10). Okay, taste wise, the re-creations were not very impressive and I would rather head over to nearby Lan Fang Yuan for their buns anytime.Drinks were standard Starbucks fare, with an Asian Dolce Latte special. If also they could conceive the traditional Hong Kong silk stocking milk tea as well.Bing Sutt – The Starbucks Concept Store
Shop M2, Mezzanine Floor, Baskerville House, 13 Duddell Street, Central (10 walk from Central MTR),
Tel: +852 2523 5685 Email: party@coffee-concepts.comOther Hong Kong Entries
Dim Sum Bar (Hong Kong)
Mak’s Noodles (Hong Kong)
Tim Ho Wan (Hong Kong)
Ho Hung Kee (Hong Kong)
Must Try Hong Kong Drinks
2013-03-28 00:00:00
Two Face – Kopitiam by Day, Pizzeria by Night
Two Face at Tiong Bahru’s Eng Hoon Street is so appropriately named. In the morning, it is an old-school kopitiam selling super delicious yong tau foo, vegetarian bee hoon and mee pok. By the evening, it transforms into a pizzeria and beef place that spells ‘hip’ all over.All they needed were some chalkboard to cover up the existing stalls, and loads of persuasion to get the coffeeshop’s master tenant to rent the place.This is such an ingenious use of space, since the existing stalls close by 2 to 3pm.The ambience at Two Face feels modish and laid-back, with sizable crowds coming in their tee-shirts and berms to chill out and have a beer. Their choice of music is sometimes questionable though.Menu is part Western, part pub grubs with Asian influences. Appetizer items that would catch your eye would include Pork Belly with Maple Mayo ($8), Frito Misto of Calamari ($10), Pan Fried Foie Gras on Fries ($14), and Ha Chong Gai ($10) which is probably an old time favourite zhi char dish.The sides were decent fare. Good news is no GST n service charge, but still said to be ‘served with love’.We also had a Lightly Spiced Aglio Olio with Porkbelly ($18). The spaghetti is adequately sautéed, though felt a little more to the oily side. The porkbelly saved the dish, still crisp on the outside with soft soft fats in the middle that makes it worthwhile to forgo your diet plans momentarily.Both times I went, we were recommended the Smoked Duck Pizza ($18) topped with arugula and truffle mayo.  No major complains about their crust, but I thought that having one miserable piece of smoked duck on each slice meant that eating the pizza felt boring. There needs to be more ingredients to add variety to the taste.I really enjoyed the old-fashioned yet chic feel of this place, and will probably be a regular return customer.While many Tiong Bahru shops are losing their ownership and appeal due to the excessive café-nization, you know that Two Face will still retain the authenticity and charm back in the morning.Two Face Pizza and Taproom
56 Eng Hoon Street #01-46 Singapore 160056 (15 min from Tiong Bahru MRT) Tel:+65 6536 0024
Hours: 5.30-11pm (Tue-Thu), 5.30pm-12am (Fri-Sat), 10am-10pm (Sun)Other Tiong Bahru Entries
5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru
PoTeaTo (Tiong Bahru)
Centre Ps (Tiong Bahru)
Drips Bakery Café (Tiong Poh Road)
The Orange Thimble (Tiong Bahru)
2013-03-27 00:00:00
Dolce Tokyo – 313 Somerset Just Got Sweeter With New Japanese Italian Café
313 Somerset just got sweeter with the opening of Japanese-Italian café Dolce Tokyo. And also more Japanese with surrounding shops like Lowry’s Farm and Uniqlo at Level 3 (which look like where I can get my entire wardrode from). But unlike the fashion stores, Dolce Tokyo is a completely new brand and concept, created due to the void of such cafés in town.While the 56-seater café looks like a shoebox unit, there is actually a small kitchen behind which can prepare a range of mains and sides for a fuller dining experience. I do notice that more customers come here during off-meal times, perhaps not knowing they serve meals such as All-Day Breakfasts and Japanese casual dishes.I thought that the strength of its kitchen lies more in the Japanese more than the Western items. Go for the Omu Curry Rice ($19) which has Japanese fried rice wrapped in a gooey bright yellow egg, served with a melt-in-your-mouth pork belly skewer and side accompaniments of salad, baby octopus and jellyfish. My afraid-to-get-fat friend was initially unconvinced of the pork belly, till she took a bite and never looked back.The Hiyashi Chuka ($15) reminds me of the Taiwanese mee sua, and is actually cold somen topped with strips of tamagoyaki egg, sliced cucumber, sliced carrot, ginger, gammon ham and nori. The best part is when the cold goma sesame (and some secret ingredients) sauce is poured around, mixed evenly (like lo hei), and relished. Refreshing and different.Most of the Japanese tai-tais who come in here are having some dessert of some kind. If you cannot decide between your group, take the Dessert Bento ($18.90) where you can mix and match.We had the Shiratama with Kantan jelly, Panna Cotta with mixed berries, Abekawa mochi, green tea gelato, and cake of the day – a homemade carrot cake. The most popular item among the girls (the Ninja Girls I meant) was the wobbly Panna Cotta made with real vanilla pods instead of just essence. Look out for the dots on the dessert for its authenticity.The most Instagram-ed dessert is likely to be Yuzu or Matcha with Goma Black Sesame Cake ($11.50 each), served in bird cage specially brought in from Japan because it is just more elegant.Some may be hesitant to order any cake at that price. Then I found out it is homemade, produced in small quantities, prepared with Japanese imported yuzu fruits because they are sweeter, and at least big in size. The matcha cake is really fluffy and unique, and I loved the green tea crumble to bits, literally.As Dolce Tokyo is still new, there could be some service lapses and items on the menu that needs some refinement. Once that is polished up, I am quite certain that we will see more of this name around. As what the Ninja Girls say collectively, the food at Dolce Tokyo is “Oishii!”.Dolce Tokyo Giveaway! 
Dolce Tokyo will be giving away 10 sets of Curry Rice with pork belly skewers & matcha latte to 10 blessed Daniel’s Food Diary readers!All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of Daniel’s Food Diary and Dolce Tokyo
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET the post on twitter
Step 3: Leave a comment below to name your favourite Dolce Tokyo item
Results will be announced 3rd April.Dolce Tokyo Cafe
313 Somerset, 313 Orchard Road #03-23 Singapore 238895 (Somerset MRT), Tel: +65 6836 5612
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:30pm*The above entry is an advertorial.
2013-03-26 00:00:00
The Ascot – English Gastrogrub Restaurant at The Grandstand Scores
New English restaurant The Ascot at The Grandstand has found a right name, called because it is known to be a famous English racecourse. It is located at the previously known Turf City, and you suspect that the original premise may be where the horses were kept.Not to be confused with the similar-sounding service apartments, this new restaurant offers the very English pub experience – authentic comfort food, beer and a view facing lush green fields.I was initially sceptical about its pub food – the focus of many similar public houses are on its brew and ambience, while food takes second-fiddle. Also, the very thought of traveling all the way to The Grandstand at Bukit Timah (shuttle bus, hot weather and everything) made me think twice.The ambience does make you feel like you are away from the country, very laidback and carefree.  The customers who are mainly Europeans or Australians come after a game of football or swimming classes, indulging in sharing plates and many laughs. The Ascot’s owner Sylvester Fedor Thang stands behind the bar counter most of the time, in his signature straw-hat. And yes, looking very chill as well.In terms of food, I was slightly taken aback by the Smoked Tomato Soup ($8) which came served with Turkish bread. One word to describe it – Awesome! Perhaps I came half-expecting some lacklustre soup prepared from a can.Once you have tasted their Smoked Tomato Soup, you won’t want to drink canned tomato soup again. It was so warm and felt rustically home-cooked. Makes good comfort food anytime.I remember having scotch eggs at London’s Spitalfields market and that’s about it. Never had it ever again. When I saw scotch eggs in The Ascot’s Cold Cut Platter ($18), I just knew I had to order it.A scotch egg is a hard-boiled egg wrapped in sausage meat, coated in breadcrumbs and deep-fried. Theirs taste almost like what I had in London, except that it could be much more piping hot. With that said, the accompanying parma ham was the bomb.Sylvester wondered if we enjoyed the Bunch of Bangers ($20), with three broiled sausages on bubble and squeak drizzled with onion gravy. (Bubble and squeak is a traditional English dish made with the shallow-fried leftover vegetables and ingredients such as potato and cabbage.) He said that some customers were not used to the potatoes being ‘chao tar’ (slightly burnt).That is precisely why I liked that dish. It tasted very grubby and unrefined, and could imagine this going so well with a mug of ice cold beer. No wonder they call the food ‘gastrogrub’.The Ascot scores for being an unpretentious place, offering straight-forward British traditional cuisine without the additional frills. Deep-fried Mars Bar yes? This is one of my recent favourite new openings this year. Now, let me think about making a trip all the way to The Grandstand.The Ascot
The Grandstand 200 Turf Club Road #01-16 Singapore 287994, Tel: +65 6462 0881
Free shuttle services from Newton, Botanical Gardens and Toa Payoh MRT Station on hourly frequency
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 11:00pm DailyOther Related Entries
The Royal Mail (Ascott Singapore)
Morganfield’s (The Star Vista)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
TongKang Colonial Bar & Restaurant (Clarke Quay)
OverTime (Dempsey)
2013-03-25 00:00:00
Seribu Sari – Semi Buffet Indonesian Dining A Pleasant Treat
Rendezvous Grand Hotel was much known for its nasi padang eatery which had been around since the 1950s, and I nearly forgotten that it has moved to Clarke Quay central after a revamp two years ago.The space has been taken up by the hotel’s own Seribu Sari, which means ‘thousand spices’ due to the variety of spices used in the classic dishes on its menu. Some of the older crowd of Hock Lock Kee never returned, but Seribu Sari have also found themselves  somenew fans.I thought that their idea of an Indonesian high-tea is quite compelling. There are already European style and dim sum styled ones, so why not some Indonesian savouries and kueh kueh such as Biji Salak (glutinous rice balls cooked with sago and coconut milk) and Getuk Ubi (mashed boiled tapioca, red sugar and grated coconut) to spend a weekend late noon? The current promotion is $22++ from 3pm to 5pm during weekends – quite an okay price.There is also an Indonesian food promotion till 21 April 2013 where you can have authentic cuisines from North Sulawesi and Java at S$33++ per person. All done in semi buffet style – the soups, salads and desserts on the buffet counter are free to take, accompanied by hot dishes which is changed regularly.Generally, my table preferred the meat dishes over the rest. The Empal Balado, a fried caramelized beef dish, was a favourite as the meat was tender and flavourfully marinated. However, the overall spiciness was not ‘killing’ enough and felt slightly modified to local palates. At least it still packs a slight punch.The Ayam Bamboo chicken stew with kamangi leaf was another crowd-pleaser, but would have fared better if there was more gravy to go with rice, as most of the other dishes felt a little dry and lukewarm.The other dishes tried such as the Udang Pedas Madu (honey stir-fried prawn), Urip Urip (roll cat fish with light soya sauce) and Urapan Sayur (toasted vegetables with shredded coconut chill) were above average, better than what you get at most food stalls, except that they were for the most part unmemorable.If you asked me to pin-point one main dish I would want to order again, I would not be able to put a finger to any.Don’t get me wrong. I loved the ambience rich in Javanese influence and service at Seribu Sari. The price was also reasonable for such a setting in a hotel, and the overall meal in terms of taste was largely pleasant.They just need to create a few impeccable signature dishes that would quickly impress, which could set themselves apart from all the rest of the Indonesian restaurants out there.Seribu Sari Indonesian Dining
#03-03 Rendezvous Gallery, Rendezvous Grand Hotel, 9 Bras Basah Road, Singapore 189559 (Bras Basah MRT) Tel: +65 6335-1871
Opening Hours: 11am-10pm dailyOther Indonesian Entries
RS Deli (Upper Thomson)
The Moluccas Rooms (Marina Bay Sands)
Bayang (Clarke Quay)
Wong Solo (Far East Plaza)
Waroeng Penyet (Marine Parade)
2013-03-22 00:00:00
Ito-Kacho Mandarin Gallery – Japanese Yakiniku Restaurant Brings Premium To A New Level
There is barbeque, and there is yakiniku. Not very much different in the strictest sense of the word. But barbeque is commonly associated with smoke and burnt meat. Over at Ito-Kacho Yakiniku Restaurant, your dining experience is going to different from what you commonly get, compared to your outdoor BBQs or Korean grill restaurants.Very much different.Ito-Kacho is the first outlet established out of Japan, located at Mandarin Gallery a few shops away from Ippudo. Mandarin Gallery is already known for its branded and posh shops from the likes of Montblanc, Emporio Armani, Marc Jacobs, D&G and Vertu.The current customer base at Ito-Kacho seems to be a mix of Japanese, businessmen, and Indonesian tai tais. You get the drift.You may wonder what’s the damage then? It is all really up to you.Their premium cuts such as grade A4 Wagyu Beef is its main highlight and recommendation. If you want to go for quality, choose their beautifully marbled Wagyu Toku-Jo-Bara Premium Short Rib ($50 for 80g, $69 for $120g), Wagyu Sasami Flank Steak ($50 for 80g, $69 for 120g) and Wagyu Kainomi Flap Meat ($22 for 80g, $29 for 120g).Or if you are not willing to spend that much, there is a cheaper range of meats from the United States and Australia – the Jo-Karubi US Short Rib ($22 for 80g, $29 for 120g), Nami-Karubi US Chuck Rib ($19 for 80g, $24 for 120g) and Wagyu Tongue Aust ($20 for 80g, $39 for $120).The meat is premium, and therefore the price is also premium. Even though the Japanese selection is about twice the price, I can safely say the tastiness and happiness you get out of eating those is more than double.All things being equal.  And provided you do not overcook your beef. For one piece burned – that would be $10 down the drain.The Japanese Black Wagyu is air-flown from Kyushu, known for its smooth texture and robust flavours.  The melt-in-your-mouth quality would likely give a pleasant surprise. My initial thought bubble was, “Wow, how would meat taste so tender and soft?” It was almost as if I did not have such beef ever in my life. I emphasize, “Wow”.The meat is said to be chilled and delivered from the supplier daily, thereby tasting more refined and delicate. Frozen meat on the reverse is drier and tougher. Warning: your happiness may be short-lived once you see the final bills.Thankfully, there are other items on the menu which won’t cost an arm or a leg, such as the recommended Dashimaki Tamago ($6.80), Kuro-Buta Ramen ($15.80) and Ishiyaki Bibimbap ($15.00).Ito-Kacho serves quality Japanese rice. The reason I say so is because a food reviewer wrote that they had the “travesty of serving Thai rice rather than Japanese”. You wonder where did that come from.One of the major concerns of not having barbeque, especially for lunch, is the worry of smelling like cooked meat after that. You do not want people to say your hair reminds me of wagyu. Unlike some other restaurants, Ito-Kacho has a specially designed pit which ensures most of the smoke will be sucked out.They will also be launching new items such as sliced puffer fish soon, which strangely tasted like bak kwa to me. Told you they were not an ordinary barbecue restaurant.Ito Kacho Yakiniku
333A Orchard Road #04-08/09 Mandarin Gallery Tel: +65 68360111 Singapore (Somerset MRT)
Opening Hours: 11am – 2pm; 6pm-11pm (Mon-Fri), 11:00am – 11pm (Sat), 11am – 10pm (Sun, PH)Other Japanese Restaurant Entries
Waku Ghin (Marina Bay Sands)
Teppei Japanese Restaurant (Orchid Hotel)
LP+Tetsu (Tanglin Mall)
Japanese Dining SUN (CHIJMES)
IKYU (Tiong Bahru)
2013-03-21 00:00:00
Genki Sushi – Order from an iPad, Sent by a Train
I always have certain reservations for conveyor belt sushi despite my liking for Japanese food. Would the sushi stay fresh after going round and round and round? And yikes, we may have seen customers checking their goods and returning them back to the belt. Touched or untouched, I do not wish to know!While our mobile companies are still crippling with the various Gs, Genki Sush at Chinatown Pointi has a new and rather sophisticated system – ordering your sushi from an iPad. Ah, the beauty of technology.How it works: You browse the menu via an iPad mini, and make your orders directly from there. I was initially skeptical. Would the machine get my orders right? Would it bill wrongly? Tested and tried – it works.You can order anything, from sushi, sashimi, soups to cooked dishes, and it would be delivered via a Kousoku Express system which looks like toy Shinkansen bullet train. Yes, there is an electronic track going around the dining tables.In a manner of saying about 2 minutes, my smoked duck sushi ($2.30) came delivered via an electric red train. While your mum may say “Don’t play with food”, this system makes food ordering clean, fast and fun. The flipside is: the sushi rice is molded by sushi robots, lacking that human touch.Usually the service staff would count your coloured plates at the end of the meal to indicate how much you have consumed and spent. Here, the empty sushi plates are slipped into a return slot and off they go. Your final bill would be indicated in that same iPad mini, making it uncomplicated for keeping track without the table filled with Jenga of plates.There are some new spring “Haru selects” from Genki Sushi and I would recommend the Cream Cheese Premium Shrimp Sushi ($5.80), Ohtoro Sushi ($5.80), Salmon Supreme Sushi ($3.80), and the Asari Miso Soup ($3.80).My main reservation for most conveyor belt sushi is the rice – usually dry and clumpy. Frankly, I wasn’t expecting much from Genki Sushi but was astonished when I tried the Scallop Carpaccio Sushi ($5.80). The rice actually tasted rather refined and superior, which I learnt is made using top-grade Koshihikari aromatic short-grain rice, cooked in purified water, and cost three times more than usual.Once your group eats up to 8 plates, you stand a chance to play jackpot on the iPad. The five of us played for 4 rounds, after 32 plates. Nope, didn’t win anything, but ended up with a food coma.Genki Sushi
Chinatown Point, 133 New Bridge Road #02-33 (Chinatown MRT)
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pmOther Sushi Entries
Sushi Tei (Ngee Ann City)
Maki-San (The Cathay)
Itacho Sushi (Plaza Singapura)
Sushi Express (City Link Mall)
2013-03-19 00:00:00
Plaza Brasserie PARKROYAL – All You Can Eat Seafood Fiesta Buffet
Put seafood and buffet together, and I am sure many faces will light up with tummies growling. Plaza Brasserie at PARKROYAL on Beach Road is having a “Seafood Fiesta” from now till May 31, and this is not just any ordinary seafood buffet.Other than the usual crowd pleasers such as Oysters, Flower Crabs, Tiger Prawns, Australian Queen Scallops and Black Mussells – all on the ice section – the cooked seafood with an Asian twist appeals to me much more.The theme is “Best of Asia” with many dishes having flavours of Singapore, Malaysia and Thailand. Think about Hong Kong style Red Garoupa, Thai-style Sea Bass, Sotong with Sambal, Nonya Sauce Steamed Fish, Black Pepper White Clams, Stir-fried Crab with Salted Egg Yolk and Green Curry Crab!  (Read about their Crab Buffet, The Seafood Buffet, Dragon Feast and Grandma’s Favourites).Are you salivating yet?My favourite part of the buffet is the Teppanyaki live station (only during weekends) where the chef will cook a selection of prawns, stingray, sotong and salmon right in front of you. Grab the fresh oysters and sushi nearby while you are waiting, or better still, have a quick chat with the chef who is shy but friendly.The items on the buffet rotate, so it can be ‘heng-sway’ because some of the Asian selection is indeed better than others. Some of the crab dishes, were a tad dry for my liking. I love my claws juicy and saucy.Among my preference, a simple dish of Penang Fried Kway Tiao with Seafood, and Stingray baked in banana leaves aka otah otah style. The chef who prepared these particular street style food is from Penang, therefore there is a certain level of authentically and home-cooked savour in these humble dishes.The thing about having seafood in Singapore is that the prices can be quite exorbitant and arbitrary at times, like I sometimes cannot fathom how some steamed fish at a zhi char stall can cost above hundred dollar.The price of the Seafood Fiesta at Plaza Brasserie at PARKROYAL on Beach Road is $53 for weekday and $58 for weekend dinners, and you probably can get your money’s worth if you are a huge crab, oysters and fish fan.Best of Asia Seafood Fiesta at Plaza Brasserie is on till May 31
Price: Adult $53++, Child $32++ (Mon-Thu dinner); Adult $58++, Child $35++ (Fri-Sun dinner)Plaza Brasserie Buffet Giveaway
DanielFoodDiary.com will be giving away 3 pairs of vouchers (each worth about $90!) to 3 blessed readers to enjoy complimentary buffet lunch for 2 at Plaza Brasserie!All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of DanielFoodDiary.com
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET on twitter
Step 3: COMMENT below to give ONE good reason why you should win these vouchers (Do include your email add)Results will be announced 28th March (Thurs). All the best – I will be so happy for the persons who win!Plaza Brasserie
7500A Beach Road, PARKROYAL on Beach Road (Nearest MRT Bugis), Tel: +65 6505 5710
Opening Hours: 6am – 12am DailyOther Buffet Entries
5 Ways to Avoid Overeating at The Buffet Restaurant 
Aquamarine (Marina Mandarin)
Silver Shell Café (Shangri La Rasa Sentosa)
10 at Claymore (Pan Pacific Orchard)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
2013-03-19 00:00:00
Beanstro Takashimaya – New American Restaurant by The Coffee Bean & Tea Leaf
The Coffee Bean & Tea Leaf coffee chain has opened another new American concept restaurant at Takashimaya – Beanstro.I wished the name sounded more hip. But it is “Bean” and “Bistro”- get it? The first Beanstro is at Marina Bay Sands, known to many of my friends to be the place to grab a quick bite and coffee if you are running late for your musical.More ordinarily known as “Coffee Bean”, the cafes used to be one of my favourite hang-out location. When I say “used to”, it goes back to my university days where the defaults were either Starbucks or Coffee Bean when we need a place to study for eight hours. The café somehow some of its modish coolness factor when swankier coffee and tea cafes open by the dozens.Beanstro which is also halal-certified, serves quite an extensive menu of All-Day breakfast, salads, open-faced sandwiches, mains, pastas and desserts.The Beanstro Breakfast Platter ($18.00) with sausage, mushroom, tomatoes, turkey bacon and two eggs done your way (I had them poached) was the usual standard fare, except that it came served in a hot plate which helps keep the food a little warmer. While I do not mean it in a bad way, my entire table thought that the best item on the plate was the… buttered baguette. Swept the bread clean with the overflowing yolk and sauce.The same occurrence happened when we tried the Open-faced Steak Sandwich ($19.50), with shaved Australian grass-fed sirloin with mescun and gherkins topped with caramelized onion. The beef was slightly overcooked and felt like a waste of good meat. Then again, we all liked the bread underneath, evenly crisp and soft.  Coffee Bean really found the right suppliers.The friendly service staff urged us to try the pasta even though we were half-full, and it was a good recommendation. Go for the Seafood Wrapped in Cartoccio ($26.00), which essentially means the pasta was boiled, sauced, then wrapped in paper and baked.So when you open up the parchment paper, the whiff of the spicy tomato sauce and sight of fresh-red spiny lobsters and fat scallops would make the dish hard to resist. And the fettuccine taste as good as it looks. Overall, Beanstro’s mains fared better than the breakfast items.Rental aside, Takashimaya is a suitable mall for a casual American dining restaurant as I recall a lack of such cuisines there. Can never find a sandwich there when I needed one after gym classes. Now I know where to go.Beanstro Discount Coupons strong>
DanielFoodDiary.com will be giving away 15 Beanstro discount coupons (which includes $10 off their breakfast sets and main courses, 2 for 1 breakfast, and complimentary brew).All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of DanielFoodDiary.com
Step 2: COMMENT below to name an item you would want to try at Beanstro (Do include your email add)
Coupons will be given to the first 15 with valid comments and email addresses. With that said, I hope the people who join truly want to try the food there.Beanstro Takashimya
Orchard Road #B1-37 Ngee Ann City Singapore 238872 (Orchard MRT) Tel: +65 6235 1610
Opening Hours: 8am to 11pm (Mon – Sun)Other Related Entries
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Wild Honey (Scotts Square)
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
Morganfield’s (The Star Vista)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
2013-03-18 00:00:00
Alfero Artisan Gelato Lor Kilat  – I Can Believe It’s The Best Gelato In Singapore
Fellow food blogger Jason Sim from “For The Love Of Food” concurred that Alfero Artisan Gelato is his best in Singapore. In his final blogpost, he wrote, “Don’t believe, then you got to try it to believe!”For those who have yet to try out this “best gelato” in Singapore, you can make your way to their third branch at Lor Kilat. (Read: Alfero Gelato at Marina Square and Alfero Gelato at MacPherson) I know it is quite out of the way, so much so that my taxi driver does not have the slightest inkling of the location despite telling him “Uncle, at Bt Timah near Toh Tuck and Toh Yi.”Though I was initially reluctant to travel, some compelling reasons to visit this new outlet is that it is neighbours with Carpenter & Cook (for round Two of desserts), Nook Panckes, Woorinara, Kim’s Family Restaurant and fellow competitor Udders. Owner Marco Alfero joked that if Udders is too crowded, ice cream lovers can always hop down a few shop to Alfero.Marco who haild from Turin Italy is quite localised, scaling wet markets and fruit stalls to come out with new fresh flavours that Singaporeans would love.Amongst the recently launched flavours such as Gula Melaka and Chocolate Mint, the pale green Avocado ($4.50 per cup) was the clear favourite, with the few of us scooping it all up despite diet plans. Unique is an understatement, unless you are Martha Stewart’s die-hard fan.The avocado flavour subtlety lingers around your buds, tasting very real, milky and fulfilling. All without the ‘fake-ness’ that some fruit ice creams may have.I was never never never a fan of durians – it’s the smell. But if you offer me a cup of Alfero’s Durian Gelato, I think I can finish a scoop. It feels like eating a smooth velvety refrigerated version of the real thing, without the heatiness and only a fifth of the smell.Our table of weight-watchers was further assured that Alfero’s gelatos has only 2-9% fat, no artificial colouring or flavouring, less sugar than the usual, and is freshly churned at the MacPherson shop.My friend Kenny who highly recommends Alfero is so confident that he says he will ‘blanja’ (treat) all of us if we did not like the gelato. Guess what – he did not need to. You really got to try it to believe.(This blogpost is specially dedicated to food blogger Jason Sim. Artisan Alfero Gelato at Lor Kilat was his last-ever blog post and tweet, and we pray that he will have a never-ending supply of delicious gelato in a better place up there.)Alfero Artisan Gelato
21 Lorong Kilat Singapore 598123 (near Carpenter & Cook) Tel:+65 64633835
Opening Hours: 12:00pm – 10:00pm DailyOther Ice Cream Entries
Alfero Artisan Gelato (Marina Square)
Alfero Artisan Gelato (MacPherson)
Ci Gusta! (Anchorpoint)
Udders (Thomson Road)
The Daily Scoop (Chip Bee Gardens)
2013-03-15 00:00:00
Gordon Grill Goodwood Park – Charming Continental Restaurant Turns 50!
Can’t believe that I had never dined at Gordon Grill, which has been established since 1963. That makes the restaurant half a century old!Located at the Goodwood Park Hotel, Gordon Grill is unexpectedly under the radar, at least for the younger generation, when it is so full of timeless charm and quality European style cuisine.This is the kind of restaurant I would bring my mum for a weekend lunch. She is the type who likes an occasional indulge in Western classics and experience old-school service style – gracious and butler-like. In fact, the service staff is still wearing those over-sized beige jackets.I took some time to observe the dining customers – mainly families (with some extended families), speak good English, looks like they just came from church, with one looking like they came from the set of “Masters of the Sea”. Their children are tucked in polos and pants. There is a very 90s charm about Gordon Grill, and I mean it in a good way.Gordon Grill is introducing a special 50th Anniversary Weekend Roast Lunch Menu (till 21 July) to commemorate this special golden jubilee.The prices are moderate considering this is Goodwood Park, at $50++ for three courses and S$60++ for four. The menu includes some of their signatures since its beginning of time, such as Jumbo Shrimp Cocktail, Tartar of Black Angus beef with melba toast, Scotch broth, Gordon Grill signature Sherry Trifle and Mini Baked Alaska of vanilla and strawberry ice cream presented in a contemporary style.Regulars who come back will be glad to know the menu is rotated on a weekly basis.One of the key features of Gordon Grill is the meat wagon introduced in the 60s which was reminiscent of olden European grill rooms, which has slowly evolved to become a meat trolley.In graceful and dignified fashion, the chef will slice the meat and plate it in front of your very eyes. This is part of the English type of service that I used to experience when I was way younger, but do not see many much more now. Can be considered a dying ‘tradition’ in Singapore restaurants.Needless to say, my main of Roast Leg of Crackling Pork on wagon, served with silky mash, spinach, baked beans and apple sauce is as delightful as it sounds, not elaborate, but full of classical goodness.Truthfully, Gordon Grill may not amaze immediately due to a small seating capacity, low walls and old-school appeal.  However, as this charming continental restaurant turns over 50, you will feel it is like a bottle of good wine, which only gets better with time.Gordon Grill
Goodwood Park Hotel, 22 Scotts Road, Singapore (Orchard MRT), Tel: +65 6730 1744
Opening Hours: 12:00-2:30pm, 7:00-10:30pmOther Related Entries
The Royal Mail (Ascott Singapore)
10 at Claymore (Pan Pacific Orchard)
Wooloomooloo Steakhouse (Raffles City)
Hogs Breath Café (Chijmes)
TongKang Colonial Bar & Restaurant (Clarke Quay)
2013-03-14 00:00:00
Dim Sum Bar Hong Kong – Not Your Typical Dim Sum Place
[Hong Kong] Throw a stone in Hong Kong and you are likely to hit a Dim Sum place. Most would be of reasonable quality, unless you are really in bad luck. If you are in search for somewhere you can drink as well, Dim Sum Bar at Tsim Sha Tsui’s Harbour City is probably one of the few that combines both a dim sum restaurant and a bar with beer, spirits and wine.Plus, they have a buffet concept for dinner (HKD$188 per adult) where you can guzzle over 30 dim sum within 2 hours. Already sounds good.Dim Sum Bar is located at Gateway Arcade of Harbour City, not too difficult a find but do note that the entrance is outdoors. Quite a suitable place to rest your legs after all that shopping. (Which by the way, I do see tourists shopping by trolley bags and luggage here – that’s how much they can buy.)Most of the time, I would go for the typical selections like Steamed Pork Siu-Mai, Steamed Beef Balls, BBQ Pork Buns and Xiao Long Bao. It is a tad boring, and I figured you should try some of their not-so-typical selections at Dum Sum Bar. The truth is some of the more ordinary items are just going to invite numerous comparisons. So try their more inventive selections which are perhaps unavailable elsewhere.I mean, their ‘fake’ watermelon jelly that looks a real watermelon already sets the tone for fun in the food.The names of the dim sum are already drool-worthy.  Steamed King’s Siu-Mai with Truffle (HKD$22 each), King’s Dumplings in Lobster Bisque (HKD$58 for 2 pieces), Steam Pork Siu-Mai with Quail’s Egg (HKD$28 for 3 pieces), and Steamed Xian Long Bao with Mitten Crab Meat (HKD$28 each).Of all I had, the Baked Whole Abalone and Diced Chicken Pastry (HKD$38 each, SGD$6.10) was the one set deep in my memories.  I can still remember how cottony the bottom base pastry is and how I can just devour the entire abalone in entire one mouthful – with no regrets.While violet coloured buns always feel too pretty-odd to me, their Baked Minced Taro Cream Buns (HKD$20 for 2 pieces, SGD$3.20) was a surprise find. For Hong Kong dims sum standards, the skin could be softer and thinner, but the slightly warm and sweet creamy yam filling more than makes up for it. If  were not staying in Hong Kong for a few more days, this would have left with me with a box in my luggage.I must say Thank You to Kit from Café Deco Group and Season from Harbour City for hosting the session as this entry marks my first official food tasting in one of my favourite cities. Hopefully, more to come Hong Kong!Dim Sum Bar 點一龍
Shop G103, Ground Floor, Gateway Arcade, Harbour City, Tsim Sha Tsui, Tel: +852 2175 3100, Email: dimsumbarhc@cafedecogroup.com
Opening Hours: 9am – 11pm (Daily)Other Hong Kong Entries
5 Restaurants at HarbourCity for Doreamon
Tim Ho Wan (Hong Kong)
Mak’s Noodles (Hong Kong)
Ho Hung Kee (Hong Kong)
Tsim Chai Kee (Hong Kong)
2013-03-13 00:00:00
5 Best Matcha Cafes in Singapore – Where Green Is The New Black
Matcha (or maccha), the fine powder green tea has found its way to Singapore as the next possible food fad. Look at the number of Matcha related restaurants and cafes opening up – Tsujiri, Nana’s Green Tea, Maccha House. We love them in almost all kinds of food, from ice cream, cakes, soft serves, mochi balls, pancakes, soba noodles to frappuccinos.From the Japanese ancient times, matcha has been known to have soothing effect with health benefits (according to Wikipedia) aplenty. It is anti-aging, anti-cancerous, reduces cholesterol levels, rich in Vitamin A, C, E and Beta carotene, rich in Catechin which helps to burn calories, and said to contain more antioxidants than blueberries, wolfberries, pomegranates, orange juice and spinach. While its taste may initially get some getting used to, there is no turning back when you fall in love with its beautiful flavour.Here are some of the new and best Japanese dessert places where you can find them. For fairness, I had their matcha latte (if it’s available) and signature desserts in each. Not sure about the calories, but I certainly have new found adoration for green tea.Tsujiri Tea House (100AM Tanjong Pagar)
Tsujiri is the clear winner of this “battle of the matcha”. This 150-year old Japanese Tea House, comes from Uji, Kyoto. When you talk about green tea, you think about Kyoto. Tsujiri Tea House has finally opened its first outlet at 100AM Tanjong Pagar offering a selection of green-tea based desserts and beverages. Its O-maccha Milk Ice Blended ($5.50) is the most ‘matcha’ of many drinks I had – you can really taste the ‘green-teaness’ and fine distinct quality of the powder in its subtlely. Its Tsujiri Parfair ($7.50) may be a tad pricey for its size and quick to melt (plus what’s with the cherry), it is definitely one delightful dessert you do not mind having again and again if you are a matcha fan.100 Tras Street, #01-14 Singapore 079027 (Tanjong Pagar MRT), Tel: +65 6543 6110, Opening  Hours: 10am – 10pmDolce Tokyo (313 Somerset)
Dolce Tokyo does not sell its matcha items aggressively. While its Matcha Latte ($7.50) is also pricey and more milky than matcha, I really like its balanced sweetness and texture which is very smoothing for the throat. The champion here is really the homemade Matcha Cake with Goma ($11.50) which comes served in a Japanese-style bird cage. I hear they make them in small quantities daily. We may have seen many green tea azuki cakes versions around, but green tea black sesame is my first. The sponge layers are fluffy and goma cream luxuriously enjoyable. The best part? The crunchy green tea crumble on its top layer.313 Somerset, 313 Orchard Road #03-23 Singapore 238895 (Somerset MRT). Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:30pm (Sun-Thurs), 11:30am – 11:00pm (Fri-Sat, Eve PH)Nana’s Green Tea Café (Plaza Singapura)
Nana’s Green Tea was once voted as the No. 1 Japanese cafe for matcha lovers, and had been known as Japanese’s version to Starbucks. After all, the founder first opened Nana’s Green Tea in Jiyugaoka because he was afraid the Japanese would be too attracted to drinking Starbucks coffee, forgetting their roots. While the mains at Nana’s Green Tea are slightly lackluster, its desserts such as its Matcha Anmitsu ($8.80) and parfaits are definitely its strength. It may not blow you away but makes a decent afternoon tea-time treat, with its azuki red bean paste smooth and satisfying. (Read: Nana’s Green Tea Café)The Atrium @ Orchard, Plaza Singapura 68 Orchard Road #03-80/82 Singapore 238839 (Dhoby Ghaut MRT) Tel: +65 6684 4312, Opening Hours: 11am – 10pmHoshino Coffee (Plaza Singapura)
Hoshino Coffee is already quite popular in Japan, specialising in hand-dripped coffee and fluffy soufflé pancakes. Its signature Pancake Souffle Style with Matcha and Ogura Bean Paste ($13.50) will take long to serve as they are freshly made on the spot, and accordingly their oven can only produce 6 at a single time. I thought it was the usual ‘Japanese desserts in Singapore’ standard – soft and not too sweet, but may not be worth the wait for some. I do know there are some die-hard fans of its best-selling Matcha Souffle ($9.80) and are willing to queue just to have it. (Read: Hoshino Coffee)68 Orchard Road #03-84 Plaza Singapura (Dhoby Gaut MRT), Tel:+65 6338 3277, Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pm DailySaint Marc Café (Vivocity)
Everybody comes to Saint Marc Café for its Choco Cro, which in short means chocolate croissant more than its matcha items. Saint Marc Café’s dessert offerings were a mixture of hits and misses. Saint Marc’s Matcha Latte ($5.00) is the least pricey of the lot but also the most diluted. The Gion ($8.20) soft serve melted before I could even bring it to the table for its photographic opportunities . If you look beyond that, the whole mixture of ingredients is quite a pleasure, especially relishing the matcha jellies with ice cream, which has a texture firm yet smooth. (Read: Saint Marc Café)1 Harbourfront Ave, Vivo City 1F #108-110, Singapore 098585 (Harbourfront MRT), Opening hours: 10 am – 10pmMaccha House (Orchard Central)
I thought I should give the newly opened Maccha House a quick mention too. Located at the basement of Orchard Central, this has a canteen-style ordering system and occupies quite a huge space. The Maccha Latte ($4.49) is an okay thirst-quencher, while Maccha Azuki Bean Dorayaki ($7.49) quite hapzardly-prepared.  Generally, I think the matcha items are still passable.  But have more problems with the service – shouting orders across in Mandarin within a huge Japanese restaurant just doesn’t seem right. I am willing to give this a second chance though.#B1-40, Orchard Central, 181 Orchard Road, Singapore 238896 (Somerset MRT), Opening Hours: 11:00am – 10:00pmOther 5 Best Entries
5 Best New Food Places At Tiong Bahru 
5 New & Best Ramen Places in Singapore
5 Stalls To Try at Maxwell Food Centre
5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru
5 Oozing Food That Singaporeans Love
2013-03-12 00:00:00
RS Deli – Sedap Chicken Satay and Beef Rendang Burgers + Voucher Giveaways
People go to RS Deli mainly for two things – For their sweet garlic emping crackers, and Nasi Lemak Burger. Even as a bottle of the Indonesia crackers go at $18, they are usually quickly snapped up during festivals. Only because they are from the famous Rasa Sayang brand.Just as you may be even wondering what “RS” means or sell, RS Deli is a new spin-off from Rasa Sayang – a rather popular brand for their Indonesia snacks and kueh lapis.The deli is a casual Indonesian restaurant along Upper Thomson Road, which gives traditional dishes a modern take.  They are most famous for their Nasi Lemak Burger ($8.90), where the buns are made of glutinous coconut rice buns, with fillings of otah otah, omelette and sambal. Other dishes include a Wok Fried Kampong Spaghetti ($6.90), Spaghetti Rebus ($6.90), and Ikan Bakar Yellow Rice ($8.00).RS Deli’s self-created Chicken Satay Burger ($9.00) served with fries and coleslaw, is quite ‘sedap’ because the drizzled peanut sauce is smooth and fragrant. The satay sauce, slightly sweeter than the usual local versions, is rather addictive on its own.While trying not to make a mess is quite a challenge, the entire combination actually works also due to its easy-to-bite-off char-grilled chicken thigh and fluffy bun.The sauce on the Beef Rendang Burger ($10.00) feels like it’s made from some age-old grandmother’s recipe –rich, spicy and tasty. Perhaps it is. While I thought the patty could be juicier, I think the RS Deli people managed to blend both modern and traditional tastes quite well together.Another one of my favourite dish is the Belado Fish & Chips ($8.00), a deep-fried breaded pacific dory served with homemade sweet chili sauce. I have to admit the belado sauce itself stole the entire thunder from the fish, which would have otherwise been ordinary.  And when I found out there was a chicken wings version, I knew I have to have it the next time.Opened by head chef Derwin Jamin and business partner Jimmy Foo, the duo certainly got many cooking tips from Mdm “Rasa Sayang” Lai Siu Ing herself, which also helps out at the kitchen occasionally. Something I wish to see? More of Rasa Sayang influences, like perhaps a very indulgent Kueh Lapis with Gelato or Mee Siam Pasta.The strange thing is, if some fastfood restaurant in Singapore were to introduce a Satay or Rendang burger, people would just flock for it.So while the new restaurant may not be entirely polished, or the mass market may not see Indonesia-style burgers as entirely hip to check out, RS Deli presents some gems and surprises that you are unlikely to find elsewhere.RS Deli Giveaway!
RS Deli will be giving away a total of 3 sets of vouchers (each worth $20) to 3 Blessed DanielFoodDiary.com readers.All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of DanielFoodDiary.com
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET on twitter
Step 3: COMMENT below to name the items you would want to try from RS Deli (Do include your email add)
Results will be announced 18th March (Mon).RS Deli
244R Upper Thomson Road, Thomas Garden Estate, Singapore 574369, Tel: +65 6455 1242
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10pm (Closed Mons)Other Indonesian Restaurant Entries
Bayang (Clarke Quay)
Wong Solo (Far East Plaza)
Ayam Penyet Ria (Lucky Plaza)
Waroeng Penyet (Marine Parade)
The Moluccas Rooms (Marina Bay Sands)
2013-03-11 00:00:00
Calls to Boycott Jollibee Singapore Ridiculous & Uncalled For
There has been a Facebook Page to “Boycott Jollibee Singapore” and posts on TR Emeritus to “Boycott-Pinoy-first business”, gathering lots of comments, many of which are insulting to the Filipinos and other foreign labour in Singapore.I know this may anger some people, but I find the page, posts and negative comments ridiculous and uncalled for. Reading the comments, we can sense that there are also many who join in ‘the boycott’ without fully understanding the reasons behind it.Some background: Jollibee is the largest fast food chain in the Philippines, and is set to open its first store in Singapore on March 12 in Lucky Plaza. It is a multinational fast food chain, and has already shops in the USA, Vietnam, Hong Kong, Saudi Arabia, Qatar, Kuwait and Brunei. They are largely known for their signature fried chicken Chickenjoy, Yumburger and Jollibee Spaghetti.So why the boycott?On the February 12,  it was posted on TR Emeritus that “Unlike other multi-national fastfood restaurants like McDonald’s and KFC which hire mainly Singaporeans and even the disabled and elderly, Jollibee Singapore intends to hire their fellow pinoys to fill up jobs in their latest Singapore venture.”Where did all those accusation come from? To be fair, Jollibee Singapore never said that.Quoting their Facebook page, it says “Dear Jollibee fan, if you are looking for careers at Jollibee Singapore, please send your detailed CV via email…”This is a clear case that Jollibee’s statement was completely taken out of context, misquoted and misconstrued for some anti-foreign sentiments (again).In another posting by TR Meritus on 22 February, it acknowledged (but did not apologize) that Jollibee Singapore “did not specifically say they would hire Filipinos only in its Facebook posting”.However, they went on to comment that since the hiring note was addressed to “Jollibee fans” and “undoubtedly, it would mean largely Filipinos since most Singaporeans have not tasted Jollibee’s food and are not familiar with Jollibee.”I question the word “undoubtedly”.And there is the assumption that many Singaporeans are unfamiliar with Jollibee. Well, perhaps. But let us keep in mind that Jollibee is a multinational chain with 39 stores in Vietnam, 13 in Brunei, 12 in the Middle East, 27 in USA and 1 in Hong Kong. The brand “Jollibee” even appeared in Glee before. (I would assume TR authors don’t watch Glee, but many do.)To add on, in a previous Press Release I received from Jollibee, they included that “Singaporean nationals and permanent residents” can send in their applications. While why they would include recruitment details in a Media Press Release is a big question mark, let us discuss this local vs foreign labour issue with greater sensitivity, understanding, and reasoning. Taking statements out of context is not.Let us also not forget that the Ministry of Manpower has introduced lower Dependency Ration Ceilings on the hiring of foreign workers. It is really not up to the restaurant to hire whoever they want.After reading all the comments, I have more concerns that so many people are jumping on that bandwagon to add on insults and name-calling, without actually finding out the reasons. If this were to snowball, what may it lead to? How would creation of this conflict and distance help us Singaporeans in way?I know many people are unhappy about foreign labour influx and their societal problems they bring upon the country. Everybody living here feels the frustration, me included. But taking it out on a fast-food chain and reinforcing false negative stereotypes is not going to help the situation at all.On a side note, Yes, I was afraid of my job being replaced by a foreigner as well. My little advice is: Just do your job well, and do it really well.Other Related Entries
Jollibee Singapore (Lucky Plaza)
2013-03-11 00:00:00
JAAN – The One Restaurant To Watch, and One of Singapore’s Best
Jaan under Chef de Cuisine Julien Royer recently won the ‘The One To Watch’ title and is ranked No. 22 in the inaugural Asia’s 50 Best Restaurants, signifying that this is indeed the restaurant to look out for in the coming years. (Read Asia’s 50 Best Restaurants – The Full List & Recommendations)Located on the 70th floor of Swissotel The Stamford at the Equinox Complex, I thought I had the most breath-taking view of the Singapore skyline facing the Marina Bay district, and you would somehow spend some time gazing across with a fall-in-love feeling. We have a beautiful country.After having the food, I concluded that Jaan is one of Singapore’s best.The word ‘Jaan’ is derived from the ancient Sanskrit word for ‘bowl’, and has at one point in time lost direction when its previous acclaimed chef de cuisines Ebbe Vollmer and Andre Chiang left. French-born Julien Royer came along with big shoes to fill, and he did not let young age (he is in his very early 30s) defeat him. Perhaps it is the youth that makes this French chef experimental and bold in his seasonal handcrafted creations.I had the 5 Course set dinner priced at $198++ per person with wine pairings at $318++ per person; the dinner menu degustation for a 7 course set dinner priced at $238++ per person, and 10 Course set surprise dinner at $288++ per person. Slightly pricey but it was for a special celebration. Better still if you have a “Feed at Raffles” card.In the beginning, the starter Heirloom Beetroot Composition with Eden-like plating was attractive, though the combination of beetroot, beetroot meringue, and beetroot sorbet felt like an purplish-beetroot over-kill. However, I was quickly won over by the intricacies in taste, with portions minute in size but sending delectable explosions to the palate.One of the main – a Confit Artic Char of a little-known cold water fish, looks humble and delicate, but once again brings out flavours and textures which are layered and taste-provoking.Born into a family of farmers, Chef Julian was taught to appreciate and value the beauty of seasonal produce, and it was apparent in this dishes that there are significant Asian ingredients and influence included.The 48 Hours Confit Tajima Beef Short Ribs comes topped with an unanticipated choy sum vegetable. It is an understatement to say that the meat will melt-in-your-mouth, but it is the combination of ingredients that brings a little fun, innovation and savour such that every bite brings a different subtle sensation.While the Latte Poivre (pepper) dessert was slightly run-on-the-mill for me, it was the Petite Four that blew me away. Other than the usual truffle chocolates, it came complete with chocolate-coated rosemary ice cream lollipop on dry ice and liquid nitrogen ice cream. They actually bothered to impress all the way to the last course.Needless to say, service was attentive, top-notch, and somewhat witty – one of the country’s best. The waiter knew how to slow down in pouring to make way for my blog photo-taking, showing slight amusement I would take 20 odd shots at some dishes. I just had to, Chef Julien’s creations were too pretty.With a 70th storey view to watch and an award ‘The One to watch’, Jaan looks like it is set to climb even higher heights.JAAN
2 Stamford Road, Level 70, Equinox complex, Swissotel the Stamford, Singapore 178882 (City Hall MRT), Tel: +65 9199 9008 reservations@equinoxcomplex.com
Opening Hours: 12pm – 2pm (Lunch Mon-Sat), 7pm – 10pm (Dinner Daily except PH)Other Asia’s 50 Best Entries
Asia’s 50 Best Restaurants – The Full List & Recommendations 
Les Créations de Narisawa (Tokyo, Japan)
Nijonryori Ryugin (Roppongi, Tokyo)
Nahm (Bangkok, Thailand)
Amber (Hong Kong)
Waku Ghin (Marina Bay Sands)
2013-03-08 00:00:00
Ipoh Lou Yau Bean Sprouts Chicken – Ipoh Horfun Boleh!
Word has it that Malaysia’s Ipoh makes the best hor fun, kway tiao and ‘tau gay’ (bean sprouts) due to its karst limestone mountain mineral water – the horfun will end up smoother, and sprouts grown from the spring water will be juicy and plump.You may be surprised to know that the horfun and beansprouts from Ipoh Lou Yau Bean Sprouts Chicken come all the way from the hometown of Ipoh, no effort spared just to make sure customers are having the most authentic stuff.Even the chicken used come from across the causeway – pale yellow in colour, smaller in size free-range boiled kampong chickens, and freshly transported over.I wished the shop has a sassier and hip name than a lengthy literal Ipoh Lou Yau Bean Sprouts Chicken, but its six branches already shows its popularity (IMM, Centrepoint, Chervon House, VivoCity, Chinatown Point and White Sands).The one person set with hor fun, steamed chicken and bean sprouts is at an affordable $6.90 nett, and makes a suitable choice for a quick lunch time fix.While we were trying to pick up the hor fun with chop sticks for photography purposes, the thin long strands quickly slipped off and glided down back into the soup, a true testimony that their horfun is indeed silky and smooth. The soup felt a little plain though, lacking the ‘oomph’ and my guess is more people would prefer the dry version.I was not a big fan of the yellower chicken, probably because I am more used to the Singapore style of moist whiter Hainanese version. Therefore, I much preferred the Yong Tau Foo dry hor fun ($5.00), which has more variety and bite anyway with the addition of minced pork.The best thing really, is the bean sprouts ($3.00 for small, $5.00 for large) in which I cleared an entire plate. Indeed, they were crunchy and fat, with little burst of refreshing moisture as you bite into them. The tau gay from the north really taste much better – Malaysia Boleh!Ipoh Lou Yau Bean Sprouts Chicken 怡保老友芽菜鷄
Chinatown Point #B1-52, 133 New Bridge Road, Singapore 059413 (Chinatown MRT)
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 10:00pm (last order: 9:30pm)
Other branches: IMM, Centrepoint, Vivocity, White Sands, Chervon House, Junction 8 (opening soon)Other Local Food Entries
Singapore Food Trail (Flyer)
Malaysian Food Street (Resorts World Sentosa)
Kok Sen Restaurant (Keong Siak Street)
Prima Taste Kitchen (Centrepoint)
Kopi Tiam (Swissotel The Stamford)
2013-03-07 00:00:00
Nahm Bangkok – Thailand’s Best Restaurant Was Good, Not Enough To Wow
[Bangkok, Thailand] Nahm has a midas touch, debuting at World’s 50 Best Restaurant at the 50th position, also named Number 3 in Asia’s 50 Best Restaurants, effectively making it Thailand’s top restaurant. While how it managed to beat several restaurants ranked above is still a question mark, getting the awards makes it Bangkok’s most watched restaurant. As if it is already not. (Read Asia’s 50 Best Restaurants – The Full List & Recommendations)Nahm is helmed by renowned chef David Thompson, an Australian who immersed himself into the Thai culture (who also found a Thai partner is also his dessert chef), scoring the very first Michelin star for a Thai restaurant for his London branch at The Halkin. That has unfortunately closed as he wants to focus more on his Bangkok business.Most would question – can a ‘foreigner’ cook Thai dishes well? Apparently so for the last 20 years. The reverse is true, we all know of Asians who can cook impressive French or Italian cuisines.Located at one of my favourite Bangkok hotels at Metropolitan South Sathorn (I actually stayed there three times, so tell the cab drivers “Met-toh Sa-thorn!” because you have to turn in a small lane before reaching the hotel), Nahm is really a lot more casual that several other fine dining restaurants – quite suitable for group dinners.The dinner set menu at 1,700 baht (SGD$71, USD$57) per person, is quite unlike usual chef’s degustation menus elsewhere. You can choose from a series of canapés, main courses available in the a la carte menu, followed by dessert. Portion sizes are determined by the number of people in the group. Lunch is at 1,100 baht. While the amount is probably considered high for Thailand’s standard, you probably cannot find other restaurants in the Top 50 list at that price point.There is no signs of the typical Thai style street food, though Chef David Thompson dishes while innovative are said to be authentic, comprising of flavourful curries, fresh stir-fries, steamed dishes and grilled specialities.  For canapés, we had Spicy Pork with Mint, Peanuts and Crunchy Rice on Betel Leaves, and Southern Grilled Mussels. Ask the service staff for recommendations.One of my personal highlight was the Coconut and Turmeric Curry of Blue Swimmer Crab with Calamansi Limes which managed to carry the many dimensions of taste that Thai cuisine is famous for, yet being able to appeal to a more conventional taste bud without being overly heavy handed.Another recommended would be the Grilled Pork Cheek, which is good on its own, but has a distinct zest with a complimentary Smoky Tomato Sauce.I thought that the Deep Fried Cured Carp with Minced Prawn and Pork simmered in Coconut Cream with Young Chillies, Red Shallots and Coriander Fresh Vegetables felt underwhelming subtle and unimpressionable. As if several of the other dishes, they were not bad, but did not stand out enough in terms of quality or aesthetics. Or perhaps I was not given the best recommendations.Unfortunately, both desserts – the Pistachio Pudding and Golden Tear Drops with Perfumed Mung Beans, and Sweet Thai Wafer with Poached Persimmons and Golden Duck Egg Noodles – were prettier to look at than good to eat, largely because it felt that there were better Thai-style desserts elsewhere.When Nahm first opened, critics were divided on how an Australia can present authentic Thai fare in an upmarket restaurant setting. Chef David Thompson had convinced his naysayers by collecting recipes wholeheartedly from the streets of Thailand, even creating dishes that are said to be truly traditional in taste. I did feel there was a ‘Wow’ element missing. After all, I am measuring Nahm using the World’s Best 50 yardstick.Nahm Bangkok
Metropolitan Hotel Bangkok, 27 South Sathorn Rd, Tungmahamek, Sathorn
Bangkok, Thailand
Tel: +662 625 3388, Email res.bkk@nahm.como.bz
Opening Hours: 12pm – 2pm (Lunch Mon-Fri); 7pm – 10:30pm (Dinner Daily)Other Asia’s 50 Best Entries
Asia’s 50 Best Restaurants – The Full List & Recommendations 
Les Créations de Narisawa (Tokyo, Japan)
Nijonryori Ryugin (Roppongi, Tokyo)
Amber (Hong Kong)
Waku Ghin (Marina Bay Sands)
2013-03-06 00:00:00
Windowsill In The Woods – Awesome Pies in a Homely Fairytale-like Cafe
Windowsill Pies is such a pretty place, and feels like a storybook scene! Before I even go on talking about the pies which everybody is raving about, this café has such much character in its décor, without going too OTT and pretentious.Here’s what caught my attention: a guitar in the corner, a yellow retro fridge, little toy dears and a wooden cashier board handmade by the owner. It took him 40 working days accordingly to make that board. Every spot here can be a photo opportunity, almost imaginging this to be a scene from a fairytale story like Goldilocks and the Three Bears.Windowsill in the Woods located at Horne Road (near Chye Seng Huat Cafe) is where brothers Jonathan and Sean Gwee, and Chief Baker Michael Liu can finally call home – after being nomads from Pandan Valley, Takashimaya to various food stalls. You can still find Windowsill pies at Manicurious, Penny University and Artistry, but nothing beats coming to their flagship store.A little personal history with “Baker Boy” (I call him so) Michael Liu. He once baked a cake for my birthday, I loved it so much, so so much that I went through all means to get his contact, and told him straight “I would look for you to bake my cakes when I open a shop!” Of course the Gwee brothers beat me to it (where’s my capital?), but I am still happy for them. I couldn’t have done it better.At Windowsill, the Strawberry Lemon, Banana Almond Brittle Cognac, and the S’mores are the most popular. And I tried all three.The S’mores pie ($8.00 per slice), filled with gooey milk chocolate pudding and sticky dark chocolate fudge, is clearly my favourite for being smoothly-chocolaty yet not being overpowering rich. There are two fluffy toasted marshmallows and home-made graham crackers placed on top. If you notice, there are some marshmallows within the pie as well, placed such that you will get a little bite of them (either the top or within) every spoonful you take. Such attention to details!The Banana Almond Brittle Pie ($7.00 per (slice) comes a close second, all complete with sweet bananas, salty caramel and crunchy nuts for a mixture of flavors. I liked how the pies taste so three-dimensional, that every bite you take gives you a play of taste and (especially) texture, part creamy fluffy, part almond-nougat-like crunchy.My little feedback for them was that I found some of the pies slightly too sweet for my palates, more apparently so in the top glazed layer and fruits, such as the sautéed apples in the Funny Apple Pie ($7.50). I couldn’t help gulping down water.Some may also find the Morello Cherry Pie slightly sour, but Sean said that they didn’t believe in making that pie any less sour so that more people can enjoy it. Instead, they would rather let those who enjoy the Cherry Pie enjoy it to the fullest in the purest form.“None of our pies can please everyone, but we do make sure that within our range of 8-9 pies, we have something for everyone.”There are many decent cake and bread shops in Singapore, but I dare say few bake a decent pie, especially one that is not too crumbly, stays firm without being hard, fruity yet not artificial tasting, in which every taste is a surprise. Windowsill Pies got all the right ticks. And my regret now is I did not recruit Baker Boy soon enough.Windowsill Pies
78 Horne Road Singapore 209078 (Opposite Jalan Besar Stadium, 15 min walk from Lavender MRT) Tel: +65 9004 7827
Opening Hours: 11:00am-9:30pm (Tue-Thurs), 11:00am-10:30pm (Fri), 10:00am-10:30pm (Sat-Sun)Other Cakes & Cafe Entries
Drips Bakery Café (Tiong Poh Road)
Pies & Coffee (Rochester Mall)
The Orange Thimble (Tiong Bahru)
Dann’s Daily Pescetarian Café (Eastwood)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
2013-03-05 00:00:00
Bing Bian – An Affair With Taiwanese Shaved Ice
Selling cold desserts should always work in hot hot Singapore, and what’s more with the sudden popularity of Taiwanese shaved ice and glass jelly desserts. Bing Bian 冰变 with the tagline “an affair with ice” is another Taiwanese-style shaved ice dessert place that has gained some notice recently. (Read: Blackball at Star Vista)I am a huge fan of Taiwanese desserts, and that includes all kinds of ‘chua bing’ (shaved iced “Hong dou! Da hong dou! Yu tou. Chua chua chua…”), taro balls and beancurd. So I am VERY particular when it comes to yu yuan (taro ball) desserts. Just feel like flying over just thinking about it. (Read: Dong Qu Fen Yuan at Taipei and Anping Bean Jelly at Tainan)The owners Boon Tuck and Gary said that they loved the yu yuan in Jiufen so much that they wanted to recreate it. I am amazed with the amount of effort and time they put into R&D, because they did not simply just buy off any recipe with money, but learnt to make it through months of experimenting.The Yu Yuan series ($4.90 per owl) comes with shavings of different flavours such as soya, peanut, sesame, taro, green tea and red bean.The interesting thing is most shops would shave the ice on the spot, while theirs is already shaved, flavoured and placed into containers. Yes, you order them as you would an ice cream, in which the ice would be scooped and placed into a bowl.  Fascinatingly, the shaved ice still remains smooth and not-clumpy.Perhaps it was because I am too used to the traditional Taiwanese style of desserts, Bing Bian’s version caught me by surprise. While their yu yuan actually tastes quite close to the ones I had in Taiwan, the entire combination felt let down by some of the ingredients and flavours. I really feel to do this well, every single ingredient has to be spot on.Which is why I feel they should focus on their Fruit Series ($4.90) which is so much better, and more unique to them. The Calamansi Ice is very refreshing, slightly tangy and provides a ‘kick’ you would need for a lethargic afternoon, coming topped with fresh calamansi, fried cranberries, jelly and almond flakes.My foodie friend Melody loved the Mango Ice Set, especially the ‘mango pops’ that creates a, well, popping sensation as you ‘play’ with them in your mouth.Many people sweat too easily, and main relieve is to hide at some air-conditioned mall and grab an ice-cold drink or dessert. I think Bing Bian has what it takes, after some refinement and perhaps focusing on more real-fruity desserts. Who knows, if shaved ice is going to be the next Singapore food craze?[Giveaway Ended] Bing Bian Vouchers Giveaway!
Bing Bian will be giving away a total of 20 sets of vouchers (each worth $13) to 20 Blessed DanielFoodDiary.com readers to enjoy these shaved ice desserts. (10 will be given via this blog, the other via FB.)All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of DanielFoodDiary.com
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET on twitter
Step 3: COMMENT below to name your favourite shaved ice dessert (Do include your email add)
Results will be announced 11th March (Mon).Bing Bian 冰变 An Affair With Ice
Millenia Walk 9 Raffles Boulevard #01-105 (Promenade MRT) Singapore 039596, Tel: +65 6337 1391
Opening Hours: 11am-9pm (Mon-Sat), 11am-8pm (Sun)
Also at: Peace Centre #01-39/43 Singapore 228149  (Dhoby Gaut MRT) Tel: +65 6338 9475Other Taiwanese Entries
Blackball (Star Vista) 
Hot Star Fried Chicken (City Square Mall)
I Love Taimei (Bugis Village)
Xi Men Ding (Vivocity)
Sophisca (Taiwan)
2013-03-04 00:00:00
Aquamarine Marina Mandarin – Huge Buffet Spread with Flavours of Siam
There is just SO MUCH FOOD at Aquamarine. After recceing one round to survey the foods, I must say this buffet restaurant at Marina Mandarin has quite a huge spread, usually known for the Singapore Chilli Crab, Grilled Beef Striploin infused with Garlic & Five Spices, Assam Fish Head Curry, and colourful variety of desserts of every kind. (Read: 5 Ways to Avoid Overeating at The Buffet Restaurant)There are not many Halal hotel buffets in Singapore (the other more familiar ones being Carousel and Straits Kitchen), and Aquamarine has recently received its Halal certification. Good consideration if you need to organise a company or group dinner where there are Muslim friends and colleagues.For the month of March there is a “Flavours of Siam” special, where guest Chef Aek Charttrakul and his team from Bangkok’s Suan Dusit International Culinary School are invited over. For a young chef at 35, he does prepare quite a notable spread of familiar Thai favourites such as Spicy Glass Noodles Salad, Rice Cracker with Chilli Prawn Curry, Stir-fried Snapper with Chili Sauce, Tom Yum Goong, and Pad Thai.So I suppose my ‘job’ here is to tell you which dishes to pick, and those you can choose to save your calories.My sense is Chef Charttrakul’s team is better in its curry dishes, so do pick the Green Curry with Braised Beef, Massaman Beef with Mild Red Curry Sauce, Red Curry with Roast Duck, and Yellow Curry Crab (it was soft-shell crab) if you come across them.While they must not look too appealing visually in buffet conditions (messy plating and gravies all over the place), the curries were fragrant and lemak coconut-y rich. In fact, I observed that the gravies were swooped first before the meats in their containers.The favourites among everybody in the media table include the Pandan Chicken, initially so troublesome and oily to remove from the leaves. But when you get across the obstacle, the chicken is so tasty-sweet, chunky tender, and reminds me exactly what those from the streets of Bangkok. The Thai fish cakes are also not bad, but only if you add the sweet chili sauce.The other is the Tom Kha Gai – chicken in galangal and coconut-infused soup – delicately prepared with a myriad of sweet-sour-salty-spicy flavours all in one. I generally prefer this soup more than the Tom Yum Goong as it has a less robust taste, but more comforting to the tummy.As with most other buffets, there are some hits and misses. Some of my usual ‘Thai classics’ such as the Beef Kway Tiao soup and Pad Thai were ordinary and bland. You wished you didn’t have those carbs so that you have more space for the desserts.Most of the Thai dishes are not that spicy and strong, possibly modified to suit local tastes. So while it loses some of its authenticity, this buffet is more able to appeal to the masses. Otherwise, you can always attack what Aquamarine has always been known for – Seafood. Crabs, oysters, prawns, sashimi – do I need to say more?Pricing:
Buffet Lunch: $58++ (adult), $29++ (child)
Weekday Buffet Dinner: $68++ (adult), $34++ (child)
Weekend Buffet Dinner: $78++(adult), $39++ (child)Aquamarine
Level 4 Marina Mandarin Singapore, 6 Raffles Boulevard, Marina Square (City Hall, Esplanade MRT), Singapore 039594, Tel:+65 6845 1111
Email: diningexpress.marina@meritushotels.com
Opening Hours: Buffet Lunch: 12pm-2:30pm, Buffet Dinner: 6:30pm-10:30pm (Daily)Other Buffet Entries
5 Ways to Avoid Overeating at The Buffet Restaurant 
10 at Claymore (Pan Pacific Orchard)
Plaza Brasserie (Park Royal)
Silver Shell Café (Shangri La Rasa Sentosa)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
2013-03-01 00:00:00
Street 50 at Bay Hotel – East-Meets-West Restaurant Needs Fine Refinements
Located at Bay Hotel which appeals to urban travellers, Street 50 Restaurant and Bar is so named because it is on 50 Telok Blangah Road. It faces a tough competitor in the name of the mammoth Vivocity. But that could also mean the working people from Mapletree, Harbourfront and Pasir Panjang can consider making their way down for a quiet environment and quite reasonably priced three-course lunch sets at $18++ onwards.However, Street 50 at Bay Hotel Singapore may suffer from an identity crisis. The pro is you get a diverse range of food from Italian, French, American, Vietnamese, Indonesian and Singaporean to hot pots in the evening, but the con is, it may become a master of none.Converted from the now-defunct Rumah Rasa which had some positive reviews, Street 50 remains strong in its Indonesian-style dishes as its chef Chef Sharifah Zaharah is still around, along with head Chef Ricky who is classically trained in French cuisine.Some of its highlights include flambéed Hazelnut Escargot ($14 for half dozen), Roulade of Porkloin ($20), Lamb Veronique ($32) and Steak Bordelaise ($24). And you still get your Asian Pad Thai ($14) and Beef Horfun ($16).The cuisine is all about east-meets-west, which could reflect the diverse cultures of Singapore. One of my favourite dish is the Lamb Rendang ($24), and that is considering I am never a big fan of lamb. For the price, you get a whole huge lamb shank, laced with rich Indonesian-style rendang gravy topped with peas and dried coconut flakes.The slow-braised shank is so tender that the meat come off almost immediately with a spoon, and the rendang gravy so luscious sedap-licious and can be best relished with fragrant white rice.Street 50’s other signature, the Duck Pot Pie ($22), contains slow braised duck cooked in wine sauce with vegetables and spices, contained under a baked shell. If food in a pastry puff is your kind of thing, you would appreciate its size and flaky crust. Two can share one pie.This dish is best eaten by ripping off the pastry cover part by part, dipping it in to gooey sauce, and licking it off your fingers. The duck within felt a bit tough for me though.Its Tom Yam Flair ($18), a spaghetti dish cooked in seafood like crayfish, mussels and squids, seems to be swimming in a creamy oily sauce. If cream is your friend, and carbs & calories not your enemies, you could love its heaviness and richness, though I was wondering if the tom yam flavours went MIA.Some dishes could come off deliciously-right, while the rest ordinary. I suspect Street 50 probably still need some time to refine the dishes, to decide which should stay, and which to take away.Street 50 at Bay Hotel Singapore
50 Telok Blangah Road, Singapore 098828, Tel: +65 6818 6681 (MRT Habourfront. Taxis arriving at hotel lobby can gain access via Temenggong Road. Entry to underground carpark via Telok Blangah Road.)
Opening Hours: 6am – 4amOther Related Entries
Bayang (Clarke Quay)
The Moluccas Rooms (Marina Bay Sands)
The Academy Bistro (Supreme Court)
Yantra (Tanglin Mall)
Kopi Tiam (Swisstel The Stamford)
2013-02-28 00:00:00
Saint Marc Café Vivocity – Its Choco Cro and Little Fuji Are To Live For
Everybody comes to Saint Marc Café for its Choco Cro, which in short means chocolate croissant. The Japanese tai-tais get it by the dozens, both its white and dark variants, or enjoy it at the quiet part of the café with a matcha latte. You will understand why.Saint Marc Café is a popular bakery from Tokyo which finally made its first foray in Singapore at Vivocity, after having 300 outlets in Japan and a first overseas branch at Shanghai. The first Saint Marc Café was opened at Ginza Maronie Boulevard in Tokyo way back in 1998, known ever since for its freshly baked breads and pastries.The  Choco Cro ($2.40) looks deceiving plain, and initially made me wonder if it was left in the tray for too long. After taking like a dozen pictures of the croissant, I was astonished with my first bite – the pastry was flaky and fluffy, and you rejoice hearing the light crunch as you take every morsel of the bite.The surprise element is the chocolate in the middle, still remaining warm and comforting as it oozes out to leave stains on my lips. I had two on separate occasions, both awesome, and was convinced why this was the best-seller.Not best known for its desserts, Saint Marc Café’s offerings was a mixture of hits and misses. The Gion ($8.20) soft serve melted before I could even bring it to the table for its photographic opportunities  (The café is self-service). If you look beyond that, the whole mixture ingredients is quite a pleasure, especially relishing the matcha jellies with ice cream, which has a texture firm yet smooth.Its Matcha Milk ($8.80) with a slightly overpriced cost, is a slight disappointment, looking nothing close to those in the food models. I realised most of its green tea products, like the syrup and latte are not its strongest, lacking in that distinct characteristic matcha-ness, letting the milk overpowering the flavour most of the time. So I could safely say you could give the Matcha drinks a miss.I initially thought the Choco Cro was the best thing at Saint Marc, till I discovered the Little Fuji ($6.30), looking quite like the representative mountain (except this is more kawaii).Despite being full, the vanilla soft serve on top of warm flaky Danish pastry drizzled with addictive caramel sauce was quite the bomb. Unexpectedly, this dessert didn’t melt as fast, allowing us to enjoy every single mouthful of cold and hot sensation.Though the counter is self-service, and the menu slightly confusing with too varied items and trays going around, the Japanese cafe makes a lovely place to settle an off-work afternoon. Provided it is already not filled with ladies. The ambience was so comfortable that a customer walked off without her shoes. She must have thought this was home.Saint Marc’s Choco Cro and Little Fuji are indeed to live for, though I won’t die for the desserts.Saint Marc Café
1 Harbourfront Ave, Vivo City 1F #108-110, Singapore 098585 (Harbourfront MRT)
Opening hours: 10 am – 10pmOther Japanese Cafe Entries
Nana’s Green Tea Café (Plaza Singapura)
Hoshino Coffee (Plaza Singapura)
Dulcet & Studio (Liang Court)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
AKB48 Café (*Scape)
2013-02-27 00:00:00
ChopSuey Café at Dempsey – Surreally Beautiful and Surprisingly Bad
Chopsuey Café at Dempsey is PS Café’s first foray into Asian cuisine, inspired by memories of Westernized Chinese food of the owners. While ‘chop suey’, a mixed meat-vegetable dish itself isn’t the most glamorous of food, it is something familiar with Chinese staying overseas.I only came here because my foodie friend heard so many less than favourable things about ChopSuey, and wanted to fulfil our curiosity (and hopefully prove the others wrong). Woke Ah Yoke commented that “the cooking ranged from bad to mediocre for the starters…” though he did praise the mains; while Six and Seven reviewed that one of the dishes “tasted no better than what I get at the economical rice store”.But it can’t be that bad right?First things first, Chopsuey Café is stunningly beautiful, set in a black and white house on Dempsey hill, with its colonial style décor surreally gorgeous. You may pay attention to the details placed from its maroon-leather menu, cutlery, rattan chairs, fresh flowers, and giant pots of pandan leaves. It was moderately packed during a weekday lunch, mainly filled with Westerners and tai-tais who look like they do not need to work. (It was my off day yah?)The dishes look outlandish expensive for the portions – Crispy seafood noodle for $36, crab mee goreng $26, jade fried rice for $16, and spring rolls for $22. I was mentally prepared for the price, fortunately pre-warned that the steamed rice would already cost $3. The menu left me only more confused, and I just got the very friendly and prompt waitress to recommend their signature dishes.So much for signature dishes. The Four Seasons Har Gao ($9) came with three miserly looking prawn dumplings (quickly worked my Maths. 1 Har Kao = $3++), though I must emphasize the whole plating looks fabulously classy. There was some disappointment where the four seasons meant the sweet corn, mushroom, broccoli and carrot toppings, which by the way did not enhance the taste at all. The skin was thick, and fillings penny-pinching. Thick skin and small fillings – it is like having the worst of both worlds.The other recommended “best seller” Pumpkin and Cod Dumpling ($9) was really all about not judging a book by its cover. I hate to waste food, especially when it is so expensive. But I could not even get past the second bite. My friend stopped at her first, saying the skin tasted like “thick soon kueh skin gone bad”. (A foodie friend who went on another day texted me that the dumpling skin was like homemade glue, and cod like mashed sardines from a can.)The Crispy Duck Pow Pockets ($17) again is attractively presented, looking like my favourite ‘kong bak pau’. But one wonders why they are so stingy with its fillings again, with a thinner-than-thin slice of duck, and stick-like strips of duck confit. The worst has got to be its white buns, slightly colder than warm. We would never imagine ourselves saying this, but we had better textured ones from Khong Guan.We concluded that the appetizers and dim sum are really not their forte. By the way, I asked the waitress for the name of the dim sum chef. She left into the kitchen looking embarrassed/frantic and never came back to serve us.Thankfully the Cooky’s Hainanese Pork Chop with Steak Chips (they meant French fries) and edamame ($24) was a saving grace. At least the pork was tender and the dish arrived warm. This concurs with what some of the other reviewers had said – that the mains are actually delicious.Perhaps the appetizer chef was having a bad day or supply, and we hope Choysuey Café’s food will see better days ahead. Still, the 3 dim sum and 1 main course set us back by 70 bucks. By the way, I heard through the grapevine that a famous plastic surgeon who spent over $500 dining there thought that “SueySuey” could have been a better name. Ouch!Chopsuey Café
01-23, Block 10 Dempsey Road, Tel: +65 9224 6611
Opening Hours: 11.30am to 4:00pm (Weekday lunch), 9.30am to 4pm (Weekend brunch), 6.30 to 10.30pm daily (Dinner)Other Related Entries
Kopi Tiam (Swisstel The Stamford)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (Beach Road)
Crystal Jade Pristine (Scotts Square)
Royal China (Raffles Hotel)
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
2013-02-26 00:00:00
Les Créations de Narisawa – Best Restaurant In Asia Serves Soil, Charcoal & Bark
[Tokyo, Japan] Les Créations de Narisawa took top honours by being the Number 1 restaurant at the inaugural Asia’s 50 Best Restaurants 2013 by S.Pellegrino. So it can be said as the Best Restaurant in Asia, according to a panel of judges, that is. (Read Asia’s 50 Best Restaurants – The Full List & Recommendations)With French dining style and fanciful Japanese flavours and art, Narisawa is familiar to being on ‘Best Restaurants’ list, already No. 27 in the world (12th in 2011), with 2 Michelin stars, though surprisingly out from the Miele Guide is 2013. (Read: No 2 In Asia: Nihonryori Ryugin)If there is an award for food-aesthetics, then Narisawa would almost win hands down. Chef Yoshihiro Narisawa who honed his skills in Robuchon, Girardet and Bocuse is all about “sustainability and gastronomy”, creating dishes “in harmony with nature and the environment”. He gets his food inspirations from the forests, and serves soil, charcoal and bark on the table. Distilled soil that is.Compared to many other restaurants, Narisawa which is near Aoyama Itchome Station is an easy-find, after a short walk past many car showrooms. It is housed in a silvery-white modern building on its own – with the interior being completely black and white, screaming style, simple chic and elegance at the same time.Booking needs to be done online a month before the reservation month (ie for a table in May, you should definitely book on the 1st of April).Lunch is a lot more affordable at 12,600 (SGD$169.50, USD$136.80), considering this is prime land Tokyo, The price used to be 7,350 Yen (SGD$98.90, USD$79.80) last year. Perhaps that’s what you pay for fame. Dinner is at 21,000 Yen (SGD$282.55, USD$227.94).My meal was called “Evolve with the Forest” – a gift from “Saien”, “Satoyama”, “Satoumi” and the Forest. The amuse bouche at Narisawa already sets the tone for a ‘nature’ ride – Onion with Leek wrapping served on a left, and bread with a moss and chlorophyll covered cube – which happens to be the most delicious butter I ever eaten.The main course was more spectacle than taste. The “Suzuki” Seas Bass with cabbage, asari and clams come wrapped with a bag, cut open in front of your very eyes, with thorough one-minute explanation from the staff. I could not catch the full-narration from the heavy-accented English, but could make out that this is a simple dish with an elaborate story.The other main, the Amagi no Shamo, a free range chicken dish felt rather lack-lustre both in terms of presentation and flavour, too one-dimensional to leave a deep impression.Desserts were once again visually astounding, humble fruits given a delightful twist with it being served a pineapple crust poured with Pina Colada all over. While I was busy taking shots, the table behind me of 8 Japanese tai-tais exclaimed with a collective “Ooooo”, and “Ahhhhh” as the service staff performs his acts so immaculately.Most French restaurants would come with petit four, Nariwasa’s served in a push-trolley with seemingly an endless supply of mini-macarons, cakes, puff pastries, meringues and chocolates. I thought I should behave more civilized in Japan, and shyly took only four pieces, while that same table behind me swopped the coconut macarons clean.Les Créations de Narisawa provides an almost perfect service, with imaginative food that tells a story. While it is not quite mind-blowing and its ranking caught me by surprise, you appreciate Chef Narisawa for his dedication to the craft. Whether the restaurant is deserving of the Number 1 spot in Japan is debatable, because food is subjective, and so is art.Les Créations de Narisawa
2-6-15 Minamiaoyama, Minato, Tokyo 107-0062, Japan (10 minutes walk from Aoyama Itchome Station), Tel: +81 3-5785-0799, www.narisawa-yoshihiro.com
Opening Hours: 12:00-3:00pm, 6:30-9:30pm (Closed Sundays)Other Japan Entries
Nijonryori Ryugin (Roppongi, Tokyo)
Ramen Santouka (Shinjuku, Tokyo)
Tsukiji Honten (Shibuya, Japan)
Menya Musashi (Shinjuku, Tokyo)
Tsukiji Fish Market (Tsukiji, Tokyo)
2013-02-25 00:00:00
Asia’s 50 Best Restaurants – The Full List and Recommendations
The inaugural Asia’s 50 Best Restaurants has just been announced. Sponsored by S.Pellegrino & Acqua Panna, the list features the restaurants in Asia that have received the most votes from the Diners Club® World’s 50 Best Restaurants Academy. There are some shoo-ins and surprises (like Singapore’s Imperial Treasure), with Les Créations de Narisawa from Tokyo clinching top spot. Of course, I had an OMG moment after I realised I already tried 4 out of the Top 5 restaurants. So blessed!The Asia’s 5 Best restaurants are Les Créations de Narisawa Japan, Nijonryori Ryugin Japan, Nahm Thailand, Amber Hong Kong and Andre Singapore, with the key awards of Chef’s Choice Award going to Chef Seiji Yamamoto of Nijonryori Ryugin and The One to Watch awarded to Jaan of Singapore.Asia’s 50 Best Restaurants – The Full List
1. Les Créations de Narisawa, Tokyo
2. Nijonryori Ryugin, Tokyo
3. Nahm, Thailand
4. Amber, Hong Kong
5. Restaurant Andre, Singapore
6. 8-1/2 Otto e Mezzo Bombana, Hong Kong
7. Mr & Mrs Bund, Shanghai
8. Ultraviolet by Paul Pairet, Shanghai
9. Iggy’s Singapore
10. Gaggan, Bangkok
11. Waku Ghin, Singapore
12. Caprice, Hong Kong
13. Lung King Heen, Hong Kong
14. Les Amis, Singaore
15. Bo Innovation, Hong Kong
16. Quintessence, Tokyo
17. Dum Pukht, New Delhi
18. The Chairman, Hong Kong
19. Eat Me, Bangkok
20. Wasabi by Morimoto, Mumbai
21. Hajime, Osaka
22. Jaan, Singapore
23. L’Atelier de Joel Robuchon, Hong Kong
24. L’Atelier de Joel Robuchon, Singapore
25. 28 HuBin Road, Hangzhou, China
26. Bukhara, New Delhi
27. Sushi Mizutani, Tokyo
28. Indigo, Mumbai
29. Sra Bua by Kiin Kiin, Bangkok
30. Varq, New Delhi
31. Aronia de Takazawa, Tokyo
32. Shinji by Kanesaka, Singapore
33. Kahala, Osaka, Japan
34. Franck Bistro, Shanghai
35. Osteria Mozza, Singapore
36. Bo.Lan, Bangkok
37, Robuchon au Dôme, Macau, China
38. Nihonbashi, Colombo, Sri Lanka
39. Sushi Saito, Tokyo
40. Fu1015, Shanghai, China
41. Indian Accent, New Delhi
42. Ishikawa, Tokyo
43. Gunther’s, Singapore
44. Karavalli, Bangalore, India
45. Jade on 36, Shanghai
46. Yardbird, Hong Kong
47. Don’s, Hanoi, Vietnam
48. Fook Lam Moon, Hong Kong
49. Imperial Treasure Super Peking Duck, Singapore
50. Mozaic, Bali, IndonesiaHere are some of my personal recommendations:Les Créations de Narisawa (Tokyo, Japan)
Chef Yoshihiro Narisawa believes in the theme of ‘sustainability and gastronomy’, and uses ingredients from the ‘real’ environment, resulting in dishes such as ‘soil’ soup, ‘water’ salad and ‘forest’ dish. As Narisawa celebrates its 10th anniversary in 2013, it is a lucky year for them as they reached the top spot in Asia. His tasting menu only lists the main ingredients and ideas, so that diners can sense the stories and messages of each dish with their own experiences and interpretation.Nijonryori Ryugin (Roppongi, Tokyo)
RyuGin’s Chef Seiji Yamamoto is known to push culinary boundaries, creating avant-garde dishes, while blending with the seasonal ingredients available in Japan. Every season has a different menu, and every day it may differ based on what is available in the market. The dinner was not only about eating anymore, but appreciating every containing plate, smelling the scents, appreciating the plating, listening to the explanation and story, and just simply watching in awe how art is created. Ryugin’s dessert will blow your mind. It was a combination of ‘candy mango’ frozen to -196 degree Celsius using liquid nitrogen, cracked and mixed with warm mature fresh mango. It was crazy, simply crazy good.Nahm (Bangkok, Thailand)
Nahm by Austrian David Thompson sometimes feel more Western than Thai in execution, unavoidably since it opened first in London. It is also the first and one of the two Thai restaurants to be every awarded a Michelin star. Located at the Metropolitan Hotel Bangkok (one of my favourite hotels ever). The price is considered very expensive for Thai standards, but probably one of the most affordable in the World’s Top 50 list (It was Number 50 in 2012). Rather than a fixed tasting menu, or set dinner, you would be given flexibility to choose from a section of canapes, relish, salad, soup, curry, stir fry and desserts – some familiar Thai street dishes given an up-market twist using quality ingredients.Waku Ghin (Marina Bay Sands, Singapore)
Opened by Celebrity Chef Tetsuya Wakuda, ‘Waku’ means to ‘spring forth’ and ‘ghin’ means silver which happens to be his favourite colour. Waku Ghin at Marina Bay Sands can be considered Chef Tetsuya’s dream ‘playground’, a 10,000 square feet expensive space, meant to serve maximum of 25 customers at one time. The 10-course degustation menu has two seatings, one at 6pm and the other 8:30pm, with a very hefty price tag of $400++ per person.  Waku Ghin’s signature dish, the Marinated Botan Shrimp with Sea Urchin and Oscietra Caviar, is mind-blowing delicious. Every spoonful of the uni just melts in your mouth sensationally, and you feel transported to a gastronomic dreamland.Amber (The Landmark Central, Hong Kong)
Located at Landmark Mandarin Oriental near Central, Amber is at the perfect blend of the produces from East and cooking techniques from the West. Chef Richard Ekkebus, Dutch-born and French-trained, loves a light touch to his cooking, with great emphasis placed on creative beautiful presentations. Without trying to exaggerate too much, I am starting to suspect that even ‘delicious’ is not enough to describe the sensational taste.  The main course – a wagyu beef tongue & cheek, with gratinated macaroni with beaufort silver beet, button mushroom and red wine reduction, was a melt-in-your-mouth meat while you can still savour the classic taste of the beef. Amber is truly in a different league of restaurants, and provides a superb dining experience.L’Atelier de Joel Robuchon (Landmark Central, Hong Kong)
L’Atelier de Joël Robuchon of Hong Kong is divided into two areas – an open L’Atelier and a closer intimate Le Jardin. For first-timers, I would recommend sitting at the L’Atelier counter where you can watch the chefs in full action within an open kitchen concept – as though you are watching a cooking programme, but it’s live. The square counter seating is inspired by Tokyo sushi restaurants, with a sexy colour scheme of lush red and mysterious black. Surprisingly, the best dish of the meal was neither the meat mains or desserts, but the “carnarolli” risotto with caramelized chausey lobster with sea urchin. Needless to say, the chunky lobster flesh and oh-so-luscious-yummy uni with the evenly cooked risotto was a combination so lip-smacking good, achieving a balance that is not too dry or moist. Almost perfect.Other Related Entries
Time To Have A Top 100 Restaurants List For Singapore
Les Créations de Narisawa (Tokyo, Japan)
Nijonryori Ryugin (Roppongi, Tokyo)
Waku Ghin (Marina Bay Sands, Singapore)
Amber (Landmark Central, Hong Kong)
L’Atelier de Joel Robuchon (Landmark Central, Hong Kong)
2013-02-22 00:00:00
Menya Sanji – Delicious Kagoshima Ramen at Orchid Hotel. No, It’s Not Keisuke
There is a very delicious new ramen shop at Orchid Hotel Tanjong Pagar. No, no, no. I am not talking about Keisuke Tontotsu King. It’s been there, done that. (Read: 5 New & Best Ramen Places in Singapore)Say Hello to Menya Sanji 麺屋三士, which refers to the ‘three warriors’ of the Meiji restoration, thus the warrior graphics in the shop interior, though not to be confused with a similar sounding Menya Musashi.Located very closely to the immensely popular Keisuke, this shop facing the main road (near Teppei Japanese Restaurant and next to Two Blur Guys) has obviously less customers, perhaps due to lack of publicity.Other than Tokyo, Guam and Taiwan, Singapore is the next country that sells Menya Sanji ramen. Its ramen is Kagoshima style – largely unheard of in this region. Kagoshima ramen is considered tonkotsu style ramen, though very different from the long and thin Kyushu Kurume style ramen we are familiar with.The noodles are medium-thick, not entirely curly like Sapporo’s, and can be considered much closer to the better-known Hakata ramen.In this small 18-seater shop, the typical choices are the original Sanji Ramen ($11.50), Black Sesame Ramen ($10.50) and Spicy Ramen ($11.00). If you ask me which I enjoy most – this is tough – I happen to like all three types (which is rare). Go for the original Sanji for the more authenic savour.The broth is overall a lot milkier and opaque than usual, yet not overly greasy or salty. Some other ramen soups though tasty can give a heavy uncomfortable feeling (like Miharu’s) after consumption of the entire bowl. Sanji’s version boiled with pork and chicken remains even-bodied and somewhat taste ‘healthier’According to Chef Kaiyama, Sanji’s broth is cooked for a full 20 hours (!) in Kagoshima before it is imported back into Singapore. Not sure how the dynamics work, but this does taste like it has been cooked that long.The main pitfall is the chashu roast pork, looking succulent and mouthwatering, but was in fact a tad too dry and tough for my liking. Also, the tamago could have been runnier.They also serve Bukkake Ramen ($9.90), somewhat similar to Tsukemen, but the sauce you pour over is cold. With options of sesame, spicy and soy sauce, the goma sesame is the elite choice for tossing in a hot summer weather of Singapore’s.So is it Keisuke or Sanji? I still think Keisuke ranks as my Top 3 ramen.  But on any given day, I would rather give the newer and more atypical Sanji a chance. This is one of the best recent ramen shops that finally serves an unforgettable bowl of comfort.Menya Sanji 麺屋三士
Orchid Hotel #01-14 1 Tras Link (5 min from Tanjong Pagar MRT) Tel: +65 6604 8891
Opening Hours: 11:30pm – 3:00pm, 5:30pm – 11:00pm DailyOther Ramen Entries
Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen (Novena Square 2)
Keishoken Ramen (Great World City)
Kitakata Rahmen Tamakichi (Orchard Plaza)
Ramen Keisuke Tori King (Amara Hotel)
Uma Uma Ramen (Forum Galleria)
2013-02-21 00:00:00
L’Atelier de Joel Robuchon Hong Kong – 3 Star Michelin Restaurant Is Sexy & Underwhelms
[Hong Kong] Joel Robuchon is known as the “Chef of the Century”, owning restaurants from Paris, Las Vegas, London to Tokyo, earning a total of 28 Michelin stars, the most of any chefs in the entire world. This meal at L’Atelier de Joel Robuchon is my first Robuchon’s, and also my first 3 Star Michelin.This restaurant executed by Chef Olivier Elzer was first listed at no. 1 on Asia’s Top 20 Restaurants of the Miele Guide in 2009, and still remains top 3 this year. While it was ranked the 53rd best restaurant in the world in 2010, 2012’s version saw it unfortunately unplaced. (Read about No. 28 Nijonryori Ryugin, No. 39 Waku Ghin  and No. 44 Amber)L’Atelier de Joël Robuchon of Hong Kong is divided into two areas – an open L’Atelier and a closer intimate Le Jardin – located at The Landmark, which houses luxury brands from Louis Vuitton, Harvey Nichols to Tiffany. Yet you can still come dressed in your smart casuals, because the ambience is bustling with energy and rather informal.Zagat was quoted that you could “spend your children’s inheritance” for a “fabulous experience” at this Robuchon production in Central. Fortunately, I did not need to spend my would-be children’s inheritance away. The L’Atelier-Show Kitchen Dinner is ‘reasonably’ priced at HK$830+ (SGD$132, USD$107), and set lunch is HK$448 (SGD$71.50, USD$57.80) I used the word ‘reasonably’ because $132 in Singapore would not get you even close to a 3 star Michelin standard.For first-timers, I would recommend sitting at the L’Atelier counter where you can watch the chefs in full action within an open kitchen concept – as though you are watching a cooking programme, but it’s live. The square counter seating is inspired by Tokyo sushi restaurants, with a sexy colour scheme of lush red and mysterious black. The flipside is I found myself in a rather cramp situation, seated too high up, too close to strangers.The starter, a scottish smoked salmon, has delightful touches coming in the form of soft creamy white asparaguses, and crispy poached quail eggs, highlighting an enthusing play on textures.  The fish on its own is otherwise standard fare.Surprisingly, the best dish of the meal was neither the meat mains or desserts, but the “carnarolli” risotto with caramelized chausey lobster with sea urchin. Needless to say, the chunky lobster flesh and oh-so-luscious-yummy uni with the evenly cooked risotto was a combination so lip-smacking good, achieving a balance that is not too dry or moist. Almost perfect.The pan seared A4 Kagoshima beef tenderloin with aromatic arugula salad which comes with a supplement of HK$400 is rather underwhelming. Not that it is any bad, but when contrasted with the roasted challans duck breast and poached baby pear in spiced red wine, it lacks an additional oomph and almost felt that it was not enough to warrant that extra price.Dessert was a rich and gorgeous-looking caribbean chocolate mousse on sugar crust pastry with Grand Marnier ice-cream.At L’Atelier de Joel Robuchon, I was more impressed with the concept and ambience rather than the tapas-style food. (Even went for wonton noodles after the meal.)Words I would definitely use to describe the restaurant – sexy, cool, energetic, friendly, enthusiastic, and lively. Delicious, delectable, scrumptious – somewhat, maybe, to a certain extent. Perhaps I came with a heart full of anticipation. After all, this is three-star Michelin right?L’Atelier de Joel Robuchon Hong Kong
Shop 401, 4/F The Landmark, Central, Hong Kong (Central Station) Tel: +852 2166 9000 reservation@robuchon.hk
Opening Hours: 12:00pm – 2:30pm, 6:30pm – 10:30pm DailyOther Hong Kong Entries
Amber (Hong Kong)
Mak’s Noodles (Hong Kong)
Tim Ho Wan (Hong Kong)
Ho Hung Kee (Hong Kong)
Tsim Chai Kee (Hong Kong)
2013-02-20 00:00:00
Waku Ghin – Possibly the Most Expensive, And the Best Restaurant in Singapore
Waku Ghin, where should I even start? That this is one of the best ranked restaurant in Singapore; the most expensive meal ever at $400, or that this is possibly the best meal in my entire life.Let’s start with Waku Ghin’s magnificent feat for being a relatively new two-year-old venue: Number 2 in Miele Asia Top 20; top restaurant in Singapore; and ranked 39th in the coveted The S.Pellegrino World’s 50 Best Restaurants in its debut, beating the original Tetsuya at Australia. (Read about No. 28 Nijonryori Ryugin and No. 44 Amber)Opened by Celebrity Chef Tetsuya Wakuda, ‘Waku’ means to ‘spring forth’ and ‘ghin’ means silver which happens to be his favourite colour. Waku Ghin at Marina Bay Sands can be considered Chef Tetsuya’s dream ‘playground’, a 10,000 square feet expensive space, meant to serve maximum of 25 customers at one time.The 10-course degustation menu has two seatings, one at 6pm and the other 8:30pm, with a very hefty price tag of $400++ per person. $400 bloody dollars. (My thrifty mother would have fainted if she knew I spent that kind of money in a single meal.)  It was my birthday, I wanted it to be very memorable, and the meal did not disappoint at all.Waku Ghin’s signature dish, the Marinated Botan Shrimp with Sea Urchin and Oscietra Caviar, is mind-blowing delicious. Every spoonful of the uni just melts in your mouth sensationally, and you feel transported to a gastronomic dreamland. While I initially wondered why its most recognisable dish was served prematurely in the 2nd course, I came to realize that every dish just gets better and better.The slow-cooked Tasmanian Petuna Ocean Trout with Witlof and Yuzu looks like salmon sashimi on sight. But when you start eating, you would just want to savour the fish very slowly, cutting it off piece by piece to appreciate the freshness and unique texture. I have eaten fish – but this is a texture so smooth. It’s simple, but easily one of my personal favourites.The most unforgettable dish in terms of taste is the Braised Canadian Lobster with Couscous and Tajine Spice. The broth which consists of lobster bisque, olive oil, tarragon and butter is cooked right in front of your very eyes. And when the lobster flesh is slowly braised within, the result is a luxurious juicy moist flesh of lobster screaming of rich unami flavour. (I have never used the word ‘unami’ ever in my previous posts, and finally decided that this particular dish is well-deserving of this word.)In case you are wondering, my dining room had only the four of us seated, with a chef cooking right in front of your very eyes on specially imported stainless steel teppanyaki grill, in pure sophistication and creativity. You can make small talks with the chef, and he is likely to answer your food queries to the best of his knowledge. For example, I asked where the abalone we had was from, and Chef Cory Soo Thoo (the guy in the photo who looks like singer Jam Hsiao with veins popping out of his arms) promptly brought out a seafood basket of live moving ones. He did say “Australia” in the end.We know how some restaurants can over-cook and spoil a perfectly wonderful meat like wagyu. Waku Ghin’s Japanese Ohmi Wagyu (from Shija prefecture) is seared for exactly 20 seconds on each side, left to rest, cubed and then served minimally with fresh wasabi grated on the spot, citrus soy and garlic chips. This is a treatment that allows the meat to speak on its own, and for you to appreciate the marbled beef in its fullest flavours.Desserts are served at then served at the main dining area, overlooking the gorgeous skyline of Marina Bay. As it was my birthday, Waku Ghin also arranged for a Chocolate Mousse Cake with Vanilla and Macadamia. Although many reviews say that desserts are not their forte, this cake did not disappoint.I know it is a lot of money, but this was $400++, well-spent.  Both food and the experience counts. Waku Ghin’s attention to details is impressive. After the entire meal, we were all given the menu as keepsake. It was personalised and includes exactly the dishes I chose and had. For memory’s sake, it also says “Happy Birthday – Wednesday, 13 February 2013”.Waku Ghin
The Shoppes Atrium 2, Marina Bay Sands #02-02 (via escalator opposite Artbox Level 2), 10 Bayfront Avenue Singapore. Tel: +65 6688 8507
Opening Hours: 6:00pm and 8:30pm (Two seatings)Other Related Entries
The Moluccas Rooms (Marina Bay Sands)
Caffe B (Marina Bay Sands)
Ocean Restaurant (Resorts World Sentosa)
Garibaldi (Purvis Street)
LP+Tetsu (Tanglin Mall)
2013-02-19 00:00:00
Thai Express – New Menu with Thai Street Favourites
Thai Express may not offer the most authentic Thai cuisine, but it is the definitely the most successful chain locally with 24 branches, and somehow has become a default choice for many when they have Thai food cravings.I am so relieved that Thai Express has moved beyond the usual Tom Yum Goong, Pad Thai and Green Curry because Thai food is so much more than that. With a new menu with over 130 items, they have chosen to go more street – with a variety from different regions, and more obscure parts of Thailand.Some of the new favourites include the popular street snack – Khoa Tang Naa Tang, rice crackers served with special creamy chicken and shrimp sauce ($7.90); Gai Op Pattaya Thai-style roasted chicken thigh ($9.90); Pueak Himmapan fried taro with cashew nut ($9.30), super spicy Kraphoa Gai Kai Yeow Maa stir-fried minced chicken with Thai basil and century egg ($9.30); and a very different sweet-spicy Kway Teow Sukhothai ($11.30).To my surprise, somebody finally brought in Complicated Noodles, at least that’s how Thailand’s Greyhound Café (Bangkok) calls it. Thai Express’s version is named a more forgettable Kway Teow Lui Suan, a DIY minced chicken and dry kway teow salad dish ($9.30). (DIY really means Do It Yourself, don’t think too much).There is nothing too complicated about this dish, but it will probably get your hands quite messy. (Must wash before eating!) So the ingredients are served on a wooden board, with stacks of square noodle sheets, lettuce, and a bowl of spicy minced pork. The trick is about how you can wrap everything up – lettuce, kway teow, a teaspoon of meat and spicy dressings in that sequence – all elegantly and effortlessly. And stuff the entire clutter in your mouth in graceful fashion. Practice makes perfect, and you never know eating can be this fun.The Kway Teow Sukhothai ($11.30) departs from the familiar taste of any noodles. This stick noodle with minced chicken and prawn swimming in chilli oil soup topped with crushed peanut, is hot, sour, salty and sweet at the same time. The element of sweetness is stronger than usual, tasting somewhat like a diluted minestrone soup, and all on the table agreed it is both strange and memorable.One of the most popular dessert I call ‘Big Brother’, but is actually named ‘Ta Kor’ ($6.80) is a half-and-half Thai fragrant pandan jelly with coconut custard. Forget about the calories for the time being, and indulge in a sweet happy ending.[Giveaway Ended] Thai Express Vouchers Giveaway!
Thai Express will be giving away 5 sets of $20 vouchers to 5 Blessed DanielFoodDiary.com readers to enjoy its new menu.All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of DanielFoodDiary.com
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET on twitter
Step 3: COMMENT below to name your favourite new Thai Express dish. (Do include your email add)
Results will be announced 25th Feb (Mon).Thai Express
Plaza Singapura, 68 Orchard Road, #03-24, Singapore 238839 (Dhoby Ghaut MRT), Tel: +65 6339 5422
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:30pmOther Branches: Bishan Junction 8, Bugis+, Bukit Panjang Plaza,  Changi Terminal 3, CityLink, Clementi Mall, Esplanade, Holland Village, JCube, Jurong Point, Kallang Leisure Park, Kovan Heartland Mall, North Point, Paragon, Parkway Parade, Plaza Singapura, Raffles City, Siglap Springvale, Sun Plaza, United Square, Tampines One, Tiong Bahru Plaza, West Coast Plaza, VivoCityOther Thai Restaurant Entries
Sweet Salty Spicy (Rail Mall)
Baan Tong Thai (Tiong Bahru)
First Thai (Purvis Street)
Suan Thai Restaurant (Killiney Road)
Porn’s (Liang Seah)
2013-02-18 00:00:00
Tim Ho Wan – Cheapest Michelin Star Restaurant’s Dim Sum Is Good, Though Not Spectacular
[Hong Kong] Tim Ho Wan 添好運 is a Cinderella story, the hole-in-the-wall dim sum restaurant that scored One Michelin Star,  thereby earning its reputation as the‘cheapest Michelin Star restaurant in the world’. Fame found its way. (The other cheap Michelin star restaurant is Ho Hung Kee)Although there were a few branches, only the outlets at Mongkok and Sham Shui Po gained those hard-earned one stars, where ironically the swankier and classier looking branch at IFC didn’t. We never know how Michelin works. But what I can tell you don’t bother queuing at its original Mongkok branch because it has already closed due to high rent. (WHAT?!)That leaves me only with Sham Shui Po to go to, also with a 30-odd person queue, occupied with tourists armed with Michelin and travels guides (Most look like Mainlanders and Taiwanese). Get a number from the lady first. (Brush up your Cantonese because she doesn’t shout those numbers in English.) Surprisingly, it took only a 15 minutes wait.Owner-chef known as Pui-Gor (Chef Mak Kwai Pui) is formerly from 3-star Michelin restaurant Lung King Heen. His signature Baked Bun with Barbecued Pork (HK$16 for 3, SGD$2.55, USD$2.05) is seriously the best I ever eaten.Very similar to a bolo bao, the sweet pastry covered bun is light and fluffy, with skin so thin, and saucy char siew pork within almost oozing out. Supercrazygood!  The portion is small, and feels like you would want to finish all three at one go. My advice: Eat them straight once the pastries are out on your table.The smooth silky and rather unique Rice Roll with Pig’s Intestines (HK$17, SGD$2.71, USD$2.19) is recommended as well. But then, the disappointment starts. Every other dim sum dish served paled in comparison soon after.From the Siew Mai (HK$23, SGD$3.67, USD$2.97) to Steamed Beef Balls with Beancurd Skin (HK$14, SGD$2.23, USD$1,81), it feels like there are many other dim sum places with offerings better than this. Don’t get me wrong, those dishes were good but were not spectacular – at least not Michelin-astonishing. I thought to myself, “I had better”.I suspect it has to do more with its execution rather than the recipe and ingredients. For example, the Carrot Cake (HK$12, SGD$1.91, USD$1.55) was fresh with delicious radish bits within (that part I simply enjoy), but was a tad oily and could have been pan-fried longer as the outer layer was just not crisp enough.Some of my Hong Kong friends say that Tim Ho Wan is overrated. Is Tim Ho Wan a one-hit (dish) wonder? I still think it serves quality dim sum at very reasonable prices, with my entire bill at about HK$100 (SGD$15.94, USD$12.90) for 7 dishes! But… I won’t queue more than an hour for this.Singapore can look forward to Tim Ho Wan’s opening at Plaza Singapura Orchard. Any fairy godmother can predict long queues (likely to be longer than Hong Kong’s). (Updated Read: Review Tim Ho Wan Singapore)May the magic of its Baked Barbeque Pork remains. With only that one star left at Sham Shui Po, let’s hope they keep it, because everybody still loves a fairytale ending.Tim Ho Wan, the Dim-Sum Specialists 添好運
9-11 Fuk Wing Street, Sham Shui Po  深水埗福榮街9-11號地下 (10 min walk from Sham Shui Po MTR) Tel:+852 2788 1226
Opening Hours: 8:00am – 9:30pm (Daily)Other branches: Shop 12A, Hong Kong Station (Podium Level 1, IFC Mall) , Central, Tel: +852 2332 3078,
Shop B, C, & D, G/F, 2-8 Wharf Road, Seaview Building, North Point, Tel: +852 2979 5608Other Hong Kong Entries
Ho Hung Kee (Hong Kong)
Tsim Chai Kee (Hong Kong)
Amber (Hong Kong)
Mak’s Noodles (Hong Kong)
5 Restaurants at HarbourCity for Doreamon (Hong Kong)
2013-02-14 00:00:00
LP+Tetsu – When French Falls In Love With Japanese Fine Dining
Like most couples, LP+Tetsu is a classic case of how two very different parties can get together looking quite incompatible, but are in fact are a match made in heaven.LP is short for Laurent Peugeot, the one-star Michelin French chef of Le Charlemagne in Burgundy France; while Tetsu is a Japanese restaurant known for its tonkatsu, operated under Food Junction. The initial difference looks startling and strange; though few may know that Chef Peugeot also owns a Sushikai Japanese restaurant, while Food Junction runs a series of restaurants from 1 Market by Chef Wan, Medz to Eggs & Berries.In short, LP+Tetsu has turned out to be a contemporary fine dining restaurant, strongly influenced by both traditional and modern French and Japanese culinary techniques and ingredients, and given a local twist with the addition of spices and the use of native produce to arouse taste buds.In the mood for love, the following is the Valentine’s Day Special Menu. Otherwise, its gastronomic journey of the usual menu of six dishes, cheese platter and a surprise dessert is priced at $190. Even then, their menu changes every few months to keep the dishes refreshing and innovative.s
The starter is already a reason to fall in love with the restaurant. Their Oshi Sushi is no ordinary maki, but akami tuna with sliced foie gras served on sushi rice and seaweed powder. A sight to behold, with a taste to remember, this dish exemplifies how traditional Japanese food can be given a modern day twist yet still taste memorably-good. Yes, French foie gras and Japanese sushi is an agreeable complement for each other.Its Wagyu Beef, of tamago with creamy miso pearls, kimpira salsifis herbs is almost a visual spectacular and work of art. As it was wagyu, I did wish there was less of a distraction around for us to fully concentrate on relishing the quality of the beef.It seems that cheese dishes are its forte, and was highly recommended its 18 month-old Comte Cheese with celery and atsina herb. I say this is a love-hate relationship. Fans of aged cheese would love its distinct unforgettable flavour, while some may find it too strong, too intense.A friend who could not stop raving about LP+Tetsu said this has got to be one of the best Japanese restaurants locally. (Well technically it shouldn’t be considered just Japanese).Overall, some of its dishes are really impressive and you feel that LP-Tetsu deserves more to its credit. Some offerings may fall flat for being over-ambitious with too much going on. Less can be more, and it really depends really on what you end up choosing.  Price aside, this is one restaurant I would recommend for all its attractive-looking food. Yes, I do love based on appearances.LP+Tetsu
163, Tanglin Road, #03-18 Tanglin Mall, Singapore 247933, Tel: +65 6836 3112
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 2:30pm, 6:00pm-10:30pmOther Japanese Restaurant Entries
B@Rochester (Rochester Park)
IKYU (Tiong Bahru)
Japanese Dining SUN (CHIJMES)
Seki (Rendezvous Hotel)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
2013-02-13 00:00:00
Nana’s Green Tea Café – Japan’s ‘Starbucks’ Now At Plaza Singapura
What’s the next big thing in Singapore for food? Looking at new Japanese cafes such as Maccha House, Dolce Tokyo, Hoshino Coffee, Saint Marc’s, Tsujiri Tea House and Nana’s Green Tea (so many!), I think it is Matcha.Yes matcha, the fine Japanese powdered green tea which is said to boost metabolism, reduce cholesterol, and moderate stress responses. The reason why Japanese have long life?When I first went to Nana’s Green Tea Café at Tokyo SkyTree Japan, I fell in love with the ambience, dessert, service and food. It was like Japanese tai-tai dream place to chit-chat about their children and pets. With 32 branches in Japan, it is termed as the “Japanese Starbucks”. But no offence to Starbucks, Nana’s Green Tea (in Japan) had this additional charm that is hard to put into words and difficult to replicate.And so Nana’s Green Tea came to JCube Singapore. Wrong location. Closed. Next.Plaza Singapura’s new The Atrium extension seems to be the right fit for Nana’s Green Tea Café, with many Japanese neighbours from clothing mega-store Uniqlo, semi-buffet restaurant Hifumi, Nabemono place Tsukada Nojo, to café Hoshino Coffee.Although Nana’s Green Tea is known to be a café, it also sells several main courses such as dons, udons and sushi rolls, with a more localised menu quite unlike the ones in Japan.The Ebi Fried Curry Don I had was $14.80, and weekday lunch sets are pretty affordable at $13.90 with a beverage from Matcha, Hoji to Azuki.Some of its dishes are fairly interesting-tasting, such as is Gyu Shabu Goma Dare Udon ($15.80) where you get cold udon noodles served with very thinly sliced beef. The special sesame sauce was lightly fragrant and not too heavy on its savour.  I am not usually a thick noodle person, but their version makes it feel like healthy and manageble. I do wonder how many customers who are used to hot piping food, can fancy cold udon though.Desserts, such as its Matcha Anmitsu ($8.80), are definitely its strength. It may not blow you away but makes a decent afternoon tea-time treat, with its azuki red bean paste smooth and satisfying. Its signature drinks include Matcha Latte ($7.00), MatchaShiratama Float ($9.00), Hoji Chocolate Latte ($8.00) and Genmai Cha ($5.50).Perhaps it is the low awareness, lack of strong branding or a special X-factor, my guess is people would still rather choose a Starbucks green tea frappucino over a Nana Green Tea’s matcha latte. A pity really.[Giveaway Ended] Nana’s Green Tea Café Giveaway!
Nana’s Green Tea Café will be giving away 5 complimentary lunch sets*
All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET on twitter
Step 3: Leave a comment below to name your favourite matcha drink or dessert. 
Results will be announced 19th Feb (TUES). *Voucher terms & conditions apply.Nana’s Green Tea Café
The Atrium @ Orchard, Plaza Singapura 68 Orchard Road #03-80/82 Singapore 238839 (Dhoby Ghaut MRT) Tel: +65 6684 4312
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pmOther Japanese Restaurant Entries
Hifiumi (Plaza Singapura)
Hoshino Coffee (Plaza Singapura)
Dulcet & Studio (Liang Court)
Sushi Tei (Ngee Ann City)
Yayoiken (Bugis+)
2013-02-07 00:00:00
Crystal Jade Pristine – New Brand Offers Nourishing, Organic Treats. Will It Work?
Crystal Jade Pristine at Level 3 Scotts Square is a new outlet with a different branding, serving more exquisite yet simple dishes. Two words to describe its cuisine – nourishing and organic.When friends wanted a recommendation for Crystal Jade, I would sometimes direct them to Scotts Square because it is less crowded (compared to Takashimya Orchard) and easier to get a seat. The environment is more conducive for chatting-up rather than the other nosier Chinese restaurants. Alas Scotts Square is so niche and upmarket that only tai-tais would go there to shop regularly – most of its shops are empty. Crystal Jade’s last concept on home-styled dishes didn’t work here.Most food tastings would be quick to offer the signature of signatures – premium, expensive-looking dishes (like the wagyus, seafoods and truffles) all set to ‘wow’. Crystal Jade Pristine’s tasting menu interestingly included several ‘simple’ food, like Baby Chinese Spinach ($16) and Braised Minced Pork with Hong Kong Kai Lan ($22.00).Its Spinach dish while looking unassuming and ordinary, is topped with poached prawn and cooked in a delicious sweet and flavourful prawn broth. I commented that I wouldn’t have ordered it at all if I just flipped the menu – I mean, it’s just spinach, but surprisingly turned out to be my favourite food of the day for its superior soup base. This kind of reminds me of how my grandma would have cooked it.There are two interesting sections in Crystal Jade Pristine’s menu – an organic selection and ladies’ specialty (told you about the tai-tai thing).The former includes Braised Beef with Chinese Yam & Red Dates ($18.00) Grilled Cod Fish with Sea Salt ($16.00), Spain Ham Vegetable Salad ($18.00); and the atter more nourishing items such as Double-boiled Bird’s Nest with Pine Mushroom in Clear Broth ($48) and Braised Rice with Black Truffle & Conpoy ($8.00)Another humble-looking dish from the ‘ladies’ menu’ is the Steamed Chicken Beancurd with Ginseng & Cordycep Mushroom ($18.00). Beancurd for $18.00?  Before you dismiss this as another tofu dish, the beancurd is made from a silky paste of malaysian kampung chicken meat steamed with various herbs like American ginseng and double-boiled broth. Amazing effort for a seemingly down-to-earth bowl. Taste wise, it feels like a very ‘bu’(beneficial for health) bowl of smooth chicken beancurd!Crystal Jade Pristine offers a nutritious and healthier option to the usually heavy-handed Chinese food. On the flip side, the price-tag is slightly towards the steep side. Let’s see, $22 for kai-lan? How many would be willing to pay more for quality ingredients, and nourishing and organic Chinese food? It’s a risky venture.Crystal Jade Pristine
Scotts Square, #03-06, 6 Scotts Road, Singapore 228209, Tel: +65 66361836
Opening Hours: Monday to Saturday: 11.30am – 3pm; 5.30pm – 10.30pm. Sun & PH: 10.30am – 3.30pm; 5.30pm – 10.30pmOther Chinese Restaurant Entries
Crystal Jade Jiangnan (Vivocity)
Crystal Jade Dining IN (Vivocity)
Peach Blossom (Marina Mandarin)
Dian Xiao Er (Serangoon NEX)
Old Hong Kong Legend (Raffles City)
2013-02-06 00:00:00
Si Chuan Dou Hua – Reunion Imperial High Tea at Tian Fu Tea Room
If you always thought high tea meant the ‘Western way’ – cakes, pies and bread, how about a Chinese high tea of handcrafted dim sum and oriental desserts?Tian Fu Tea Room at Si Chuan Dou Hua Restaurant, with branches at Park Royal on Beach Road, Kitchener Road and UOB Plaza, have been offering Imperial High Tea from 2:30pm to 6:00pm, where the selection of tea is specially selected to match with its dim sum delicacies. (Read: Si Chuan Dou Hua High Tea at UOB Plaza)Chinese high teas on a lazy Sunday afternoons  for you to catch up with family and friends always sound like a brilliant idea. You do get to spend quality time to chat up rather than rush through a hurried meal, and also appreciate fine Chinese tea which takes time to brew and be served. ‘Gongfu Cha’ is indeed a dying cultural art-form in Singapore.I know some are surprised that Si Chuan Dou Hua serves dim sum, as they have always been known for their authentic ‘Chuan dishes’ and smooth tau hway with wolfberries. Well, Tian Fu Tea Room is the first Chinese tea room concept within a restaurant in Singapore.Its Reunion Imperial High Tea (at  $30++ per person) includes eight varieties of dim sum such as Cantonese style pan fried carrot cake in XO Sauce and Sichuan inspired sliced pork in garlic and chilli sauce. Oh, and yusheng too!With that said, their Steamed Prawn Dumpling with Gold Fold is both impressive on its aesthetics and taste, very delicate and fresh which makes it one of the best har kow I had locally. The gold leaves on top add a touch of class and elegance (though I always wonder what happens to the gold after consumption into the body!)Its Steam Crystal Dumpling with Minced Prawn and Carrot, also artistically designed, has a delightful filling of carrot and coriander which adds a light and crunchy bite.My favourite dim sum of the eight was the Deep Fried BBQ Meat Puff, so crisp-fully fried. Do eat it while its warm but be careful its roasted pork filling will ooze out like textured delicious juice.This special high tea starts from 10 Feb till 24 Feb, do note that every branch will have a different selection and some of these exquisite dim sum offered are only available in the Reunion Imperial High Tea set.Si Chuan Dou Hua Reunion Imperial High Tea Giveaway!
Si Chuan Dou Hua’s Tian Fu Tea Room will be giving away 8 sets of Reunion Imperial High Tea (each worth $30) to 8 blessed Daniel’s Food Diary readers to enjoy during this Chinese New Year. Huat, Huat, Huat!All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET the post on twitter
Step 3: Leave a comment below to name your favourite dimsum and WHY. (Pls include your email add)
Results will be announced 8th Feb (FRI)[Giveaway Ended] Si Chuan Dou Hua Restaurant Tian Fu Tea Room
PARKROYAL on Beach Road, 7500 Beach Road, Singapore 199591 (15 min walk from Bugis MRT), Tel: +65 6505 5722
Other branches:
TOP of UOB Plaza, 80 Raffles Place, #60-01, UOB Plaza 1, Singapore 048624
Tel: +65 6535 6006,
PARKROYAL on Kitchener Road 181 Kitchener Road, Singapore 208533, Tel: +65 6428 3170Other Dim Sum Entries
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
Royal China (Raffles Hotel)
Yan Ting (St Regis)
Old Hong Kong Legend (Raffles City)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
2013-02-04 00:00:00
Ocean Restaurant – A Magical Dining Experience from The Lady Iron Chef Cat Cora
Woh. The first and only lady Iron Chef Cat Cora has joined Resorts World Sentosa to open the Ocean Restaurant. I was partly star-struck when I met this celebrity chef with an impressive resume, known to be an accomplished restaurateur with six restaurants under her belt, a television host of Around the World in 80 Plates, and a guest judge on “Iron Chef”.She is very out-spoken, humorously-friendly yet with a sense of authority that you know can call the shots in the kitchen. You would get that sense during photo-taking with the pose with her usual arms-folded “I am confident” air.Cat’s (whose original name is Catherine) passion for life and food is admirable, being a proud mother of four sons (born with her partner Jennifer Cora), with style of cooking influenced by Julia Child, Barbara Tropp, M.F.K. Fisher and her grandmother, Alma.Her collaboration with RWS marks her first restaurant in Asia. Some of the new dishes at Ocean Restaurant by Cat Cora are Mediterranean-Californian influenced with a touch of Asian elements as she believes in incorporating local ingredients into the dishes.There are some of the Iron Chef’s signatures, such as the Sous Vide 48°C king salmon topped with sustainable caviar and accompanied by Prosecco pear crushed almond, vine tomato jelly and garden cress. All prepared by using sustainable seafood sources.The “Cat Cora Experience” 5-course tasting set dinner at $158++ was surprisingly not as steep as compared to other celebrity chefs’ offerings. But I still come with a higher than high expectation.Amongst which, my favourite dish was the Sakura Shrimp Risotto with Morel Mushroom-Black Truffle Butter Ikura ($28 ala carte). There was a smooth balanced blend of textures, from the creamy risotto with the lightly fried crispy sakura shrimps.Most risottos would have been too heavy for me usually, but this was light and satisfying enough. Unfortunately (and ironically for a seafood restaurant), the seared Hokkaido scallop could have been a lot fresher and juicier.The Grilled Basque Wagyu Striploin, with Leak Bread Pudding and Roasted Sesame- Coriander Vegetables ($120.00 carte) was another favourite, with the meat very evenly prepared, juicy and excellent in execution. There was an interesting tang of coriander-spiciness that our table was divided on – that it was on the heavy side and masked the original savour of the meat.Ocean Restaurant is likely to be one of the most beautiful and magical in Singapore, located right inside the S.E.A Aquarium. I am not exaggerating. You dine with thousands of marine life right beside you, with the Ocean Gallery – the world’s largest aquarium viewing panel just next door.The deep blue sea colours are just breath-taking, as you may get the same sense of peace that I did when the stingray whizzes by.Ocean Restaurant
S.E.A Aquarium, Marine Life Park,22 Sentosa Gateway, Resorts World Sentosa, Singapore 098269, Tel:+65 6577 6869
(If driving, drive through main RWS carpark towards B1 West Carpark Equarius Hotel. The entrance is inside the carpark)
Operating Hours: 11.00am till 10.30pm (Mon-Sun)Other Related Entries
Anar Restaurant (Resorts World)
The Moluccas Rooms (Marina Bay Sands)
Garibaldi (Purvis Street)
il Cielo (Hilton Hotel Singapore) 
Waku Ghin (Marina Bay Sands)
2013-02-01 00:00:00
Krispy Kreme Shinjuku – My Favourite Donut Branch In The World
[Tokyo, Japan] Donut lovers will know all about Krispy Kreme, founded in 1937, said to sell the best donuts in the world. Many friends who are open fans of the donuts will buy back boxes whenever they come back from Bangkok, Seoul, and Australia. Near enough not to spoil.The rejoicing news is, 15 Krispy Kreme franchise locations will be set up in Singapore over the next five years. Despite Krispy Kreme having over 700 locations in 21 countries, there is one branch which I is just so different and which I would always visit if I go to that city… Tokyo’s Shinjuku outlet.This branch at Shinjuku Southern Terrace ((新宿サザンテラス)  in Shibuya-ku is Japan’s first, at a very convenient location right outside a JR station, with a bridge connected to the popular Takashimaya mall.During weekends, there are long queues in get in, and this location is known for providing free hot glazed donuts to patrons waiting in the queue. Are the Japanese the only ones who do that?I remember when I had my very first original glazed Krispy Kreme (which many claim is still the best), I never looked at donuts the same way again. Every donut I ate in my life paled in comparison every since.I make it a point to wake up early to visit this Krispy Kreme, it’s almost like a tourist attraction to many. (I could have subconsciously booked hotels at Shinjuku).  After ordering say a Chocolate Iced Glazed (180Yen, SGD$2.45) a special Mango Jelly donut (200 Yen, SGD$2.70) and Iced Latte (370Yen, SGD$5.00), you could make your way upstairs and grab a seat facing the glass window.While looking out, you can reflect upon life, or Japanese (people)-watch for a good hour. Their perfect fashion sense, from the youngest to the oldest, never fail to amaze me.  My friend Alice actually went to that particular Krispy Kreme every day she was there at Tokyo. (And she was there for a fitness convention.)There is just a little quiet charm in this beautiful two storey shop. Maybe it is the cheerful and polite Japanese staff, maybe it is the soft-sweet glazed donuts, maybe it is a spot where you can watch the world go by,  I know other outlets in the world just cannot replicate that same feeling.Krispy Kreme Shinjuku
Shinjuku Southern Terrace. 2-2-2 Yoyogi, Shibuya-ku, Tokyo, Japan 東京都渋谷区代々木2-2-2 新宿サザンテラス内  Tel: 0120 1072 89
(1 min walk away from the South exit of the Shinjuku Station, and a 10 min walk from the West exit)
Opening Hours: 7:00am – 11:00pmOther Tokyo Entries
Café & Meal Muji (Ginza, Tokyo)
Tsukiji Fish Market (Tsukiji, Tokyo)
Sugamo Konaya (Roppongi, Tokyo)
Tsukiji Honten (Shibuya, Japan)
Ramen Santouka (Shinjuku, Tokyo)
2013-01-31 00:00:00
The Singapore #UniqueHawker Challenge
So I posted a challenge to some fellow food bloggers to find a unique, strange, interesting, never-seen-before hawker food, possibly found in a lone stall in some hawker centre or coffee shop. Thus, the hashtag #UniqueHawkerAfter a very long search, this is my discovery – a stall at Hong Lim Market called the “Famous Sungei Road Trishaw Laksa”, though its laksa is hardly as famous as Katong’s.However, their signature dish is most likely the only one in Singapore, found at no other place… Presenting… The Fruit Juice Crayfish Mee Siam ($6). Huh?When I texted my friend I wanted to try Hong Lim’s famous Fruit Juice Crayfish Mee Siam, she thought I left out the “and” and meant fruit juice and clayfish and mee siam. No, no, no. This dish is everything in one.Mee Siam is a dish of thin vermicelli cooked in a light, spicy, sweet and sour gravy, though the Chinese and Malays in Singapore cook it slightly differently. Ingredients are simple and similar, such as hard boiled egg, bean sprouts and dried bean curd. But NOBODY calls it fruit juice mee siam, or adds a crayfish on top.Owner Daniel Soo is one of the friendliest hawker I ever met, mild-mannered with all smiles. He explained in fluent English that his food is “healthy, all-natural, good quality, and found no where else in Singapore.” I believe him. He uses only fresh products and ingredients because health for customers is his number one priority.The mee siam is more tangy, sour and slightly citrusy, very unlike any other mee siam you ever tried. There is no assam added, only some “secret ingredients” which the owner refused to reveal. I guess there is pineapple juice added. Tell me what you think.The Asia Delight Laksa ($3/$4/$5.50 with crayfish) is also one of a kind. The gravy cooked using fresh coconut, scallops, dried oysters and dried prawns is rather sumptuous and flavourful, yet very very thin with texture like some chicken soup. It is not as ‘lemak’ (coconuty) or thick like the normal (unhealthier) ones, but taste is not compromised.Mr Soo is also generous with the ingredients with fishcake, prawns, cockles, tau pok and slices of chicken added. Where to find?Delicious? Yes. #UniqueHawker? Definitely. Mission accomplished.Famous Sungei Road Trishaw Laksa
Blk 531A Upper Cross Street, Hong Lim Market & Food Centre #02-66, Singapore 051531 (Chinatown MRT)
Opening Hours: 10:30am-6:30pm Mon-Sat (Closed Sun)Other Hawker Entries
Soon Lee Fire-Pot Stew Beef (Alexandra Food Village)
Claypot Laksa (Alexandra Village)
Special Shanghai Tim-Sum (Maxwell Food Centre)
Hock Leng Satay Beehoon Lok Lok (Old Airport Road)
Family Stove + Family Wok (Orchard Towers
2013-01-30 00:00:00
Kok Sen – One of the Best Zi Char Restaurants with Unique Big Prawn Bee Hoon
Keong Siak Street is one of the recent ‘happening’ food places – think about the very hyped-up British inspired bar Keong Siak Snacks, Spanish Tapas bar Esquina, American restaurant Donoma, Restaurant Ember at 1929, Provence Le Restaurant and Thai Mookata steamboat Moojaa.On a search for Singapore’s unique hawker (#UniqueHawker) food, I found myself at Kok Sen Restaurant. Though technically not a hawker place, it is known to serve different-from-usual zhi char and is definitely one of a kind.There are many atypical dishes: Braised big prawn noodles, crispy noodles with shrimp omelette, claypot yong tau fu, black pepper beef with bitter gourd, and salted egg with wolfberry leaves. Most are strange combinations but actually works.Know not what to order? Ask the friendly auntie. All the names of the signatures dishes are also written on bright coloured cards pasted all over the wall in ‘Hong Kong’ restaurant style.This Cantonese-style restaurant most famous dish is its Big Prawn Bee Hoon, costing a pricey $14 for a seemingly humble zi char place. Yes, 14 bucks for hae mee! But quoting L’Oreal, it is worth it, and I have been ordering it almost every single time I come. My tip is to share the bowl with a friend though as it is quite heavy in taste. Plus, you should leave some space for other dishes like the awesome Claypot Yong Tau Fu.The Big Prawn Bee Hoon arrived steaming hot with two huge fresh prawns, partly de-shelled so it is easier to eat. The soup is thick, red, spicy, grainy with hints of belacan. It is so tasty that I would always finish it till the last drop. Some may find the stock a tad too thick and flavoursome though and may need to down some water.Kok Sen’s Big Prawn Crispy Noodles ($14) which looks like the typical ‘shen mian’ also has a unique style unseen in other zi char restaurants. Other than the fact the prawns are larger than large, the noodles remains crisp, fried in delicious starchy – spicy gravy with a nice wok hei flavour.This unique Zi Char place is usually very crowded during weekends. Be there early and you won’t be disappointed.My Review at InSing.com HungryGoWhere – Kok Sen RestaurantKok Sen Restaurant
No 30-32 Keong Saik Road, Singapore 089137
Opening Hours: Lunch: 11.30am – 2.30pm, Dinner: 6.00pm – 10.30pm (Closed on Mon)Other Related Entries
Mellben (Pasir Ris)
Galley By The Straits (Admiralty Road)
Beach Road Scissor Cut Curry Rice (Jalan Besar)
Kay Lee Roast Meat Joint (Paya Lebar)
Malaysian Food Street (Resorts World Sentosa)
2013-01-29 00:00:00
Din Tai Fung – The New Truffle Chicken Soup
Everything I go to Din Tai Fung, there are some regulars I always order: The Xiao Cai Oriental Salad in Special Vinegar Dressing, Fried Rice with Shrimps and Eggs, Noodle Soup with Fried Pork Chop, Hot & Sour Soup, and of course the signature Steamed Pork Dumplings. I can usually just finish two dishes of the vinegary Xiao Cai at one go.Din Tai Fung needs little introduction: Said as one of the world’s Top Ten Best Restaurants by The New York Times and it is even awarded one Michelin Star at its Hong Kong branch. Surprised? (Read: Din Tai Fung at Taipei 101 + Guide To Eating Xiao Long Bao The Right Way)Some may say their Xiao Long Bao are not as delicate as they used to be. Let’s just say that there is greater competition from the likes of Crystal Jade Jiangnan, Imperial Treasure, and Paradise Dynasty and there is definitely some basis for comparison. I still think Din Tai Fung manages to keep up with a relatively consistent quality and taste of its Xiao Long Bao over the years.I do know there are tons of DTF fans who will go gaga over the Steamed Chicken Soup, which tastes really sumptuous, really nutritious as though the fresh chicken essence is going to enhance your inner strength after consumption. At least that’s what some of my friends say.So what if I tell you that very same signature chicken soup simmered for over six hours, has fresh black truffles added into it?The new Truffle Chicken Soup dish ($19.80) will come to your table with this really strong aroma and the truffle smell is very enlivening. You will just smell it again and again before consumption. The soup still remains rich yet delicate, without the original chicken soup flavour being overpowered. It actually tastes expensive and exquisite.This distinctive dish is available available at all branches though, only in limited quantity per day at Paragon, Marina Bay Sands and Resorts World Sentosa branches. Just go to Paragon real early in the day![Giveaway ended] Din Tai Fung Chinese New Year 2013 Special Giveaway! 
Din Tai Fung has created a Golden Fortune Yu Sheng which are available in two toppings options: Smoked Salmon (Standard $38.80, Deluxe $58.80) or Abalone Yu Sheng (Deluxe $88.80) for customers to usher the Chinese New Year with prosperity and abundance (available between 1st and 24th Feb 2013).Din Tai Fung will be giving 5 sets of Golden Fortune Smoked Salmon Yusheng (worth $38.80) to 5 blessed Daniel’s Food Diary readers to enjoy during this festive period.All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET the post on twitter
Step 3: Leave a comment below to name your favourite Ding Tai Fung dish and WHY
Results will be announced 1st Feb (FRI)Din Tai Fung
290 Orchard Road #B1-03 Paragon Shopping Centre #B1-03 Singapore 238859 (Orchard MRT Station), Tel: +65 6836 8336Other Chinese Restaurant Entries
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
Crystal Jade Jiangnan (Vivocity)
Yan Ting (St Regis)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
Old Hong Kong Legend (Raffles City)
2013-01-28 00:00:00
Blackball – The Must Eats at Taiwan’s No1 Glass Jelly Dessert Chain
This Blackball Taiwanese dessert 黑丸嫩仙草 has been attracting long queues at The Star Vista, which seems to be a big hit with the students. Seriously, with Singapore’s hot weather, almost any dessert-thing should work. (Read: The Star Vista’s Complete Food & Restaurant Guide)Blackball is said to be Taiwan’s No.1 grass jelly desert chain, with natural ingredients flown fresh from Guanxi (that’s why more expensive lah.) Some people actually thought it is owned by MediaCorp actor Zhang Yao Dong, which I think he is just a paid endorser. Still, how many Taiwan dessert stalls in Singapore you know have the capital to pay for artiste endorsement?The Taiwanese desserts are available cold, warm, hot or icy. The choice for me is obvious, especially when The Star Vista is non-air-conditioned, and I swiftly ordered the BlackBall Signature Crushed Ice ($4.90), Jiu Fen Taro Ball Crushed Ice ($4.50) and Honey Yam Crushed Ice with Milk.The top-selling BlackBall Crushed Ice comes with an abundant variety of toppings, such as golden sweet potato, pearl, red bean, yam ball, glass jelly topped with milk. Actually, it is qqqqqqquite close to what I had in Taiwan. You know it is not quite there yet, but is still quite delicate especially the glass jelly which has a winning smooth texture yet not being overly sweet.However, the Jiu Fen Taro Ball Crushed Ice is still far from the quality I had in the retro-Chinese backlanes at Jiu Fen. Discounting the price which is probably twice of those in the real Jiu Fen, the presentation is haphazardly messy (The Taiwanese will NEVER allow this to happen), and the taro cubes lack the elegant yet distinct savour of the yam.Surprisingly, the Honey Yam Crushed Ice was my table’s favourite, the yam tenderly soft almost disintegrating in the mouth. The aesthetic value can be improved, but refreshing factor is definitely there.The Taiwanese desserts we had are not (I quote my friend) “life-changing”, but are “nice and deserve a repeat visit”. I concur. Even my Taiwanese friend commented that it is not too bad. The name “Blackball” comes from a combination of ‘black’ glass jelly and taro ‘balls’. And Blackball’s silky glass jelly is indeed one of the best-tasting available here.Blackball Singapore 黑丸嫩仙草
1 Vista Green #02-14/15 The Star Vista Singapore 138617 (Buona Vista MRT) Tel: +65 6694 3070
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pm (Sun-Thurs), 10am – 11pm (Fri-Sat)
Other Branches: Clementi CityVibe #01-19, Bedok North St 1 Blk 204 #01-393, Bugis+ #01-14, 112 Katong #02-27Other Taiwanese Dessert/Drinks Entries
I Love Taimei (Bugis Village)
Koi Bubbletea (Toa Payoh)
HK Gong Cha v SG Gong Cha
Artease Café (Cineleisure)
The Battle of the Bubble Teas
2013-01-23 00:00:00
Danro NEX – Japanese Hot Pot Buffet with 9 Different Broths to Choose From
Somehow this feels like the right season to have some steaming tasty Japanese hot pot, and I found my way to Danro under the Ministry of Food (MOF) hybrid at NEX. Not a big fan of buffet though, since I am a small eater (*cough cough*) and you don’t usually get much quality food at all-you-can-eat places.My table of four was first very surprised at the pricing – $16.90++ for weekday lunch, $22.90++ for weekday dinner, and $24.90++ for weekend dinner. Danro also offer very special rates for senior citizens and children. (I wonder how they earn!) Well, having hot pot is a great way to bond together with family and friends yah?The food here may not come in large massive quantities, but had quality ingredients such as salmon, prawns, shabu shabu beef and pork. Sushi, deep fried items, fresh fruits, soft serve ice cream, assorted daily desserts and drinks are ALL-IN. Though I can probably skip all the seafood, and just spend my time shabu-ing away and dipping the thinly-sliced meats into home-made ponzu sauce and sambal chilli. Oishii!Danro is the 1st hot pot restaurant in Singapore serving specialty hot pots from different regions in Japan – nine in total. Each pot is a half-half ‘yuan-yang’ with two choices of soup. That also meant we managed to try four soup bases.  Great since Singaporeans love variety.Our favourite was the Chicken and Milk Broth from the Nara region, a light and popular tasting soup with balanced savour of chicken, tofu and mushrooms. While I hear that many locals do not fancy the lighter Wafu soup from Akita, this was my next favourite as it brings out the flavours of the dory fish slices and beef.The soups here are cooked for at least 10 hours and are therefore richer than the usual steamboat soups. Most should enjoy Chicken Spicy Broth while ramen soup lovers would also like the Tonkotsu Miso. (The other choices are Chicken Paitan, Tonkotsu, Chicken Miso, and Wafu Miso.)Somehow Japanese style broths just taste more delicate and refreshing, without the overpowering heavy MSG-filled soups offered in some steamboat restaurants. If you are a fan of nabemono, this is warm comfort food. As with all hot pot, the soup just gets better and tastier with time. (I just spent most of my time drinking the soup rather than eating the ingredients.)Our table was presented with 4 sticks of rice which looked rather strange, like carb sausages. Call us mountain tortoises. The rice skewer is Danro’s signature food called the Kiritanpo. It was slightly and sweet-salty carb, not bad when the rice absorbs the soup. The Kiritanpo is a traditional rice stick, a must-have with Japanese hot pot which the head chef Kazunori Sonoda insisted on including. “This is Japanese culture!”[Giveaway Ended] Danro Japanese Hot Pot Vouchers Giveaway! 
Danro Japanese Hot Pot Vouchers at NEX will be giving 10 sets of $20 vouchers to 10 blessed Daniel’s Food Diary readers to enjoy the delicious buffet!All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of Daniel’s Food Diary and DANRO Singapore
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET the post on twitter
Step 3: Leave a comment below to name your favourite DANRO broth and WHY
Results will be announced 30th Jan (WED)DANRO Japanese Hot Pot Buffet by MOF
Serangoon NEX #02-04/06 (Serangoon MRT) Tel:  +65 6634 4608
FaceBook:  www.facebook.com/DanroSingapore
Operating hours:  Mon-Thurs, Sun & PH 11:30am-3:30pm, 5:30pm-10:00pm; Fri-Sat & Eve PH 11:30am – 3:30pm, 5:30pm – 10:30pm*The above entry brought to you by Ministry of Food (MOF).
2013-01-22 00:00:00
Marutama Ramen – The Chicken Ramen Gets Lukewarm Response at Killiney Road
Never mind its mildly offensive name if you know Hokkien,  was known to be the best chicken stock ramen in Singapore. I use the word “was” because Ramen Keisuke Tori King came along, while I have become an absolute fan of Nantsutei’s version of chicken broth ramen. (Read: 5 New & Best Ramen Places in Singapore)Fans of Marutama Ramen (I call it the basketball face ramen) swear by it and gives their full support at its branches at Central, Liang Court and United Square. Surprisingly, response at its new Killiney Road branch is rather lukewarm, with less than three tables of customers everytime I went. Come-on, the mammoth Singtel is just opposite.If you are Marutama’s boss and happen to be reading this (or somebody who intends to take this shop space some time down the road), this corner shop has changed hands from House of Rice Roll and Porridge , Sun Coffee Planet, Ding Ji Café to BigBank Café which also did not manage to survive. I leave you to sum your own conclusion.Marutama’s selection is simple with four types to choose from – Non-spicy chicken soup ($12), Nama Karashi spicy chicken soup ($12), Aka ramen with 7 kinds of ground nuts mixture ($15) and Tan-men chicken soup ramen with vegetable toppings ($13).What attracts me most is the thin-curly homemade Hakata-styled ramen noodle, which kinds of resembles instant noodle (and I don’t mean it in a bad way). It is one of the first stores which serve pure Toripaitan broth (milky chicken broth), which needs to be cooked and prepared about 5 hours daily.My personal favourite is its Aka Ramen as there is a more layered nutty taste and light-spicy flavour which is quite unique and unexpected if you are a virgin to their soup. Do add some of those deep-fried garlic which brings out the essence of the soup. But don’t do that during a date.Marutama is a well-known Ramen which has developed their shops not only in Japan, but also in Singapore, Indonesia, Malaysia and Thailand since the first restaurant in 2001. Let us see how long its newest Killiney branch can survive.Marutama Ramen (Killiney Road)
75 Killiney Road Singapore 239529 (8-10 minutes walk from Somerset MRT)Other Ramen Entries
Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen (Novena Square 2)
Keisuke Tonkotsu King (Orchid Hotel)
Uma Uma Ramen (Forum Galleria)
Kitakata Rahmen Tamakichi (Orchard Plaza)
Keishoken Ramen (Great World City)
2013-01-21 00:00:00
Tom’s Citizoom – Never Seen Before Fish Chor Mee
This is my second time to Tom’s Citizoom Mee Pok Tar, and I was caught a little by surprised when Tom remembered who I was “Yes Daniel, what’s your order? How many hawkers remember their customer’s name after two visits?Tom is a 28-young old ‘Ah Boy” (he still looks like he is 22) who is the owner cum cook of the stall, even though he has a polytechnic diploma. This is quite unusual as the younger Singaporeans do not want to be hawkers, seen as a ‘lower-class’ job.And if you think only the older uncles can cook up an excellent bowl of mee pok, you are quite wrong. Tom does a very good job for his age and experience.I had my usual order – a simple yet awesome bowl of Fish Chor Mee. You would have thought “fish chor mee” could be just an inventive way of repacking the same old stuff, but this was one delicious bowl priced at only $2.50.The springy mee pok which took Tom 4 years to perfect his recipe, was with mouth-watering slices of fishcake. The juicy handmade fishcake and fishballs are supplied by Tom’s uncle, whose who is called Citizoom (therefore the name). The fishcake is only cut into slices just before serving, retaining its moisture within.While there is no minced pork, the bowl is topped with crispy fish flakes which add an additional bite to the noodles.If only there are more Toms around – young educated hawkers who can cook up a storm, yet being able to retain some of the most traditional tastes. Will you be such a hawker?My Review at InSing.com HungryGoWhere – Tom’s Citizoom Mee Pok TarTom’s Citizoom Mee Pok Tar
Blk 57 Lengkok Bahru, #01-04 Singapore 151057 (10 minute walk from Redhill MRT), Tel:+65 9742 0865
Opening hours: Mon-Sun 8:30am-3:00pm (Closed alternate Sun and PH)Other Noodle Entries
Singapore’s Most Popular Noodle Stalls
Ah Guan Mee Pok (Syed Awi)
Pin Xiang Noodles(Toa Payoh Lor 4)
Nam Seng Noodles (Far East Square)
Claypot Laksa (Alexandra Village)
2013-01-18 00:00:00
5 Best Places to Dine at Bugis+, the new iluma
When Illuma did not work out, this mall at Bugis with the illuminated ‘crystal’ façade went for an overhaul with a lot more shopping and F&B outlets. Thus the birth of Bugis+, or Bugis Plus.Some of the new food places include Aloha Ma Maison, Aston Specialties, Blackball, C-Jade HK Café IN, Coco Ichibanya, Laksania, Zebra.C, Rocku Japanese Charcoal Grill, Taipei Station and Ireland’s Potatoes. CapitalMall made the right move with increasing the choice available is definitely a lot better, with many of these brands unseen in other parts of Singapore.When in doubt, here are 5 of the most popular places to dine at Bugis+.Poulet – French Casual Dining with Yummy Chicken
Poulet (pronounced Poo-lay, meaning chicken) is Thai Express’s baby of a French casual dining restaurant at Bugis+ offering adorable French classics to the masses. The star of the restaurant has to be its Poulet Roti ($15.80 for half, $28.80 for whole), or chicken – brined for a full day in a traditional recipe and placed in a rotisserie for a slow roast to tan to a golden brown. Its home-made white and creamy mushroom Chardonnay Sauce is probably one of the best and addictive chicken sauces I had in a long time.  Since its opening, it enjoys one of the best fanfare at Bugis+. There has been very differing reviews though. The main challenge for them is to keep food and service standards consistent.Ramen Champion – The Best of Ramen in One Place 
This formula is ingenious, gathering six of the best ramen shops in a single place for a competition.  Best is subjective. The year before, Ikkousha ‘s hakata-style thin ramen won the heart of customers more than 100,000 bowls sold in a year, beating seconding place Bario at 65,529 bowls. Last year, Aoyama and Taka-no-Tsume joined in the competition.  Ikkousha with its tasty broth still remains the best in my opinion. When in doubt, go for the stall with the longest queue, or follow the style that you like. Some of the bowls are not really up to expectation; the good thing is they are likely to be out the next year.Yayoiken – Affordable Japanese Sets
At Yayoiken, you would find hamburger steaks, grilled mackerel, pork cutlets, beef steak and mixed grills – food more Western in flavours. Personally, I love the Japanese take on Western food, such as pasta, as they are usually lighter and more delicate. Yayoiken is really affordable for a Japanese restaurant standard. A Buta Shogayaki, Saba miso or Oyako don set can cost only $9.90. So that’s stir fried sliced pork, with Japanese rice, miso, salad and tofu costing slightly more than $10 after taxes. Queues are long during peak hours, but I guess it’s worth the wait.KungFu Paradise – Late Night Suppers at Hong Kong Cafe
Just like any Hong Kong café which sells mannnnnny things, Kungfu Paradise puts on the dining table popular Hong Kong cuisine (such as dim sum, rice and noodles), Western picks (pasta, sandwiches and toast) and desserts. I am usually sceptical of chilli crab ‘anything’, but Kungfu Paradise’s Seafood Chili Crab Pasta ($9.90) was HOT, almost like the real thing, with the noodles swimming in an oily, spicy and fiery mix. Good news for youths (and bad news for their parents), this Hong Kong Café opens till very late at night which provides supper-goers a great place to nibble and hang out.Bonchon Chicken – Korean Fried Chicken
For those who have yet to try Bonchon’s Korean style fried chicken, it is deep fried twice – so the skin becomes crunchier and the meat less greasy when compared to the usual American fast food fried chicken. And according to its menu, the chicken contains ZERO trans fat. It feels kind of pricy to me. A medium combo of 6 wings, 2 drumsticks with one side is $15.90, and I am only saying it because the pieces are quite small. Also, be prepared to wait due to its double-fried preparation time needed. Flipside is the chicken can be considered too dry. And they don’t serve tap water.Bugis+, 201 Victoria Street Singapore 188067 (Bugis MRT Station)Other 5 Best Entries
5 New & Best Ramen Places in Singapore
5 Best New Food Places At Tiong Bahru 
5 Best Turkish Street Food from Istanbul 
5 Oozing Food That Singaporeans Love
5 Stalls To Try at Maxwell Food Centre
2013-01-17 00:00:00
District 10 at Star Vista – Eat The Tapas & Smash Your Stress
District 10 Bar Tapas Restaurant allows you to smash your glass bottles, not within their shop but in a customized see-through box. All in the name of relieving your stress. If you want, there is an iPad where you can facebook your boss’s photo and smash your stress. Wonderful idea?“Anybody you hate?” I was asked. And I thought for a while, pondered, and could not find a single person I really wanted to smash. (I love everyone in my life, even my boss).  So I went back to the food.This new tapas restaurant at the Star Vista is pretty much the place you would hang out with your colleague and friends after work/before dinner during for a Happy Hour. (Read: The Star Vista’s Complete Food & Restaurant Guide)There are more than 35 selections of tapas and pinchos (spike in Spanish) that are made of fresh and seasonal produce to choose from. Some of the not-to-be-missed dishes include the Mini Black Angus Cheddar Cheese burger ($7), Manchego Cheese and Jamon Croquette ($8.80), and Jumbo Crab Cake ($14). Most ideal with a cool icy beer.Since there are so many items, let me make some recommendations. My favourite of the sides is the Mini Burger, with juice tender Angus beef patty and bun that was warm and soft.Epicure once named District’s 10’s Hoegaarden Battered Fish & Chips ($22) as one of the Top Ten Fish & Chips in Singapore, and I would concur with that.  It is worthy. The beer battered fish was superiorly crunchy, even though I took some time photographing the dish before taking my bite. The fries were just as addictive and crazy good when dipped into a mixture of mint and truffles sauce.The better news is this Tapas Restaurant is bringing back some of the popular items from the OLD District 10 menu, such as Chilli Crab Pizza, Sambal Prawn Pizza, Beef Rendang Pizza, Wagyu Beef Rendang served with pita bread and Balinese Grilled Chicken with rice.The Soft Shell Chilli Crab Pizza ($25) made me eat more than I wanted to (like 3 slices) because the sauce was just very sweet-spicy-yummy. (Okay, there could be more sauce overall.) Topped with mozzarella cheese, fried soft shell crab, chilli crab meat and rocket lettuce, this is good to share with four other friends.Desserts are not their strongest forte though. Let’s just say the tastes of the New York Cheese Cake ($10) and Warm Chocolate Cake with vanilla ice cream ($14) did not match up to their photogenic looks, though the District 10 Sour Cheery Sundae ($11) is probably the one you should leave with if you need something sweet and satisfying.[Giveaway Ended] District 10 Bar Tapas Restaurant Giveaway! 
District 10 Bar Tapas Restaurant at Star Vista will be giving 5 sets of $30 vouchers to 5 blessed Daniel’s Food Diary readers!All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET the post on twitter
Step 3: Leave a comment below to say WHY you want to ‘Smash your Stress’. No hatred speech please, be funny & creative! 
Results will be announced 23rd Jan (WED)District 10 Bar Tapas Restaurant
1 Vista Exchange Green, The Star Vista #01-42/K3 Singapore 138617 (Buona Vista MRT), Tel: +65 6694 2884
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 3pm, 6pm-11pm (Mon-Thurs), 11:30am-3pm, 6pm-1am (Fri), 11am-3pm, 6pm-1am (Sat), 11am-6pm, 6pm-11pm (Sun)Other Star Vista Entries
The Star Vista’s Complete Food & Restaurant Guide 
NeNe Chicken (The Star Vista)
Morganfield’s (The Star Vista)
Bornga (The Star Vista)
Sogurt (The Star Vista)
2013-01-16 00:00:00
50 Lan (50嵐) – This Is The Original KOI
[Taipei, Taiwan] Some of my friends who travel to Taipei were asking, “There is NO KOI in Taipei!” In case you do not know why that shock, KOI is one of the most known bubble tea brands in Singapore. Nothing beats having your favourite drink from where it origins.They are about right. There is NO KOI in Taipei (maybe only in Taichung)…  but the brand is known as 50 Lan (50嵐) over there instead. It was marketed as KOI in Singapore – good move as it has a more hip and contemporary vibe to attract local youths.Look around the streets of Taipei and 50 Lan’s popularity will be obvious – bright yellow signage with sky blue logo.  The number of branches they have is perhaps coincidental… 50 in total. It is not be exaggerating to say that out of every 20 shops you see in Taipei (especially near the night markets), one is a bubbletea/beverage/fruit juice/jelly-whatever-drink place.50 Lan started way back in 1994 as a humble beverage and fruit juice stall which also sells those giant bigger-than-your-face fried chicken cutlets (salivating for Hao Da Chicken Culet now). There is no special meaning to its name, gotten when its owner Mr Ma was touring Japan and thought 50 Lan has a ring and is easy to remember.There are 5 main categories sold – tea, jelly, milk tea, juice and latte, with more than 100s of different permutations and combination of drinks you can think of.Some of my personal favourites from 50 Lan: the creamy sweet Hazelnut Milk Tea (NT$35, $1.50), layer frothy Black Tea Macchiato (NT$35, SGD$1.50), refreshing light Mango Baozhong (NT$30, SGD$1.30) and superb drink-it-fast Ice Cream Tea (NT$30, SGD$1.30). All the drinks are very reasonably priced, most below $2.Do not leave Taiwan without trying a milky smooth tea-fragrant 50 Lan bubbletea. Go easy on them though, think about your waistline.Other Taiwan Entries
Ji Guang Xiang Xiang Ji (Taiwan)
Ah Zong Mian Xian (Taiwan) 
Modern Toilet Restaurant
Anping Bean Jelly (Tainan)
Din Tai Fung (Taipei)
2013-01-15 00:00:00
Ryoshi Sushi Ikeikemaru – Quality Sushi at Reasonable Prices
These days you can’t get quality sushi at reasonable prices, most ‘authentic’ restaurants coming with steep price tags. And the cheap ones taste, well, cheap.Until I found Ryoshi Sushi Ikeikemaru at Liang Court, with sushi such as Ebi Prawn, Mongo Ika Cuttlefish, Tobikko Fish Row and Inari priced at $1.80 for two pieces.Even the more expensive selections Maguro Tuna, Anago Sea Eel, and Shimesaba Mackerel are at $3.80 for two. The fish comes from a variety of places, with most shipped in from markets in Hokkaido. Shipment arrives on Tuesday and Thursday, so plan your days if you want the freshest sashimi.You may frown upon conveyor sushi belts, like “how good can the sushi be really?”  Ryoshi Sushi Ikeikemaru surprisingly is a notch better than the usual brands, boosting of Japanese chef and Japanese-speaking staff. Most of the customers seem to be Japanese as well.I have been told again and again if you spot real Japanese at a Japanese restaurant in Singapore, just go for it. You can’t fool around with the Japanese in terms of food.Service-wise, they were obviously short-handed. But at least staffs were polite and tried their best to serve well.If cold sushi is not your cup of tea, a selection of hot food such as noodles and donburi are on its menu too. My other choices such as Maguro Avocado Salad ($8.60), Assorted Tempura ($10.60), and Tori Karaage ($5.80) though not spectacular, were certainly better than the average sushi shops (which shall remain unnamed).All these plus 8 pieces of fresh sushi and Chawanmushi came up to less than $50 for three persons. No wonder the long queue during the weekends!Ryoshi Sushi Ikeikemaru Singapore 師寿司　活けいけ丸 シンガポール
177 River Valley Road Basement 1 Liang Court, Singapore 179030 (10 min walk from Clarke Quay MRT), Tel: + 65 6337 1022
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 9:30pmOther Sushi Entries
Sushi Tei (Ngee Ann City)
Maki-San (The Cathay)
Seki (Rendezvous Hotel)
Itacho Sushi (Plaza Singapura)
Sushi Express (City Link Mall)
2013-01-14 00:00:00
Dian Xiao Er Grand Reunion Contest
We have seen Facebook contests of all kind, but this “Grand Reunion 大团圆” contest by Dian Xiao Er is really quite different and fun. This is based on the reunion dinner that the Chinese will hold on Chinese New Year Eve.To join the contest, you must ‘host’ a table of table of 10 (including yourself). All qualified tables stand a chance to win the grand prize of $888 Cash for the Host and the fans of that table will win one of the 9 x S$88 Dian Xiao Er voucher.Join my Hosted table 1
Join my Hosted table 2
Join my Hosted table 3What are the prizes?
Grand Prize: 
For one lucky qualified table will be randomly selected at the end of the contest.
1 x $888 Cash for the Host,  9 x $88 Cash each for those who joined the tableMost Popular Host: 
1 x $388 Cash for the Host who has the most number of qualified tablesWhat is the duration of the contest? 
This contest starts on 10 January 2013, at 12.01am and ends on 9 February 2013 at 11.59pm (Singapore time).How to join the contest? 
1. You have to ‘like’ the Dian Xiao Er fan page to enter the contest.
2. You can then open or host as many table as they would like to have, with the following options:
•	Public – anyone can join the table
•	Friends Only – any friends of the host can join the table
•	Invitation – only those invited by the host can join the table
*Note: All tables hosted, must NOT have the same people joining
3. Fan(s) can also join any table opened to them. Each table can only accommodate up to 10 people including the host, and that table is considered ‘qualified’.Join my Hosted table 1
Join my Hosted table 2
Join my Hosted table 3
May we all HUAT and win!Other Related Entries
Dian Xiao Er (Serangoon NEX)*The above entry is an advertorial.
2013-01-11 00:00:00
Peony Tea S – 10 Things You Probably Do Not Know About Chinese Tea
I am not lying when I say I drink Chinese tea almost every morning, when my love for Chinese tea rekindled after trips to Taiwan’s Alishan and China’s Shantou which is the land of origin of kungfu tea. Some may consider it an ‘old man’s drink’, or that preparing gongfu tea is a set of tedious process.Psychologically (and even physically), drinking Chinese tea makes me feel cleansed, rejuvenated and relaxed, as though all the greasiness from food is ‘washed away’. While English tea houses are very popular locally, I think it is about time Chinese tea gets some attention and perhaps be more glorified.While I am a tea drinker, there are many mistakes that I make in drinking tea. I met up with Derek from online tea shop Peony Tea S  to find out about the finer arts of tea drinking.Here are 10 Things You Probably Do Not Know About Chinese Tea1. The 6 categories of teas are green tea, white tea, yellow tea, oolong tea, black tea and dark tea otherwise known as post-fermented teas.2. If you see someone tapping on the table after drinking tea, there are actually thanking the tea master. The fingers tapping signify a bowing servant and a sign of respect.3. Light-coloured teas go better with lighter-coloured food (chicken, fish, seafood), while darke- coloured teas go better with red meats and oiler food.4. Black Tea is known as Red Tea in Chinese (think about your bubbletea red tea) because Westerners name teas after the color of the leaves while Chinese name it after the color of the brewed tea.5. Oolong tea and Pu-er are the most popular teas in Singapore due to the predominant Hokkien community.6. Tea that has been left overnight should not be drunk as bacteria will grow on it when left unattended.7. Tea should not be drunk immediately before and after meal times (half an hour before and an hour after) because this will hinder with absorption of iron in the body.8. Do not drink cold tea (I am so guilty of this) as cold tea is ‘damp’ and damages the stomach and digestive system. So how about bubble tea? At least the traditional Taiwanese style is not brewed hot and cooled with ice but rather ice-brewed.9. Loose tea leaves are always better than tea bags because the quality of the tea is usually much better, tea leaves can unfurl to release more flavours,  over-steeping of tea bags often lead to bitterness (‘siap siap’ taste).10. Black tea generally survives better in tea bags than green tea since freshness and shelf life is less of an issue. Have black tea if you really need to drink from a tea bag.[Giveaway Ended] Peony Ts Chinese New Year Giveaway
Online Teashop Peony Tea S will be giving 3 sets of Peony Tea S Starter Kits  (worth $68 each) to 3 blessed Daniel’s Food Diary readers.The Starter Kit includes a tea set and 2 ‘servings’ of a variety from each of the 6 major categories of tea. This way, you can also try everything and find your preferred types of tea.All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook pages of Daniel’s Food Diary and and Peony Tea S
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET the post on twitter
Step 3: Leave a comment below to share your favourite Chinese tea type and why
Results will be announced 18th Jan 2013.Peony Tea S
Peony Tea S  is an online tea shop that specializes in loose tea leaves and brewing utensils from China and Taiwan. They are not only selling tea wares – they want to help you enjoy your tea to its fullest- whether it is maximizing the taste of your drink or minimizing the hassle. Plus, their tea comes in attractive modern packaging and makes a really suitable gift for the Chinese New Year and other festive seasons.
Website: www.peonyts.com*The above entry is an advertorial.
2013-01-08 00:00:00
Dian Xiao Er – The House of Juicy Herbal Roast Duck
Beijing is famous for its sliced Peking Duck, and it is about time that Singapore promotes more of the flavourful Herbal Roast Duck, found at Dian Xiao Er. Actually, I do not know of anywhere here which makes these herbals ducks better than them.I am a more of a chicken than a duck person.  But when I have duck cravings, I know l can make my way to Marina Square which is one of its original branch. Or NEX which has a fascinating ang-pao red colour and décor, red ribbon lanterns and a red OTT wedding wall. No kidding –it’s quite interesting and you feel transported back to the period drama times of China.Dian Xiao Er’s signature dish is the Ten Wonder Herbs Roast Duck ($13.60 for small, $25.30 for medium), where the herbs is said to revitalize energy and relief mental stress. I am not sure if it is indeed the herbs or duck, but I do feel happier after savouring a slice of its meat – tender and somewhat sweetish juicy. You know how duck meat at lousier stalls can be dry and tough, this is the opposite.I much preferred its less known Angelica Herb Roast Duck ($12.90 for small, $24.30 for medium), where the flavours are stronger and less herbal. If you never never never ever had Dian Xiao Er’s duck before, you never know what you are missing out.Imagine your usual favourite roast duck but with more juice that is sealed within the duck, said to be marinated overnight to allow the sauces to fully permeate within.If you want something lighter to balance the taste, I would recommend the Wheatgrass Tofu ($12.60) which is slightly jade green as it is infused with wheatgrass extract. Fried with fresh prawns and scallops, the beancurd is soft and sauce quite healthy-tasting.Heard of Gangnam style prawns? This is not exactly Korean, but a tongue-in-chic way to name Dian Xiao Er’s Jiangnan Baked Fresh Prawn ($21.90 for small, $43.60 for large). The taste somewhat reminds of the aromatic butter crabs I had in Malaysia, and rest assured that the prawns are HUGE.Dian Xiao Er also offers Chinese New Year Reunion Dinner Takeaway Reservation. If you prefer dining in the comfort of your home, get their takeaway packages which can include their signature Herbal Roasted Duck and Prosperity Yu Sheng.[Giveaway Ended] Chinese New Year Giveaway – Dian Xiao Er Vouchers
Dian Xiao Er will be giving 5 sets of $50 vouchers to 5 lucky Daniel’s Food Diary readers!All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook pages of Daniel’s Food Diary and Dian Xiao Er
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET the post on twitter
Step 3: Leave a comment below to name the dishes you would order if you won the $50 voucher.Results will be announced Tues 15 Jan 2013. Contest winners must have local Singapore addresses. Jia You!Dian Xiao Er Singapore
NEX Serangoon Central #02-09/10 (Serangoon MRT, Northeast line), Tel: +6634 4828Other branches: Ang Mo Kio Ave 3, Changi Airport Terminal 3, Jurong Pt, Lot One, Marina Square, Vivocity, Tampines One*The above entry is brought to you by Dian Xiao Er.
2013-01-07 00:00:00
Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen – Ever Tried A Volcano Ramen?
Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen at Novena Square 2 is known for its Volcano Ramen, and you may be wondering if its pork broth erupts and spills to the face. Not really.Simply put, this Osaka-based shop uses a cone-shaped lip with a cylinder top to cover their noodles, and steam comes out during the cooking process just like an erupting volcano. Sodesu ne.There is something about Singaporean and their obsession for ramen (actually pot calling the kettle black). In the last few months, we have seen Ramen Keisuke Tori King (Amara Hotel), Kitakata Rahmen Tamakichi (Orchard Plaza), Menya Musashi Kodou (Ion Orchard), Uma Uma Ramen (Forum Galleria), Ramen Bar Suzuki (Boat Quay) and Keishoken Ramen (Great World City) set foot in our small island. And yes, I am the sort who will search to find the Best Ramen. (Read: 5 New & Best Ramen Places in Singapore)This is how their Ishiyaki Ramen or Hot Stone Roast Ramen ($18++) works:
1. Soup is poured into a preheated 300 degree Celsius stone bowl with all the ingredients inside. Warning: HOT!!
2. The bowl is covered by a conical lid for one minute. Experience the ‘eruption’! (Don’t be silly to put your face over the cover.)
3. You can continue to put the rest of the soup in. Mix the ingredients and noodles well.
4. Transfer the ramen to a smaller bowl to enjoy.I was supposed to add rice into the left-over soup mixture, but the waitress obviously left out my rice!The best part of the volcano ramen is its soup. It is obviously warm throughout and very comforting if it is a rainy day. (For your information, there is also a curry version. Ooooo.)If you are the sort that loves your broth thick, thick and thick, yet not overly salty, this pork bone soup prepared everyday early morning should be to your liking. Veggie lovers should be glad to know that there is A LOT of vegetables like cabbage, carrots, leeks and bean sprouts added.On the flipside, the noodles were slightly thick for my liking. It did not help that the chewy strands got slightly soggy as I struggled to finish the big bowl. I seriously think that this can feed two persons. Fortunately (or unfortunately), I am the kind who does not like to waste food.Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen also sells the usual Shoyu, Shio and Karamiso Ramen ($12.00) – the last bowl of tonkotsu broth enhanced with special blended spicy miso paste being my favourite. While this small shop may seem rather gimmicky, they actually serve quite decent stuff.Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen
10 Sinaran Drive #02-68/69 Square 2, Singapore 307506 (Novena MRT), Tel: +65 6397 6636Other Ramen Entries
Keishoken Ramen (Great World City)
Uma Uma Ramen (Forum Galleria)
Menya Musashi Kodou (Ion Orchard)
Kitakata Rahmen Tamakichi (Orchard Plaza)
Ramen Keisuke Tori King (Amara Hotel)
2013-01-04 00:00:00
5 Best Turkish Street Food from Istanbul
[Istanbul, Turkey] Istanbul is described as the most exotic and most inspiring land in the world, offering some of the best street food around. While you are at the old Istanbul Sultan Ahmet area admiring the Blue Mosque, Hagia Sophia and Topkapi Palace, or making some cheap buys at the 500 years old Grand Bazaar and Spice Market, take a bite of their famous kebap, doner and borek available outside these amazing sites.Some of the narrower lanes are worth exploring, and you never know what you are going to find. If you are lost, let the aroma lead your way.Here’s a list of my 5 Favourite Turkish Street Food, some may take you more to stomach.Kokoreç (Kokorech)
Who would have expected my Number 1 Turkish street food to be a strange-looking sandwich filled with… gasp… lamb intestines! While you may see this to be on Fear Factor, the Kokoreç made with suckling lambs or goat innards is chewy-spicy-tasty. The dish popular with nomadic Turks is first roasted on a horizontal skewer like a rotisserie chicken, chopped with tomatoes and green pepper, and served in a quarter bread. On a normal day, intestines (especially unclean ones) are a no-no for me, but no regrets this time. Sounds a tad gross, so would you try it?Pide (Pee-deh)
Pide in some countries is known as the pita, a slightly leavened wheat bread usually oval in shape. It almost tastes like the Italian pizza with the exception of a pocket in the middle. This shop, Mavi Haliç Pide Salonu at Kutucular Sk near the Spice Bazaar serves them fresh piping hot, over a large oven for about 10 minutes. Choose your toppings from spicy sausage, minced lamb to my favourite yellow cheese – where simplicity works its best.Doner Kebab
Singaporeans should be familiar with the Doner kebab, sometimes seen in our pasar malam. Actually this should be the most familiar Turkish street food sold in various cities. As my tour group did not serve a single Doner kebab the whole trip, I took a detour in the Spice Bazaar to enjoy my Durum (thin roll) sheet in a back alley on a stool where cats roam around. Good decision made. Some do not like the idea of the same meat being reheated every single day (goodness for how long), but who could resist those oily thin sliced meats coming off the rotating vertical spit. A pity for its extremely high salt content.Simit
You can call the Simit a ‘Turkish bagel’. I have seen these ring-shaped savoury loaves in almost every breakfast, almost everywhere at the old Sirkeci area. These are mostly sold in push-cart trollies, though you are likely to see some vendors carrying a tray of the bread on their head! (I only caught one since it was snowing most of the time). Looking like a donut, the simit is slightly crunchy on the outside with sesame seed, and chewy on the inside. Best eaten with soup or humus dips.Kestane The Chinese would call this ‘gao luck’ which simply means roasted chestnut. Even if you are not a fan, its aroma during a cold winter day right outside the Hagia Sophia would tempt you to take a bag. A hundred grams for a bag of say seven pieces would set you back by 4 Turkish Lira, that’s about SGD$2.70 or USD $2.20. If you are nearer the touristy areas, that would be 5. Not too bad, though my preference is with softer chestnuts.Çiğ köfte (Chee Kufta) 
An additional choice if you are game to try – I didn’t like it, the others in the tours loved it. Çiğ köfte is otherwise known as raw meat patty, but this hole-in-the wall stall Cig Kofetci li Usta is made of cracked wheat grain. A lump of brown – tell me what it looks like. Word has it that it was invented by Urfa in the time of Abraham. Here’s what you need to do: Stretch up your bare hands, put some lettuce on it, dump a lump of ‘raw patty’,  and the owner would squeeze lemon juice right all over. On your hands.Other 5 Best Entries
5 Must Try Food in Taipei 
5 Restaurants at HarbourCity for Doreamon
5 Strangest Durian Combinations
5 Stalls To Try at Maxwell Food Centre
5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru
2013-01-03 00:00:00
Osaka Ohsho – The King of Gyoza Arrives at Raffles City
It’s about time that a shop specialising in gyoza opens in Singapore, since fried dumplings are always playing second fiddle to their ramen counterparts. Osaka Ohsho is said to be “The King of Gyoza in Osaka”, a franchise with more than 300 outlets in in Asia, and has finally arrived to Raffles City.I was curious at all the Chinese-sounding dishes in this Japanese restaurant – like the Sichuan Mabo Tofu ($7.90), Ban Ban Chicken ($5.90), Hui Guo Ruo ($9.90) and Black Vinegar Fried Chicken ($9.90, $14.90 for set). That is because the gyoza specialist is also known for its Chuka Chinese-inspired dishes, so you can get the best of both worlds.Like nearby neighbours Nam Nam Noodle Bar and Tiong Bahru Bakery, Osaka Ohsho has a long queue during lunchtime. (And you won’t miss the giant gyoza at the storefront.) Tables are aplenty, so the wait was not too long.When you look at the prices on the menu, it’s little wonder why the attraction. $3.90 for six 1and $7.80 for twelve gyoza. That’s 65 cents per piece, way more affordable that some ramen shops selling them at least $5-6 for the same number.I am a fan of different incarnations of dumplings, whether guotie, jiaozi or gyoza. But only when the skin is thin enough.The verdict? The meat dumplings are delightfully pan-fried – loving its thinly crisp outer layer with skin freshly made daily with Japanese flour. The inner filling with pork and some cabbage and garlic, was slightly moist and could do with more juice. I like the bite-and-spurt like a xiao long bao feeling that it’s lacking. Know what I mean?I finished all six single-handedly nevertheless.Osaka Ohsho’s sets also come with three gyoza each, so you may want to portion it out or share with a friend. Unless nine gyoza is not a problem for you.The table’s favourite was the intriguing Fuwatoro Tenshin Han ($9.90) which looks like omu-rice with mui-fan gravy. “Omu rice?” Waitress says, “No….. this softer.” Indeed the omelette blanketing over is quite fluffy, almost pillow-like with fluffy Koshihikari rice within. Definitely Osaka Ohsho’s star dish.[Giveaway Ended] 2013 New Year Giveaway – Osaka Ohsho vouchers
Gyoza Specialist Osaka Ohsho Singapore will be giving 5 sets of $20 vouchers to 5 lucky Daniel’s Food Diary readers!All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook pages of Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET the post on twitter
Step 3: Leave a comment below to name the dishes you would order if you won the voucher.Osaka Ohsho Singapore
#B1-75 Raffles City Shopping Centre, 252 North Bridge Road Singapore 179103 (Raffles City MRT), Tel: +65 6338 5584
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 9:45pmOther Japanese Restaurant Entries
Menya Musashi Kodou (Ion Orchard)
Hoshino Coffee (Plaza Singapura)
Yayoiken (Bugis+)
Hifiumi (Plaza Singapura)
Japanese Dining SUN (CHIJMES)
2012-12-28 00:00:00
“I WAS THERE” with Samsung GALAXY Camera – An Italian Food Journey at Da Paolo BistroBar
Photographs create moments, and a good camera will help to build good memories. Ever been to a magical place, or experienced something so wonderful, but yet regretting not bringing a handy camera along to capture those moments? We have all been THERE before.So I thought that the I WAS THERE initiative by Samsung, which takes “Samsung reporters” for various extraordinary adventures, bringing people to places they could only imagine, was such a fantastic one.After a successful GALAXY Camera Fans’ Exclusive Event at The Line, I suggested to Samsung to take our lucky Samsung reporters on an Italian food journey at Da Paolo BistroBar.Let’s see… wonderful open ambience at the Rochester, delicious Italian cuisines, plus the chance to make Da Paolo’s signature Tiramisu and meet the cute-looking Chef Andrea Scarpa, our Samsung reporters Steve, Juliana and Stephanie certainly had a different I WAS THERE experience.And aren’t we honoured to be part of the inaugural I WAS THERE?Our Samsung reporters were all armed with the best equipment, the new Samsung GALAXY Camera (retailing at $698 without contract) which runs on the Andriod 4.1.1 (Jelly Bean)  platform for them to connect, upload and share photos DIRECTLY from the camera.Interesting, ALL the reporters coincidentally happened to be Samsung GALAXY Note users, so they got so familiar with the GALAXY Camera in minutes. I think they got even better than me after playing around with their toy for a while. (It’s pretty idiot proof anyway!)Some of the key features of the GALAXY Camera are its 16 megapixel lens with a surprisingly long 21x Zoom with bright F/2.8 at wide angle. One thing we all noticed was that the screen was unusually wide and big, so you can view the pictures clearly and fully. Best if you want to take your food pictures up close. There are also no protruding buttons, and all controls and apps are easily found on the screen.These are what our Samsung Reporters had: Fresh Taglatelle with crab meat in lobster bisque sauce, and Spaghetti Aglio Olio with mushrooms, cherry tomatoes and rocket salad. All were taken under dim romantic lighting without the use of flash.The highlight of the I WAS THERE was the creation of Da Paolo’s signature tiramisu with Chef Andrea’s guidance. I think we were all better in food-taking than food-making. Though the four of us were slightly clumsy in the kitchen, it was certainly an experience we would not forget.This is our final creation… good or not?For the next Samsung I WAS THERE, you’ll want to be part of it! Win tickets to an exclusive Meet & Greet with Korean pop group SKarf & a chance to win GALAXY Camera! Can I say want to be THERE?! Details at Samsung Mobile Singapore’s FaceBook page.* The above entry is brought to you by Samsung Mobile Singapore. All photos on this blogpost are taken with the Samsung GALAXY Camera.Other Related Entries
GALAXY Camera Fans’ Exclusive Event at The Line
2012-12-27 00:00:00
Daniel’s Food Diary Favourite Blog Entries of 2012
2012 is really a year of ups and lows, really dramatic at parts. On a personal level, it is the year I finally graded with a Masters (with Higher Distinction, yeah!) after years of juggling work, studies and blogging; and also one which I found a new job lecturing. Oh, and I led Prime Minister Lee in a workout at The Gardens by The Bay. Totally surreal experience.DanielFoodDiary.com has also reached a readership never before, and it spurs me to work harder and better.A special Thank You to all friends, fellow bloggers, PR personals, restaurant & café owners, hawker, fans and followers for giving me the opportunity, and affecting my life is every positive way.These are 5 of my favourite and most blog entries of 2012 I would like to share with you.The First #CookForFamily Initiative – Kudos to All 111 Bloggers!
The #CookForFamily was an initiative I created because I felt that the Singapore blogging community could do more for the people around us.  The inaugural #CookForFamily Bloggers’ Initiative took place on 6th August 2012, with a total of 111 bloggers who took part and cooked for their family. It is created with a simple objective of getting more bloggers, and hopefully their fans and followers, to start cooking and bonding with their families.  Yes, every sponsor who came and offered a prize was rejected. Because I felt that bonding is the family is the greatest priceless prize. In fact, from this we know that every blogger who joined truly wanted to take part. Yes, I will definitely continue with #CookForFamily during Year 2013, which I am targeting 200 Bloggers. Would that be possible? Join the #CookForFamily Facebook GroupAnd My Valentine’s Day Date Is…
The long-story-short is that I auctioned my Valentine’s Day dinner date on Sold.sg and raised a decent sum of money for The Spastic Children’s Association of Singapore. Some say I am very brave (I think the girls in this auction are braver). When Alvinology from omy.sg invited me for this project, my first question was “Who would bid for me?!!” But since it was for a good cause, and it only cost me a night, I was all game for it in the end. My bid remained at 15 cents for the longest time, slightly embarrassing, with an actual facebook comment of “Who the F is Daniel Ang?” adding a bit of insult.  Therefore, I am thankful for my friends and supporters for pushing the bid up all the way to $82.65 from 15 cents. Each auction jump on Sold.sg was 15 cents and cost 75 cents, which means a total of $495.90 was raised for charity. Thank you for the lovely Minhui who bided for me. (And I still owe you a meal.)As We Say Goodbye to King Albert Park
If you have not heard, King Albert Park fondly known as K.A.P has been sold to Oxley Holdings for $150 million. That would mean all seven units, including the favourites Cold Storage, Island Creamery and yes, McDonald’s at KAP would be closing and saying goodbye. Online voices are not too happy about it – that an “iconic 20 year place” is going to be turned into another condominium; that they are losing part of their memories; and this is coming right after the closure of East Coast Park. This was the story that got DanielFoodDiary.com featured on Channel 8 news because that particular blogpost got so widely circulated with more than a thousand shares. Somehow many Singaporeans felt the same way as I do. Yes, I am ready to let KAP go. But I do wonder about growing up in a country where I do not recognise the buildings around anymore.How On Earth Did A Food Blogger Become A Zumba Instructor?
Imagine this, in the afternoon you are at a food tasting session at a restaurant, savouring the best foods with arms holding a camera, almost burping at the sensational tastes. Right after that, you switch into your workout gear at the gym, dancing to the music with arms holding weights, and start instructing a Zumba class. I lead these two vastly different lives in a single afternoon. So how on earth did a food blogger become a Zumba Instructor? The truth is, I signed up for it 5 years ago without knowing what it was. Yes, I just signed up. I am very fortunate to belong to the very first batch of instructors from Singapore taught by Zumba’s founder himself Beto Perez. Now, I just want to show that it is possible to eat what you want and stay healthy.GALAXY Camera Fans’ Exclusive Event at The Line
Even though I write advertorials here and there, this Samsung event was one because I would remember because I got the opportunity to work with one of my favourite brands, choose a place to eat, meet up with my fans and also get paid for it. It reminded me of two things: how far I been through, how grounded I should continue to be. I started blogging for Omy.sg since 5 years back and only recently started DanielFoodDiary.com Every single blog entry was time, effort and passion, but still nobody believed that much in food bloggers then, with the exception of one or two. Thank you to Samsung and friends for believing in me, and I will continue to write with time, effort and passion.I really think 2013 will be a much more awesome year ahead. And I invite you to take on this exciting food journey ahead along with me.Daniel’s Food Diary Favourite Blog Entries of 2012
The First #CookForFamily Initiative – Kudos to All 111 Bloggers!
And My Valentine’s Day Date Is…
As We Say Goodbye to King Albert Park
How On Earth Did A Food Blogger Become A Zumba Instructor?
GALAXY Camera Fans’ Exclusive Event at The Line
2012-12-26 00:00:00
Nam Nam Noodle Bar – Budget Vietnamese Pho Set for $9.90 Nett!
Since so many people said such good things about Nam Nam Noodle Bar – the new Vietnamese restaurant, and the queue at Raffles City during lunchtime is never ending, I just had to give it a try.The name ‘Nam Nam’ is a play of the word Viet-nam, and it is also a more budget offshoot of the Les Amis Group’s Annam Vietnamese Cuisine, helmed by Chef Nam Quoc Nguyen.It is not difficult to see why this Vietnamese food joint is so popular. The Pho and Banh Mi toasted baguette sets are affordable for the lunch crowd – $9.90 nett with spring rolls and a drink thrown in. Yeahness to No GST and service charge! (On weekdays 10am-3pm)The signature Pho are inspired from those in Hanoi, where the rice flour noodles are cooked with broth boiled for over 24 hours, coming in choices of Pho with chicken, beef balls, beef steak slices, beef combination or wagyu beef slices ($16.90 for this.)And better news for me – no MSG at all. I almost had enough of irresponsible people adding too much MSG to our soups, thinking they can get away with it.The Southern Rolls with sweet shrimps, egg and fresh herbs were unfortunately nothing to scream about, the skin being too dry and tough to bite. I suspect that the rolls are mass-prepared and left out in the open for too long a time. Its accompanying dip made of hoisin sauce fried with chicken liver was absolutely delicious though. But you cannot always depend on dips to save the day.I love Pho, but just cannot find enough decent ones in Singapore, other those in Joo Chiat (Long Phung anytime please).  For those who have not eaten Pho before, it is rather similar to the Cantonese ‘horfun’ where it may have derived name from (or some say from the French pot-au-feu beef stew.Both the Pho Beef Steak Slices and Pho Chicken set were actually not too bad for its price, with the broth warm, lightly-sweet and tasty. The meat slices are tender thin and easy to bite, though a pity the noodles got a little clumpy.Nam Nam Noodle Bar’s Pho may not be compared to those in Vietnam, but definitely worthy enough. It is tough to find reasonable quality food around, with a good bargain of breakfast value set priced at $5.90nett and 3-course lunch menu for $9.90nett. The Flower Crab Noodle Soup is calling out to me to try next. I will be back.Nam Nam Noodle Bar (Raffles Place)
252 North Bridge Road #B1-46 Raffles City Shopping Centre, Singapore 179103 (City Hall MRT), Tel: +65 6336 0550
Opening Hours:  8:00am – 10:00pm Daily
2nd Branch:  Wheelock Place #B2-02, 501 Orchard RoadOther Noodle Entries
HonGuo (NEX)
Gurney Drive Restaurant
Noodle Star (Bugis Village)
Bugis Street Ngak Seah Beef Kway Teow (Lavender)
Once Upon A Thyme (Golden Mile)
2012-12-20 00:00:00
Keishoken Ramen – White, Black, Red, Yellow, and Orange Ramen!
White, black, red, yellow, orange. They are not just colours of cupcakes, macarons or xiao long bao, but the ramen flavours of new shop Keishoken Ramen at Great World City. (Read: 5 New & Best Ramen Places in Singapore)Keishoken Ramen is part of the Ebisboshi Shotengai group of restaurants, which also includes Bishamon, Uomasa and Jyoshoken. That means you can order your sushi and yakitori from various stalls, and even sapporo ramen from Bishamon and seasonal tsukemen at Jyoshoken. (Read: Daikokuya which is also under the same group)A few restaurants in one is probably their specialty, as they are also behind the Ramen Champion concept in Singapore. Incidentally, Keishoken Ramen first originated locally at Ramen Champion’s branch found in Terminal 3 Changi Airport.Now, Orange ramen? You may have thought it is made with the fruit, but the ramen is actually topped with a ‘ball’ of ingredients blended with ginger, garlic, apple, minced pork and …… Peanut Butter!I just had to order it. The peanut buttery Orange Ramen ($13.00) strangely works, and is not overly strong in its execution. Would I order it again? The novelty was not exciting enough in flavours to want to make me commit to another bowl.  I also did wish the bowl colour was in a more vibrant orange than boring black.The Yellow Ramen ($13.00) works better if you enjoy weirdness. Yellow? Curry desu. It is blended with minced pork, onions, green onions, appeal, tomato, ginger and some soft potato cubes. The curry is not too robust, and adds just a light variety to the original broth.The creator of Keishoken ramen is a youthful-looking Chef Kazuo Sukuraoka with 13 outlets in Japan. Accordingly, a lot of fresh vegetables are added to get rid of the unpleasant strong taste of pork. The noodles are the long, thin and springy thin, in case you are a fan.If you need some comfort food, Keishoken Ramen is not good enough to ‘wow’ but still satisfying.Additional thing to note: The fact that there are other shops under the same umbrella also means you have to compete for attention from the very thinly-spread wait staff.  I asked for green tea and iced water from 4 waitresses. 4 different waitresses. An hour later, I still did not get a single cup of water.Keishoken Ramen at Ebisboshi Shotengai Great World City
1 Kim Seng Promenade, Great World City, #01-22 Singapore 237994, Tel: +65 6235 6190
Opening Hours:  11:30am – 10:00pm (Sun-Thurs), 11:30am – 11:30pm (Fri-Sat)Other Ramen Entries
Ramen Keisuke Tori King (Amara Hotel)
Uma Uma Ramen (Forum Galleria)
Menya Musashi Kodou (Ion Orchard)
Kitakata Rahmen Tamakichi (Orchard Plaza)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
2012-12-18 00:00:00
5 Most Searched Food Posts 2012
According to Google’s annual Zeitgeist, Singapore’s most searched “Food and Drinks” keywords are: 1 Rainbow Cake, 2 Chilled Beancurd (Tau Hway), 3 Cupcakes, 4 Chocolate Cake, 5 Sushi. 6 Korean Bbq, 7 Pizza, 8 Fried Chicken, 9 Xiao Long Bao, 10 Fish And ChipsI would think I have contributed to a few words up there, especially No. 2 (haha). If you ask me, Buffet, Ramen, Brunch, Eggs Benedict, and Pancakes should have made it to the list too. Really, more Singaporeans search for ‘Fish and Chips’ than ‘Buffets’?Interesting in terms of food types, the most popular search for DanielFoodDiary.com does not differ much from Google’s list, with 1 Paris Baguette, 2 Rainbow Cake, 3 Twelve Cupcakes, 4 Poulet, 5 Eggs & Berries, 6 Menya Musashi, 7 PoTeaTo, 8 Wooloomooloo Steakhouse, 9 Sophisca and 10 NeNe Chicken taking some of the most searched keywords. And here are the Top 5 most searched posts.Paris Baguette – Korean Bakery Finally Comes to Singapore, But Why Seoul Expensive?
Located at Level 2 Wisma Atria, Paris Baguette has replaced DingTai Fung and attracted throngs of office crowd and the Korean expat community to land their support. Because it is newly opened, its self-service ordering system, service crunch, and lack of seats due to its popularity may throw you back a little. The Scrambled Egg Brioche Brunch ($18.00) is a photogenic dish with chorizo on toasted brioche, and the eggs evenly prepared and cooked. If we were to judge by the eggs alone, yes it is fresh delicious, but somehow lacks a punch. I like its clean open concept, and its wide selection from bread, sandwiches, salads to puddings for takeaways for the busy lunchtime crowd.Le Chocolat Café – Go WOW with The Rainbow Cake
The Rainbow Cake seems to be the next big thing in the world of cafes and cake shops. I had my Rainbow Cake at Le Chocolat Café for $7 a slice. When the cake arrived, we almost went for an orgasmic “wow”. The bright red-orange-yellow-green-blue-dark purple cake was covered with chocolate and dripping beautifully with chocolate. It felt like chocolate rain over the velvet sky. What the Rainbow Cake can promise in beauty, it may not in taste. Every layer was almost too sweet, possible over-enhanced with the food colourings. And if you closed your eyes to eat them, it would just feel like a saccharine butter cake.The Story of Twelve Cupcakes
Twelve Cupcakes was founded by Jaime Teo and Daniel Ong – the celebrity couple who met on the set of Mr Kiasu, got married, had a kid, and opened 5 cupcake shops. Their cupcakes had earned very positive reviews from critics, fans and friends, with some saying this is probably the best cupcake found in Singapore. Never mind if owner Daniel Ong got himself in the news too much times with brushes with SPH and his neighbours, it probably brought him a lot more publicity and attention. Twelve cupcakes are pretty in pink and delightful, almost to send fellow colleagues and friends in delight if you takeaway for them, kept in equally beautiful pink boxes.Poulet – Thai Express Opens a Délicieux French Restaurant at Bugis+
Poulét (pronounced Poo-lay, meaning chicken) is a new French casual dining restaurant at Bugis+ offering adorable French classics to the masses at Bugis Plus. (Read: New Poulet branch at Great World City). The star of the restaurant has to be its Poulet Roti ($15.80 for half, $28.80 for whole), or chicken – brined for a full day in a traditional recipe and placed in a rotisserie for a slow roast to tan to a golden brown. Its home-made white and creamy mushroom Chardonnay Sauce is probably one of the best and addictive chicken sauces I had in a long time.Eggs & Berries – Everything with Eggs. Berry Nice
An entire restaurant selling everything with eggs and berries. The very idea thrilled me a little, having my mind torn between having eggs benedict, scrambled eggs, omelettes, sunny-side-ups, Or waffles, pancakes, sliced cakes and crepes.  How can you come here without trying the Eggs Benedict ($12.80) right? The two poached eggs were adorably oval looking, oozing out york goodness on top of English muffins, bacon and a rosti-tasting hash brown. Other than the cheap tasting ham, the dish was delightfully wonderful.What do you think will be the HOT Food keywords for 2013?Other 5 Best Entries
5 New & Best Ramen Places in Singapore
5 Stalls To Try at Maxwell Food Centre
5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru
5 Best New Food Places At Tiong Bahru 
5 Restaurants at The Star Vista
2012-12-17 00:00:00
Nihonryori RyuGin – One of Japan’s Finest, Probably My Best Meal Ever
[Tokyo, Japan] The meal at Nihonryori RyuGin at Roppongi Tokyo is probably my best in 2012, okay, make that best meal ever. And it is definitely the most expensive meal in my life so far.RyuGin has an impressive resume – ranked Number 28 in The S.Pellegrino World’s 50 Best Restaurants 2012 (staying there for 20 years), once ranked No 3 in the world, and The Michelin Guide Tokyo 2013 has also awarded RyuGin restaurant 3 stars.How much did I pay? One gastronomy course is for 23,100 Japanese Yen (22,000 JPY plus 5% consumption tax, 1,100 JPY). That makes it SGD$337 or USD$277!My heart also broke when I found out about the cost. It was initially painful. I am no rich kid, so what made me decide to part so much for a single meal? This is after all one of the best restaurants in the world, and every single of my friend who parted with that same amount said it was worth it.RyuGin’s Chef Seiji Yamamoto is known to push culinary boundaries, creating avant-garde dishes, while blending with the seasonal ingredients available in Japan. Every season has a different menu, and every day it may differ based on what is available in the market.And every single dish was a piece of art. The dinner was not only about eating anymore, but appreciating every containing plate, smelling the scents, appreciating the plating, listening to the explanation and story, and just simply watching in awe how art is created.Take for example, Chef Yamamoto’s summer speciality – a Swimming Ayu Fish grilled over charcoal with chill presentation, drizzled with a special Benitade sauce made using watermelon. The sweetfish was first grilled smoking with bamboo leaves, then transferred to a stone plate, placed as though the fishes were swimming in a river stream. It was incredibly incredible!Just as you thought the gastronomical-presentation could not get any more embellishing, the dessert will blow your mind.It was a combination of ‘candy mango’ frozen to -196 degree Celsius using liquid nitrogen, cracked and mixed with warm mature fresh mango. Imagine putting the two together in your mouth, where you experience a literal ‘popping’ sensation. RyuGin’s dessert was crazy, simply crazy good.If you do get there, guests are told not to wear strong perfumes and eau de cologne which may compromise the experience.It made me realise even deeper that a restaurant should create an eating experience where all your senses are stimulated, and not just about taste. I thanked God profusely for such a wonderful excellent meal.Nihonryori RyuGin
Side Roppongi Building, 1st Floor, 7-17-24 Roppongi Minato, Tokyo 106-0032, Japan Tel: +81 3 3423 8006 www.nihonryori-ryugin.com
Roppongi Station on Hibiya Line (Tokyo Metro), 2 minutes walk from Exit2（in front of Meiji-ya super market). Tokyo metro oedo subway line roppongi station exit 7(in front of Tokyo Mid-town) 5minutes walk.RyuGin is also available at Hong Kong, 101/F, ICC, 1 Austin Rd. West, West Kowloon, Tel: 2302 0222Other Tokyo Entries
Tsukiji Fish Market (Tsukiji, Tokyo)
Sugamo Konaya (Roppongi, Tokyo)
Tsukiji Honten (Shibuya, Japan)
Menya Musashi (Shinjuku, Tokyo)
Café & Meal Muji (Ginza, Tokyo)
2012-12-14 00:00:00
Bornga – Korea’s Leading BBQ Restaurant Comes to Star Vista Singapore
I was full of hopes for Bornga. After all, this is Korea’s leading BBQ restaurant, led by famous celebrity chef Jon Won Paik, and is Bornga’ first venture to Singapore at The Star Vista. (Read: The Star Vista’s Complete Food & Restaurant Guide )This restaurant franchise has more than 30 outlets across Korea, the US, China and Indonesia. Yes, Bornga is crowded all the time, and you better come early or reserve your seats.Maybe it is the Korean and Gangnum Style fever, Korean BBQ restaurants are practically packed in Singapore. Many hot-sizzling restaurants have also just opened, such as Boss BarBQ at Clarke Quay, Kkongdon BBQ at Marina Square, Mini Korea Bistro & Izakaya, and Supulae, both at Tanjong Pagar. (Read: Big Mama at Tiong Bahru)Word has it that Chef Jon Won Paik wanted to create a new style of BBQ meat that could retain the natural colours and taste, unlike many other Korean style meat which are dark in colour due to over marinating. The result is the signature and patented Woo Sam Gyup ($22) – thinly sliced beef brisket dressed a special sauce.Some of the other premium cut beefs do not exactly come cheap – Ggot Sal prime cute unmarinated boneless beef ($38), Saeng Galbi unmarinated beef ribs ($45), Yangnyum Galbi prime cut beef ribs in house special sauce ($45), and my personal favourite Samgyupsal grilled pork belly ($18).We always joke how that we can be full after having just the Korean Banchan (side dishes). Bornga serves enough to fill up the entire table, especially with an elongated plate of lettuce. With the exception of the potato salad, most are not appetising though.Service was rather attentive, and the wait staff could help you grill and cut up the meat. The boy who was serving us at least knew “the meats were from US” after I questioned.Beef slices cook very fast. The best way to enjoy them it to roll up with scallions into the lettuce, dip into the house sauce, and stuff the entire thing in your mouth. The vegetables were cool, crunchy and fresh, making it particularly enjoyable to savour the tender meat with.Other than the delicious BBQ grill and sauce, most of the other dishes were not particularly memorable, with some left half untouched.Food aside, I cannot help but notice that the first thing I noticed after entering Bornga is… smoke everywhere, like you are walking through fog.I walked out, hair smelling like that grilled beef slice, my new shirt with a porky aroma, and felt like jumping into a shower pool. So if you sniff Korean BBQ while watching a concert at The Star Performing Arts Centre, you know where the ‘aroma’ comes from.Updated: Bornga opens 2nd outlet at VivocityBornga 本家 본가
1 Vista Exchange Green #02-24 The Star Vista, Singapore 138617 (Buona Vista MRT) Tel: +65 6694 4696
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pm DailyOther Star Vista Entries
The Star Vista’s Complete Food & Restaurant Guide 
NeNe Chicken (The Star Vista)
Morganfield’s (The Star Vista)
Sogurt (The Star Vista)
2012-12-13 00:00:00
Teppei Japanese Restaurant – Quality Omakase for $40, $50, $60!
Teppei Japanese Restaurant is one of those places that I would like to keep a secret, but really, good things are meant to be shared. Seriously, nine-course Omakase sets going for $40, $50 or $60?It is almost impossible to find in Singapore, where some Japanese meals can cost an arm or leg.‘Omakase’ simply means “I’ll leave it to you”. The chef decides entirely what you eat, beginning with the lightest starters, proceeding to the richer dishes and ending with a dessert. At Teppei, you would be given some choices, for example between rice or noodles. Sashimi is also included, where the chef will slice the fish right in front of your eyes.Located right beside the insanely popular Keisuke Tonkotsu King , you may be quick to dismiss that Teppei is not that well-liked just because there is no queue like its neighbour (during the evenings).Wrong. Customers who want to dine in this 18-seater have to book way in advance before they can get a seat at night. Two weeks would be just about right.During lunch, the menu is slightly different with lunch sets available. And yes, you have to queue.This is what you get for $40 – an assortment of items from salads, chawanmushi, deep-fried chicken wings, sashimi, tempura king prawn, deep fried shiromi white fish, spicy fried rice to matcha ice cream.If you are thinking quality is comprised because of its price, No. Some of the dishes beats those served in more respectable restaurants, especially the crisp deep fried king prawn which makes all other tempura ebi look insignificant.Plus, my female friends always enjoy watching Chef Yamashita Teppei serious at work, and he is not that bad looking a chef to chat with.Of the nine or ten dishes, there may be a few you may not fancy as much. Chef Yamashita Teppei always comes with something different, according to the season and his mood. That makes every visit to Teppei worthwhile and memorable. And yes, Teppei is probably my favourite new restaurant of 2012.Teppei Japanese Restaurant
1 Tras Link #01-18 Orchid Hotel (Tanjong Pagar MRT) Tel:+65 6222 7363 (Please call to reserve seats)
Open daily: 12 noon – 2.30 pm; 6.30 pm – 10.30 pmOther Japanese Restaurant Entries
Hifiumi (Plaza Singapura)
Japanese Dining SUN (CHIJMES)
Seki (Rendezvous Hotel)
Hoshino Coffee (Plaza Singapura)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
2012-12-11 00:00:00
MooJaa – Thai style Mookata Barbecue Sizzles and Surprises
Western BBQ, Chinese BBQ, Korean BBQ, yes yes yes, but Thai style Barbeque? That’s something different in Singapore, and Mookata shops (which means pork skillet or pork fryer) is opening up in places from Katong, Golden Mile to Keong Siak Road.If you have eaten one of these barbecue hot-pot combination in the streets of Bangkok and Chiangmai, you will certainly want to crave for more.MooJaa which has recently opened at Keong Siak Street (a few shops away from Keong Siak Snacks and diagonally opposite Kok Sen) has been attracting Thai patrons and groups of friends visiting because it reminds them of home.The Mookata apparatus looks like a combination of the Korean BBQ with Chinese steamboat, where you grill the meat on a dome with soup surrounding it. The soup brewed by chicken and pork bone, is heated by a whiter looking Binchotan Japanese charcoal which creates less soot and also cooks more evenly.If ordering Ala Carte is too troublesome, I would suggest going for the Set Moo (pork) or Set Gai (chicken) which comes with meat slices, prawn, pork balls, squid, hot dog, golden mushroom, vermicelli, xiao bai cai and kang kong which can feed two. Quite generous portions for its price of $39.90. (I would have thought ‘Moo’ would mean ‘cow’. Haha.)Two things I noticed: The meat does not get ‘chao tar’ (burnt) easily, and the entire restaurant stays surprisingly smoke-free unlike some places where you leave smelling like a chimney or roast.Some of the must-order side dishes are the Fish Skin ($6) and Cheese Ball ($8). Try soaking the fish skin in the soup for a few seconds and you will land up with a part-crisp part-soggy tasty combination.  And the hot cheese that oozes out of the balls is ooh-laa-laa yummy.MooJaa’s winning formula has to be the two dipping sauces – one spicy BBQ and the other sweet and sour seafood  – which is said to be created from 31 different ingredients. A little suggestion, I would certainly like to see Tom Yum soup or Tom Yum sauce options one day.MooJaa actually means “My lovely pig”, and the owner got inspired after he saw a girl poke her boyfriend’s belly after a meal. My belly definitely got bigger and rounder after this Moojaa meal. Burp![Giveaway Ended] – MooJaa Set Meals vouchers
MooJaa will be giving 2 sets of Set Moo or Set Gai meals to 2 lucky Daniel’s Food Diary readers. Each meal is for two persons.All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook pages of Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook
Step 3: Leave a comment below to name your favourite BBQ grill or hotpot ingredient you would like to see at MooJaaResults will be announced Fri 14 Dec 2012. Contest winners must have local Singapore addresses.MooJaa Singapore No.1 Mookata
25 Keong Siak Road Singapore 089132 (15 min walk from Tanjong Pagar MRT), Tel: +65 6536 4780
Opening Hours: Lunch 11am – 2pm (Mon-Fri), Dinner 5pm – 11pm (Mon-Sun)Other Thai Food Entries
Sweet Salty Spicy (Rail Mall)
Baan Tong Thai (Tiong Bahru)
First Thai (Purvis Street)
Suan Thai Restaurant (Killiney Road)
Porn’s (Liang Seah)
2012-12-10 00:00:00
5 Best New Food Places At Tiong Bahru
It is an understatement to say that old estate Tiong Bahru is facing a culinary explosion over the last two years. How many new cafes and restaurants do we need there? The good is that it drives many foreigners and hippies over to hang out over the weekends, though many old-time residents have more to complain about the loss in culture, congestion and parking woes. (Read: 5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru)Let’s talk about the new cafes and restaurants at Tiong Bahru. I know, I know… you must be thinking Tiong Bahru Bakery, P.S. Café or the strangely named edgy bar Coq and Balls. (Coq and Balls, get it?) So how about those who go under the radar?Here are 5 new restaurants to try out at Tiong Bahru, all opened within the last year.Big Mama (Kim Tian Road)
Former tutor and caretaker, Ji-young Nam Gung nick-named as “Big Mama” has set up a homely Korean eatery at Tiong Bahru after cooking for Korean students in Singapore for years. Big Mama or one of her staff would help you prepare the Dakgalbi ($15 per pax, min 2 pax), where marinated chicken chunks, Korean rice cake and vegetables are fried with a special homemade chilli sauce right in front of you on a grill. Surprisingly, this is very delicious with the saucy chicken going extremely well with plain rice. Maybe it is also Big Mama is talking while preparing, which makes us feel right at home.2 Kim Tian Road, Singapore 169244, Tel: +65 6270 7704, Opening Hours: 11:30am – 2:30pm, 5:30pm – 11:0pm (closed on most Mondays)Abe’s Diner (Eng Hoon Street)
This is one of Tiong Bahru’s best kept secret. Abe’s Diner opposite famous Ting Heng Seafood Restaurant is a newly opened Japanese restaurant with very little publicity. In fact, there is no signage at the storefront that indicates this is the restaurant. Plus it’s only opened evening onwards. The small cosy restaurant is usually occupied by local Japanese, who indulges in some of their Japanese-meets-European cuisines such as Cream Gratin ($13), Carbonara Udon ($14), and Polynesian Roast Spare ($20). Expect to wait for your food.42 Eng Hoon Street, Singapore 16978, Tel: +65 6222 1719,  Opening Hours: 5:00pm – 12:00am (closed Mondays)PoTeaTo (Yong Siak Street)
“PoTeaTo”, which is a combination of the words ‘potato’ and ‘tea’, sells mainly potato-made dishes and tea. So you can jia kantang and lim teh (eat potatoes and drink tea). For the potato bites, the selection includes PoTeaTo Chips, shoestring fries, sweet potato fries and wedges ($5-$6). No, they don’t sell the usual potato chips from the packet. Instead, their chips are made from US Russet potatoes, hand-sliced and deep-fried fresh right in the kitchen. When you thought you had enough of those salty packet snacks, this is SO GOOD.78 Yong Siak Street #01-018, Tel: +65 6221 2488 Opening Hours: 11am – 10 pm Tue to Sun (closed Mon)IKYU (Yong Siak Street)
Ikyu which means “take a break” and with a tagline “is the new sexy”, sells the usual Japanese basics such as sushi and sashimi, but with a contemporary fusion twist. The 54-seater diner seems promising – décor is modern and service friendly, sometimes too friendly as different service staff came over to ask “Is everything okay, do you want to eat more?” Executive Chef Takuma Seki (former chef-de Cuisine of Hide Yamamoto at The Shoppes at Marina Bay Sands) does not disappoint, from the aesthetically pleasing plating, to the use of fresh ingredients to create Japanese cuisines with French and Western influences.  Expect food to be pricey though.5 Yong Siak Street, Singapore 168650 (15 min walk from Tiong Bahru MRT), Tel: +65 6223 9003 Opening Hour: 11:330am – 3pm, 6pm – 10:30pmBaan Tong Thai (Kim Tian Road)
While slightly unpolished, Baan Tong Thai does have a few dishes that reminds you of the great food memories you have in Thailand. What it needs is a little push. The Green Curry ($8.80) was decently thick and flavoursome though, unless some places where the gravy is really watered down.  My favourite dish so far is the Claypot Green Curry Fried Rice ($7.50) which interestingly keeps the green curry taste locked in, with the claypot keeping the dish warm and moist throughout the meal.16 Kim Tian Road, Tel: +65 6270 1008,  Opening hours: 11am – 230pm, 530pm – 1030pmWhat’s your take on the explosion of new food places at Tiong Bahru? While we always welcome new places and set-ups, a part of me is feeling the loss of the ‘old’ Tiong Bahru, when there is just a very quiet and peaceful beauty that can never be replaced.Other 5 Best Entries
5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru
5 New & Best Ramen in Singapore
5 Stalls To Try at Maxwell Food Centre
5 Oozing Food That Singaporeans Love
5 Restaurants at The Star Vista
2012-12-06 00:00:00
Majestic Bay Seafood Restaurant – Their Kopi Crab Is On Fire! Really On Fire.
The Majestic Bay Seafood Restaurant which is newly opened at Gardens By The Bay, offers customers a family-friendly place for seafood and dimsum meals, especially after a walk at the Flower Dome right above.Knowing Singaporean’s love affair with crabs, Chef Yong Bing Ngen of Majestic Restaurant and Jing fame has created a dish that many locals have not seen before, but would identify with immediately – Kopi Crabs. Yes, coffee crabs!Just as you are wondering how this would be possible and how it would taste, its sight and smell alone are huge draws. Entering the restaurant, you could almost smell a faint fragrance of the aromatic coffee, made from a blend of 3 varieties of beans.Immediately after it is served on the table, the crab would be lighted with a flame. It got some much attention that two busloads of PRC tourists ran over from four tables away for a photo opportunity of the burning sensation. The kopi crab is truly a star in the making.Taste-wise, I liked the sauce a lot, reminding me of the sweet-bitter savour I would associate with coffee pork ribs. My only reservation was the dish was too dry, and could do with more and wetter sauce, such that I can sweep part of my mantou over with.Crab lovers should also try the Chili Crab Meat Bun ($4.50 for 3 pieces) where actual crab meat is wrapped in a lightly seared ‘bao’ with crisp skin. Imagine eating chilli crabs with buns, but in a reverse manner. The fillings did not flow (as I expected) but it is still a definite must-order.If you are in a dilemma of what sweet dimsum to order, try the Sweet’s Temptation ($20 for 4 pax) which includes the Glutinous Rice Dumpling with Yam Paste Stuffing, Shredded Coconut; Glutinous Rice Dumpling with Fresh Cream Stuffing; Steamed Custard Bun, Salted Egg Yolk; Bay’s Chinese Pancake, and Red Bean Paste.Majestic Bay Seafood Restaurant is almost guaranteed to fill up your hungry tummies, especially with its baked rice and assorted seafood done Macau style. If you are feeling too full, there is always a good excuse by taking a walk at the Supertree Grove above.Majestic Bay Seafood Restaurant
Flower Dome #01-10 Gardens by the Bay, 18 Marina Gardens Drive, Singapore 018953 (Bayside MRT) Tel: +65 6604 6604 www.majesticbay.sg
Opening Hours: Lunch 11:45am-2:30pm (Mon-Fri), 11:30am-2:30pm (Sat-Sun), Dinner 5.45pm-9:30pm (Mon-Sun)Other Chinese and Seafood Restaurants
Min Jiang (Goodwood Park Hotel)
Peach Blossom (Marina Mandarin)
Yan Ting (St Regis)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
Old Hong Kong Legend (Raffles City)
2012-12-05 00:00:00
il Cielo – Probably The Best Thin Crust Pizzas in Singapore
Hilton Singapore may not be that immediate place you would think of when you crave for ‘Italian’, but its flagship restaurant il Cielo does serve some of the best contemporary Italian dishes around.I am pretty surprised myself. This relatively new restaurant at the 24th of Hilton, which means ‘the sky’, is next to the swimming pool with a beautiful panoramic view of the Orchard Road skyline. Appropriately named. Many may now even know such a place exist, and I could so see this place as that romantic date or wedding anniversary venue.il Cielo was recently awarded the Ospitalità Italiana Seal of Quality which is a testament to the quality and authenticity of cuisine and service true to the Italian culture. Their pizzas have also been recognized as one of the top 10 think crust pizzas in Singapore by Epicure Asia.Some traditionalist pan-pizza lovers may frown upon Rome-style variants, but the ‘less carb is better’ person in me much prefers these than the doughy-think-chewy kind. The Bosco ($45), topped with porchini, home-cured Italian sausage and truffle is baked in open fire brick oven. This would please any truffle fan with its elegant fragrance and perfect balanced flavour.Most skinny pizzas would be just crunchy and brittle (or soggy for the badly made ones). But il Cielo’s version is crispy on its side, but soft and chewy towards the centre where the ingredients are, with that extra bite. I do not know how Chef Omar Bernardi achieves it, but his version of the thin-crust makes better sense with more substance and blend of textures. A testament that simple things can be impressive.Another signature is its Orata E Branzino ($75), a sea bream fast roasted on olive wood for an earthy relish. If you are a seafood lover who likes your cuisine with its natural flavours locked in, yet without that fishy scent, this should work well for you.Other specialties from Chef Omar Bernardi include its homemade Burrata mozzarella, special handcraft cured meats and homemade pasta made from rare organic flours. The il Cielo Dessert Sampler ($20) will provide you with its best of tiramisu, chocolate cake, lemon custard cream and panna conna, leaving a sweet touch for this novel Italian experience.At a price range of $100-$120 per person, save il Cielo for that dinner treat to enjoy with the one you love most, with the modern Orchard Road cityscape as the sundown backdrop.Il Cielo Hilton Singapore
581 Orchard Road, Level 24 Hilton Hotel Singapore (Orchard Road MRT), Tel: +6730 3395
Opening Hours: Lunch 12pm-2:30pm (Mon-Fri), Dinner 7pm-10:30pm (Mon-Sun), Bar 6pm-12am (Mon-Sun)Other Italian Restaurant Entries
Da Paolo Bistrobar (Rochester Park)
Caffe B (Marina Bay Sands)
Limoncello Restaurant (Robertson Quay)
Covelli Italian Bistro & Wine Bar (Orchard Central)
Garibaldi (Purvis Street)
2012-12-04 00:00:00
GALAXY Camera Fans’ Exclusive Event at The Line + The Samsung GALAXY Camera Review
A food blogger like me loves to travel around to scout for the best restaurants. Yet lugging a DSLR seems too heavy for long distance holidays, and the mobile phone camera is just not sharp enough for food photography.So that problem is solved with the new Samsung GALAXY Camera, which comes in an elegant white. Love it!Retailing at $698 (without contract), this runs on Andriod 4.1.1 (Jelly Bean) platform meaning you can connect, upload and share photos DIRECTLY from the camera. Amazing!Imagine this. It may sound ridiculous and cumbersome, but during holidays I can end up taking photos with my DSLR, transferring the files to my laptop, then transferring again to my phone for an edited picture to be uploaded on the various social media platforms. That’s if you do not mind the fuss. Or the additional weight during travels.With 3G or Wi-Fi connection, I can now shoot the photo with the GALAXY Camera, edit it with the GALAXY Camera, and upload to Facebook, Twitter and Instagram with the GALAXY Camera. This IS an all-in–one device (You can check out my photos taken on Instagram @DanielFoodDiary with hashtag #GALAXYCamera).Samsung users can also share photo easily with in-app functions such as ChatON Photo Share to send photos directly to other Wi-Fi devices within range.I was invited by Samsung to host a fans’ exclusive event at one of the best buffet restaurants The Line at Shangri-la, and what better way to test the camera by taking various photos of the food line-up.What’s your verdict?This smart camera has a 16 megapixel lens with a focal length of 4.1mm-86.1mm with an effective (35mm) focal length of 23mm-483mm. While I won’t say the photos are exactly DSLR quality, they are pretty neat and can be easily edited using basic tools like Photoshop or Photo Wizard that can be downloaded straight to the GALAXY Camera.Some of the other plus points
- You can shoot in Auto, Smart or Manual mode. I took some photos in Auto which is really quite idiot proof, or Smart Macro for close-ups.
- It has a 21X super long 100% optical zoom which would come in handy for concert performance and sports events (like when you bought the cheaper tickets but still want a good shot of the stars)
- I realised I did not bring an additional storage card or laptop to transfer the files. But hey, I recalled there is Dropbox, and all I needed to do was to download the app and store the photos. All done within a few minutes.The only thing is that you cannot use your camera to make a phonecall (though you can do VOIP calls using apps like skype), and battery can run low in  day when you are running too many apps.If you want a new ‘toy’ which is fresh and fun, and sharing current photos over social media is your thing, then the Samsung GALAXY Camera is one something you can really consider.* The above entry is brought to you by Samsung Mobile Singapore. All photos on this blogpost are taken with the Samsung GALAXY Camera.
2012-12-04 00:00:00
Christmas Cornflakes Festive Wreath from Da Paolo Gastronomia
Ho Ho Ho, tis the season to be jolly. If you are up for something different and special from the usual logcake and fruit cakes, Da Paolo Gastronomia is introducing an edible festive wreath!This wreath ($24.80, serves 10-12 persons) is made entirely of crunchy cornflakes moulded together with icing, and topped with candied fruit and roasted nuts. Not a white chocolate person? It is available in in sexy dark chocolate as well. You may be tempted to hang it up like a usual wreath, but don’t.If you are familiar with the chocolate cornflake goodies you usually get during other festivals, this is similar-tasting, except with much more chocolate and a louder crunch.[Christmas Giveaway ended] – Cornflakes Festive Wreath from Da Paolo Gastronomia
In the spirit of giving and sharing, Da Paolo Gastronomia will be giving away 5 Fruit & Nut White Chocolate Cornflakes Festive Wreath to 5 blessed Daniel’s Food Diary readers.All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook pages of Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: Share this post on Facebook
Step 3: Leave a comment to name the Da Paolo Gastronomia branch featured below (Even if you do not know, make a guess in the name of fun.)Results will be announced Fri 7 Dec 2012. Contest winners must collect the festive wreath from Da Paolo Gastronomia at Paragon Orchard Road from 10-16 Dec 2012.Da Paolo Gastronomia is found at Bt Timah, East Coast, Holland Village, Marina Bay, Orchard, Raffles Place, River Valley (Great World City), Serangoon Gardens.Other Related Entries
Da Paolo Bistrobar (Rochester Park)
Da Paolo Ristorante (Holland Village)
Interview with Francesca Scarpa from Da Paolo
2012-12-03 00:00:00
Ramen Santouka 山頭火 – Famed Toroniku Pork Cheeks Ramen at Shinjuku Tokyo
[Tokyo, Japan] In a search for some of the best ramen in Tokyo, I combed more than 10 different Japanese ramen stores over 2 trips. Surprisingly, I did not get sick eating ramen for both lunch and dinner because every bowl was just very different yet all flavourful. (Read: The Must-Try Ramen at Shinjuku Tokyo + How to Order Ramen via a Vending Machine)It was only right to explore Ramen Santouka, one of the most popular ramen shops in Singapore, famed for its pork cheeks ramen. (Read: Review Ramen Santouka at Clake Quay Central)Santouka’s founder Hitoshi Hatanaka opened his own ramen shop at Hokkaido in 1988 because he was unsatisfied with all other ramen establishments. Its thin-noodle ramen with elegant broth topped perfectly with mouthwatering slices of char-siu pork and pickled plums gained popularity in Hokkaido immediately, even though it was a 9-seater small shop.But it was Santouka’s specialty Toroniku char-siu pork which was made from the “rarest of the rare” pork cheeks that changed the fate of its ramen ever since.Its signature Toroniku ramen comes in shio (salt), shoyu (soya), miso (bean paste) and kara-miso (hot bean paste) flavours, at a price of 1,150 yen (SGD$17, USD$13.90)  for a small bowl and 1,250 yen (SGD$18.50, USD$15.10) for a medium.The Japanese are really patient and determined to perfect their craft in cooking, as seen as the number of hours they take to simmer their pork bones Tonkotsu soup. 20 hours. 20 full hours. That is almost a day before other ingredients such as vegetables, dried fish and kelp at added.And, their soup is never boiled, maintained at an optimal temperature. No wonder it doesn’t really ever feel hot enough. Their pork cheek is a must order, guaranteed to change your perception of pork because it is just so melt-in-your-mouth tender-fully delectable.Both the tsukemen (dipping noodles) and kara-miso are of the usual high quality standards of the Japanese, definitely better than the ones back home, though not a lot more. That is to say their quality is still quite consistent, and Singaporeans are not getting too bad a deal.Even though Ramen Santouka should rank as my top few in Singapore, there are just too many better and more special ramen shops in Tokyo. Just saying.Santouka 山頭火
Tokyo Shinjuku Minamiguchi Shop
160-0023 Nakaoki Building, 1F, 1-18-5 Nishi-Shinjuku, Shinjuku-ku, Tokyo (Take a train to JR Shinjuku Station Exit 2, about 5 min walk away) Tel: 03-3349-0338
Other Tokyo Branches: Nihonbashi Yaesu Bldg, Ikebukuro Minanmi-Ikebukuro, Harajuku Kakuda Bldg, Kanda Genki Bldg, Gotanda Gurinnderu Gotannda, Shibuyu Gojo Bldg, Shinjuku Mylord Odakyu
Opening Hours: 11:00am-11:00pm DailyOther Tokyo Entries
Menya Musashi (Shinjuku, Tokyo)
Mutekiya Ramen (Ikebukuro, Tokyo)
Tsukiji Honten (Shibuya, Japan)
Café & Meal Muji (Ginza, Tokyo)
Tsukiji Fish Market (Tsukiji, Tokyo)
2012-11-30 00:00:00
Judging The Bosch Dream Kitchen Cookoff
The Bosch Dream Kitchen Cookoff must be Singapore’s answer to MasterChef, and I am honoured to be invited to judge one of the episodes. WooHoo!The competition is a five-episode web-based reality show that follows the gastronomic journey of four teams who will pit their culinary skills for the Bosch kitchen of their dreams worth more than $20,000. And for Episode 3 of the Bosch Cookoff, teams face the challenge of cooking Frog Gruel!I must say that Bosch Singapore has gathered quite a varied and watchable group of contestants which makes it a rather entertaining web series. There are mother-daughter, couple, best friends, and siblings teams – comprising of people of different occupations from an investment advisors, teacher, to some very popular food bloggers Keropokman and Melicacy.If you think this is just another ordinary youtube video, the teams mean serious business, all under the mentorship of celebrity chefs John See (Asparagus), Andrea Scarpa (Da Paolo Group), Lee Bennett (Equinox), Heather Barrie (Fine Palate), Tim Ross-Watson (The Garden of Eden).The host is ‘double-confirm’ Hossan Leong, with judges including Wolfgang Lapper (Esmirada Group), Tim Ross-Watson (The Garden of Eden), Crystal Chua (My Private Chef) and emmmm, Daniel Ang (DanielFoodDiary.com).Judging was tough! It was hard because there were components that I liked about each dish, but others I didn’t fancy as much. Other than taste, these were what I was looking out for…- Teamwork: Brother-sister Team D demonstrated really strong teamwork. They knew what they wanted and went for it, each doing their own part and coming together. I gave them the highest score (tied with Team B).
- The story: Mother-daughter Team A had a slightly believable representation of “bridge of the family” behind their dish. While they did not have the best culinary experienced, I envied them because it is so admirable for a career woman to give up her time to bond with her daughter.
- Presentation: For a food blogger, a dish must not only taste good, but should be photogenic as well. So those I gave higher scores also had better-looking food.Presenting The Bosch Dream Kitchen Cookoff Episode 3 with me as a judge! (Don’t judge me.)Who would have thought filming for a 13 minute episode took an entire day! (You can see that some shots are in daylight and some are at night.) Kudos to Bosch Singapore, the production team and all the 4 groups of contestants. Tell me what you think about the episode!Vote for your favourite teams
2012-11-30 00:00:00
Maki San – Design Your Own Sushi and Salads. It’s Fun!
With healthy salads in popularity now, Maki San with its design your own Japanese-inspiring salad or sushi roll is very appealing. This outlet at The Cathay Handy Road must be the first of its kind in Singapore, and I was excited to know I am put almost anything I want in my rice rolls.You can customize salads and sushi, with over 80 ingredients to choose from, including a twist with some of the localized dressing. Char siew, Japanese curry, Thai chilli sauce? The extra specials ($2.50 per potion) some of my favourite fillings such as teriyaki chicken, smoked duck, grilled unagi, tempura prawn and roast beef.The price is pretty affordable as well, $6.90 for a ‘Little San’ and $9.90 ‘Mega San’. So students from the nearby SOTA, Lasalle and NAFA can venture over for a treat without feeling overly broke.My sushi essential was a combination of shredded chicken, Japanese omelette and avocado, wrapped with healthy brown rice including a very special char siew sauce. Instead of the usual seaweed, mine was covered in soy with sesame wrap.It took me a while to decide because there were just too many ingredients to tick out of the order form. After which, a ‘sushi robot’ would slice the maki roll into eight almost-equal pieces contained in a artistically beautiful box. (If the box was stained with the char siew sauce, I would have brought it back to keep paper clips.)Honestly, I was not expecting much as a shop like Maki San felt rather gimmicky, but was so wrong. The sushi was actually satisfyingly delicious with all the ingredients mixed in, and healthy tasting too. My guess is how good the sushi would taste would also depend on what you pick.My choice of salad was Mixed Veggies with roasted mushrooms, silken tofu, roasted pumpkin, topped with chicken floss and dressed with yuzu sesame. Another plus point is the portions are quite generous for its price of $7.90.While Maki San’s location at The Cathay is not the best, I am a convert and was impressed with the execution of the whole concept – creative and inspiring with all the cute Japanese drawings. Now, wondering what I would include in a “Daniel-san” sushi that would best represent myself.Christmas Giveaway – Maki San vouchers!
Maki San will be giving 5 pairs of Maki-Lucki Vouchers for Daniel’s Food Diary readers to redeem two “Little San Sushi”.All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook pages of Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: Share this post on Facebook
Step 3: Leave a comment below to name the ingredients you would include in a “Daniel San” sushi. All in the name of fun!Results will be announced Thurs 6 Dec 2012. Contest winners must have local Singapore addressses.Maki-San
The Cathay, 2 Handy Road #B1-17/18 Singapore 229233 (Dhoby Gaut MRT), Tel:+65 6737 8772
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 9:30pm DailyOther Sushi Entries
Sushi Tei (Ngee Ann City)
Itacho Sushi (Plaza Singapura)
Sushi Express (City Link Mall)
Japanese Dining SUN (CHIJMES)
Seki (Rendezvous Hotel)
2012-11-28 00:00:00
Hoshino Coffee – Lovely New Japanese Restaurant Opens at Plaza Sing
It seems that the Atrium @ Orchard aka Plaza Singapura extension is going on a Japanese food route – with semi-buffet restaurant Hifiumi, hot pop restaurant Tsukada Nojo, dessert café Nana’s Green Tea, and the newly opened Hoshino Coffee. I am not complaining, because it gives us one more good reason to visit PS.Hoshino Coffee is already quite popular in Japan, specialising in hand-dripped coffee and fluffy soufflé pancakes. It is also sister companies with Doutor Coffee at MBFC and spaghetti place Youmenya Goemon.The first thing you would notice at Hoshino – the queue is snakingly long, up to 30 pax in line during the weekends. So the food must be really good?The artificial food display set outside is already so tempting and eye-catching, with dishes such as Hoshino Spaghetti with Eggplant, Bacon, Shimeiji, Sausage ($14.00), Fuwa-Fuwa Hoshino Souffle ($15.80), Classic Omu Rice ($13.00) and Arrabiata Spaghetti being some of its signatures.The Lobster Bisque Soup Spaghetti was suitably al dente, with a moderate taste of the lobster flavour. The ‘bisque punch’ could have been more distinct, but I am not complaining. The portion is huge, and makes it one of the better casual Japanese pastas around.Even though the Hoshino Pot Baked Curry Rice looked nothing close to the display set and took a while to arrive, it was worth the wait. The piping hot dish was oishii scrumptious, the curry not overly sweet or spicy, and especially satisfying when the egg yolk is mixed in fully.I do have some dissatisfaction with its service though, at times slow and inattentive. We called for the attention of the service staff for a few minutes before somebody really noticed. The order of the pancake took longer than 45 minutes to arrive, so we did spend some time just waiting after our mains were finished (that may explain the long queue as well.) I asked for a spoon, they gave me a fork. Proper conversations with the opposite side were tough because the table width was broad, and blocked by a huge lamp.And so the Pancake Souffle Style with Matcha and Ogura Bean Paste ($13.50) will take that long as they are freshly made on the spot (and accordingly their oven can only produce 6 at a single time). It was the usual ‘Japanese desserts in Singapore’ standard – soft and not too sweet, but I don’t think it’s worth the price and wait. (Went during off peak and took 25 minutes.)Hoshino Coffee is quite a ‘chilaxing’ place to come for afternoon tea. Do try its iced coffee made with “high thermal conductivity” coffee cup for a well balanced taste. I am pretty sure we will get to see more of Hoshino Coffee in time to come.Hoshino Coffee 星乃珈琲屋
68 Orchard Road #03-84 Plaza Singapura (Dhoby Gaut MRT), Tel:+65 6338 3277
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pm DailyOther Japanese Restaurant Entries
Hifiumi (Plaza Singapura)
Yayoiken (Bugis+)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
CoCo ICHIBANYA (313 Somerset)
Sushi Tei (Ngee Ann City)
2012-11-26 00:00:00
Christmas Giveaway – Choco-Durian Christmas Log from Emicakes!
Christmas is never complete without logcakes that stir up the magic of childhood and fun holiday memories with family and friends.Some logcakes are very unique-tasting, and Emicakes’ offering will certainly please many Singaporeans and is one to remember in many Christmases to come – A Choco-Durian Christmas Log!The Choco-Durian Christmas Log ($49) is a daring combination of chocolate ganache and D24 durian. Never had the two together before? It’s actually quite a rich perfect combination of the two distinct flavours.[Giveaway Ended] Choco-Durian Christmas Log from Emicakes 
To get into the mood of sharing and giving this Christmas, Emicakes will be giving away 3 boxes of their Choco-Durian Christmas Log to 3 blessed Daniel’s Food Diary readers.All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook pages of Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: Share this post on Facebook
Step 3: Leave a comment below to Name the Emicake branch featured in the photo below
(Make a good guess! No harming trying.)Results will be announced Fri 30 Nov 2012. Contest winners must collect the logcakes from an Emicake branchEmicakes are available at http://www.emicakes.com.sg/logcake
 and Ang Mo Kio Blk 722, Bedok Blk 56 Upper Changi Rd, Bukit Batok Central, Causeway Point, Compass Point, Clement Blk 327 Ave 2, Kovan Blk 203 Hougang St 21, Pasir Ris Downtown East, Plaza Singapura, Tampines 1 Mall, Tampines Blk 264 St 21 and Toa Payoh Blk 116 Lor 2 (Braddell)
2012-11-23 00:00:00
Nene Chicken – Korean’s Favourite Fried Chicken Has Arrived To Singapore!
It is not only SMTOWN that has come to Singapore, one of Korea’s most popular fried chicken specialist NeNe Chicken has also arrived at The Star Vista. The name ‘NeNe’ shouldn’t be difficult to remember, and simply means “Yes! Yes!” in Korean.I overheard the first lady at the fast food counter who exclaimed, “I waited for you to come for so long!” I didn’t think she was referring to the service staff. Founded in 1999, there are more than 1,000 NeNe Chicken outlets in Korea and this branch at The Star Vista marks its first international outlet. Singapore is first in another area again. (Read: The Star Vista’s Complete Food & Restaurant Guide )For first timers, the menu can be quite confusing. Cut long story short, there are four basic flavours of Black Sesame Tender, Green Onion Tender, Swicy (sweet and spicy), and Freaking Hot. (Read: Korean Bonchon Chicken at Bugis+)Let’s start with the milder ones. The Green Onion Tender Super Meal ($13.90) which includes buffalo sticks (fries lah), pickled radish and drink is somewhat (I only say somewhat) like your Tori Karaage chicken chunks topped with a soy and mustard sauce, and loads of freshly shredded green.My recommendation is the Swicy chicken, which comes in a set of 2 pieces ($8.90) or 9 piece whole chicken ($25.90). You know what, just buy the whole box home and munch on them while watching your favourite Korean drama, Runningman or Gangnam style MTV x 100 times. So shiok you know.The chicken is surprisingly not oily, even though we are provided with plastic gloves. Just lick the sauce off your fingers if you are at home. Even though we left it the chicken out for some time (need to take photos mah), the batter remains crisp, and the meat succulent.For the fearless and dare-dare-must-try (yes, you who have tried the Level 10-20 buffalo wings), go for their Freaking Hot Chicken ($25.90 for 9 pieces). On my first bite, I thought to myself “Nothing lah, not really spicy”. It was after you finished then you realized that the hot chili pepper sauce gets on you, with a fiery sensation that tells you “I must have more”.The 17-seater fast food outlet is very small though, which also means that takeaways may be a better option.  And oh, kids may love to order the Korean version of the popcorn chicken with a drink below. Guess what it is called? NeNePop! I know what you are thinking.NeNe Chicken Singapore
1 Vista Green Exchange, Star Vista #01-24, Singapore 138617 (Buona Vista MRT), Tel: + 6694 5489
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm DailyOther Chicken Entries
Bonchon Chicken (Bugis+)
Wingadees (Junction 10)
ChicKing (Marina Square)
Popeyes Chicken and Biscuits (Airport T3)
Charly Ts (Katong 112)
2012-11-22 00:00:00
Morganfield’s – The Star Restaurant at The Star Vista
Morganfield’s is undeniably the ‘star restaurant’ at The Star, also home to The Star Vista and The Star Performing Arts Centre. Entering the Noah’s Ark inspired building from the front; you would notice the 180-seater first due to its big space and signature. And it has easily the most crowds on a lazy weekday afternoon. (Read: The Star Vista’s Complete Food & Restaurant Guide )Unexpectedly, Morganfield’s picked a shop space that many of the other restaurants did not want, due to the humongous chunky pillars in the middle. (These could be their lucky pillars.) And make a good guess this BBQ-ribs restaurant originated from? America? Australia? Hong Kong? Surprise, it’s Malaysia.Maybe it is because the food is not that bad to begin with – wholesome, family-style, huge portioned American meals that encourages sharing among family and friends.It doesn’t hurt that the weekday lunches are really quite affordable (They should also consider doing a cheap, fast and good Sunday New Creation Church set). Think about having its popular Black Pepper Chicken Chop ($9.90) which comes with coleslaw and French fries, or Tequila Spike Chicken ($20.90) marinated with spicy Tequila, lime paprika, char-grilled and served with sides. You may need two pax to finish this.Called the Home of Sticky Bones, Morganfield’s signature dish is the Hickory BBQ Spare Ribs ($24.90 for half, and $36.90 for full), which weighs more than 2 pound. It is VAST and almost bigger that the plate.The taste is the usual old-fashioned style with sweet and tangy barbeque sauce with a hint of cider, yet not overly distinctive and strong which would mask the flavours of the prime pork. It is not fall-off-the-bones tender, but soft enough that won’t cause your teeth much trouble. Online reviews were not raving, but it was better than I expected.My personal preference is the Hot Ribs Sandwich ($19.90 with lunch set), with chunks of pork ribs pulled off the bones tossed in a special BBQ sauce and sandwiched in a warm buttered bun. Consider me lazy but this burger is both easy to eat and tastily filling.On a sweet note, the Chocolate Lava Cake ($13.90) is moist and warm with rich chocolate cream. It was supposed to be sharing dessert, but I finished like 80%. Opps. A pity that the chocolate did not flow, yes, did not flow.The Star Vista is the year best’s newcomer for its selection of restaurants. No other malls really come close. With hearty food, great location, and atmospheric dining area, Morganfield’s is one of THE restaurants to look out for.Morganfield’s
1 Vista Exchange Green #02-23 The Star Vista Singapore 138617 (Buona Vista MRT), Tel: +65 66694 3635
Opening Hours: 11am-10:30pm (Sun-Thurs), 11am-12am (Fri-Sun)Other Ribs & Burger Entries
Hogs Breath Café (Chijmes)
Wooloomooloo Steakhouse (Raffles City)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
N.Y.D.C (Bugis Junction)
Charly T’s (Nomu Building)
2012-11-21 00:00:00
5 New & Best Ramen Places in Singapore
Am I wrong to say that Singapore is the next best place to have ramen after Japan? We are so fortunate. There are so many ramen restaurants in Singapore, with many more new openings in 2012.And Ramen is very personal. Tell a Marutama fan that Ippudo is better and you are likely to get angry stares and engage in the debate of “their soup is so salty” or “the noodles are too straight”. (Read: Differentiate the Types of Ramen)Some of the best ramen places is Singapore has been widely accepted as Ippudo (or Ippudo Tao), Keisuke Tontotsu King, Santouka, Miharu, Daikokuya and Marutama . They are in no particular order and sorry that your favourite is not here.Daniel’s Food Diary, being a ramen fanatic, thinks it is about time to update the list and will attempt to rank 5 new and best ramen places in Singapore, all opened in 2012.Ramen Keisuke Tori King (Amara Hotel)
Ramen Keisuke Tori King which is just opened at the newly renovated Amara Hotel Shopping Mall has been attracting long queues. This is the popular Keisuke bringing a spin to the traditional ramen – chicken thigh with chicken stock! My recommendation is the Black Spicy Tori King Ramen Special with All Toppings ($16.90) which includes an amazing tender chicken thigh with a huge slice of pork loin, tamago and seaweed. Some people hate this – too big chicken (too big also complain?), troublesome chicken bone, and ‘strange’ chicken stock, especially with wasabi. Yes, I still prefer the Tontotsu version any time, but this really comes very close in terms of Wow-factor.Ramen Bar Suzuki (Boat Quay)
This ramen bar at Boat Quay would have been easily my Number One if I stopped at my first bowl. My 2nd and 3rd visits were inconsistent both in terms of service and taste. Otherwise their thin straight noodles noodles and warm Tonkotsu broth should appeal to many Singaporeans, and I know many CBD workers swear by this shop. Go during crowded lunchtime and you will know why. My preference is with the jet black ramen ($13.90), with added aroma of garlic and squid ink, tasting more flavourful and varied. Otherwise, go for the Tsukemen flavoured with fish, available in limited quantities.Menya Musashi (Raffles City, Ion Orchard, The Star Vista)
We know how Menya Musashi continues to enjoy queues (though not as long as before) at Raffles City, Ion Orchard and The Star Vista. I am more inclined to think this is slightly over-rated and inconsistent as well. Perhaps it was because I tried the original Menya Musashi at Shinjuku Tokyo which was way way better than the local versions. Still, the black kakuni ramen ($14.90) is quite ‘oishii’, with a thick and salty broth cooked from a mixture of pork bones and dried saury fish. You would appreciate its noodles are different from the usual Sapporo or Kyushu types, cooked ‘al dente’ style with a slight chewy bite. (And do you know Menya Musashi is brought to Singapore by Ajisen?)Uma Uma Ramen (Forum Galleria)
There isn’t very much to choose from as there are only two types of ramen – Uma Uma Ramen ($14) and Spicy Chasiu Ramen ($16). If you like your noodles thin, non-curly and springy (like mee kia, similar to Ippudo’s version), chances are you will enjoy Uma Uma a lot. Not for the Sapporo ramen fans though (ie Ramen Santouka’s version). The tonkotsu broth is thick, dark, rich, and salty. On the flipside, the portion (or can I say bowl) is small, and therefore the soup cools down faster than usual, not likely to please those heavy eaters who prefer a fuller meal.Kitakata Rahmen Tamakichi (Orchard Plaza)
Ironically, this is the most authentic ramen shop of the lot – hole in the wall, and real Japanese chefs. The majority of the ramen are Shio-based, which has a pale and clear broth made with plenty of salt and vegetable. I had the basic Rahmen ($12.00) which arrived with a clear stock with light yellow, slightly thick and curly noodles (which may remind you of instant noodles).  Tonkotsu fans who are used to thick, salty and creamy soup bases may get turned off by this version, which is exactly the opposite – thin, simple and plain.There are some other new ramen shops that I tried like Marukin Ramen at Scotts Square, Keishoken at Great World City, Tonkotsu Kazan Ramen at Novena Square 2 and the new stalls at Ramen Champion Changi Airport Terminal 3 which have their own fans as well.So which do you think is the Best Ramen Newcomer in Singapore 2012?The Ramen Entries
Ramen Keisuke Tori King (Amara Hotel)
Ramen Bar Suzuki (Boat Quay)
Menya Musashi Kodou (Ion Orchard)
Uma Uma Ramen (Forum Galleria)
Kitakata Rahmen Tamakichi (Orchard Plaza)
2012-11-20 00:00:00
Poulet – New Cranberry Chicken and New Outlet at Great World City
Poulet, the popular French casual dining restaurant at Bugis Plus, needs little introduction after it debuted with both positive reviews and customer attendance. Just look at the queues at Bugis+! (Read: Poulet at Bugis+)It is not surprisingly that Poulet’s second branch came fast and furious, at Great World City which has much support from the expatriates and the upper-middle class.This news is hot from the oven. (I went for the chicken so fast their PR Chantel said the press release was still in her computer.) Poulet just launched a new chicken flavour, right in time for the Christmas festive meals though it is likely to be here to stay. Roast chicken with cranberry sauce and double pommery and Dijon mustard, simply called Poulet de Cranberry ($17.80 for half, $30.80 for whole).The luscious cranberry sauce works pretty well with the fragrantly roasted chicken too, somewhat jam-mish in texture which gives it a sweetish-sour-delightful lift. Can just so feel Christmas coming.I love my chicken with sauce, sauce, and more sauce. So the original Poulet Roti ($15.80 for half) with the creamy white mushroom chardonnay sauce works better for me. I must say though, that the sauce used to be a lot more generous, and now barely enough to cover my golden brown poultry.The Iberico Pork Belly ($15.80) was disappointing though, especially when a friend remarked how “the meat would fall off easily”. The version I had felt wrinkled and dry, too tough to be bitten off, and I had to leave it half untouched. I am sure it had seen better days.There were some surprise finds though, in the starter dish of Sauté Wild Mushroom ($7.80). Seriously? Shimeiji mushrooms with oozing poached egg – just give it to me!I would normally go for the Tiramisu ($7.80), but the Profiteroles ($7.80) of choux puffs with vanilla ice cream, almond flakes and waaaaaarm chocolate sauce was the dessert winner in every way on a cool rainy night.So do you like Poulet’s chicken? Where do you think serves the best rotisserie chicken in Singapore?Poulet
Great World City, Level 2 #02-K2/K3 (Shuttlebus or bus from Orchard MRT), Tel: +65 6733 495
Bugis+ (Illuma), Level 4 #04-12 (Bugis MRT), Tel: +65 6509 9411
Opening Hours: 11:30am- 10:00pm DailyOther Chicken Entries
Poulet (Bugis+)
The Rotisserie (China Square Food Centre)
Charly T’s (Nomu Building)
Nandos (Plaza Singapura)
Charly Ts (Katong 112)
2012-11-19 00:00:00
Japanese Dining SUN – Bringing The Kyushu Gourmet Experience To Singapore
Kyushu is the third largest island in Japan, home to a variety of food with high nutritional value, thereby also earning the title of “Food Island”. Getting to Kyushu now would be a dream come true. But if that doesn’t happen, it will be best if someone brings Kyushu to us.Japanese Dining SUN, with the support from the Fukuoka Chamber of Commerce and Industry, has just launched the Kyushu Gourmet Experience (till 8th January 2013), with authentic ingredients air-flown in twice weekly to Singapore. I hear that Tuesdays and Fridays are the best days to come, because that’s when the fish shipment arrives. (Read: SUN Japanese Dining’s Hokkaido Special)If you are feeling you want to splurge, then it is about time you do it with the Kyushu Sashimi Mori ($88.80 for 7 kinds) which include fatty tuna, yellow sea bream, horse mackerel, golden-eye snapper, striped hack, yellowtail and Japanese sea bream. Or a Japanese grade A3 Miyazaku Wagyu Ribeye and Sirloin Steak Teppanyaki ($88.80).Both my dining partner AiMakan and I were just okay with the ‘expensive dishes’ during the tasting, and instead fell more head over heels with the very simple gyoza. The Fukuoka-style Kurobuta Gyoza ($9.80) came hot piping in a metallic plate, sized small and cute. It was no wonder the dumplings were tender, tasty and juicy at the same time – the meat was made from Berkshire pork (black pig = heavily marbled) filled with cabbage chives and garlic. Though I was on a diet, I promptly finished five!The sushi, a Mentai Salmon Takana Roll ($18.80) was particularly interesting because it tasted like some I never had before. It was partly spicy due to the seasoned cod roe, partly sweet for the omelette, and partly ‘kiam-chye-ish’ salty for the addition of preserved mustard leaf. I think this is a love or hate sushi, but I happened to like it for the explosion of different tastes. Traditionalist would frown.Somebody must be kidding me when you say that these green noodles dipped into cold sauce is NOT soba. Yah, right. It is actually Nori Udon made with seaweed. This is one of my personal highlight dishes because there is a firmer yet slippery texture compared to the usual soba, yet still remaining light (I usually don’t take udon because it is just too chewy and heavy.).If these spread still do not make you feel like in Kyushu, the Tonkotsu Ramen ($11.80) and Chazuke ($15.80) which are their signature cuisine should do the trick. The Momo Jam Chiffon Cake ($6.50) infused with ripe peach jam and served with homemade vanilla cream, all light and fluffy, should make you feel  that you are having a refreshing holiday right over there.Japanese Dining Sun
30 Victoria Street, #02-01 CHIJMES, Singapore 187996 (City Hall MRT), Tel: +65 6681 6635
Also available at Sun With Moon, #03-15 Wheelock Place Orchard Road
Opening Hours: 12-3pm, 6:30-11pm (Mon-Sat); 12-3pm, 6-10:30pm (Sun)Other Japanese Restaurant Entries
Seki Japanese Restaurant (Rendezvous Grand Hotel)
Sushi Tei (Ngee Ann City)
IKYU (Tiong Bahru)
Yayoiken (Bugis+)
Hifumi (Plaza Singapura)
2012-11-16 00:00:00
Sharetea Exclusive Giveaway – “When a Wolf Falls in Love with a Sheep” Autographed Posters + Tickets + Bubbletea Vouchers!
What do Sharetea and Ko Chen-Tung have in common? They are both Taiwanese, both very popular, both rather sweet and both to be given away (in a sense).Sharetea Singapore is giving away exclusive gala tickets to “When a Wolf Falls in Love with a Sheep”, a Taiwanese romantic comedy starring the good-looking Ko Chen-tung 柯震东 (I can hear some girls screaming already) who falls in love with the quirky “Yao Yao” Kuo Shu-yao 郭书瑶. Sounds like another “You Are The Apple Of My Eye” in the making.Own and run by two young and vibrant Singaporean entrepreneurs, Sharetea has built a loyal following in Singapore and is known for its wide selection of hot and cold beverages. Other than the Classic Pearl Milk Tea ($2.40) and Honey Milk Tea ($2.90), other popular unique teas include the Red Bean Milk Tea ($3.50), Handmade Taro with Fresh Milk ($5.40) and QQ Happy Family Tea ($3.50) which consists of six different toppings all in one cup!Sharetea has also recently opened more outlets at Great World City, Jurong Point, JCUBE and Marina Link, bringing it to a total of 12 branches in Singapore alone. (Read: Interview with owner of ShareTea Singapore)[Giveaway Ended] “When a Wolf Falls in Love with a Sheep” Autographed Posters + Tickets + Bubbletea Vouchers!Want to win EXCLUSIVE Ko Chen-Tung & Kuo Shu-Yao 柯震东 & 郭书瑶 Autographed Posters and Gala Movie Tickets to “ When a Wolf Falls in Love with a Sheep” 南方小羊牧场? Sharetea Singapore is also giving away 10 additional sets of $20 vouchers to 10 lucky Daniel’s Food Diary readers.All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook pages of Sharetea Singapore and Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: Share this post on Facebook
Step 3: Leave a comment below to name your favourite Sharetea drinkResults will be announced Fri 30 Nov 2012. Contest winners must be addressees of Singapore to facilitate postage.Other Related Entries
Share Tea (Wisma)
ShareTea Launching 18 Hot Milk Teas
2012-11-15 00:00:00
Nook D.I.Y House of Pancakes – Pancakes Have Never Been This Fun + Vouchers Giveaway!
Rainbow pancakes, red velvet pancakes, bailey’s pancakes and design your own pancakes… The very idea of Nook already sounds way too exciting. What better way to spend a weekday afternoon than to doodle some pancakes with your friend, and then eating your creation? Hmmm.Nook is out of the way at Lor Kilat, a few shops away from Carpenter & Cook and Udders. While there are many pancake shops in Singapore, people come all the way here because they are the only and first DIY pancake art concept in Singapore. Meaning to say, all their tables are customised with a griddle in the middle just so you can flip your own pancakes and make you own pancake art.The shop name comes from the word “The Breakfast Nook” which actually is a term used by the Americans in the olden days. It is actually a small corner where the poor have breakfast in the morning, where they get to bond and have a nice breakfast meal together as a family. Over at Nook, they also want everyone to come in to have a good bonding session together over breakfast and pancakes.If you are lazy, the Rainbow Pancake ($12) with 6-coloured stacks is a can-order, surely to send your facebook or instagram likes to a record high with the photogenic piece. As with all rainbow desserts, Uncle Daniel here says this is a tad too sweet for my liking, and too much sugar sends me on a food coma. (Read: Rainbow Cake at Le Chocolat Café)The Red Velvet Pancakes ($10) is definitely their winning item, soft batter without being overly saccharine, with the cream cheese filling adding a smooth velvety touch.If you want to do your art classes justice, or want to draw a face/write a name to eat, you can go for the DIY Pancake package.A 2-flavoured pancake with 3 toppings will set you back by $28. I think it’s a tad steep but worth the price if you split the cost with many friends, because you can stay there for up to 3 hours and make many many many pancakes with the squeezer bottles provided.Maameemoomoo and I decided that drawing pancakes is maybe not our forte. Make a guess what we created?DIY pancakes is really quite a fun concept for friends and families with kids to play with. For the idler people like me, I would love to see more creations such as the classic stacks, chocolate banana, strawberry cream or anything with ice cream.Nook D.I.Y House of Pancakes Giveaway!
Nook will be giving 5 sets of a DIY Pancake Making Experience worth $28 to 5 blessed Daniel’s Food Diary readers!All you need to do is to
Step 1: LIKES the FaceBook page of Daniel’s Food Diary
Step 2: SHARE this post on Facebook or RETWEET the post on twitter
Step 3: Leave a comment below to describe your ultimate PANCAKE flavour and toppings. Be creative!
Results will be announced 1st Feb 2013 (Fri)Nook D.I.Y. House of Pancakes
21 Lorong Kilat #01-03 Singapore 598123 (Upper Bukit Timah), Tel: +65 6466 1811
Opening Hours: 12pm-10pm (Tues-Fri), 10am-10pm (Sat), 10am-7pm (Sun)Other Sweet Entries
Le Chocolat Café (Ann Siang Road)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
3 Inch Sin (Millenia Walk)
Drips Bakery Café (Tiong Poh Road)
Dessert Cup (Raffles City)
2012-11-14 00:00:00
Hifumi – Cheap Japanese Bentos, FREE All You Can Eat Appetizers
Hifumi, the new Japanese restaurant at the Plaza Singapura extension, serves bento sets meals with all-you-can-eat appetizer bar!The Atrium of Plaza Singapura has just undergone an overhaul, with more F&B selections which include Canele Patisserie, Hoshino Coffee, Skinny Pizza, Dome, Swiss Bakery, and Bangkok Jam. The new mix of shops seems a little scattered (another Uniqlo), and the one restaurant that enjoy very long queue is Hifumi.Among the selection: Baked chicken ($10.90), yakiniku rice ($12.90), salmon oyoko-jyu ($16.90), tonkatsu ($12.90), chicken katsu ($11.90), chicken oyakoni ($11.90) and beef hamburg ($14.90) – the usual Japanese cuisine in a contemporary setting with wallet-friendly prices.Let’s start with the appetizers. There are more than 10 choices available, for free, for real.It includes potato salad (ok), tofu gratin (nice, can take), jellyfish (skip), pumpkin salad (my fav), cheese fondue (ok), rice cracker (can take), fried fish (not fresh), and everybody’s favourite chawanmushi (can’t complain).  Note:  the mini-buffet is only available during lunch and dinner times.You can also enjoy free flow of drink at $1.90.  The good news is, you are not restricted and can take any drinks from pepsi, coffee, ginger ale, green tea to ice tea.Hifumi is indeed value-for-money. Maybe they took some cues on how to keep operational costs low from their sister company Chizo Kanmai which is also known for its very cheap budget.  (Read: Chiso Zanmai at Clarke Quay Central)I had a Pork Katsuni Set ($11.90) of simmered pork cutlet with onion and egg. It was decent, warm at least, though nothing to shout about as the meat was kind of tough. Really, I was not expecting much anyway.The Hamburg Steak ($14.90) with demi-glace sauce, though small in portion, was also just all right. At that price, this is not somewhere you would expect top-notch quality Japanese meals, but a place that can definitely fill your tummy if you are not that fussy. (This is like Saizeriya with buffet)I hope Hifumi keeps updating their appetizers, so that I won’t mind coming back again.Hifumi Japanese Restaurant
68 Orchard Road #04-68, Singapore 238839, Tel: +65 6338 4712 (Dhoby Gaut MRT)
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pmOther Japanese Restaurant Entries
Yayoiken (Bugis+)
Saizeriya Ristorante (Liang Court)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
CoCo ICHIBANYA (313 Somerset)
Sushi Tei (Ngee Ann City)
2012-11-12 00:00:00
Kitakata Rahmen Yamakichi – Authentic Kitakata-Style Ramen Shop Opens At Orchard
Ramen alert again! Another ramen shop has opened at Orchard Road, and you probably have not heard of it yet. The new Kitakata Rahmen Yamakichi has found a spot at Orchard Plaza, replacing Noodle House Ken at a more dodgy part of Orchard where there are quite a few authentic Japanese food places.Kitakata ramen? Eaten before or not? (Read Ramen Keisuke Tori King which opened on the same day.)Singaporeans are definitely fans of tonkotsu ramen styles, but kitakata style noodles remains very unexplored. Kitakata is a city located in Fukushima, in northern Honshū Japan and also mean ‘northern place’.The city Kitakata is known for its distinctive style of ramen, said to have the highest per-capita number of ramen establishments in Japan. Word has it that ‘soba’ also refers to ramen here because it is just so prominent here. If you want to order soba there, call it ‘nihon soba’ instead.Kitakata Rahmen Yamakichi already looks promising: A hole in the wall, small-cramped place, evenly packed on a weekday night, Japanese sprouting customers, and with two Japanese chefs (Chef Kita and Chef Hiro) behind the counter. This is as authentic as it can get.But I did not know what to order.The majority of the ramen are Shio-based, which has a pale and clear broth made with plenty of salt and vegetable. I don’t know about you, but shio ramen is the last thing I would order compared to the other varieties of shoyu, miso or tonkotsu. And the other is ‘Jito’, which simply means ‘local’. AND, there is NO tamago. Huh, no eggs?I had the basic Rahmen ($12.00) which arrived with a clear stock with light yellow, slightly thick and curly noodles (which may remind you of instant noodles).  Tonkotsu fans who are used to thick, salty and creamy soup bases may get turned off by this version, which is exactly the opposite – thin, simple and plain.The Shio Jito Rahmen ($14.00), contrary to its name, is not very salty as well. In fact, I told myself this is the kind of comfort food I would go for if I am not feeling too well. Don’t get me wrong – the soup still taste tasty in its own way.I just wonder if Singaporeans would take well to this – my guess is not for the moment. Doesn’t sound too good, but I know the modest and unassuming Kitakata Ramen will find its fans.Kitakata Rahmen Yamakichi
150 Orchard Road #01-18 Orchard Plaza, Singapore 238841Other Ramen Entries
Ramen Keisuke Tori King (Amara Hotel)
Menya Musashi Kodou
Uma Uma Ramen (Forum Galleria)
Marukin Ramen (Scotts Square)
Sapporo Ramen Miharu (Gallery Hotel)
2012-11-11 00:00:00
Baker & Cook – Brunch at the All New Martin Road Branch
Baker & Cook is now opened at Martin Road! Good news for me, because I do not have to go down all the way to Hillcrest to try their exceptional breads, cakes, croissants, Danish pastries, tarts, pies and quiches.And I do not have to compete with President Tony Tan (and his security) who is said to be a regular at the Bt Timah branch.Martin Road, near River Valley Close and Robertson Quay, has a brand new look with Spanish Bomba Paella Bar and New Zealander style Baker and Cook in its hood. And there are definitely more parking lots here.The brunch offerings are so enticing, and sound like a healthier spin to the regular breakfast items. They include the Baker & Cook Deluxe Granola with berry compote and natural yoghurt, Pancakes Stack with homemade toffee sauce, and Simply Scrambled Eggs with toasted bread on side.You do not have to really guess hard what I would order – Eggs Benedict! The B&C version ($17) does look slightly more rustic and down-to-earth than the other all-so-stunning-pretty versions. The poached eggs did not flow as I would have wanted to. A pity.But do not judge eggs benedict by its look. This was an absolutely sumptuous, slightly hearty version with the hollandaise sauce almost perfectly prepared. The winner has to be its toast underneath, part-crisp and part-moist after it absorbed the sauce.Everybody raves about Baker & Cook’s carrot cake ($26 for whole, $4.50 for slice). I had it as one of my birthday cakes this year, and this farmhouse version was easily one of the most memorable. For the record, I had 40 different cakes for my birthday. For real.The Blueberry Cheesecake ($27 for whole, $5 for slice) recommended by one of their friendly service staff (after I told them was bored of their carrot cake haha) was actually not too bad too. Slightly dense and not too sweet, though its small size can hardly feed two of me.Owner Dean Brettschneider, a New Zealand TV personality and celebrity chef who has more than 25 years of baking experience, says that this new outlet at Martin Road is more “urban” and customers are “more demanding”. Surprisingly, there are not too many families, but many Japanese tai tais, or expatriates with baby in one hand and a loaf of bread in the other.This site has a brand new ‘micro bakery’ especially installed to give a sense of fresh baking at the doorstep. Do try Chef Dean’s jams – they are one of the best.(So many new bakeries… Tiong Bahru Bakery, Nassim Hill Bakery, Paris Baguette, PAUL Bakery, Maison Kayser, which is your favourite?)Baker & Cook (Martin Road)
38A Martin Road Singapore 239072 (near River Valley Close, nearest MRT Clarke Quay) Tel: +65 66365965
Opening Hours: 8am-6pm (Sun-Thurs), 8am-8pm (Fri-Sat)Other Bakery Entries
Tiong Bahru Bakery (Raffles City)
Nassim Hill Bakery Bistro Bar (Tanglin Road)
Paris Baguette (Wisma)
PAUL Bakery (Ngee Ann City)
Maison Kayser (Scotts Square)
2012-11-08 00:00:00
Bomba Paella Bar – Delicioso Spanish Favourites at Martin Road
Hola! The Singapore food culture is definitely getting very Spanish of late, with many sexy Spanish tapas bar sprouting up and it is all fashionable to have your chorizo with Sangria.  I relate Spanish food to a beauty like Penelope Cruz – colourful, hot and passionate.But, but, but… I never really found good Spanish paella here, with my most exceptional one tried in MoVida Melbourne. So I had to make my way to 38 Martin Road to try Bomba Paella Bar (which replaced Graze, with Baker & Cook
 as its neighbour). Since the restaurant is named ‘Bomba’, its paella has to be good. (Read: Review of Baker & Cook)Many non-Spaniards view paella as Spain’s national dish, its like how Singaporeans would view their chicken rice. And they use the Bomba rice, considered the highest quality of all Spanish rice varieties.  I hear that Chef Jean-Philippe Patruno achieves paella greatness with golden caramelized crust forming at the bottom layer of the rice.The Arroz Negro ($40 for small serving that serves two), a wet paella of squid ink, squid, dry sherry and black mushrooms cooked with fish stock is already impressive. The paella was really fragrant, with its smell arriving at our noses while the pan was still 3 metres away.This is when I really took note of eating every bit of rice, each enveloped with a strong and dense flavours, with an intense flavour that would likely leave you feeling satisfied. The portion’s generous too. While the serving is meant for two, my take is four light eaters can easily share this.I almost felt that I was near the Mediterranean beaches when I got a whiff of the Langoustine Squid & Prawns Paella, seafood paella cooked with tomatoes and seafood stock ($40 for small, $60 for medium, $80 for large).Never thought I would ‘complain’ about this, but there were just too many ingredients of prawns, mussels, squid and fish slices swimming in the pan. A happy problem I presume. While there was no additional salt added, I thought that the dish was slightly ‘seafoody-salty’, and could do with a much lighter touch.Other Para Picar (small bites) that are worth trying include the Iberico Ham Croquettas which are breaded deep fried potato croquette with iberico ham ($12 for 3 pieces), and side dish of Patatas Bravos with spicy tomato sauce ($8).As with the Spanish way of life and sharing culture, Bomba Paella Bar is a terrific place to hang around after work where you can indulge in enjoyable portions of tapas and paellas. Plus, there is no service charge!BOMBA Paella Bar
Martin No. 38, 38 Martin Road, Singapore 239059 (near Robertson Quay). Tel: +65 6509 1680
Opening Hours: 6:00pm – 12:00am Mon-Sat (Closed Sun)Other Related Entries
Salt Tapas & Bar (Raffles City)
Amuse (Orchard Hotel)
Lucky 13 (TripleOne Somerset)
Singapore Sling Boutique (Clarke Quay)
OverTime (Dempsey)
2012-11-07 00:00:00
Amuse by Armin Leitgeb – Not Just An Ordinary “Tapas” Bar
Not many would venture beyond Orchard Towers to the Orchard Hotel stretch, which actually houses gems such as plate-smashing (literally) Esmirada, music bar TAB and the recently opened Amuse by Armin Leitgeb.Replacing Bodega Y Tapas, “Amuse” comes from the French term ‘amuse bouche’ which literally translates to ‘mouth amuser’. It should not be mistaken to be another Spanish Tapas bar, because it is not. Incidentally, the casual bar has both an international team and appeal.Food consultant Armin Leitgeb (ex-Les Amis chef de cuisine) is Austrian, Chef Lee Chee Keong is Malaysian (Singapore PR) who used to be a dim sum chef, manager Katharina Riege is German (born in Poland), and bar manager mixologist Klaus Leopold is Austrian. Put them together and you will get charming bar with wide-varying food from Chorizo “Groest’l” ($16), Pickled Kurobuta Pork Cheeks ($16) to Grilled Spanish Octopus ($19).Of the menu’s selection, the resounding table’s favourite which everyone went “Ahhhh…” is actually the Spicy Lamb Burger ($16) with fennel pollen aioli, eggplant and harissa. Strange, because the lamb burger is not the first thing anybody would order in such a menu. But the soft charred pita with such lamb patties with a touch of spice made a surprise sensation when popped in the mouth, and you wonder how lamb would taste so juicy.The Ciabatta Wrapped Crispy Egg ($15) looks like an intriguing mini-tower when plated, prosciutto on top, hiding an egg in the middle. The trick is to let it fall and mix it together, and that’s when the oozing yolk will flow and make a delectable mash with the prosciutto, spinach and mushroom.Seriously, who would order a can of sardines in a bar? I did. Only because it was A Burning Tin of Cuca Sardines ($12). Other than a visual sight when it burns, the sardines actually taste particularly scrumptious and non-fishy, not like the typical cheap canned ones we are used to. If only there is so buttered toast on side to spread the sardine on.Chef Armin’s personal favourite dish was the Char-Grilled Wagyu Cubes Cooked in Hay ($39), which has a rustic aftertaste, inspired by what he had back home in Austria. I would recommend pairing this dish with the Maica ($18) of Rhum Vieux du Père Labat, fresh banana, milk, and Vedrenne chocolat liquor, and blow-torched raw sugar.The concoctions here are indeed creative, colourful and elegant-looking, mixed by a young Austrian who will Amuse ladies and provide them with another major reason to visit. Yes, he is by the way quite good-looking. International appeal, yes.[Updated: Amuse by Armin Leitgeb is closed, and converted to Bodega Y Tapas]
442 Orchard Road, #01-29 Orchard Hotel. Tel: +65  6735 3476
Opening Hours: 5pm-1am (Mon-Fri0, 12pm-1pm (Sat), 12pm-11pm (Sun)Other Related Entries
Salt Tapas & Bar (Raffles City)
TAB (Orchard)
Singapore Sling Boutique (Clarke Quay)
Social Haus (Tiong Bahru)
Wooloomooloo Steakhouse (Raffles City)
2012-11-01 00:00:00
Ramen Keisuke Tori King – Ramen Alert! Keisuke Opens Their 3rd Shop At Amara
Another good news for ramen lovers. Ramen Keisuke Tori King has just opened at the newly renovated Amara Hotel Shopping Mall. This time, the Ramen King is bringing yet another spin to the traditional ramen – chicken thigh with chicken stock!Keisuke Tokyo Ramen is already well-known for its creative take on ramen, having won the title of Ramen Champion at Tokyo Ramen Championship 2011 in Japan. Founder Keisuke Takeda was also selected as the top ramen chef in Japan and crowned as Ramen King. Singaporeans have also shown Keisuke lots of love with the snaking queues at Orchid Hotel. (Read: Keisuke Tonkotsu King at Orchid Hotel and Keisuke Ramen Millenia Walk)You may wonder, why are the branches so close together?Keisuke Takeda made the decision to open his third restaurant at Amara Hotel (which is totally different inside now) because Tonkotsu King has been receiving an average of 350 customers since its opening, drawing huge crowds of locals during both lunch and dinner time. He feels the need to have Tori King within the Tanjong Pagar vicinity just so the loyal diners of Keisuke will have more than one option.At the new Tori King, chicken is the main attraction.  Yes, similar to the Marutama and Marukin Ramen.My recommendation is the Black Spicy Tori King Ramen Special with All Toppings ($16.90) which includes an amazing tender chicken thigh with a huge slice of pork loin, tamago and seaweed.The evenly grilled chicken thigh is indeed the show-stopper, with meat coming off the bones so easily, extremely tasty as it is simmered and submerged in premium soy stock overnight. Eating it at some point does remind me an Indonesian ‘ayam panggang’. It is HUGE.The chicken stock is really warm, thick and flavoursome, yet not overly salty. I would say try not to take your time to savour or don’t finish the stock as it may become over-powering and heavy-going towards the end. For the adventurous, you can also try their green spicy stock which contains wasabi. If not, the original is very safe.I was asked by Mr Keisuke Takeda which was my preference. It still has to be Keisuke Tonkotsu King at Orchid Hotel because the pork stock feels more authentic, ‘cleaner’ and lighter to me.Fan photo with Ramen King Mr Keisuke. I was so happy, but I kept my excitement.Fans of Keisuke will be glad to know that the hard-boiled eggs, beansprouts and sesame seeds remain complimentary. And it does not take a fortune teller to predict that Ramen Keisuke Tori King is going to attract a long long queue as well. Don’t wait – just go!Ramen Keisuke Tori King
Amara Hotel #03-15, 100 Tras Street , (Tanjong Pagar MRT) Tel: +65 6604 6861
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pmOther Ramen Entries
Uma Uma Ramen (Forum Galleria)
Menya Musashi Kodou (Ion Orchard)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
Daikokuya (Orchard Paragon)
Ramen Bar Suzuki (Boat Quay)
2012-11-01 00:00:00
Sogurt – Soooo Goood Yogurt at The Star Vista
The Star Performing Arts Centre has officially opened today – 1st November 2012, with a grand opening concert by David Foster and friends over the next 2 days. This is pretty exciting for the local arts culture with a new performance space boosting a 5,000 seat theatre.So I have also been to The Star Vista downstairs which has indeed many many many food outlets, which hopefully can handle concert goers during peak hours. Though I cannot help feeling a little sweaty there because it has no aircon (all natural air), and I instinctively headed to the yogurt shop first for a quick cool-down. (Read: The Star Vista’s Complete Food & Restaurant Guide)Sogurt is a home-grown, yogurt-by-weight shop that screams of pastel pink and lime green, likely to attract the young and cheery. Contrary to many other shops, they even offer students in school uniform a 20% discount. Adults are warned not to try squeezing into their pinafore or tight shorts.I spoke to its owner Lee Li Ping, whom at age 25, has already opened 5 yogurt stores.Why the name Sogurt?
Usually get people to guess this one, but think you can sorta guess? I chose Sogurt cos it rhymes with “yogurt”, and would have a catchy tagline “Sogurt is SOOO GOOOOD”. Was pretty amused with the name myself at the start. Initially, I was set on “YO-mama”, but later discovered that a froyo store in HK already had the name, and hence had to come up with a new one, “Sogurt”. No regrets!Why did u choose to sell yogurt?
Yogurt is my personal passion.  I still eat my froyo almost every day, even after 3 years of being in business. Not sick of it one bit yet.What were you doing before going into yogurt business?
I started Sogurt 3 months after graduating from USC (University of Southern California) in LA. It all started with my obsession for froyo when I was there, used to drag my friends to eat it with me every single day. Helped a lot also that there was a rising froyo trend in the U.S. while I was studying there. I was especially impressed and enticed by the self-serve froyo concept, thus came back and decided to share this love with my fellow Singaporeans.What is your personal favourite Sogurt flavour? 
Chocolate! I have a sweet tooth, love Sogurt’s choc flavour with nuts, digestive biscuits and sunflower seeds. Awesome combo!(I love Sogurt’s light and smooth chocolate flavour too. Somehow chocolate in yogurt form also feels less guilty.)How about the customers’ favorite?
This is a tough one as there is no ONE favourite flavour, but I’d have to say our lychee flavoured yogurt is quite a hit.How do you ensure the yogurt doesn’t melt too fast in Singapore’s blazing heat?
Have a good AC system in our shops to shield our customers from the hot hot heat. Besides that, I guess I can say our yogurt is pretty delicious that it is usually finished even before given a chance to melt!For those unfamiliar with the self-serve concept, steps are simple:  Take cup; dispense the yogurt ; select the toppings; weigh the cup and pay $3.00 for each 100 grams you take.Get the chocolate. It is really SOOO GOOOOD.Sogurt
The Star Vista, 1 Vista Exchange Green, 01-34, Singapore 138617 (Buona Vista MRT)
Other branches: 617 Bt Timah Rd (next to Coronation),  United Square, NEX, West Mall
Opening Hours: 11am-10:30pmOther Yogurt & Ice Cream Entries
Swirl Art (Liang Seah St)
Once Upon a Milkshake (Maxwell Chambers)
The Daily Scoop (Chip Bee Gardens)
Ci Gusta! (Anchorpoint)
Alfero Artisan Gelato (MacPherson)
2012-10-30 00:00:00
Min Jiang – The Hairy Crabs Season Is Finally Back
Dear hairy crabs, I have waited for you for a year to be back. There are some things that I would have to wait for 300 days before I can savour again. One of which are the hairy crabs. These Chinese mitten crabs, which are Shanghai’s prized delicacy, only come during the days of Autumn.Over at Min Jiang at Goodwood Park and One North, these hair crab creations are available from now till 30 November, not too long a period before they disappear back to the Yang Cheng Lake.Min Jiang offers two special six-course set menus at $98++ and $118++ per person, for a minimum of two diners. If you have not tried these palm-sized creatures before, and am wondering “Why so expensive”, the Chinese can spend hundred of yuan just to have them. There are crabs, and there are craps – people would spend more to get their money’s worth for good quality ones.My favourite version prepared by Master Chef Chan Hwee Kee is the Steamed Hairy Crab with Glutinous Rice Served in Lotus Leaves ($68++ each).  For me, steaming works best for hairy crabs where the tastes and juices remain locked in, and the meat remains fresh and sweet. Imagine when some of the flavours of the crab meat flows and get absorbed by the glutinous rice.Look at the rich bright orange roe – easily my favourite part in the entire crab.  Do not remind me of the cholesterol level though. Just allow it to linger in your tongue while you relish the thick thick roe, a taste almost quite unforgettable. (I would best describe it as a texture similar to a creamy form of salted ice yolk but 10 times more delicate.)The manager in charge Wai See was also skillful in cutting up the crustacean so you can eat it almost mess free. When I asked how long she trained for, she said “Ten years”.The Baked Hair Crab Wrapped in Lotus Leaves is also a popular choice, while I did think that the smell of the leaves overpowered the true natural flavours of the crab at times.For those who are too lazy to eat with your hands (how can?), you can have the Hairy Crab Meat and Row on Green Bean Noodles. I thought this is unusual take. These liang fen known as cold noodles eaten during summer is combined with this autumn treat, rather appetizing, especially when the crab meat braised with warm orangey starchy sauce sticks to the cool thin sheet noodles.Reminder, these hairy crabs only come once a year. You really do not want to wait till next year again. Life is too short for messy regrets.Min Jiang
Goodwood Park Hotel, 22 Scotts Road, Singapore 228221, Tel: +65 6730 1704
Or Min Jiang at One North, No 5 Rochester Park
Opening Hours: 11am – 2:30pm (Lunch), 6pm – 10:30pm (Dinner)Other Crab Entries
Peach Blossom (Marina Mandarin)
Putien (City Square Mall)
Mellben (Pasir Ris)
2012-10-29 00:00:00
Baan Tong Thai – New Thai restaurant opens at Tiong Bahru
What, another food place at Tiong Bahru. This time a Thai restaurant by the name of “Baan Tong Thai” which means ‘Thai Golden House’, located at Kim Thai Road two shops away from Big Mama.Cheers for Thai food fans who are looking for spicy tasty dishes at the Tiong Bahru enclave, currently peppered with new café joints, bakeries and Japanese restaurants. Bad news? Hard to find parking my friends. (Read: 5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru)The interior of Baan Tong Thai does not suggest ‘golden house’ though. It is more like a casual family-style restaurant where prices are still kept medium-affordable. Stuffed chicken wings are $8.80 for 3, a Phad Thai is $5.80, Pineapple Rice $7.50, and Tom Yum at $8.80 per bowl.Baan Tong Thai is opened by 4 partners who set up this restaurant because they are all food lovers and want to do more to promote authentic Thai cuisine. I seriously think this place needs some publicity (anybody heard about it?), and so I spoke to one of the partners Daniel Teh.Why open a Thai restaurant at Tiong Bahru?
As the area here lack of authentic Thai food other than Thai express located at Tiong Bahru plaza which consider more on Modern Thai fast food.Do you think there is too much competition and too many restaurants at Tiong Bahru?
Not really. I agreed there is more & more restaurant, but more on Western Base. As we stand out as Authentic Thai Cuisine.What are some of your signature dishes? 
Majority of the dishes are our popular & signature dishes, as we go through many rounds of tasting. However, the most popular dishes are Honey chicken, Green Curry, Claypot Tanghoon Crab, Prawn cakes etc. We just serve it real authentic, nothing more, nothing less.You sell quite a number of Thai dishes here. How do you ensure quality in your food? 
The Seafood- We getting from Jurong fishery port through our appointed supplier, The seabass we having is not from the pond, but from deep Sea.& for the prawns, We don’t use frozen, we using the fresh market prawns (We are Proud of this) Eg. The Crab – We only accept quality Sri Lanka Crab  that is meaty & full of Roe. That is why we indicated” Limited Stock” as we are very particular about it.What is Baan Tong Thai’s unique selling point?
Let the food & service do the talking. As we served Authentic thai cuisine & we source the freshest & good ingredients.PS: Though not easy to achieve, We believe strongly in “Serving Good Food, Good Service” as our main focus. We value all feedbacks very seriously no matter how big or small it is.Serving that many dishes, there are some that do not quite meet the mark. The Beef Kway Teow Soup ($6.50) was a let-down as it lacked that special herbal taste in the soup, and the beef slices were overcooked and tough. The Tom Yum ($8.80) felt it could have more ingredients within.The Green Curry ($8.80) was decently thick and flavoursome though, unless some places where the gravy is really watered down.  My favourite dish so far is the Claypot Green Curry Fried Rice ($7.50) which interestingly keeps the green curry taste locked in, with the claypot keeping the dish warm and moist throughout the meal.While slightly unpolished, Baan Tong Thai does have a few dishes that reminds you of the great food memories you have in Thailand. What it needs is a little push.Baan Tong Thai
16 Kim Tian Road (10 min walk from Tiong Bahru MRT) Tel: +65 6270 1008
Opening hours: 11am – 230pm, 530pm – 1030pmOther Thai Restaurant Entries
Sweet Salty Spicy (Rail Mall)
First Thai (Purvis Street)
Suan Thai Restaurant (Killiney Road)
Porn’s (Liang Seah)
Coffee Stars by Dao (Wisma Atria)
2012-10-25 00:00:00
Nirai Kanai Okinawan Restaurant – The Experience of Authentic Okinawan Goodness in Singapore
Okinawan cuisine may sound unfamiliar to you, even if you could be a Japanese food fan. So my advice is, do not go to this Okinawan restaurant at Liang Court expecting sashimi, sushi, ramen and katsu don. The food is really quite unexpected.As Okinawa is an island, the diet of its people comprises mainly of fish, tofu and seaweed which are low-fat and low-salt in nature. An interesting fact is that this small island has the record number of centurions, and is known to be the healthiest place on earth.While I do not think Nirai Kanai Okinwan Restaurant’s authentic Okinawan cuisine such as the peanut tofu and pork belly will provide me with longevity, there are quite many surprises.There is a rather rustic feel and ‘village-like’ ambience in the restaurant, and this is reflected in the dishes as well.Its several noodle dishes, such as cold noodle in sesame sauce ($13.60) and fried noodle in vegetable sauce ($13.60), do not have the fanciful aesthetic presentation as what it would have in other Japanese restaurants. Refreshing, though not spectacular. It tastes very close to how the Chinese would have cooked their noodles, with a lighter approach both in terms of ingredients and seasoning.Its Teppanyaki-style Japanese beef hamburger steak set meal ($18.70++) is a thick slab of juicy succulent patty served with aosa seaweed soup and other side dishes.My overall favourite dish of the day was the grilled seasoned chicken thing with miso ($12.00++), evenly grilled and not too heavily seasoned so that you can still savour the flavours of the meat.The winning note here is really its ambience, decked up with a 1970s Okinawan décor with sounds of traditional Okinawan tunes. Service is uneven. My table was completely ignored during the first visit, while the second was a more pleasant experience with a real Japanese staff.There is a saying that Okinawan cuisine “begins with pig and ends with pig”, and pork dishes will be my definite choice the next time.Nirai Kanai Okinawan Restaurant
177 River Valley Road, #B1-01/02 Liang Court Shopping Centre, Singapore (Clarke Quay MRT), Tel: +65 6339 4811
Opening Hours: 12pm-3pm, 6pm-11pm (Mon-Fri), 12pm-11pm (Sat-Sun)Other Japanese Restaurants
Saizeriya Ristorante (Liang Court)
Sushi Tei (Ngee Ann City)
IKYU (Tiong Bahru)
Yayoiken (Bugis+)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
2012-10-24 00:00:00
The Manhattan Pizza Co – Huge XXXL Pizzas Lands In Singapore
I have never been to Manhattan or the New York to judge their pizzas, but I do know that this Manhattan Pizza Co in Singapore serves HUGE ones. Huge to the extent that the pizza filled the entire square table, huge that each slice is bigger than my hand, huge that 5 of my hungry friends could not finish the whole thing.20 inches long to be exact.“Chief” Joey Manoli brought their signature pizza from New York City to Singapore’s Orchard Central. The Napoli style pizza was created by Joey’s ‘Poppi’ (his papa) when their entire uprooted themselves to NYC, and made a good living out of it.The restaurant is at a difficult-to-find basement location at Orchard Central, already known for its crazy navigation. Fortunately, Manhattan is located right next to Gong Cha which probably brought some customers in.Initially, I was a little doubting. Red and yellow décor, matched with plastic chairs, and rather loud music screams ‘fast-food restaurant’ – not the kind of place I would enjoy having long chats with good friends over pizza slices and sides.But, the pizzas are pretty affordable. The classic variety such as Hawaiian and Pepperoni are $38-$39, while the specialty range such as seafood and meat lover are $40-$42. A classic slice with a drink is $5.90.Joey said that a Singaporean Tan Yi Ling was ‘schmoozing’ over their pizzas at NYC, which motivated him to come over Singapore for a look. (Interesting, I checked HungryGoWhere and there is a Tan Yi Ling giving positive reviews on Manhattan. I wonder if Joey knows.)My gym-going friends and I shared a Meat Lover / Roast Duck half and half combination ($42), with an OMG moment when the pizza first landed on our table. Proven right that size does matter.The dough is not the thin sliced kind that many Singaporeans love, but something more real, chewy and doughy that is true to the pizza that comes from the other side of the world.We loved the Meat Lover, but not as much as the Roast Duck which has a made-in-Singapore flavour. Tasting rather similar to other Peking duck pizza versions, this has slightly thicker slices of duck meat with an addictive roast meat plum sauce. We were surprised that the ‘ang mohs’ made this oriental pizza so well, so well that we finished that other half clean.Warning that eating here will temporary throw all diet plans away. Each slice is 10 inches, a definite value-for-money. That’s why the Manhattan Pizza people always say “We put the XXX in XXXL.”The Manhattan Pizza Co Classic Pizzas Giveaway!
The Manhattan Pizza Co is giving away vouchers to 5 lucky Daniel’s Food Diary readers to redeem a free 20″ Classic Pizza Of Your Choice.All you need to do is
1) *Likes* the FaceBook Page of Daniel’s Food Diary,
2) Share this post on Facebook or Retweet on Twitter AND
3) Leave a comment below to name one Pizza Flavour you hope Chief Joey will make. Be creative! (His other flavours)
Giveaway will end next Wednesday, 31 Oct 2012.The Manhattan Pizza Company M.P.C. Singapore
Orchard Central, 181 Orchard Road, B1-01 (next to Gong Cha), Singapore 238896 (Somerset MRT) Tel: 800 852 3887 (toll-free)
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm (Mon – Thur), 11 am – 10.30 pm (Fri – Sun)Other Pizza Entries
Spizza (East Coast)
Peperoni Pizzeria (Zion Road)
Da Paolo Bistrobar (Rochester Park)
Verve Pizzeria (One North)
Singapore Sling Chilli Crab Pizza (Clarke Quay)
2012-10-22 00:00:00
Ladurée – Their Macarons Make The World Go Round
[Tokyo, Japan] The favourite past-time of Japanese ladies seem to be sitting down at a cafe, savouring a pretty tiny piece of cake after a tough day of shopping. One of the cakes places to be caught in is definitely Ladurée in Tokyo, which are available at Ginza Mitsukoshi and Shinjuku Lumine. Having pastries and tea here is ‘tai tai’ life at its best.Think about it: Luxurious European furniture, macarons of every colours, cakes that are just too pretty to eat, packaging boxes that comes in pink, violet and beidge, with the touch of ribbons and their signature pastel green paper box. This is the place to be seen. And perhaps having silent conversations of handbags and flowers.Yes. I also felt awkward to be the only guy in the entire store.For fans in Singapore, if you still have not heard, Ladurée is coming to town. What’s the fuss you may wonder? They ARE the inventor of the double-decker macarons (one ‘O’ please), known to be one of the best macaron makers, and still sell more than 15,000 of them every day.From Singapore’s hearty love for macarons sold anywhere from Antoinette, Au Chocolat, Obolo, TWG, Canelé, Jean-Philippe Darcis, and Jewels Artisan, you know we have a slight obsession with the dainty brightly coloured sweet things.The Parisian luxury patisserie chain is reported to be located in town, close to its sister company PAUL Bakery at Orchard. Let me make a guess, Paragon? (Read: PAUL Bakery)One thing I must say. I have never once had bad service during my 2 weeks in Tokyo, until at Ladurée Shinjuku. The grumpy faced service staff did not smile at all. Shocking. It may be normal in other countries, but in Tokyo, this must be called ‘service-sin’.The cakes are drop-dead gorgeous, every piece of them. But also drop-dead expensive. The reddish artificial strawberry lookalike cake cost more than $15, but also perhaps one of my most memorable cakes ever (in a good way).The chocolate gelato topped with nuts, brownie and caramel sauce also tastes as good as it looks.The main let-down was surprisingly, the macarons, especially when they were also freaking expensive. Price was 2940 Yen for 8 pieces (SGD$45, USD$37). I wondered if it had anything to do with my ‘guyish’ choices of vanilla, chocolate and coffee, and should have picked the more bubblegum coloured looking blackcurrant violet, green apple or strawberry candy. Not that they were any bad, but they were just … ordinary?Until then, I hope the macarons in Singapore does not cost $45 for 8. Even though, I am sure people will still throng to buy them. Macarons? It’s never really about the taste.Ladurée
Ginza Mitsukoshi 4-6-16 Ginza, Chuo-ku, Tokyo 104-8212, Japan
Tel : +81 (0)3 3563 2120
Shinjuku Lumine 2, 1F, 3-38-2 Shinjuku-ku, Shinjuku, Tokyo 160-0022, Tel : +81 (0)3 6380 5981Other Tokyo Entries
Café & Meal Muji (Ginza, Tokyo)
Tsukiji Honten (Shibuya, Japan)
Menya Musashi (Shinjuku, Tokyo)
Mutekiya Ramen (Ikebukuro, Tokyo)
Tsukiji Fish Market (Tsukiji, Tokyo)
2012-10-18 00:00:00
Au Chocolat – Don’t Miss This Sweet Treats Paradise at MBS
Au Chocolat is a delightful additional to Marina Bay Sands, with a part-pretty part-whimsical décor, and a huge 4,700 square feet space comprising bistro, confectionary, gelato counter and even a retail segment.Located above the skating rink at MBS, you may have thought that Au Chocolat (pronounced o ∫okola) with all the chi chi tai tai dining ambience would have been opened by the French. No, it is actually opened by Singaporeans, by the same people who brought us Ku De Ta and Catalunya nevertheless.There is a childlike charm at Au Chocolat. There is a little girl Danielle (created after the owner’s niece) who is the central character at the retail side, soft toys of two dogs OO and Yu Fa (also inspired by the owners’ pets) and a running train on the ceiling. You almost feel like a child walking into a big candy stall.The bistro offers a delightful selection of all-day breakfast, salads, pastas, roasted meats, crepes and munchies.Its Truffles Fries ($15), strips of crispy potatoes drizzled with white truffles oil, seasoned with truffle sea salt, and coming wrapped in a made-believe newspaper, is easily one of the best around. The New Paper’s Wee Teck confirmed this. The fragrance of the truffles is impeccable and you can almost do it without the mayonnaise and BBQ sauce served.Who can deny that eggs benedict is THE IT brunch dish of the year? Au Chocolat’s version ($18) has its eggs almost perfectly poached, coming with hollandaise sauce infused with red wine and dark chocolate. Surprisingly, the chocolate sauce does not overpower the dish, and adds an interesting twist to the otherwise predictable flavour.It won’t be too much to say Au Chocolat is a sweet treats paradise. If your girlfriend is cake, crepes, chcocolates and cupcakes person, do not think twice about bringing her here.The Stuffed French Toast ($18), with two slices of brioche bread filled with plump berries and indulgent mascarpone cheese is “Wow” Instagram worthy. The outer layer is coated with cornflakes for a slight crunch. If only it comes topped with gelato. If only.Some may just skip the dessert menu and head off to the Confiserie to choose from a variety of cheesecakes, macaroons and cupcakes. The Kalamansi Meringue Tart is the popular choice among the girls, though I won’t mind an extra large Blanc Feuilletine Macaron ($7.00) with dark chocolate and crispy wafers vanilla cream, or a rich and dense Au Chocolat cupcake ($5.50).Nothing like a sweet treat to end a meal.Au Chocolat MBS
Bay Level L1-03, The Shoppes at Marina Bay Sands, 2 Bayfront Avenue, Singapore 018956 (Bayfront MRT) Tel: +65 6688 7227
Opening Hours: 10am – 12am DailyOther MBS Entries
Caffe B (Marina Bay Sands)
The Moluccas Rooms (Marina Bay Sands)
2012-10-16 00:00:00
Xin Wang Hong Kong Café – Supper Till Wee Hours of 4am
Suppers are evil. They help you put on those extra pounds, and eye bags when you need that additional sleep. But suppers are also some of the most enjoyable moments of friendships. During our growing up years, I am sure you can remember those class outings where we hang out with our friends till the wee hours of the morning.Sometimes we just do not know where to go to eat other than the 24 hour fastfood and prata shops. The good news is 13 out of 16 Xin Wang Hong Kong Café are operating till 4am daily, best if you are hungry after a midnight movie or KTV session.One of the characteristics of Hong Kong café is that they sell almost everything. Well, almost. More than 200 items to be more exact.What’s your favourite item at Xin Wang?Some of mine are the rather Singapore style Chicken Cutlet Dry Curry Ramen ($9.50), healthy tasting Pork Chop and Egg Papaya Soup Bee Hoon ($9.50), hearty Pork Chop and Fries ($8.80), and their super crowd pleaser Mango Snow Ice ($6.90). Not forgetting the Ice HK Milk Tea ($3.20) which has always been their signature best-selling drink.Their HK Steamed Chicken Sausage and Mushroom Bamboo Rice ($7.80) is better than I expected – tasty, moist and fragrant. I love it where there are generous portions of sausage and mushroom, and the rice is suitably warm and well-covered with sauce.I never once thought of ordering deep fried chicken at a Hong Kong café. If I really needed some, I would have went to the other restaurants starting with K, P or T yah? Their Chicken In A Basket (3 for $8.80) is dry and crisp on its outer layer and surprisingly tender on the inside, with the plus point of not being overly oily. I actually ordered it again!What I like about Hong Kong café menus is that they dare to be experimental, and adding twists to otherwise ‘cheap’ food. Their Dry Noodles with Chye Poh Omelette and Chicken Floss feels like a combination of my mother’s cooking and the usual fried instant noodles – but it somehow works. Though I must say this dish may not be consistent throughout different branches.I must say that I am not encouraging people to stay out late (especially when I am a teacher). But we all know there are times we would just want to indulge in dining and chit chatting with friends (Here’s a pic of me and foodie pals Miss Tam Chiak and CalvinTimo – taken at 1am!). Some of my best uni memories are supper times where we would search Singapore just to look for a place that is opened. At least you now know where to go and what to eat.Xin Wang Hong Kong Café Voucher Giveaway! [Giveaway ended]
Xin Wang Hong Kong Cafe is giving away $20 vouchers each to 2 lucky Daniel’s Food Diary readers.All you need to do is
1) *Likes* the FaceBook Page of Daniel’s Food Diary,
2) Share this post on Facebook or Retweet on Twitter AND
3) Leave a comment below to name your favourite supper item from Xin Wang
Results will be announced this Friday, 19 Oct 2012.Xin Wang Hong Kong Café
No. 6 Raffles Boulevard, Marina Square #01-04, Singapore 039594 (City Hall MRT) Tel: +65-6337 5297
Other outlets: Anchorpoint, Cathay Orchard Cineleisure, Changi Airport T3, Heartland Mall, Holland Village, Marina Square, Northpoint, Springvale, Sun Plaza, Tiong Bahru Plaza, West Coast Plaza, White Sands Shopping Mall, Yew Tee Point,
Opening Hours:  11am-4am (Mon-Fri), 10am-4am (Sat-Sun)Other Hong Kong Cafe Entries
KungFu Paradise (Bugis+)
Causeway Bay Hong Kong Cafe
Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong (TripleOne)
HK Kim Gary Restaurant (Vivocity)
Wong Kok Char Chan Teng (Bugis Junction)
2012-10-15 00:00:00
Family Stove + Family Wok – Yong Tau Foo Sold By A Fashionista
There behind an inconspicuous stall at the food court is this youngish-looking 30-something, who wears a straw hat, tight purple shirt, silver shoes and accessorized with a self-designed pendent.Never would you ever imagine that a former artistic director and fashion stylist would switch jobs to sell… yong tau foo! And at all places, a food court within Orchard Towers.Fashionista Cedric Tan has proclaimed that he has “seen it all” (by mid-30s) and wants to challenge himself to try something different. Having been inspired by little eateries in Japan, he wants to start-up an equally unassuming food business in Singapore.I do know of many ‘fashionable’ friends who toy with the idea of opening a ‘nice little cafe’, but it’s all up there in the mind. Cedric Tan is really that one guy who shows that you should just do what you want at least once in your life. And he has clearly no qualms about the ‘status’ of the food he is selling.The homemade Yong Tau Foo offerings are quite affordable, with a minimum order of 6 pieces at $3.80, and additional pieces at 60 cents each. A must-try is the curry version which is light, tasting rather similar to lontong gravy.I was initially worried about the calorie content, but drank it clean because it was just too sumptuous.Full Post at InSing.com – Family Stove + Family WokFamily Stove + Family Wok
1 Claymore Drive, #02-01 Eateries Paradise (above Jasons Supermarket), Orchard Towers, Singapore 229594 (Orchard MRT) Tel:+65 8688 2559
Opening hours: 12:00pm-9:00pm (Mon-Fri)Other Related Entries
Singapore’s Most Popular Noodle Stalls
Claypot Laksa (Alexandra Village)
Ah Guan Mee Pok (Syed Awi)
Beach Road Scissor Cut Curry Rice (Jalan Besar)
Nam Seng Noodles (Far East Square)
2012-10-11 00:00:00
Old Bibik’s Nasi Rendang – Mouthwatering Rendang From Grandma’s Secret Recipe
Old Bibik is a new stall at Lavender Food Square serving chicken and beef rendang, made from a secret recipe which has been passed down 3 generations.A serving of this stall’s beef rendang ($5.50) comes with rice, stir fried long beans, a slice of omelette, papadum and tender chunks of mouthwatering rendang drenched in spicy gravy. Order the Chicken & Beef Rendang combo ($6.00) if you can’t decide on which meat to have.The beef rendang is really quite sedap (Malay for ‘delicious’), and I was hooked to the rempah sauce which is prepared using fresh ingredients every day. Authentic Peranakan is indeed a hard find at the local hawker centres, moreover at such a value-for-money price. Old Bibik would have been proud of her grandson.Full Post at InSing.com – Old Bibik’s Nasi RendangOld Bibik’s Nasi Rendang
380 Jalan Besar, #01-30 Lavender Food Square, Eminent Plaza Singapore 209000, Tel: +65 9797 2842
Opening Hours: 12:00pm–11:00pm (Mon-Thurs), 12:00pm–1:00am (Fri-Sat), 11:00am–11:00pm (Sun)Other Peranakan Entries
Chinta Manis (MyVillage)
My Peranakan Spice Box (Toa Payoh)
Where To Find Nonya Food
2012-10-10 00:00:00
Ramen Bar Suzuki – For Authentic Japanese Tonkotsu Noodles
Ramen Bar Suzuki claims that they sell “the real” traditional tonkotsu (pork bone) noodles, and further says that “there are only 2 places in Singapore” that serves the authentic deal. (When asked, they revealed that the other is Ippudo.)They have three ramen choices – basic white, red representing hot and spicy, and black, similar to the other ramen shops such as Keisuke Tonkotsu King and Menya Musashi. Plus other perks such unlimited serving of steamed rice, bean sprouts, potato salad and hard-boiled eggs during lunch, and fresh cabbage for dinner.My preference is with the jet black ramen ($13.90), with added aroma of garlic and squid ink, tasting more flavourful and varied. Otherwise, go for the Tsukemen flavoured with fish, available in limited quantities.Full Post at InSing.com – Ramen Bar SuzukiRamen Bar Suzuki
Boat Quay, 61 Circular Road #01-01 Singapore 049415 (Raffles Place MRT)
Opening Hours: 11:30am-3:00pm, 5:30pm-12:00am (Closed Sun)Other Ramen Entries
Uma Uma Ramen (Forum Galleria)
Marukin Ramen (Scotts Square)
Marutama Ra-Men (Liang Court)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
Sapporo Ramen Miharu (Gallery Hotel)
2012-10-09 00:00:00
Crystal Jade Jiang Nan – Serving Multi-Coloured Xiao Long Bao & ‘Not A Fried Rice’
Crystal Jade has ventured into Jiangnan cuisine, again. While most may think that this concept at Vivocity is new, Crystal Jade once had Hui Cui which serves Shanghainese food, and Jiang Nan Cuisine at Ngee Ann City – with some of the popular menu dishes still remaining.Jiangnan food?  How many of you can name any? The famed Yangzhou Fried Rice should be considered as part. Crystal Jade Jiang Nan’s definition includes the four styles of Sichuan (川菜), Jiangsu (苏菜), Hunan (湘菜) and Shanghai（上海）for this new restaurant.I am a huge fan of Crystal Jade, whether it is the Cantonese style Crystal Jade Kitchen, Shanghainese style Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao, or bakery My Bread. However, Jiang Nan feels a little all over the place, without a definitive style, more on gimmick than nom.You see why I can hardly use the word “authentic”.All at my table were impressed by the Milk Tea in Hong Kong style ($4.50), said to be “super cold iced”. I liked the taste, as most were more intrigued by the vase-like container with an opening in the centre – where dry ice mist flowed out.  Wait, I have already seen this years ago at Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café at Orchard Central.Crystal Jade Jiang Nan serves the Multi-Flavoured, Multi-coloured Xiao Long Bao ($14.50) too! Wait, is this an authentic Jiang Nan cuisine, or a rip-off from Paradise Dynasty’s version? Coming in similar flavours such as foie grras, cheese and black truffles, the difference is you can mix and match, and there is a custard bun in the middle.I know the question you will ask – which is better? While I still enjoy Crystal Jade’s, Paradise Dynasty’s dumplings have a more distinct flavour in each, while Jiang Nan’s versions are more muted. The original are fine. Also, one or two of the Xiao Long Bao arrived badly wrapped, with the inner broth spilled before we even got to taste them.A must-try dish is the “Not a Fried Rice” ($12.80). Though I neither tasted nor heard of it prior to this experience, this legendary dish was said to be passed down since the Qing dynasty, where the emperor wanted the chef to make fried rice without using rice. Kind of a huge challenge, yah? The clever chef eventually copped up bean sprouts small bits, and sautéed it together with diced ham, egg and vegetables.It looks like fried rice, smells like fried rice, tastes a little like fried rice, but is actually a dish of ‘taugay’. With all that effort, I must say this is a simple yet appetizing dish.The Shanghainese style La Mian dishes are also worth savouring, especially the one with the chicken broth. And there are 8 types of noodle varieties you can choose from in terms of length and breath. I am still a Crystal Jade fan, and would likely to return to try more of their Shanghainese dishes – something they are really stronger in.Crystal Jade Jiangnan 翡翠江南
1 Harbour Front Walk, #01-52 VivoCity (nearest MRT Harbourfront), Tel: +65 6221 1830
Opening Hours : 11.30am – 10.30pm (Mon-Fri), 11.00am – 10.30pm (Sat-Sun)Other Related Entries
Crystal Jade Kitchen (Scotts Square)
HonGuo (NEX)
Shanghai Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
Putien (City Square Mall)
2012-10-05 00:00:00
10 Ways To Take Care of Your Work-Life Balance
You have to agree that many Singaporeans are workaholics, tirelessly slogging extended hours into the nights and sometimes during weekends. We all have our fair share of co-workers who skip meals to complete projects, send proposal emails at 3am, and do not have the other leisure life of sports and hobbies. No Work-Life Balance ah!Are you one of them?Several government agencies and organisations are already encouraging employees to have a work-life balance, by letting them work less OT and leave home before sunset, with the hope that they make more babies for Singapore. Doesn’t seem to be really working, well, at least they are trying.The good news is Phillips Singapore is initiating The ‘+’ Project to invite Singaporeans to share in a survey how we can improve the quality of lives in Singapore, and achieve better work-life balance. After the survey, you can vote for the idea that means the most to you, enter a draw to win weekly and grand prizes worth up to $10,000! It is not just a survey because whichever idea is chosen will get implemented. (Take Part in Survey)Singaporean youths who want to achieve work-life balance5 of the ideas that seek to improve the health and well-being of people in Singapore include
1) Heart Matters – Train more Singaporeans on CPR and AED to enhance well-being
2) National Picnic Day – Evening of fun featuring celebrity chefs and fitness activities
3) Parents’ University – Give all parents an upgrade to develop skills
4) Healthier Schools, Brighter Kids – Schools programmes for improved learning environments
5) Mothers’ Best Friends – Mothers’ corners that provide advice and comfortable spaces for breastfeedingI personally just signed up for a CPR and AED course. Never know when you need these life-saving skills.I am all for the five ideas to be implemented. The current top votes go to “Healthier Schools, Brighter Kids”, and yes it is ironic that even kids nowadays have so much home ‘work’ (from both school and tuition classes) that they do not have time to enjoy their childhood and develop their talents.If this idea is implemented, I hope for few possible things to happen 1) More delicious and healthier canteen food (why are our kids loving burgers and fries?) 2) More visits to places of nature, without students having to do worksheets 3) Letting the young develop in arts, dance or music, without the examinations 4) Children to be engaged in different forms of sports, from swimming to table tennis. It shouldn’t be just about tuition classes.Philips has committed to develop the winning idea and will invest up to US$50,000 to get it started. So vote for your favourite idea now because it will come to fruition!Preliminary results from the #TakeCareSg survey: Only 12% of respondents exercise at least 3 times a week. Got no time?10 Ways to Take Care of Work-Life Balance
I have a few jobs to manage, study for my Masters (previously), and take care of my handicapped parents. Life can get pretty busy and stressful at times, yet I make it a point to rest well and still meet up my friends regularly for meals and gym classes (talk about balancing off!). These are 10 ways I use to remind myself to live a better balanced life.REST – Rest when it’s time to rest, only work when it’s time to work.
SLEEP – Fix a time to sleep during workday. (For me, it’s 11pm and my alarm will set off a reminder)
PLAY – Indulge a sport or hobby, and get your good friends or loved ones involved so that there are no excuses.
EAT – Eat at least one good meal a week, and really take your time for that one meal.
COOK – Cook for your family. It’s tiring but the joy of bonding and seeing them savour your creations is immense. If I had the resources, I would definitely push for a nation-wide #CookForFamily Campaign.
TRAVEL – No better way to get rejuvenated than to be away and immerse in a different culture.
BREATHE – Slow down to enjoy the moment, All. The. Time.
READ – Read a book. Technology makes us skim, but its reading that makes us think.
LISTEN – Listen to your thoughts and your body
DREAM – The impossible may just become possible if you give yourself time to do it.Magnets reminding us to “Take Care of Ourselves”If you have other ways to achieve that Work-Life Balance, share your ideas with The The ‘+’ Project by Phillips Singapore and Tweet & Instagram with the hashtag #TakeCareSG & #SGPlus.You can also visit the Philips TAKE CARE installation at Raffles Place (last day today!) and collect a magnet with individual activation code to enter at the end of the survey (double chance of winning!). Plus, the magnets are really cute.I gotten my “Take Care of Work-Life Balance” design, which will you take?The above entry is brought to you by  The ‘+’ Project by Phillips Singapore
2012-10-04 00:00:00
Bangkok’s Platinum Fashion Mall – 5 Best Stalls At This Shopping & Food Paradise
[Bangkok, Thailand] Fellow shopaholics listen up. You cannot go to Bangkok without a visit to The Platinum Fashion Mall, a six-storey fashion, clothes, accessories, bags retail and wholesale mall. Food lovers can also proceed to Level 6 to try its very popular food court where you can try the best of Thai food at a single place, at a very affordable price. Plus it’s air-conditioned.The Food Centre is located at L6 on its 2nd Mall, and can get very crowded during peak hours. There are 28 stalls, selling cheap Thai food with some selling Japanese, Vietnamese and Chinese offerings. While half of the group is probably filled with tourists, the locals (probably staff here) also dine here. Food price is cheap cheap. Compared to its counterpart over at Mahboonkrong MBK, it feels more convenient and cleaner as you make your purchases with a pre-paid card compared to paper coupons. (Read about: MBK Foodcourt)Stewed Beef with Noodle Claypot (Stall P1) 
My favourite stall at the entire foodcourt, the stewed beef combination soup (60 Baht, SGD$2.40, USD$1.95) comes with different ingredients of sliced beef, intestine, tendon and meatballs served in a claypot. The soup, part spicy and part herbal, is extremely flavoursome and goes well with fragrant Thai rice. The beef tendons and intestines are stewed so soft that they almost melt in your mouth.Fried Oyster Omelette (Stall P11) 
The stall called “Shell to Fry, Thai Fried Noodle”, which has the longest queue during lunchtime, sells familiar Thai street fare such as Pad Tahi with Prawn (75 Baht, SGD$3.00 USD$2.45,), Thai Fried Glass Noodle (50 Baht, SGD$2.00, USD$1.60) and Hoy Tod Fried Oyster (75 Baht). The Fried Oyster Omelette is crazy good, very crispy on its edge, fried with fresh oysters, served on top on crunchy beansprouts. Do add some sweet sauce on its side for extra oomph. I did wish it was a tad less oily.Rice with Stewed Pork Limb (Stall P14)
Another favourite with tourists, the stewed pork (40 Baht, SGD$1.60, USD$1.30)  is cooked till its tender, soft, juicy and full of taste. The pork on its own can be slightly salty though, so have it with rice. If you just want to savour the meat, the Stewed Pork Limb alone is 400 Baht. You can work out the Maths.Sticky Rice with Mango (Stall F28)
This is the must-have dessert in Bangkok. The mangos are so so so so sweet. Their version (80 Baht, SGD$3.20, USD$2.60) comes with a sticky rice of black, red and white and sago beans to add an extra crunch. Very filling, yet satisfying.Claypot Kuay Chap (Stall P10)
Was recommended to this stall at Instagram. The Kuay Chap Rolled Rice Noodle Soup (45 Baht, SGD$1.80, USD$1.46) with the tender pig intestines did not disappoint. The soup retained its heat because it is stored in a claypot. I did not fancy the rice noodles as it was slightly thick and rolled up, and would have preferred if it came in thinner flat sheets.Talking about shopping, the shops operate on a ‘wholesale’ principle – one piece is retail price, and more pieces warrant a wholesale price. For example, one T-shirt can cost 190 Baht, but five T-shirts at 700 Baht. That’s $28 for five tees! I went without expecting much, but with one entire floor dedicated to men’s fashion, I came back with a luggage full. Many are seen trolling Platinum Mall with empty suitcases, while some are finding supplies for their own blog shops.Platinum mall is on Phetchaburi Road, next to Novotel Hotel, opposite Pratunam Complex, and a walking distance from Central World Plaza. It is about a 10 minute walk from Siam and Chitlom BTS, though Chitlom is slightly nearer.  Seriously, the cabs are very cheap here, just take one to enjoy your shopping and food.Platinum Fashion Mall Food Court
6th Floor (at Platinum Mall 2), 222 (Pratunum) Petchaburi Road, Ratchathevee, Bangkok, Thailand, Tel: +66 (0) 2121 8000
Opening Hours: 9am – 8pmOther Bangkok Entries
MBK Foodcourt (Bangkok)
Greyhound Café (Bangkok)
2012-10-03 00:00:00
Peach Blossoms Marina Mandarin – Its The Seasons Of Crabs Again
Singaporeans love crabs. Look at the number of different crab dishes we indulge in, and the different seafood restaurants around. Well, crab lovers are in for a treat with over 20 different crab delights at Peach Blossoms this October.Their Chinese Executive Chef Chan Shun Wong from Hong Kong has come up with two crustacean set menu, and ten à la carte crab delights. If not, you can just select from the array of Alaskan King, Sri Lankan, Cream, Meat and Flower, and ask to cook it just the way you want.  Some of the favourites include Baked with Superior Broth, Stir-fried with Ginger and Spring Onion, or with Singapore-style Chilli Sauce.My top recommendation is its Deep-fried crab ($12++ per person, or part of set menu). With a light crispy outer layer, the surprise is in its inside – juicy creamy crab meat with smooth fish roes. Some of the other versions I previously had can be dry, but Chef Chan’s creation is especially moist because milk is used to prepare the fillings.In most Cantonese style restaurants, the almond soup usually comes as a form of a dessert, and I wondered when this came as a starter. This Almond Soup as part of the set menu is double-boiled and comes with fresh crab meat and fish maw. The taste? It is slightly sweet like the almond dessert, but very refreshing and nutritious-tasting (very 补).  I can probably finish two bowls of this.Peach Blossoms’ Ee-fu Noodle ($16++) is again a different take than the usual drier and thicker style offered in other restaurants. The lighter coloured noodles comes drenched in a thick orangey crab roe fried in superior broth with generous servings of crab meat. On the flipside, it lacks of the ‘wok hei’, and could otherwise compensate by being much hotter.Did I forget to mention that Peach Blossom is always very popular for its dim sum?Peach Blossoms 鸿桃轩
6 Raffles Boulevard, Level 5 Marina Mandarin, Singapore 039594 (nearest MRT City Hall), Tel: +65 6845 1118
Opening Hours: Lunch 12pm to 2.30pm (Weekday), 11am to 2.30pm (Weekend)
Dinner: 6.30pm to 10.30pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
Old Hong Kong Legend (Raffles City)
Royal China (Raffles Hotel)
Yan Ting (St Regis)
Putien (City Square Mall)
2012-09-28 00:00:00
Ireland’s Potatoes – Popular Fries Chain from Hong Kong & Taiwan Comes To Bugis+
Wait a minute! You mean the potatoes sold at Ireland’s Potatoes are not from Ireland?Before you feel cheated, the shop is so named after it was “inspired” by the “Great Potato” famine in Ireland’s during 1845, which made the Irish treasure potatoes a lot more. Therefore it was Irish’s passionate and appreciative attitude toward the potato which inspired this brand. Not sure why the link? Me neither.On the shop front, there is a line which promotes Ireland’s proverb of “There are two things in the world that can’t be joked: 1. Marriage 2. Potato.” (Huh?)Other than that, Ireland’s Potatoes has really nothing do with Ireland, but you need to know that it is from Hong Kong, popular in Taiwan, Malaysia, Thailand and Myanmar. The shop at Bugis+ (right opposite Poulet) is Ireland’s Potato first outlet in Singapore.The snacks sold are American-type fries with interesting dips such as Honey Mustard, Yogurt Cream, Sour Cream, Cheese Pizza, Special Cheese, and Wasabi Mayo. Price for one is between $4.70 and $5.50, not exactly very cheap.I was full of anticipation because the fries I tried in Hong Kong and Taiwan are really addictive – hot, crisp and thickly-cut.After a 5 minute wait, I was slightly disappointed. No, it is not too bad at all and makes a suitable pre-cinema show snack. But the portion’s not as much as I wished for that price; the fries were not exactly piping hot; and the honey mustard dip though tasty and refreshing, was too little for a good spread.One thing’s for sure – Singaporean’s love fries. Other than the usual fast food chains, Best Fries Forever, Everything With Fries, Sofries, Rock & Ash, What The Fries and PoTeaTo all have their own fries’ fans. Which are you a fan of?Ireland’s Potato
201 Victoria Street #04-01 Bugis+ Singapore 188067 (Bugis MRT) Tel: +65 9720 0961
Opening Hours: 11am-10pm (Mon-Thurs), 11am-11pm (Fri-Sat)Other Bugis+ Entries
Poulet (Bugis+)
Kungfu Paradise (Bugis+)
Bonchon Chicken (Bugis+)
Yayoiken (Bugis+)
2012-09-27 00:00:00
Tiong Bahru Bakery Raffles City – Super Nice or Over Hyped?
Tiong Bahru Bakery is one of those places where I hear my friends complain about it being “over-rated”, “overpriced”, “hyped up”, “so-so” yet go back time and time again. If this is not the X-factor, I don’t know what is.Just in case you think this is some old-style historical bakery, this is a relatively new bakery started by the Spa Espirit Group in collaboration with Parisian baker Gontran Cherrier. (Read: 5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru)Spa Espirit Group is also the brand behind Strip, Browhaus, The Tippling Club, Skinny Pizza, O My Dog, 40 Hands, Open Door Policy and Broadcast HQ. From its track record, you know they have a midas touch.Compared to the more indie café feel at Tiong Bahru, the second branch at Raffles City (which replaced Aerins) seems more up-market, and three-times bigger which can accommodate up to 120.First things first, the queue system appears kind of dumb (or smart depending how you look at it). Even if you just want to buy a single item, you have to join in the queue line from the breads, sandwiches, cakes, coffee all the way to the cashier. Never a good plan if you are rushing back office.But psychologically, it works for them. The longer I queued, the more I saw, and the more I wanted to buy. And since I am already spending 5 minutes queuing up, I ended up with more than I originally intended to.One of their most popular items is the blacked-coloured Squid Ink Sandwich ($8.50) with plenty of rocket leaves, some salmon and little parma ham. This is more novelty than taste to me, nothing remarkable, though very healthy-tasting.Their croissants ($2.80) are said to be the “best in town” by the Straits Times and TimeOut Magazine.I had the Almond Croissant ($3.20) which is indeed worthy of mention – chewy yet soft texture, layered taste of almond paste and rum, with a sweet finishing touch of icing sugar on top. Thumbs up for the Almond Croisant.The Chocolate Brioche ($3.00) also has a pillow-like texture, making it a wonderful partner if you are settling for a cup of cuppa.Some of the cakes though not the prettiest looking, have a down-to-earth air and makes a fulfilling dessert to end the meal with. Of which the Pandan Flan ($6.00) which has an egg-tart like texture with pandan fragrance, and Chocolate Trio ($8.50)Some of the other tarts like their signature Mandarine Tart ($6.00) and Orange Blossom ($6.00) have this darker unappetizing look as compared to the Tiong Barhu main branch and an overly tough crust to crack.Tiong Bahru Bakery – some say “super nice”, some say “over hyped”. While I feel it is more of the latter, I would still probably be back to try more croissants to spend a lazy afternoon away.Tiong Bahru Bakery (Raffles Place)
252 North Bridge Road #B1-11/13 Raffles City Shopping Centre, Singapore 179103 (City Hall MRT), Tel: +65 6333 4160
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 10:00pmOther Related Entries
PAUL Bakery (Ngee Ann City)
Bakerzin Artisan Bread (MyVillage)
Barcook Bakery (Clarke Quay Central)
Maison Kayser (Scotts Square)
Joe & Dough (Suntec)
2012-09-26 00:00:00
Da Paolo BistroBar – Beautiful Space, Beautiful Food, Good Looking Chef
This is not just another Da Paolo. This BistroBar is helmed by Da Paolo Junior, aka Chef Andrea Scarpa, son of Da Paolo Group founder Paolo Scarpa. (So technically he is Scarpa Junior.) This shy 20-something created most of the dishes on its new a la carte menu, with a focus on Italian specialties with a twist.And shhh…… Da Paolo Junior is quite good looking, giving one more reason other than the desserts for the ladies to drool over. (Read: Interview with his beautiful sister Francesca Scarpa Da Paolo)The pizzas created by Chef Scarpa are quite light and ‘youngish’, tasting pretty different from any of the traditional pizzas I had. (Read: Da Paolo Ristorante)Its Sweet Corn and Smoked Duck ($24) has savoury thin slices of smoked duck with sweet corn puree as a base, resulting in a sweet-salty interesting (or peculiar tasting) combination. Duck and corn? You will either like it or hate it. All I can say is it left quite an impression for everyone on the table.I much preferred the Pear and Parma Ham ($28) where the thin curst wood-fired pizza is topped with parma harma, feta cheese and sweet pear puree base. Absolutely loved it when it was topped with a melted Gorgonzolo cheese, making the original pizza a little richer and creamier. Am sure about the additional calories too, but it’s worth it.Da Paolo has always been known for their desserts.The trio of Candied Almond Popcorn ($17) contains three different things on a single long plate: salted caramel panna cotta, crunchy honey coated popcorn and iced cold mocha. We are supposed to take a bit, a crunch, then a sip, which all results in an out of the ordinary dessert experience. The panna cotta was rather sweet, the mocha does help to balance it off.The Chocolate Caramel Bar with Salted Peanut Nougat ($17) is another creative and photogenic ‘many-likes’ dessert – caramel, chocolate and nougat stacked on a salty peanut butter chocolate base. It will take some bites for this trinity to grow in you, and I have the feeling many regulars would just go for the signature Tiramisu ($15).Da Paolo BistroBar makes a very relaxing place to chill out with friends, or enjoy a romantic dinner date. It is located in an old-style colonial black and white bungalow, surrounded by lush greenery and water features.Beautiful space, beautiful food, and a good looking chef, what more can you ask for?Da Paolo BistroBar
3 Rochester Park Singapore 139214 (near other restaurants such as B@Rochester, NOSH and Graze), Tel: +65 6773 5537
Opening Hours: Lunch 11:30am-2:30pm, Dinner 5:30pm-10:30pm, Bar 5:30pm-11:30pm (Mon-Fri)
Brunch 10:30am-2:30pm, Dinner 5:30pm-10:30pm, Bar 2:00pm-11:30pm (Sat-Sun)Other Italian Restaurant Entries
Caffe B (Marina Bay Sands)
Peperoni Pizzeria (Zion Road)
Limoncello Restaurant (Robertson Quay)
Covelli Italian Bistro & Wine Bar (Orchard Central)
Garibaldi (Purvis Street)
2012-09-25 00:00:00
Kiseki Japanese Buffet Restaurant – Mega Buffet at Mini Prices
Singaporeans will queue for a few things: buying 4D, Korean pop concert, and Japanese buffets. Kiseki Japanese Buffet Restaurant which used to be at Heeren (and didn’t exactly get the best of reviews), opened up with new life at Orchard Central.New location, new fengshui, new view, new chef, new food = very good business, so good that the queues can reach the elevators at the usually unoccupied mall.Let’s agree on this. Not every buffet is good, and not every item on the buffet menu can be good. We have seen how some buffet restaurants, while selling substandard quality items, can get pretty brisk business.With more than 200 buffet items over 29 item categories, Kiseki took me by surprise – most of the food actually tastes decent, like I would pay for them as individual items in a restaurant. Plus with a price of $19.80++ during weekday lunch, it does not exactly hurt your wallet.I don’t encourage overeating. If you are like me, who wants to make both your money and calories count worth it, here are 5 recommended items to get the most satisfaction. (Read: 5 Ways to Avoid Overeating at The Buffet Restaurant )Number 1 – Yakitori
The yakitori selections were so yummy that I went for three, or maybe four rounds of this. The chicken meat, chicken balls, pork belly and shitake mushroom skewers were of a reasonable standard – tender meat, nice bite and goes so well with the goma sesame sauce. I would gladly pay $1.20 for each outside, and after taking 15 sticks, I figured I got my money’s worth.Number 2 – Waffles with Japanese Gelato
Girls on my table went ga-ga over the waffles, which I was initially skeptical about. I mean, it was just waffles right? That was before I had it with the Japanese gelatos of black sesame and white yuzu, smooth and rich, unlike the other cheap-tasting icy ice creams at other buffet restaurants. Though it is slightly sweet, it should promise a happy ending (or intermission) to your buffet meal.Number 3 – Teppanyaki Pork
Live cooking stations are always my favourite. This is the Teppanyaki station where you can order from the chef in action items such as Beef Cubes with Garlic, Assorted Vegetables, Pork Slices, and Fried Fillet Fillet. This reminds me of the good old Shokudo Japanese Food Bazaar back in its glory days.Number 4 – Curry Ebi Tempura
The tempura, is every deep fried food fans’ baby. The curry ebi was fried crunchy with crisp batter, with a delicious twist of slight curry flavour. My friend’s boy had 6 prawns, and he is only that small-sized.Number 5 – Pasta with Wafu Sauce
The pasta station is where you can choose your own toppings such as shitake mushroom, vongole and poached eggs, with a base sauce of cabonara or wafu. While the egg did not come exactly perfect, the speed of delivery, the portion and the addictive spicy sauce made this a pleasurable dish.The other items of nabemono, chawanmushi, rosti and match cake that almost made it into my Top 5, but they were happily in my tummy anyway.Though I am not the biggest fan of buffets, Kiseki does show that good food and service is still the way to peoples’ heart.And since my AiMakan dining partner dared me to do a stupid Sumo pose…Kiseki Buffet Price
Weekday Lunch – $19.90++ for adult, $12.80++ for children
Weekend Lunch – $27.80++ for adult, $17.80++ for children
Weekday Dinner – $31.80++ for adult, $15.80++ for children
Weekend Dinner – $34.80++ for adult, $18.80 for childrenKiseki Japanese Buffet Restaurant
Orchard Central, 181 Orchard Road #08-01/02/03 Singapore 238896 (Somerset MRT) Tel: +65 6736 1216
Opening Hours:  11:30am – 3:00pm (lunch), 6:00pm – 10:30 (dinner)Other Buffet Entries
Chiso Zanmai (Clarke Quay Central)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
Silver Shell Café (Shangri La Rasa Sentosa)
10 at Claymore (Pan Pacific Orchard)
Plaza Brasserie (Park Royal Hotel)
2012-09-24 00:00:00
Seki Japanese Restaurant – How Does Seki Fare Without Chef Seki?
Seki Japanese Restaurant at Rendezvous Grand Hotel Singapore gives the impression of being expensive, perhaps due to its modern décor, classy-looking interior and location in a hotel.So imagine my surprise when I saw that it offers $15 nett lunch set and 1-for-1 lunch menu with Charcoal Grilled Saba set ($29.90), Curry Udon & California Maki Set ($39.90), and Tempura Udon & Futomaki Set ($39.90) which is all fairly reasonable for the office crowd.As for the quality of food, famous critic Wong Ah Yoke have written that “not only was the seafood very fresh, the fish was also sliced thick, allowing enough oils to be released as you chew.” That was in February when Chef Seki was around.After which, Seki Restaurant did take a few setbacks – former head chef Takuma Seki whom the restaurant was named after had left and set up his own restaurant IKYU at Tiong Bahru; Seki offered deals on Groupon which may be seen by some as lowering their image, and they have received a few negative review with regards to service. (I too cannot imagine how it would feel to still name my restaurant after a chef who has left.)Two changes of chefs later, owner Keith Toh just wants to make things right, and his passions is admirable.For the food, one of their main specialties is Sashimi Moriawase on Ice ($42 for 3 kind or $75 for 5 kind). The ingredients are imported fresh from Tokyo, Hokkaido and Osaka. Accordingly, their shipment arrives every Tuesday and Thursday, and my tip is to have it on Thursday because that’s when they have a larger order for the weekends. (Read about Tsukiji Fish Market)The sashimi arrived picture-worthy like a work of art, and though it is pricier than some of the Japanese restaurant chains, there is a certain level of freshness guaranteed here.  The Ebi (shrimp) was easily my favourite – sweet, fresh and juicy with a certain bite. You know how horrible it can be if your prawns are mushy.Seki’s signature Sushi Moriawase ($68) is equally gorgeous, with the various pieces picked by the chefs. The portion seems good enough for two who are on a date.  I was impressed by the amount of effort taken into plating, which again demonstrates the pride of the Japanese. While the taste of the sushi is not spectacular, the selection is definitely above average with the pieces succulent and thickly cut.My main recommendation is the Foie Gras with Robatayaki Beef Steak ($42) with charcoal grilled tender beef sirloin steak topped with succulent foie gras – which is an almost perfect combination of two superior ingredients.From the menu’s selection, you would get a sense that Seki is still finding its way and footing in an increasingly competitive F&B industry. Yes, the price can be a notch high, but I had a great dining experience – welcoming environment, decent sashimi and elegantly beautiful place to enjoy an easy dinner.SEKI Japanese Restaurant
9 Bras Basah Road, #01-02 Rendezvous Hotel Gallery Tel: +65 6336 3806
Opening Hours: 12pm–3pm, 6pm–11pm DailyOther Japanese Restaurant Entries
IKYU (Tiong Bahru)
Sushi Tei (Ngee Ann City)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
Yayoiken (Bugis+)
B@Rochester (Rochester Park)
2012-09-21 00:00:00
Tokyo’s Tsukiji Fish Market – What To Do, How To Go, What To Eat
[Tokyo, Japan] Tsukiji Fish Market (築地市場), the world’s most famous fish market, is the must-go for first time visitors to Tokyo Japan. This popular wholesale market is where you will experience the real-life seafood auction with some of the biggest and freshest fishes you have ever seen in your life.What To Do 
If you are willing to wake up early enough to take an expensive taxi ride over, go for the tuna auction. However, the total number of visitors a day is restricted to only 120.Foreigners who wish to view the auction have to apply at the Osakana Fukyu Center (Fish Information Center) at the Kachidoki Gate, starting from 5:00am on a first-come, first-serve basis. A first group of 60 visitors will be admitted to the auction between 5:25 and 5:50am, while a second group of 60 visitors will be admitted between 5:50 and 6:15am. I hear of visitors going at 4am.If you do not mind skipping the auction, Tsukiji Market stays open until 1pm, though the real action does not exactly happen beyond 8am, and many shops close after 10am.The next best time to visit is probably 9am because the wholesale market inside Tsukiji is off-limits to visitors until after 9 am.How To Go 
Many tourists may make the mistake of stopping at Tsukiji Station itself. The nearest station to Tsukiji Market is actually Tsukijishijo Station, reachable by the Toei Subway Oedo Line (The Magenta coloured line). If you would take the Tokyo Metro Hibiya Line to the Tsukiji Station, it would be about a 10 minutes walk.You can take the Oedo Subway Line directly from Shinjuku Station to Tsukiji Shijo Station. The one way trip will take about 20 minutes and cost 260 yen (SGD$4, USD$3.32).What To Eat
A sashimi and sushi breakfast is a MUST at Tsukiji. Imagine how fresh the fish would be since this is THE market where all the best sashimi comes from. Tsukiji’s most popular sashimi restaurants can be found in inner alleys of Building 6, reached by walking in from the main entrance. You can also ask directions from the friendly security guards around, or follow tourists armed with the Lonely Planet.Although they are many sushi joints at Tsukiji, two shops attract the longest queue – Sushi Dai (寿司大) and Daiwa Sushi (大和寿司). Many chose to walk in random shops during their visits, without the queue, and their standards won’t be too far off.Sushi Dai is the easily most popular joint in the whole of Tsukiji, with queues snaking at the side of the shop, and can take from 2 to 3 hours for your wait. Starting operations at 5am, the set of 10 pieces and 1 roll will set you back by 3900 yen (SGD$61, USD$50).For something very similar in quality and a much shorter queue, move to a shops away at Daiwa Sushi, which is actually run by the son of the owner of Sushi Dai. It is said that the father and son team fish together and compete to see who can catch and make the best sushi in Tsukiji.I queued for about 40 minutes at a more tourist-friendly English speaking Daiwa Sushi before I was led it a small side of the shop which can sit about 10. (Even after I finished eating at Daiwa, I noticed that the queue at Dai has not really moved.)The Omakase chef’s choice is 3,500 yen (SGD$55, USD$45) for seven sushi and one roll. If you work the sums, each sushi will be about $7 – much more expensive than usual. The flavours will depend on the catch of the day, typically including ebi (shrimp), uni (sea urchin), hamachi (yellowtail), tamago (sweet egg), tuna rolls, as well as a bowl of miso and green tea.Just as I was still wondering if I should have paid that much, the first sushi I tried was almost life-changing, unforgettable, extremely fresh that the meat almost melts in your mouth. Not exaggerating. If you never liked sushi, this may change your mind.It was so unbelievable that my dining partner said, “So this is how sushi actually tastes like. What have I been eating all my life?” (True enough, any sushi eaten back home just does not taste good enough anymore.)Despite the fact that we all woke up very early in the morning, traveled long distances, and queued for a while, this sushi meal at Daiwa was very enjoyable, and informative. The chef preparing the sushi would find time to joke and explain how you should eat sushi right. Sure, it is not cheap, but I can never fault the Japanese for their service standards and food quality, ever.So what happens after this early meal? Make your way to high-end Ginza which is just a few stations away for some shopping, provided you do not smell too fishy.Daiwa Sushi (大和寿司)
Tsukiji Market Part 6 Building, 5-2-1 #6 (5-10 min walk from Tsukiji Shijo Station). Tel: +-3 3547-6807
Opening Hours: 5:00am-1:00pm (Closed Sun, some Wed)Tsukiji Fish Market (築地市場)
5-2-1 Tsukiji (Tsukijishijo Station, Toei Oedo Subway), Tel: +81 03-3542-1111
Opening Hours: Outer Market 5:00am-1:00pm, Wholesale Market 9:00am-1:00pm, Tuna Auction 5:00am-6:15am. Closed Sundays, holidays, and the second and fourth Wednesdays of each monthOther Tokyo Entries
Tsukiji Honten (Shibuya, Tokyo)
Menya Musashi (Shinjuku, Tokyo)
Mutekiya Ramen (Ikebukuro, Tokyo)
Sugamo Konaya (Roppongi, Tokyo)
Café & Meal Muji (Ginza, Tokyo)
2012-09-20 00:00:00
5 Best Mooncakes for 2012 – The Good, The Pretty and The Weird
If there are any trends of mooncakes in 2012, it will be a) flavours are getting more adventurous b) many shops other than the hotels and restaurants are selling mooncakes, and c) they are getting so much more expensive.Let us see some of the weird ones, Angry Bird mooncakes from Peony Jade (cute), Baked lobster mooncakes from Majestic Restaurant (extravagant), Ham and Cheese from Mandarin Court Chinese Restaurant (seriously), Bak Kwa mooncakes from Singapore Marriott Hotel (better to leave for CNY), and Ginseng with Macadamia Nuts mooncakes from TCM company Eu Yan Sang (does this improve my blood circulation?).Who would have thought that mooncakes which were once used in the Ming dynasty to hide secret messages for the Han Chinese revolt, would have turned be to a huge marketing gimmicky device in 2012?Consider me boring. I am less adventurous in my choices (give me plain lotus paste any time), and here are my Best 5 Mooncakes which left an impression out of the dozens in my fridge.Best Mooncake 2012 – The Peninsula Hong Kong available Takashimaya Square & Wheat Baumkuchen (Read: Egg Custard Mooncakes) 
Trust the Hong Kongers to come out with such delicious mooncakes. If you haven’t never tried The Peninsula Hong Kong’s egg custard mooncakes ($48 for eight assorted mini), you do not know what you are missing out. Based on the exclusive traditional recipe originating from The Peninsula Hong Kong in 1986, the light mini-egg custard mooncake is a delicious contemporary take on the traditional filling of lotus seed paste and duck egg yolk. Boss told me that it has been selling like hot-cakes since my blog post, and only limited boxes are left.Best Lotus Paste Mooncake – Mandarin Court 
Created by Executive Chinese Chef Sunny Kong, Mandarin Court at Mandarin Orchard has homemade creations such as the Mini Snow Skin Raspberry Mooncake ($56 for 8),  Mini Snow Skin Cheese with Citrus Mooncake ($56 for 8), and the ladies’ favourite of Mini Snow Skin Lychee Martini Mooncakes ($52 for 8). However, it was the most traditional one that stole my heart. I find the Baked Mooncake with Single Yolk and White Lotus Paste ($55 for 4) simple, straightforward, smooth and not overly sweet.Best Durian Mooncake – Goodwood Park Hotel (Read: Mao Shan Wang Mooncakes)
Talk about durian mooncakes, the first place to come to mind is Goodwood Park Hotel. (Read Goodwood Park Hotel’s Durians).This year they have launched Mao Shan Wang durian mooncakes ($38 for two pieces, $68 for four pieces) which will delight every durian fan. The snowskin is in a pretty olive green representing the durian husk, also reminding me of huge jade blocks. The Mao Shan Wang, the king of all durian variant, has firm yet creamy flesh, and leaves a deep impression everytime you open your fridge.Best Weird Flavours – Peach Blossoms 
I right to say some mooncakes are just different for the sake of being different. Dim Sum Chef Kerene Cheng must have an extremely difficult task creating mooncakes (S$56.80 for a box of 8, with 2 pieces per flavour).representing the flavours of life – sour, sweet, bitter and spicy (酸、甜、苦、辣). Bitter mooncakes?! The Osmanthus with White Lotus Paste being sweet and delicate is easily my favourite. Some would find that the Spicy Chocolate Snowskin Mooncake differently refreshing. While the Mini Bitter Gourd & Cashew Nuts does not really work for me, it has its fair share of fans. Looks like there is something for everyone.Best Packaging – Crystal Jade (Read: Crystal Jade Mooncakes)
Crystal Jade’s Mid-Autumn gift set this year must have been one of the most beautiful I have received. Its limited edition Premium Gold Treasure ($88.00 for 4 pieces) comes with four individual boxes with lids of silk, each adorned with a “seal” with the words “Fei Cui” (Crystal Jade in Chinese). Consider this one of the higher priced mooncakes around. The set comprises of Gold Leaf White Lotus Paste with Double Yolk, Gold Leaf Red Lotus Paste with Double Yolk, Gold Leaf Plain White Lotus Paste, and Gold Leaf Mixed Nuts and Ham. After finishing the mooncakes, mum can use it to keep jewellery.One man’s mooncake is another man’s heartache. Which is your favourite mooncake this year, one you are willing to consume 800 calories for?Other Mooncake Entries
Ice Cream Mooncakes (Haagen Dazs)
Pandan Mooncakes (BreadTalk)
Taiwanese Pineapple Cakes (SunnyHills)
Taiwan Pineapple Cakes (Din Tai Fung)
Egg Custard Mooncake (The Peninsula Hong Kong)
2012-09-19 00:00:00
Shangri-La’s Waterfall Café – Perfect Place For That Romantic Dinner Date
Recently, I have been a “date guru” of sorts. Not just food anymore. People asking me where to bring their girlfriends on a first date, first month anniversary, first year anniversary etc etc. Actually, I rather not recommend as I would never want to be guilty of recommending a ‘wrong’ place and spoiling that date (forever).‘Wrong’ because I don’t believe that many wrong places when compared to wrong dates.I think the other party will be pretty impressed and delighted to have a dinner at Shangri-La Hotel’s new Waterfall Café. It is very respectable, yet does not cost a bomb. I however, would not recommend this for the very first date.  Set your cost expectations right first, because it should only get better (or higher).Let’s see… One of Singapore’s top hotel, tropical greenery, poolside view, dim yellow lighting, colonial interior, comfy furniture, lovely chocolates and desserts… checked, checked, checked.The mains consist of healthy yet creative and colourful-looking dishes inspired by Mediterranean flavours, created by Chef de Cuisine Stephane Cocu.The Seared Sea Scallops ($24) in hazelnut crust, crushed potatoes, port win jus sets the tone right – light pan-fried, crispy on the outer crust, and fresh and moist on the inside. Easily the most memorable dish of the evening.I had the Atlantic Cod ($38) which is served on barley risotto, an interesting take as most would have been cooked with rice. The barley gives the dish a light sweetness, and has slight foam which adds a more varied texture. Probably two can share this if both are light eaters.If you date is a vegetarian, the Socca ($21) which comes with spicy tomato coulis, roasted vegetables, fresh herb salad and pesto is both a beautiful and delectable dish.Every date should end with a dessert, and it is usually a key deciding factor on whether the dinner would turn out well. The dainty looking Lemon Curd with Fresh Blueberry with Orchid Root Scented Coulis ($10) was surprisingly my favourite dessert, for just being very different from all the rest of them.Dating a chocolate lover is a high possibility. You can go for the Valrhona chocolate cake with Bourbon Vanilla Ice Cream ($14) though there is no chocolate flowing from the centre, or the Trio of Chocolate Mousse ($8) which has white, milk and dark chocolate beneath a cacao crumble which should set you on a chocolate high.And guess who I spotted having a date with his wife at Waterfall Café? Professor Tommy Koh!  Now, if Chubby Hubby’s daddy and mummy are here, you know you have probably chosen the right place to treat the love of your life.Waterfall Café (Shangri-La Hotel)
22 Orange Grove Road, Garden Wing, Level One, Shangri-La Hotel Singapore 258350, Singapore 258350 Tel: +65 6213 4138
Opening Hours: Breakfast Mon – Sun: 6.30am – 11am, Light Snacks, Mon – Sun: 11am – 12pm, 3pm – 6pm, Lunch Mon – Sun: 12pm – 3pm, Dinner Mon – Sat: 6pm – 10:30pmOther Possible Date Places
Wooloomooloo Steakhouse (Raffles City)
The Royal Mail (Ascott Singapore)
Cocotte (Wunderlust Hotel)
Salt Tapas & Bar (Raffles City)
TongKang Colonial Bar & Restaurant (Clarke Quay)
2012-09-18 00:00:00
The Star Vista’s Complete Food & Restaurant Guide
One of the most anticipated malls in Singapore, The Star Vista has finally opened at Buona Vista! Are you excited or what? The Star is quite unlike any other. From a distance, the architectural design is spectacular and looks like a ship – probably inspired from the story of Noah’s Ark.The lower 3 levels are operated by CapitaMalls Asia, and makes this the first naturally cooled mall in Singapore. That means no aircon when you walk outside the shops (and I was sweating a little)! But, it does feel like you are taking a stroll in the park with natural air.Located above The Star Vista is The Star Performing Arts Centre, owned and managed by Rock Productions, and is one of Singapore’s largest performance venues with a 5,000 seat auditorium. This is also where New Creation Church ministered by Senior Pastor Joseph Prince will have its weekly Sunday services at the upper room after it moves out of Suntec.For friends working at the Buona Vista, Rochester, One North, Biopolis and Fusionpolis, The Star Vista is probably a long-waited new lunch spot. And for church-goers at New Creation, this is where you will enjoy your blessed meals. (Read other eats at Rochester: B@Rochester, Obolo Galeria & Pies & Coffee.)Here is a mall directory of the various Food places at The Star Vista. Good news as from the list, you will know there is no lack of food choices (Note: Not all shops are opened yet).Basement 1
-18C, Canton Paradise Teahouse, Four Leaves, Fresh-Healthy Café, Marble Slab Creamery, Menya Musashi , Nando’s, Shake a treat, SOFRIES, Subway, Texas Chicken, The Manhattan Fish Market, Wrap & Roll, Xi Men JieLevel 1
Boston Seafood Shack, Chewy Junior, District 10 Bar Tapas Restaurant, dr Café, espresSOUP, Gong Cha, Hot Tomato Café & Grill, iBake, Itacho Sushi, Jamaica Blue, PappaRich, Pinocchio, Riciiotti-Pizza Pasta Grill, Sogurt, Trip-O’s by Whiteshop, NeNe ChickenLevel 2
Awfully Chocolate, BlackBall, Bornga, Brotzeit, CoCo ICHIBANYA , La barra, Lee’s Taiwanese, Morganfield’s, Owl Café, PORN’s, Senor Taco, Shiraz Lazziz Bistro & Bar, The Kitchen, Watami, Ya Kun, Youmenya GoemonThis brand new lifestyle destination does have a mix of tenants quite unlike the other malls in Singapore. For fellow foodies, here are 5 interesting food finds at The Star Vista. (And I still can’t believe I ate all of these in a single day. Abundance indeed.)Morganfield’s #02-23
Morganfield’s has a cosy relaxing ambience which offers both indoor and alfresco seating. The food served is traditional American style, such as its signature Sticky Bones ($24.90 for half-slab, $36.90 for full-slab) which is old-fashioned barbeque pork ribs basted with special sweet and tangy hickory barbeque sauce. Surprisingly, the set lunches are very affordable, starting with $9.90 for a main course with soup and drink. Unfortunately what I wanted (both the Black Pepper Chicken and Quarter Honey Stung Chicken) were sold out during lunch time of Day 1 of operations. Settled for a Sirloin with Caramelized Onions ($16.90) which is decent though not spectacular, and a tiny tad small-portioned for guys like me. (Read: Full review of Morganfield’s)Boston Seafood Shack #01-46
Boston Seafood Shack has the exterior design that caught my attention most – a fun colourful carnival type of décor. The food offers hearty flavours of the Bostonian harbour such as Golden-Battered Fish & Chips, Boston Clam Chowder and Boston Premium Lobstar Rolls. The Battered Cod ($12.90) comes wrapped in paper (so Aussie, I like) with servings of vinegar on side (so British, I like). The batter is deliciously crisp, but the fries reek of a fishy after-taste which is quite a spoiler. Has potential.Owl Café #02-10/11
One of Singapore’s most familiar coffee brand Owl has its developed its first Owl café, which serves toast and an array of Asian-fusion delights such as Hainanese Curry Chicken, Assam Mango Chicken, Chicken Meat Ball Soup and Soft Shell Chill Crab Pasta (very similar to Old Town White Coffee’s concept). The Toast is unexpectedly tasty, with crispy evenly toasted sides, and generous topping of kaya and fragrant butter. Both the Kopi and Teh, unfortunately, were bad – one too thick and saccharine sweet, the later diluted and watery thin. We know this is first day on its job, and should deserve a second and third chance.The Kitchen #02-25/26
The Kitchen by Koufu is the only food court at the Star Vista, with well-loved local favourites like Chicken Rice, home-made Yong Tau Foo, Ban Mian and Mixed Vegetable Rice amongst others. There is also a wide variety of International cuisine represented by the choice of Japanese, Korean, Western or Hong Kong delights. My main question is: Why is the dessert and fruit juice stall outside the food court in the open? This will probably be my default eating place for cheaper eats.Sogurt #01-34
Sogurt and Sofries are sister companies, with Sofries selling a variety of fries (cereal fries anyone?) with 15 different flavoured dips. They were unfortunately not ready to serve us. Sogurt is a yogurt-by-weight shop, with more than 10 different flavours of low-fat, high calcium yogurt as well as an spectrum of toppings to choose from. Considering the mall can be rather warm during the day-time, having a yogurt here felt like heaven. The chocolate is my favourite, managing to balance a thick chocolate taste with light yogurt. (Read: Review of Sogurt)“When they saw The Star, they rejoiced with exceeding great joy.”
With The Star Vista now opened, which is that one Food Outlet that you want to try first?The Star Vista
1 Vista Exchange Green, Singapore 138617 (Buona Vista MRT)
Opening Hours: 10:00am – 10:00pmOther 5 Best Entries
5 New & Best Ramen Places in Singapore 
5 Stalls To Try at Maxwell Food Centre
5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru
5 Oozing Food That Singaporeans Love
5 Ways to Avoid Overeating at The Buffet Restaurant
2012-09-17 00:00:00
The Peninsula Hong Kong – Superb Divine Egg Custard Mooncakes, Available in Singapore!
The Peninsula Hotel (香港半岛酒店) is one of Hong Kong’s best and classiest hotels, and they are known to produce one of the best mooncakes around.Imagine my huge surprise when I found out that I did not have to travel all the way to Hong Kong for their renowned mooncakes, as they are now available in Singapore!The Peninsula’s mooncakes are available in two flavours, traditional Lotus Seed Paste and the best-selling Egg Custard. If you want to try both, get the assorted Mini Mooncakes box ($48 for eight mini-mooncakes).If you haven’t never tried their egg custard mooncakes before, you do not know what you are missing out. Based on the exclusive traditional recipe originating from The Peninsula Hong Kong in 1986, the light mini-egg custard mooncake is a delicious contemporary take on the traditional filling of lotus seed paste and duck egg yolk.Air-flowned to Singapore, Penisula’s mooncakes are quite cute and weigh about 40 grams compared to the regular size of 160 grams. They are small with soft pastry shellls, and you can easily finish one in a mouthful.When I took my first bite, it was actually the slight taste of the salted duck egg yolk that took me by surprise – it is not quite what I ever tasted before. After that, the light and delicate custard which is made from butter, coconut milk, eggs, condensed milk, corn starch, and wheat flour slowly grows on you, with quite a few dimensions to the taste.And so, the most impressionable mooncake I had this year (after trying more than 10 boxes), is actually from Hong Kong. Not too much of a surprise since they have always been known for their pastries.I found the Peninsula Hong Kong’s mooncakes at an unexpected place – Wheat Baumkuchen Pastry & Noodle Bar (branches at One Raffles Place and Toa Payoh), which is where I go to should I crave for healthy cold ramen and soba. I would say “Mai Tu Liao” – Delay No More!Wheat Baumkuchen Pastry & Noodle Bar
1 Raffles Place, #B1-15 One Raffles Place (OUB Centre), Singapore (Raffles Place) Tel: +65 6535 0277
Opening Hours: 8am – 8pm (Mon–Fri)Other Mooncake Entries
Crystal Jade Mooncakes 
Mao Shan Wang Mooncakes (Goodwood Park)
Ice Cream Mooncakes (Haagen Dazs)
Pandan Mooncakes (BreadTalk)
Taiwanese Pineapple Cakes (SunnyHills)
2012-09-14 00:00:00
Crystal Jade Mooncakes – Premium Gold Treasure $88.80 Mooncakes!
Why would you buy mooncakes for, I may ask?5 out of 10 I asked gave me any other answers, but the taste of mooncakes: The pretty packaging, that famous ‘brand’, the free gifts, the innovativeness of the flavours, the cuteness (Angry Birds Mooncakes anyone?).Talking about packaging, Crystal Jade’s Mid-Autumn gift set this year must have been one of the most beautiful I have received. Its limited edition Premium Gold Treasure ($88.00 for 4 pieces) comes with four individual boxes with lids of silk, each adorned with a “seal” with the words “Fei Cui” (Crystal Jade in Chinese). Consider this one of the higher priced mooncakes around.These purple and blue-silver boxes remind me of one of those boxes used in some Hong Kong TVB period drama “Beyond the Realm of Conscience” 宮心计 where the imperial concubine will keep their golden jewelries. My mother will probably use it to keep receipts.Will your mum keep the mooncake boxes?The set comprises of Gold Leaf White Lotus Paste with Double Yolk, Gold Leaf Red Lotus Paste with Double Yolk, Gold Leaf Plain White Lotus Paste, and Gold Leaf Mixed Nuts and Ham. Of all the flavours, the simple white lotus paste is still my favourite, while the mixed nuts and ham is really not my thing. (Consider one mooncake wasted?)The auntie at Crystal Jade told me that if I did not really care that much about packaging and boxes, then go for the more casual Magnificent Five ($68.00 for 5 pieces)  which comes with similar flavours. “Oh, but no gold leaf on top ah!”Mooncakes may be considered too ‘heaty’ and sweet for children, and you may want to get the lighter, fruitier flavours for them. Crystal Jade My Bread’s Yogurt Pudding Mooncake series, the Kindred Bliss ($22.00), comes in a set with in Mango, Mixed Berries, Apple, and Original flavours. On the flipside, they don’t keep long.You can purchase the mooncakes at most Crystal Jade outlets. Advance orders can be made three days in advance (until Thursday, 27 September). Orders can also be made via the Crystal Jade Mooncake Hotline at 6512 0800 Mondays to Fridays, 9am – 6pm.
Crystal Jade My Bread (Thomas Plaza, Ang Mo Kio, IMM Building, Takashimaya, Junction 8, Suntec City Mall)Other Mooncake Entries
Mao Shan Wang Mooncakes (Goodwood Park)
Ice Cream Mooncakes (Haagen Dazs)
Pandan Mooncakes (BreadTalk)
Taiwanese Pineapple Cakes (SunnyHills)
Taiwan Pineapple Cakes (Din Tai Fung)
2012-09-13 00:00:00
5 Stalls To Try At Maxwell Food Centre
Maxwell Road Food Centre has closed for two months to clean up the premises and has reopened again. Two months did feel like a long wait.I am sure some of you have your favourite stalls there including: Tian Tian Chicken Rice,  Zhen Zhen Porridge , Lao Ban Beancurd ,  Hoe Kee Porridge and Dim Sum, Jin Hua Fish Head Bee Hoon, Hum Jin Pang, and the newly opened Rolina Curry Puffs and Special Shanghai Tim-Sum .Here are 5 Stalls you may want to try:Tian Tian Chicken Rice
Probably one of Singapore’s most famous chicken rice stall, Tian Tian’s winning formula to me has to be its rice. Even Anthony Bourdain said that the chicken rice is so fragrant and delicious that it can be eaten on its own. Probably one of the best chicken rice in Singapore, it’s warm, fluffy, fragrant and tasty. So good I can just eat it with the chilli sauce. And you can always hop to Ah Tai Chicken Rice (their ex-Master chef) 2 stalls away for a comparison.Zhen Zhen Porridge
If you liked your porridge thick and dense, cooked with broken grains instead of whole rice, you would find Zhen Zhen’s porridge pleasurable. Every spoonful of porridge I eaten was full of ingredients, such as chicken meat (or fish slices) and century egg, and other peripherals of spring onion, shallots and chopped preserved vegetables.  That made the porridge un-plain and exciting to eat. BUT, be prepared to wait for a very, very, very long time. And they close really early.Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodles
While this is not Maxwell’s most known stall, it has been around for the last 14 years. We have tried many types of char siew noodles but how about black pepper char siew dumpling noodles ($4.50)? This is very close to the styled served in Hong Kong, with springy wanton noodles topped with thickly sliced char siew and leafy kai lan. Owner Mr Lim explained that thick cut of the roast meat is to let customers enjoy the meat’s succulence and tenderness betterSpecial Shanghai Tim-Sum
Special Shanghai Tim-Sum is better known as “that dumpling stall from Queenstown”, and has since relocated to Maxwell. I will always go for their fried guotie, which has a unique crispy thin skin, and delicious juicy fillings.  I know that their Hot & Sour Soup ($4) is a hot favourite among loyal customers too. It’s thick, eggy and only slightly spicy, reeking of simple home-cooked goodness.Jin Hua Sliced Fish Bee Hoon
Jin Hua prepares Cantonese style fish head beehoon soup, and its selling point is in its hot piping milk fish broth. At $4 per bowl, this comes with a few chunks of fried fish, which tastes really succulent and yummy when it absorbs all the thick soup. The thick vermicelli is interesting thinner, and cooked more al dente than the usual.  Be prepared to wait even during non-peak hours (took me 20 min when I went about 11:30am), as the chef cooks only two pots at the time,Which is that ONE stall you always try at Maxwell?Other 5 Best Entries
5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru
5 Restaurants at HarbourCity for Doreamon
5 Strangest Durian Combinations
5 Oozing Food That Singaporeans Love
5 Must Try Food in Taipei
2012-09-12 00:00:00
5 Ways to Avoid Overeating at The Buffet Restaurant
Do you both love and hate buffets – love the variety and choice of food, but hate the feeling of overeating, with a sense of guilty and feeling plumpish at the same time. Not a good feeling to have, right?How to avoid overeating at the buffet restaurant? The most important rule of thumb – Don’t feel the need to CONQUER every single food at a single seating! Sometimes when I see the amount fellow customers eat, I also get a bit terrified.So I was invited to a buffet tasting at one of my favourite All-You-Can-Eat restaurant, Plaza Brasserie at Park Royal, as they have a new Thai cuisine promotion. (Read about their Crab Buffet, The Seafood Buffet, Dragon Feast and Grandma’s Favourites).You may want to consider some of the following tips when you go for your next buffet experience.Start the Meal with a Salad
Some may be thinking, “Shouldn’t we start the meal with the most expensive items – the crabs, prawns, oysters and meat?!” No, no, no. Preceding the meal with salad or soup can help curb appetite. Plus, filling up on fiber-rich foods first can help reduce overall calorie intake at a meal by up to 12 percent. Research shows that people who started meals with soup ended up eating less than those who skipped the soup.Zesty Thai papaya salad to start the meal. Pile up those fiber first.Order From The Live-Cooking Stations 
When eating, your brain needs about 20 minutes to get the “signal” that you are not hungry anymore. I know some people hate queuing at the live-cooking stations, but the waiting gives you time to digest the food you already eaten. Plus, you can tell the chef to do a healthier version of any dish – less oil, less carb, and more vegetables. And I always feel better eating hot and fresher food anyway.My order, Thai Beef Noodle Soup from live-cooking station – less kway tiao!Do Your Research Before Going to the Buffet
Most reviews and credible food blogs should recommend the highlights of the buffet. Reading up on the must-eats can help you plan your buffet meat ‘strategically’, start eating with your favourite food types, and not waste calories on the yuckier food.If you are going for this Thai buffet and need 3 recommendations, it would be Thai Beef Noodle Soup, Thai Fish Maw Soup and Steamed Thai Fish in Lime and Chilli.Only Eat Food That You Like 
I know some people will feel it is very “wasted” if you don’t get to try every food at the table. I think it is a far greater “waste” and injustice to your taste-buds and tummy if we keep stuffing with every single thing – good and bad. We should just enjoy the good food right? I have a friend who keeps eating fresh oysters and crabs at the buffet, despite the fact that he doesn’t really like them. Because he wants to feel his money is well-spent! “If not, very lugi!” How, like that?May be seen as a ‘cheap’ dish, but this simple Thai style Kai-lan reminds me of this wonderful zhi char stall at Bangkok. Eat food that you really enjoy at the buffet, remember, you are not competing with anyone.Spend Some Time Plating and Photographing Your Food
Place food on your dinner plate as if you want to photograph it later (or you can really instagram the food). You will find that you will end up taking less, and not pile up like a mountain. The time spent can also help you digest your food slowly. If not, focus on talking to the dining mates, rather than eating off your dining plate. A great conversation is the winning formula at the buffet table.The smaller the plate, the better. Style your plate, make conversations with your friend, shoot a pic before you enjoy the food.Flavours of Thai Buffet at Parkroyal on Beach Road is on from 5 Sep till 31 Oct 2012
Price: Adult $52++, Child $31++ (Mon-Thu dinner); Adult $55++, Child $33++ (Fri-Sun dinner)Plaza Brasserie
7500A Beach Road, Park Royal on Beach Road (Nearest MRT Bugis), Tel: +65 6505 5710
Opening Hours: 6am – 12am DailyOther Buffet Entries
Silver Shell Café (Shangri La Rasa Sentosa)
Chiso Zanmai (Clarke Quay Central)
10 at Claymore (Pan Pacific Orchard)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
Carousel (Royal Plaza on Scotts)
2012-09-12 00:00:00
Din Tai Fung – Mid-Autumn Taiwan Pineapple Cakes
Looks like the Taiwanese style pineapple cakes are gaining popularity in Singapore as gifts during the Mid-Autumn festival, other than traditional lotus mooncakes. (Read: Why Do Taiwanese Give Pineapple Cakes During Mid-Autumn?)Din Tai Fung is also offering their pineapple cakes as gift sets, $24.80 nett for a box of eight with premium Jasmine tea. These pineapple cakes are baked in their Taiwan’s central kitchen and air-flown to Singapore! (Read: Din Tai Fung at Taipei 101 + Guide To Eating Xiao Long Bao The Right Way)The filling is ‘jam-my’, made with Songshan pineapples which is slightly sweet and not too acidic or tangy. Be careful though, their buttery golden crust is very crumply, and I am very sure bits will fall off if you just bite off without a plate holding the crumbs. I kind of like that because a full complete block would otherwise feel overly artificial.[Giveaway Ended] Din Tai Fung Mid-Autumn Taiwan Pineapple Cakes Giveaway!
Din Tai Fung is giving away 2 boxes of the Mid-Autumn Taiwan Pineapple Cakes to lucky Daniel’s Food Diary readers. Each box will contain eight pineapple cakes and two boxes of premium Jasmine tea in an elegant gift packaging.All you need to do is
1) *Likes* the FaceBook Page of Daniel’s Food Diary,
2) Share this post on Facebook or Retweet on Twitter AND
3) Leave a comment below to name ONE Din Tai Fung branch in Singapore (If you need a CLUE)Results will be announced on Friday 14th September 2012. Contest winners must furnish a Singapore postal address. T&C applies.Other Mooncake Entries
Mao Shan Wang Mooncakes (Goodwood Park)
Ice Cream Mooncakes (Haagen Dazs)
Pandan Mooncakes (BreadTalk)
Taiwanese Pineapple Cakes (SunnyHills)
2012-09-12 00:00:00
Special Shanghai Tim-Sum  – The Queenstown Dumplings Are Now At Maxwell
Tong Xing Ju 同心居 Special Shanghai Tim-Sum used to be from Queenstowns Margaret Drive Food Centre, and is known to serve delicious Shanghainese style dumplings, noodles and soup.The hawker stall had been frequently featured on television and earned several positive reviews, but few know of its whereabouts after the food centre at Queenstown was torn down. (Read about: Sin Kee Chicken Rice which has since moved to Mei Ling Food CentreLike many of its old-time fans, I was so happy to find that it has just relocated to Maxwell Food Centre.The guotie (fried dumplings, $4 for 8 pieces) served with a soy-vinegar dipping sauce and specially made chili sauce, is easily one of the best I had in Singapore. The shui jiao (steamed dumplings, $4 for 8 pieces) also impresses with its fresh ingredients within, with use of chopped ham which gives the dumplings a slight salty savour.You do need to wait like 15 minutes though (even if there is no queue), because they prepare everything fresh!Full Post at InSing.com – Special Shanghai Tim-SumTong Xing Ju Special Shanghai Tim-Sum 同心居
#01-92, Maxwell Food Centre, 1 Kadayanallur Street, Singapore 069184 (10 min walk from Chinatown MRT) Tel:+65 9662 3501
Opening hours: Tues-Sun 11:30a-8:00pm (closed Mon)Other Related Entries
Tian Tian vs Ah Tai (Maxwell)
Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodles (Maxwell)
Zhen Zhen Porridge (Maxwell)
Sin Kee Chicken Rice (Mei Ling Food Centre)
2012-09-11 00:00:00
Din Tai Fung at Taipei 101 + Guide To Eating Xiao Long Bao The Right Way
[Taipei, Taiwan] Din Tai Fung is the world’s most famous Xiao Long Bao (small steamed buns) makers which originated in Taiwan, ranked as one of the world’s top 10 restaurants by The New York Times in 1993.Over at Hong Kong, Din Tai Fung’s Silvercord Branch (新港店) and Yee Wo Branch (怡和店) at Causeway Bay were also awarded one Michelin star by the Hong Kong and Macau 2010 edition of the Michelin Guide.You may not know about this, but the characters in the name mean: 鼎, a type of cooking cauldron; 泰, peaceful; and 豐, abundant, and the Din Tai Fung first started not as a dumping shop, but a cooking oil retailer. Surprised?Founder Yang Bingyi and wife started selling Xiao Long Bao when their oil business was bad, which eventually became so popular they started a restaurant on Xinyi Road in Taipei.We all have our own ways of eating these delicate dumplings, with some ending in mini-disastrous outcomes – broken dumplings, spilled soup, or worse, scalded tongues. (Read: 5 Things You May Not Know About Xiao Long Bao)I had the privilege of learning how to make these Xiao Long Bao over at Taipei 101, and was taught the correct way to eat Xiao Long Bao. Always thought you knew what was right? (Read: I Made Xiao Long Bao at Din Tai Fung 鼎泰丰)Guide to eating Xiao Long Bao
Step 1 – Put some soy sauce and vinegar in the ginger dish. You should first put the soy sauce BEFORE the vinegar, with a suggested ratio of 1 portion of soy sauce to 3 portions of vinegar.  (The purpose of the vinegar is to ‘cleanse’ the saltiness of the soy sauce)
Step 2 – Take a piece of Xiao Long Bao and dip lightly in the sauce.  Just dip, don’t submerge. (You may want to try the original Xiao Long Bao first without any sauce.)
Step 3 – Place Xiao Long Bao in the spoon and poke a small hole to release the broth.
Step 4 – Pick up a few slices of ginger.
Step 5 – Enjoy Xiao Long Bao with some ginger and the broth. Careful, it can be hot!And trust the Taiwanese to come up with a little catch phrase that you can use when eating your dumplings. Bet you never heard it before. (English translation my own.)轻轻提 Pick up lightly
慢慢移 Shift it slowy
掀开窗 Open the window
后品汤 Enjoy the broth
夹姜丝 Pick up the ginger
一口尝 Enjoy the dumplingsEach Din Tai Fung Xiao Long Bao supposedly weights 21 grams (+/-0.4grams) and has 18 folds. Go count them!Din Tai Fung (Taipei 101)
Basement 1F, No.45, Shifu Rd., Xinyi Dist., Taipei City 110, Taiwan (R.O.C.) Tel:02-8101-7799
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 9:30pm (Sun-Thu), 11:00am – 10:00pm (Fri-Sat)Din Tai Fung Singapore branches: Paragon, Tampines Mall, Raffles City, 313@Somerset, Marina Bay Link Mall, Junction 8, Wisma Atria, Jurong Point, Resorts World Sentosa, NEX, 112 Katong, Marina Bay SandsOther Xiao Long Bao Entries
Shanghai Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Noodle Star (Bugis Village)
2012-09-10 00:00:00
Lee Kum Kee – Keeping it Fast, Fresh & Simple
Lee Kum Kee’s founder Mr Lee Kum Sheung has been known to be the inventor of oyster sauce, and I know many are fans of its dipping sauces. My dad particularly liked the spicy-sweet Hoisin sauce which he used to marinade pork before he roasted or grilled the meat, and the premium XO sauce which can make any ordinary fried vegetable taste good.They have also just launched the First Draw Soy Sauce, a premium soy sauce that is drawn from the soy beans during the first extraction process. As the soy bean are brewed in a traditional and natural method, the First Draw Soy Sauce is rich in both taste and aroma, making it a perfect condiment used to Cook for Your Family.[Giveaway Ended]Lee Kum Kee ‘Fast, Fresh & Simple’ Products Giveaway!
Lee Kum Kee is giving away 3 goodie bags to lucky Daniel’s Food Diary readers. Each bag will contain a bottle of XO sauce, First Draw Soy Sauce, Chiu Chow Chilli Oil and Hossin Sauce.All you need to do is
1) *Likes* the FaceBook Page of Daniel’s Food Diary,
2) Share this post on Facebook or Retweet on Twitter AND
3) Leave a comment below to say what you would cook with the First Draw Soy Sauce.Results will be announced on Thursday 13th September 2012. Contest winners must furnish a Singapore postal address to receive the goodie bags.Other Related Entries
I Love To #CookForFamily – Recipe of Simple & Easy-to-Cook Fried Bee Hoon 
Grill Fillet With Vegetable
Recipe of Grilled Slipper Lobster
Recipe Ketam Masak Lemak
Cold Shrimp with Mayo in Vol-au-vent shells
2012-09-07 00:00:00
SunnyHills – Why Do Taiwanese Give Pineapple Cakes During Mid-Autumn?
Mooncakes are the traditional delicacy for the Mid-Autumn Festival, where round mooncakes resemble the full moon and is a symbol of family reunion and completeness in traditional Chinese culture. We say “yuan yuan man man” which means ‘round and abundant’.Over at Taiwan, it seems that two things have caught the waves – barbecue and pineapple cakes. According to the Taiwanese, several barbecue sauce companies were promoting in in markets and organized fairs their barbecue-related products just before the Mid-Autumn festivals, and barbecue eventually became a Mid-Autumn festival custom as important as eating mooncakes in Taiwan.Also, pineapple cakes used to be round in shape as bakeries made pineapple jams to be wrapped in huge round dough. These are usually eaten during Mid-autumn or engagement parties, given as a symbol of love.Its popularity increased, and bakeries eventually changed the round pineapple cakes into little rectangular ones to resemble “golden bricks”, which really means prosperity. Money come money come.Some bakeries add white gourd to pineapple cakes because it balances off the sour taste of the pineapple jam, and has a cooling effect according to Chinese medicine. But avoid those that replace pineapple completely with winter melon, or just add pineapple essence for fragrance!The pineapple cakes, with buttery crust and sweet paste within, have been nearly widespread for one hundred years in Taiwan. The wave seems to have caught on over at Singapore, and the most popular pineapple brand here should be SunnyHills. I have personally seen how SunnyHills has ‘grown’ from a small kiosk to a full-fledged shop at Raffles Hotel. (Read: When SunnyHills was still a kiosk)To celebrate the Mid-Autumn Festival, SunnyHills’ pineapple cakes will be packaged in a Mid-Autumn gift box and tote bag which features the symbolic “Jade Rabbit” and full moon, and are available in boxes of 10, 15 or 20 pieces, at $25, $37.50 and S$50 respectively.You may want to send some “golden bricks” to your loved ones, plus the bunny tote bag is really quite cute.My concern is that some Singaporeans still prefer to receive the traditional lotus mooncakes instead of the fancier options. What do you think?SunnyHills Singapore 微熱山丘
328 North Bridge Road, #03-05 Raffles Hotel Arcade (Cityhall MRT), Singapore, Tel: +65 8522 9605
Opening Hours: Tue–Sat: 11am – 8pm, Sun: 11am – 3pm
Also available at Takashimaya Square Mid Autumn Festival SpecialOther Mooncake Entries
Mao Shan Wang Mooncakes (Goodwood Park)
Ice Cream Mooncakes (Haagen Dazs)
Pandan Mooncakes (BreadTalk)
2012-09-06 00:00:00
Nassim Hill Bakery Bistro Bar – Breakfast, Brunch, Bakes & Beer All-In-One
Nassim Hill Bakery Bistro Bar has one of the most interesting concepts – bakery with brunch items in the dawn, bistro in the noon, and transformed to a charming bar by dusk with DJs spinning at the side.Getting a condominium at Nassim Hill has always been one of my dreams (let that be granted), but I now know I can now indulge nearby in a hearty breakfast of Eggs Benedict ($15 nett) and Country Scrambled Eggs ($16) at an ‘okay-price’ considering this is very prime district.Nassim Hill Bakery Bistro Bar sits within the iconic Tanglin Post Office building, right opposite Tanglin Mall and near Gleaneagles Hospital. To get here, you have to get to the back of the post office, or climb up a flight of stairs from Swiss Bakery.If this bar within a post office concept seems familiar to you, it is also done up by Imaginings who is also behind KPO, WALA WALA, Balaclava and 1128. Beer drinkers can rejoice because you can tap your own draught beers at the end of the counter. (I unfortunately, don’t drink beer.)Considering I am not quite a carb-person, I fell in love with the Grimbergen Ambree bread ($8), a Grimbergen (Belgian abbey beers) infused bread created by Head Baker Audrey from Freshly Baked at Killiney Road. (No wonder the bread and cakes taste so familiar. The KPO probably approached her since they are ‘neighbours’.) The bread is very wholesome, full-bodied and hearty, with a slightly rustic feel to it. Extremely satisfying with the marmalade jam.That same bread is also used in the Hot Reuben ($16 nett), a sliced corned beef sandwich with melted emmental cheese, sauerkraut (sour cabbage), onions and delicious Russian dressing. Warning: It takes two or more to finish this.The other beer inspired dishes are also enjoyable such as the Grimbergen Fish and Chips ($22 nett), a Grimbergen Blanche beer battered pacific dory fish dish served with fries. You can literally hear the loud “Crunch!” of the deep fried batter when the fish is sliced.The braised Meatballs with Artisan bread basket ($22 nett) is served with tasty chasseur sauce prepared with Grimbergen Ambree beer, veal jus, onions and mushrooms. My advice is to leave some bread to clean up the sauce.Note: Breakfast items run out by 5, so you know I will be back again for oozing poached eggs with creamy hollandaise sauce.Nassim Hill Bakery Bistro Bar
56 Tanglin Road #01-03 Tanglin Post Office, Singapore 247964 (15 walk from Orchard MRT), Tel: +65 6835 1128
Opening Hours: 8:00am – 12:00am (Closed Mon), Breakfast & brunch: 8am – 5pm, Lunch: 11am – 5pm, Dinner:  5pm – 10:30pmOther Related Entries
TAB (Orchard)
Singapore Sling Boutique (Clarke Quay)
Social Haus (Tiong Bahru)
OverTime (Dempsey)
Infusion (Dempsey)
2012-09-05 00:00:00
Epilogue Café – When Popular Bookstore Opens a Café
Popular Bookstore opens a café. Yes, the same Popular Bookstores where hungry, I mean kiasu parents hunt down assessment books and 10-years series for their adolescent to get a head-start of their successful life. Popular was my ‘saviour’ in that way too. (Won’t have cleared my Os and As without you, Popular!)Epilogue Café within Prologue (at Level 4 Ion) provides a completely different vibe – quiet surroundings, lovely music, view of Orchard Road, artistic lights made of recycled books. Overall, a very cosy corner to read a book, drink a cup of cuppa or have casual business lunches.In fact when I was there during a public holiday, the directors of Popular were having a lunch meeting there. Talk about working hard.This new café concept offers not only gourmet coffee and cakes, but a plethora of Italian food selections such as soups, sandwiches and pastas.Epilogue brings in a slight Asian twist to its special menu. I had a Rendang Chicken Set Meal ($11.90) which is really quite an interesting and workable combination with huge chicken chunks marinated in a sweet spicy rendang sauce topped on spaghetti. Thumbs up for this. The drink is an Iced Singapore Sling sans the alchohol.The Ultimate Beef Meatballs Pasta ($13) on the reverse is quite blah – dry beefballs and ordinary tomato sauce. But I should probably discount the fact that this is the assemble-and-microwave kind of café, with 2 staff in total when I was there.If you need to escape the hustle and bustle of Orchard Road, find a quiet spot to wind down, or read E.L. James while having a sweet and moist red velvet cake, Epilogue Café is the place. You even get a free book for spending above $16 here.There must be a sign somewhere that says “Do not study” but I guess people are ignoring it.Epilogue Café ION Orchard
2 Orchard Turn, #04-16 ION Orchard, Singapore 238801 (Orchard MRT), Tel:+65 6465 1477
Opens daily: 10:30am – 10:00pm
Branch: #06-01/02/03 Orchard CentralOther Related Entries
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Charlie Brown Café (Somerset)
7 KICKstart BREWiches (Armenian Place)
Dann’s Daily Pescetarian Café (Eastwood)
Pies & Coffee (Rochester Mall)
2012-09-04 00:00:00
Breadtalk Mooncakes – Mooncakes In ‘Vintage’ Chest with Free LiuLi. For Real
Breadtalk is probably Singapore’s most popular bread-makers, and they have also worked hard on their 2012 Mooncake collection.If you are the type who wants to impress your mother-in-law, perhaps you can consider the Premium collection with 6 pieces in a box at $88.80 (very auspicious number). This comes in a chest of drawers in pretty ‘Little Nonya’ type pinkish-purplish design (where she can keep her stash), AND an exquisite ‘Liu Li’ thrown in.An exquisite ‘Crouching Dragon Hidden Pearl’ Liuli in a mooncake box is the last thing I would think of. Impressive, or some people will say “Win already loh”!However, I am the boring and unconventional type when it comes to mooncakes. And I only have my mum to impress. So I went for the Classic at $44.80 (4 pieces/box) which comes with flavours such as Green Tea Lotus Paste, Taro and White Lotus Single Yolk. More value for money too.While my mum thought green tea flavoured lotus mooncake could go stronger in its matcha flavour, the light pandan flavoured with slight sweetness and pandan fragrance was easily our favourite.Breadtalk Mooncakes
Available at various Breaktalk branches such as 112 Katong, 313 Somerset, AMK Hub, Bugis Junction, Causeway Point, Centrepoint, Citylink Mall, City Square, Clementi Mall, Great World City, HarbourFront Centre, Holland Village, Junction 8, Jurong Point, Marina Bay Link Mall, NEX, Northpoint, Novena Square, Parkway Parade, Paragon, Plaza Singapura, Raffles City, Tampines Mall, Tiong Bahru Plaza, Toa Payoh HDB Hub, West Mall, Wisma Atria, VivocityOther Mooncake Entries
Mao Shan Wang Mooncakes (Goodwood Park)
Ice Cream Mooncakes (Haagen Dazs)
Taiwanese Pineapple Cakes (SunnyHills)
Crystal Jade Mooncakes 
Egg Custard Mooncake (The Peninsula Hong Kong
2012-09-03 00:00:00
The Inspiring Paralympics Medalist Laurentia Tan – How She Overcame Eating With Chopsticks
My first correspondences started with Laurentia at a time of credit crunch and recession, when news was all doom and gloom. But the ever cheerful Laurentia stayed very positive and replied jokingly, “Hey, I’m still on cloud nine!”Equestrain rider Laurentia Tan, now 33, has just won a bronze in the Paralympics Grade IA individual championship dressage test, Singapore’s first medal at the London Paralympic Games. She first made news for winning Singapore’s first medal at the Paralympics Games at Beijing 2008. It was also Asia’s first Paralympics equestrian medal.Doctors once diagnosed her as ‘spastic’ and unable to walk, and told her parents that she would lead a life of a vegetable. Laurentia has come a lot way in overcoming all odds to achieve her dreams. Even though she was profoundly deaf, she performed on form in competitive world riding competitions where she was cued by music!While eating can be a straightforward task to many, it is a challenge to Laurentia who had developed cerebral palsy due a complication of jaundice after birthday.However, she did not let this condition handicap her and just laughed about it, “I am always striving to do things that the ‘able bodied’ can do… and that includes using chopsticks, especially when everyone else is using them!”For many years, she was not able to use the usual chopsticks, and had to use special ones that were joined at the top.  She was seldom successful as they were often not strong or flexible enough, and would end up breaking numerous pairs.But nevertheless, she was determined to use the normal chopsticks in what she thought were weird and wonderful ways.It first started with fishballs where she would poke a single chopstick through them. And when it came to eating her favourite prawns, the chopstick would go through the middle of the prawn, as though it was curling around the stick.Alternatively, she would use the two chopsticks like a spoon and try to balance meat on two chopsticks, rather than holding it in between.It was until in her late teens that she thought she tried using chopsticks with her left hand instead (even though she was right handed), and there was that “Eureka!” moment.While many of us would just give up after failures, she opened my eyes on how we can always work around things and not allow ourselves to be beaten.When asked about food, she would sparkle at the thought of her love of seafood such as lobsters and crabs. However, she doesn’t crave for them that much as she could get them fairly easily at London where she is based.The one thing she would really love to have is a simple Chwee Kueh, which she would describe as little steamed rice cakes with salted vegetable on top.“I still think of my Ah Gong fondly whenever I eat Chwee Kueh…”She warmly remembers how her paternal grandfather would go to the market in the mornings to bring home breakfast for the family. Sadly he had passed away, but memories will stay.Unfortunately, the Seletar Chwee Kueh that she used to have a child is no longer available after the market was demolished. She promised herself that she would try the famous ones at Tiong Bahru the next time she comes back.Everything I see Laurentia’s article in the news, I feel proud of her, yet ashamed of myself. As we cross hurdlers in life, giving up seems so easy and straight forward. But we always take things for granted, such as a very ordinary thing like eating with a pair of chopsticks. Laurentia has taught me so much – on how we can appreciate the simpler things and moments in life.Other Interview Entries
Keith Png Wants to Design Hawker Food
A Wagyu Burger with Aston Soon
Bakerzin’s Daniel Tay and His Greatest Regret
The 23-year girl behind Wow Wow West   
MOF’s CEO did not have enough to eat Lor Mee
2012-09-03 00:00:00
Paris Baguette – Korean Bakery Finally Comes to Singapore, But Why Seoul Expensive?
Paris Baguette is finally here in Singapore! If you are thinking this is some French brand, nope. This chain is actually the top Korean bakery, receiving “constant love” for its freshly baked bread, cakes, sandwiches, desserts and brunch items.It has over 3500 stores in Korea, US and China. None in France though, go figure. (Wheareas PAUL is really from France.)Located at Level 2 Wisma Atria, Paris Baguette has replaced Ding Tai Fung (which has upgraded to Food Republic, or should I say downgraded) and attracted throngs of office crowd and the Korean expat community to land their support. Good chance to people-watch and spot a (almost) Girl Generation type customer.Because it is newly opened, its self-service ordering system, service crunch, and lack of seats due to its popularity may throw you back a little. Customers were looking high and low for the menu sheet, only to find them lying around somewhere. Somewhere.Indulge in a lazy afternoon with its brunch items, the best seller being the Cheese Omelette With A Difference ($18.00, and what a name). The omelette with spinach, gruyere and feta cheese is quite cheesy and yummy, plain in its own way, and heartily satisfying.The Scrambled Egg Brioche Brunch ($18.00) is a photogenic dish with chorizo on toasted brioche, and the eggs evenly prepared and cooked. If we were to judge by the eggs alone, yes it is fresh delicious, but somehow lacks a punch. Should throw in a juicy sausage and some sautéed mushrooms.The cakes on my table – a strawberry cream Mille-Feuille,  impossibly cute Wahaha Chocolate Cake, and Peach Tart (between $6.50 and $8.50), are extremely pretty to look at, but not so pretty to eat. Some dry, some lacking that delicate touch. (More cakes at Coffee Stars by Dao downstairs.)Pardonnez for the offensive-looking tartOverall, I like its clean open concept, and its wide selection from bread, sandwiches, salads to puddings for takeaways for the busy lunchtime crowd. Paris Baguette plans to open up to 30 branches in Singapore and looks like it is here to stay. But…Question: Why is Paris Baguette in Singapore seoul expensive? $17.00 for club sandwich, $18.00 for eggs, and $11.00 for iced orange tea! Makes me think twice downing that $11.00 Chamomile tea to calm myself.Paris Baguette Singapore (Wisma Atria)
435 Orchard Road, #02-48 to 53 Wisma Atria, Singapore 239977 (Orchard MRT), Tel:+ 65 6836 2010, +65 6836 3010Other Related Entries
PAUL Bakery (Ngee Ann City)
Maison Kayser (Scotts Square)
Brunetti (Tanglin Mall)
Delicious (Scotts Square)
Eggs & Berries (Changi City Point)
2012-08-31 00:00:00
Uma Uma Ramen – Top Restaurant Iggy’s Opens a Ramen Shop
Another ramen shop with an impressive CV opens in Singapore – famous Fukuoka ramen chain, 59 years of history, helmed by Ignatius Chan, owned by Iggy’s the top restaurant in Singapore. He is also behind the high-end Kaiseki restaurant Yoshiyuki downstairs.Looks like there is another reason to go to the rather Forum the Shopping Mall at Orchard now, other than Toys “R” Us and California Pizza Kitchen.There isn’t very much to choose from as there are only two types of ramen – Uma Uma Ramen ($14) and Spicy Chasiu Ramen ($16).The former is a spicy miso base, with Hakata-style noodles, and toppings such as charsiu, spring onions and black fungus. The later, is a spicier version at $2 extra, and there really isn’t too much of a difference. Extra tamago at $1.50.If you like your noodles thin, non-curly and springy (like mee kia, similar to Ippudo’s version), chances are you will enjoy Uma Uma a lot. Not for the Sapporo ramen fans though (ie Ramen Santouka’s version).The tonkotsu broth is thick, dark, rich, and salty. The portion (or can I say bowl) is small, and therefore the soup cools down faster than usual, not likely to please those heavy eaters who prefer a fuller meal.Feeling unsatisfied, we ordered an extra Chicken Karaage ($8) which at that price, is equally small portioned and un-filling. If rich broth and thin noodles is your preference, then you should like this ramen uma uma much.Uma Uma Ramen
583 Orchard Road, #01-41/42/43 Forum The Shopping Mall, Singapore 238884 (10 mins walk from Orchard MRT), Tel: +65 6235 0855 Opening Hours: 11.30am – 3.30pm, 6.30pm – 10pm (Mon – Sat); 11.30am – sold out (Sun)Other Ramen Entries
Menya Musashi Kodou
Keisuke Tonkotsu King (Orchid Hotel)
Marukin Ramen (Scotts Square)
Marutama Ra-Men (Liang Court)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
2012-08-30 00:00:00
Time To Have A Top 100 Restaurants List For Singapore
Two of Singapore’s renowned restaurants Iggy’s and Waku Ghin have made it to the the “World’s 50 Best Restaurants” list. While we can be proud to say that Singapore has a place in the culinary map, it is about time that we should develop our own list of Singapore’s top 100 restaurants. (Read about: Waku Ghin)While the world list has definite international recognition, it is undeniable that the British-based list can be skewed towards European restaurants and food styles. The good news is that an Asian list is in the works.Les Créations de Narisawa – Top ranked restaurant in Japan and AsiaLooking back at Singapore, travellers and locals alike do not exactly have a reference to which are the top restaurants in here. As a food blogger, I make decisions on which are the ‘best’ restaurants by various food review websites, iphone applications, and food bloggers’ recommendations.However, there is no island-wide set standard, or Michelin stars that the Singapore culinary scene can look forward to.Amber – Top ranked restaurant in Hong Kong at Number 44Having a locally recognised list can perhaps spur many Singapore restaurants to work towards a benchmark, in both culinary skills and customer service. There are many excellent local restaurants which deserve some form of recognition, other than the usual top names like Iggy’s, Les Amis and Andre. It is time we unearth these hidden talents.This can also act as a checklist for food enthusiasts, especially those coming around the world.A suggestion would be for the Singapore Tourism Board to take a step forward to develop the list with the media and a panel– such as chefs, food experts, writers and bloggers. The list will probably be an exciting and colourful one, representing the multi food cultures of Singapore.Perhaps restaurants such as Crystal Jade Dining IN would make it in our list of Top 100. If Hong Kong’s Ho Hung Kee can have a Michelin star, it is time we reward our own restaurants too.The above letter is originally published in TODAY, May 18 2012.
2012-08-28 00:00:00
Big Mama Korean Restaurant – Not ‘Gangnam Style’, but Home Style Cooking
It is very seldom that a woman in apron would come to your table to teach you how you should eat your food. Well, maybe at home, but we are talking about a Korean restaurant here.Big Mama Korean Restaurant is not exactly ‘Gangnam Style’ (I know the song is hot, and it is Korean language colloquialism that actually refers to a luxurious lifestyle), but offers comfort ‘Home Style’ cooking.And this new restaurant is also at Tiong Bahru. (Read: 5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru, new food places IKYU and PoTeaTo)Former tutor and caretaker, Ji-young Nam Gung nick-named as “Big Mama” (looks like “Cooking Mama” in the Nintendo game), has set up a homely Korean eatery at Tiong Bahru after cooking for Korean students in Singapore for years. Her Korean dishes are in between authentic and creative, because half are inspired by her own mama’s recipes while others have been fine tuned to suit Singaporean taste-buds.It was quite funny because my friends were all trying to guess who Big Mama was, then realised it was not difficult to point out. The one behind the cashier loh.The restaurant looks quite minimal in terms of decor, but has groups of Koreans dining, an indication that this is worth your try.There are two big pictures of the Dakgalbi (spicy grilled chicken) and Suyuk (steam pork belly) on the wall, which suggests that these are the two must-try dishes.Big Mama or one of her staff would help you prepare the Dakgalbi ($15 per pax, min 2 pax), where marinated chicken chunks, Korean rice cake and vegetables are fried with a special homemade chilli sauce right in front of you on a grill.Surprisingly, this is very delicious with the saucy chicken going extremely well with plain rice. Maybe it is also Big Mama is talking while preparing, which makes us feel right at home. Yes, she would tell us how to eat Korean food the right way. A tip is to NOT finish the ingredients, because Big Mama would fry it with rice (additional $3.00) if requested.Normal Suyuk are thinly-sliced boiled beef or pork served with a soy sauce or a salted shrimp dip. Big Mama’s Suyuk ($25/$40) uses a special steaming method for the pork belly, ensuring the outside stays crispy while the inside is tender. She also removes all the extra fat so that it is healthier.The pork is eaten wrapped within delicate celery and cucumber slices, then dipped in either a saltier black bean sauce or a sweet spicy sauce. Does it already sound good?Big Mama may not be the most polished chef, but she prepares home-style Korean food with a big heart and bigger smile, making this one of the best Korean restaurants I tried locally. Kamsahamnida Big Mama!Big Mama Korean Restaurant
2 Kim Tian Road, Singapore 169244 (10 min walk from Tiong Bahru MRT) Tel: +65 6270 7704
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 2:30pm, 5:30pm – 11:0pm (closed on most Mondays)Other Tiong Bahru Entries
5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru
IKYU (Tiong Bahru)
PoTeaTo (Tiong Bahru)
The Orange Thimble (Tiong Bahru)
Social Haus (Tiong Bahru)
2012-08-26 00:00:00
Alexandra Village Claypot Laksa – Best Sizzling Hot Laksa Ever
Alexandra Village Food Centre is one of those hawker centre gems that is not so populated, underrated, and filled with above-average hawker stalls. Interesting, I noticed many customers ordering various claypot dishes of bak kut teh, sausage rice, mushroom chicken, prawn noodles and pork trotters.You can almost call Alexandra Village Food Centre a “claypot heaven”. (Read: Alexandra’s Village Soon Lee Fire-Pot Stew Beef)Of course, its most famous claypot stall is the Claypot Laksa? Never had it before? Then you are missing a huge deal.This stall originated form the Depot Road Zhen Shan Mei Claypot Laksa near CMPB, and word has it that the old couple sold their recipe to its present owners. While the present version is said to be less sizzling hot, loyal customers would still say it is more or less than same.Alexandra Village’s Claypot Laksa ($4.50) is really the best laksa I ever had – the gravy is spicy, lemak and so so tasty. Warning though: a bowl of lemak laksa is 696 calories according to HPB, so go easy on the gravy.The style is completely different from the popular but more muted Katong laksa (you can go opposite to Queensway Shopping Centre to try).It is quite ingenious to use a claypot to contain because the food remains warm throughout, and just adds double fiery to the gravy.I love most claypot dishes – claypot rice, claypot noodles, claypot bak kut teh, claypot tofu… what other dishes do you suggest to be ‘clay-potted’?Depot Road Zhen Shan Mei Claypot Laksa (Bukit Merah Lane)
Blk 119 Bukit Merah Lane 1 #01-75, Alexandra Village, Singapore 150119 (nearest MRT Queenstown, but need to take a bus from there), Tel: +65 9088 9203
Opening Hours: 8:30am – 3:30 pm (Closed Mondays)Other Related Entries
Soon Lee Fire-Pot Stew Beef (Alexandra Food Village)
Golden Mile Claypot Rice (Golden Mile)
Hock Leng Satay Beehoon Lok Lok (Old Airport Road)
Kidney Mee Sua (Kaki Bukit)
Nam Seng Noodles (Far East Square)
2012-08-25 00:00:00
Lessons Learnt from Diner En Blanc – Food is Meant to Unite, Not Divide
Dear friends,As the blogger directly involved in the Diner En Blanc incident, I am thankful of the many people who came up to support our local delicacies that we are so proud of, and the blogging community. The encouragement demonstrated by everyone makes me feel both proud to be a Singaporean and a blogger.With that said, I have to emphasize what I have said in my earlier blogs posts: That I hope it is all a big misunderstanding and we should keep calm.The organisers of Diner En Blanc has announced on their Facebook that “we would like to clarify that Diner en Blanc worldwide welcomes local food as can be seen in many international events both passed and upcoming. Menus in Barcelona, Mexico, Kigali for instance, all include local food.”I consider that case closed.From the Diner En Blanc online discussion, I feel I need to emphasize on three points:1)	Our purpose is not to incite any form of anger, whether it is towards the organisers or the French. We should not stereotype people based on perceptions and assumptions. Sorry, I do feel some of the online comments are really uncalled for. This may be a mistake or miscommunication made by a small group of people, and we should acknowledge that there are others in the organizing team who planned very hard for this.2)	There are many other groups of people who have started their own initiative or picnics – whether it is Diner En Noir, Eat Tau Hway Day, Makan Ho Chiak, Makan Day, or Super White. These are creative and fun, and celebrate the spontaneity of the online community. However, we should not set up ‘camps’ wearing all red or all black, near them, for any purpose to spoil the Diner En Noir event. The original spirit of Diner En Blanc is the celebration of life and togetherness, which I am fully supportive of. Also, let us be gracious towards our French visitors.3)	The majority of criticisms are targeted towards the PR agency, who is seen as a PR failure for ignoring social media and undermining bloggers. I do think they know what they are doing, and are aware of the consequences. I have always kept an open communication with the PR agency involved. All I can say is many PR companies have to follow the strict instructions of their clients (or they would lose their business), and all my PR friends can vouch for the number of times clients would go against their professional advice. Two lessons learnt: Clients should trust the experts to do their stuff; and bloggers should always keep a healthy relationship with the PRs (vice versa).Let us show to the rest of the world that We Have Class. And Daniel’s Food Diary will emphasize: Food is meant to Unite, not Divide. Peace.The original Dîner en Blanc entry
I Have Been Told To Remove My Blog Post; I Have Decided I Won’tUpdate 1: The Head Organiser of Diner en Blanc Singapore Clemen Chiang has written an email to apologise and I have accepted the apology. Forgive and forget. 
(Luke 17:3)Update 2: From PR Agency THOX Pte Ltd, “This email serves to confirm that we have officially disengaged ourselves from working with the client (Diner en Blanc Singapore) as of last Friday 24 Aug 2012, due to a misalignment of views. We certainly look forward to working with you again on other events.”
2012-08-24 00:00:00
I Have Been Told To Remove My Blog Post; I Have Decided I Won’t
Never in my years of blogging have I been told to remove a blog post. Minor edits due to factual errors, sure. If it is a request to remove a negative comment, I will usually ignore because I have decided to be fair, just and objective to my blog readers. This is what blogging is about right?Being asked to remove a post recently is definitely my first. (Read: My original Dîner en Blanc entry)You may wonder if I had written a very drastic and negative review about a restaurant. Firstly, I won’t waste time writing about an F&B place which I feel do not deserve that extra publicity (good or bad); and secondly, I do not slam places. That is my style.On the 20th of July, I WAS invited to attend a Dîner en Blanc event as a media personnel (and can bring a friend), the French viral picnic which is to take place in Singapore for the first time. Accordingly, Singapore would be the first Asian city to host the Dîner en Blanc.Sounds exciting, except for its strict rules – attire must be white, table décor must be white, tables and chairs must brought on your own and of a certain size, beer and hard alcohol are not allowed, neither plastic cutlery and paper plates, food brought must be “quality” food, and men are to sit on one side and women on the other. That is totally discounting people who come with same sex dining partners, but that is another matter altogether. Other than that, I thought that the rules are still reasonable.On the 21st of August, I blogged about Dîner en Blanc, told readers about the rules and exclusivity, and recommended 12 foods to bring to the picnic. To be more creative, the 12 foods recommended have  local or Asian flavours, and are primarily white. I cleared my content with the PR company (just to be safe) and they also thought the idea was fun and imaginative.Then the problems began.I first had a warning from fellow food blogger RubbishEatRubbishGrow, “eh, I quote my friend who is helping out with Diner en blanc. It is not one of the picnics to bring hawker food. You’re expected to bring more atas food leh.”To which I replied “I personally hate the idea that only cakes, tapas and canapes are considered ‘atas’ food. Why can’t Soon Kueh be served on nice China plates and be considered ‘atas’? Right?”And there I was thinking that the French organisers would be gracious, and in fact happy that we bring a Singapore flavour to their prestigious event. I was so wrong.The next day I received a call from the PR company for me to totally remove the post. Not modify. Not edit. But totally remove the post. Reason according to both the French and local organisers was the local delicacies were not in line with the image of the picnic.For your information, the 12 white food I recommended were tau hway, teochew pau, cheese raisin buns, xiao long bao, chee chiong fun, fishballs, Hainanese chicken rice, white bee hoon, chwee kueh, kueh tu tu, soon kueh and popiah – everyone of which I feel deserve to be in that platform. (The 12 food I recommended)Maybe there is some miscommunication somewhere. (And I still hope it is all a big miscommunication). If the French organisers are unhappy with ‘tau hway’ being featured, let me explain that it is a traditional long-time favourite of local Singaporeans and other Asian countries, made from soy beans which is a great vernacular of Asian gastronomy. Tau hway is a simple, inexpensive and elegant dessert. Jazz it up to be served on a fine China bowl, and it will look good.And chicken rice actually needs no introduction, but for good measure, it is Singapore’s signature dish, praised by renowned chef Anthony Bourdain no less, and served in not a few of Singapore’s top hotels.Part 2.I found out that I was uninvited for the event. Not only me, but ALL other bloggers and social media personnel. Reason given was: There is not enough space for people. Do you buy into that reason?To both the French and local organisers, my teachers taught me that you do not ‘un-invite’ guests to an event. At least we all know that is being very un-courteous and impolite. Basic manners, isn’t it? Who would have expected – coming from what one would have imagined to be one of the classiest events of the world.I am absolutely fine with not going for the Diner En Blanc event. Remember, I am only going to be there because I WAS invited.Screen capture of Diner En Blanc’s Facebook replyHere are three lessons I take from this incident:1)	You can disrespect me as a blogger, and disrespect my blog post, but you do not disrespect my culture. If you are going to hold a party at my house, I welcome you with open arms, I respect your rules but please respect your hosts as well.2)	My Singapore local delicacies are the classiest food ever in our hearts. Yes, foie gras, bisque, mille-feuille, escargots, crème brulee are all classy-sounding food. Our tau hway, chicken rice and soon kueh are also all classy in their own way. Thank you very much.3)	You do not dictate to bloggers which posts to put up, which posts not to; invite us, then uninvite us.  You do not own us; Neither do you own the Internet.My last note is for the local organisers and attendees. I would urge you to stand along-side with us, that our Singapore local delicacies that we grew up with, lived with, feed our children with, and feel so proud of, that represents our colourful heritage – can appear in a white prestigious picnic like Dîner en Blanc.Of course, I still hope, this is all a big misunderstanding.Fellow blogger Smith Leong created this, which brought a smile on an otherwise stressful day.Updated Entry
Lessons Learnt from Diner En Blanc – Food is Meant to Unite, Not Divide
2012-08-24 00:00:00
Ikyu – High-end Japanese Restaurant Joins the Pack at Tiong Bahru
High-ended Japanese restaurant Ikyu (pronounced E-Q) has opened at Yong Siak Street in the Tiong Bahru ‘old estate’. You may be surprised – another one? There are already more than 20 F&B places there.Since 40 Hands opened across the road just 2 years back in 2010, F&B outlets Open Door Policy ODP, SocialHaus, PoTeaTo, independent bookstore Books Actually and boutique Strangelets and Nana & Bird all set its foot on this short street. This is not counting PS Café opening at Guan Chuan Street, and Japanese bistro Abe’s Diner at Eng Hoon – just minutes walk away. (Read 5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru)Too many?Ikyu which means “take a break” and with a tagline “is the new sexy”, sells the usual Japanese basics such as sushi and sashimi, but with a contemporary fusion twist.The 54-seater diner seems promising – décor is modern and service friendly, sometimes too friendly as different service staff came over to ask “Is everything okay, do you want to eat more?”Executive Chef Takuma Seki (former chef-de Cuisine of Hide Yamamoto at The Shoppes at Marina Bay Sands) does not disappoint, from the aesthetically pleasing plating, to the use of fresh ingredients to create Japanese cuisines with French and Western influences.Expect food to be pricey though.I was urged by the service staff to order the Omakase ($128), which I was reluctant for the untried and untested.  Instead I went for several of the starters such as Soft Shell Crab with Mexican Salsa Sauce ($12.50) and Assorted Wrapped Pork ($15.50) and Yuba Uni ($10.00) which were delicate, definitely above average and creative.The fish is said to be supplied from Tokyo’s Tsukiji market, therefore the price of $48.50 for 5 pieces and $28.50 for 5 kinds of Nigiri. (I was promised 5 pairs by the waitress but landed up with 5 pieces. Consider her new.)Unfortunately, the sushi did not taste anything close to those I had in Tsukiji. While it was certainly a step above those served at the conveyor belts, the sushi did not have a melt-in-your-mouth sensation.The signature dessert, a Sho Cheesecake ($8.50), is a classic example on how the chefs could work several ingredients together, being light, fresh, pretty and delicately smooth.In summary, good to look at and delicious, but pricey and small-portioned. My bill came up to above a hundred for a supposedly light un-filling dinner.It won’t be long before the hipster crowd at Tiong Bahru throngs the new addition to the estate. Ikyu’s challenge is to really be on par, if not better the standards of medium-high end restaurants for it to survive in this increasingly competitive area.IKYU (Tiong Bahru)
5 Yong Siak Street, Singapore 168650 (15 min walk from Tiong Bahru MRT), Tel: +65 6223 9003
Opening Hour: 11:330am – 3pm, 6pm – 10:30pmOther Tiong Bahru Entries
5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru
PoTeaTo (Tiong Bahru)
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
The Orange Thimble (Tiong Bahru)
Social Haus (Tiong Bahru)
2012-08-23 00:00:00
Goodwood Park Hotel – The King of Durians “Mao Shan Wang” Mooncakes
Mooncake fillings have gone way beyond the traditional lotus paste fillings. It is as if every mooncake shop is trying to innovate over the rest. And talk about durian mooncakes, the first place to come to mind is Goodwood Park Hotel. (Read Goodwood Park Hotel’s Durians)This year they have launched Mao Shan Wang durian mooncakes ($38 for two pieces, $68 for four pieces) which will delight every durian fan. The snowskin is in a pretty olive green representing the durian husk, also reminding me of huge jade blocks. Don’t you think so?The Mao Shan Wang, literally translates to ‘cat mountain king’, is the king of all durian variants, the highest quality of species with firm yet creamy flesh, bitter meets sweet taste.Warning: If you have cut your Mao Shan Wang durian, finish it within a day or it will stink up your entire fridge. I left an uncut box in my office for a while, and within minutes, everybody was asking “Where’s the durian?!”The Mao Shan Wang Mooncake is sure to stink your breath. And strangely, people like that idea!My Olympic arrangment of mooncakesNot a durian fan? There are also other weird fruity flavours such as Blood Orange with Banana Snowskin ($46 for four), Mango with Pomelo ($46 for four), Cempedak Paste ($55 for four) mooncakes for you to choose from at Goodwood Park.*Free delivery to 1 location for orders of 50 boxes of 4 pieces and above. Delivery can also be arranged at $50.00+ per location.Goodwood Park Hotel Deli
22 Scotts Road Singapore 228221 (Orchard MRT), Ordering Tel Number: +65 6730 1867
Ordering Hours: 9am – 7pm (Mon-Fri), 9am – 1pm (Sat-Sun)Other Mooncake Entries
Haagen Dazs Mooncakes
Crystal Jade Mooncakes 
Egg Custard Mooncake (The Peninsula Hong Kong
Pandan Mooncakes (BreadTalk)
Taiwanese Pineapple Cakes (SunnyHills)
2012-08-21 00:00:00
Dîner en Blanc is Coming to Singapore! What To Expect & What White Food To Bring
This is very exciting news. Dîner en Blanc is coming to Asia, and Singapore will be the FIRST Asian City to host this prestigious world-renown viral secret pop-up picnic. The date is set to be 30th August 2012, which is next Thursday!Simply said, this is a classy picnic where everybody turns up in white at a ‘secret location’.  Dîner en Blanc first started in 1988 Paris, where the creator François Pasquier asked attendees to convene at the Bois de Boulogne dressed in white so they could all ﬁnd each other. This eventually became a must-go, world’s most viral outdoor food & party event which has taken place at Paris, Lyon, Amsterdam, Munich, Zürich, Berlin, Montreal, New York, and now Singapore.Now, visualise a thousand Singaporeans and friends coming together to enjoy a meal together, with a beautiful evening skyline behind, dressed in a sea of white (yet not showing support for any political party) – all chic, clean and sophisticated. This is a Singapore I have never imagined, very dreamlike, yet coming true.How does it work?
Only at the last minute will the ‘secret location’ be revealed, and the thousands of invitees will come dressed in WHITE, with their picnic basket, tables and chairs (all MUST be WHITE), and enjoy the mass chic picnic together in a public space. Will Singaporeans stick to the dress code? (Note that you will be rejected entry if you don’t.)I want to go to Dîner en Blanc. How? 
Like the Parisian version, the only way to attend is to score an invite from a friend, and to know someone who is attending. Registration is already super full.Where is it going to be held?
As I mentioned, the location is kept secret and even attendees like myself would only find out that day. BUT to find a scenic location in Singapore that can house more than 1000 people, my guesses are Gardens by the Bay, Marina Bay area, or Marina Bay Sands. My guess is as good as anybody else.What are the rules?
The organisers are strict. If you are invited and not attending, you would be kicked off the guest list (like forever). You have to bring your own white foldable tables and chairs. The food must be eaten off proper plates and cutlery (such as fine china) and NOT plastic cutlery and paper plates. The organisers want to be environmentally friendly. Only wine and champagne are allowed, and beer and hard alcohol are prohibited.What to wear?
I don’t think the ladies are going to have much problem with wearing white. BUT the guys are going to have a lot of problem… wearing white pants. How many of you guys own a pair of white pants? Own up! (Other than the PAP folks) After you do find a pair, please do not wear bright coloured underwear (resist your temptation of wearing red undies). My advice is to wear light coloured tight fitting boxer briefs and going commando is really the worst option ever.What WHITE food to bring?
Good question. While the Parisians probably indulged in their platters of classy white canapés, here’s a list of White food you can consider bringing, Singapore style of course. Let’s be a little bit creative.1.	Smooth Beancurd Tau Hway (Available Lao Ban Beancurd Old Airport Road / One Raffles Place)
2.	Mini Teochew Handmade Pau (Available Teochew Handmade Pau Toa Payoh Lor 1)
3.	Cheese Raisin Buns (Available Barcook Bakery Clarke Quay Central)
4.	Xiao Long Bao (Available at Shanghai Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant Plaza Singapura)
5.	Ipoh Chee Chiong Fun (Available Fan Play Savouries Carrefour Suntec)
6.	Mega Fishball Soup (Available Top 73+1 Handmade Fishball Noodle Singapore Food Trail)
7.	White Hainanese Chicken Rice (Available Tian Tian Maxwell Hawker)
8.	White Bee Hoon (Available Red Hill Food Centre)
9.	Chwee Kueh (Available Tiong Bahru Jian Bo Chwee Kueh)
10.	Kueh Tu Tu (Available Tan’s Tutu Clementi / Ion Orchard)
11.	Soon Kueh (Available Tiong Bahru Teochew Kueh Tiong Bahru)
12.	Popiah (Available Ann Chin Popiah Chinatown)Wanted to bring Snow White Milk Gelato  but think it will melt before I reach there. Anyway, I am just kidding about the White Food part. You can any bring coloured-food, just no paper plates and disposibles. If you are thinking of bringing ‘hawker’ food, do eat them off proper plates in the ‘right’ presentation.So now, are you ready for le pique-nique on 30 August?Updated Entries
I Have Been Told To Remove My Blog Post; I Have Decided I Won’t
Lessons Learnt from Diner En Blanc – Food is Meant to Unite, Not Divide
2012-08-17 00:00:00
Häagen-Dazs – Celebrate Mid Autumn with Ice Cream & Sorbet Yolk Mooncakes
Häagen-Dazs were one of the first to create ice-cream mooncakes, and this year they have 4 different flavours (quite similar to last year’s) – White Chocolate, Dark Chocolate, Milk Chocolate and Strawberry Chocolate.Mid Autumn Festival falls on 30th September Sunday in 2012, so it is not too early to get them. Singaporeans tend to be a little kiasu.The Häagen-Dazs ice cream mooncakes are handcrafted, comes with an Mango Sorbet ‘yolk’ and a crispy praline base.Here’s the good: Häagen-Dazs is known to produce super-premium quality ice cream. So if you like the ice cream, there is a high likelihood you will like the mooncake offerings.It is no wonder that the crowd pleaser is the White Chocolate coated mooncake filled with Cookies & Cream ice cream – one of the most popular flavours they produce.I liked the Strawberry Chocolate, with bits of plump and sweet sun-ripened strawberries from Poland within. This refreshing and lighter flavour also goes best with the sweet-sour sorbet yolk. Milky chocolate and sorbet are just quite at odds. Also, the strawberry flavor is part of the Haagen-Dazs Five flavours which contains fewer calories, fewer fat and fewer saturated fat.The bad? The mooncakes come with a price tag of $24++ for one, which is pretty pricey because it is essentially just ice cream packaged more elegantly. My advice is to get a classic gift set of four at $68 which is more value for money. Still, some may find it pricey, especially when the chocolate and vanilla flavoured ones can taste like a higher-class Magnum with its crumply chocolate crusts.Some random facts about Haagen Dazs 
- The ice cream was created in 1959 by Polish born New York businessman Reuben Mattus.
- Mattus invented the Danish sounding ‘Häagen-Dazs’ as a tribute to Denmark’s exemplary treatment of its Jews during the Second World War,
- The name “Haagen Dazs” is an invented word and has no particular meaning.
- The premium ice cream had a map of Scandinavia on the carton.
- It started with only three flavors: vanilla, chocolate, and coffee.
- The ice cream quite dense (very little air is mixed in during manufacture), uses no emulsifiers or stabilizers other than egg yolks, and has a high butterfat content.
- Generally, each 1/2-cup serving of ice cream contains 250 to 300 calories, 15 to 20g fat, 20 to 30g carbohydrate and 5g protein.If you worry about your mooncakes melting away, Häagen-Dazs’ products are meant to be kept at a temperature that is substantially lower than most ice creams in order to keep its intended firmness. These mooncakes can last up to 45 minutes in the open. Be sure your cab ride is shorter than that.Häagen-Dazs
Available at: Bishan Junction 8, Holland Village, Vivocity, Centrepoint, Jurong Point, Wisma Atria, Clarke Quay, Sentosa Kiosk, Esplanade Mall, Springvale, Hilton Sidewalk, Tampines MallOther Ice Cream Entries
Cold Stone Creamery (Orchard Central)
Alfero Artisan Gelato (MacPherson)
Udders (Thomson Road)
Once Upon a Milkshake (Maxwell Chambers)
Ci Gusta! (Anchorpoint)
2012-08-16 00:00:00
PoTeaTo – New Café at Tiong Bahru to Jiak Kantang and Lim Teh
Another café, PoTeaTo opens at the very hip Yong Siak Street at Tiong Bahru, just two shops away from the famous 40 Hands. And there is already Open Door Policy ODP, drinking bar SocialHaus and Japanese restaurant IKYU opposite.But they are not fighting for the same pie. (Read: 5 Best Places For Cakes At Tiong Bahru)“PoTeaTo”, which is a combination of the words ‘potato’ and ‘tea’, sells mainly potato-made dishes and tea. So you can jia kantang and lim teh (eat potatoes and drink tea).Owner Debra Chan say she is often called potato for her ‘jiak kantang’ nature (Asian with Western outlook), and she wants to appear as friendly neighbours to 40 Hands. So they don’t publicise so much on their coffee.This potato-tea shop is not as well-known as the other Tiong Bahru eateries, because they are not under Spa Esprit and Debra says she does not have deep pockets. “My neighbours all drive bigger cars than I do!” Their shop is also partly covered and I had some trouble finding. (It’s okay Debra, the food blogger will help you publicise.)The premium tea selections ($7.80 for a pot) such as Persian Apple & Ginger, Sunrise Sunshine, Raspberry Mint, Peach Peach and Oolong Berry are ordered from a local supplier. Though PoTeato is not TWG or Gryphon, its selections and mixture are pretty unique and refreshing, with the Oolong Berry as my particular favourite.For the potato bites, the selection includes PoTeaTo Chips, shoestring fries, sweet potato fries and wedges ($5-$6). No, they don’t sell the usual potato chips from the packet. Instead, their chips are made from US Russet potatoes, hand-sliced and deep-fried fresh right in the kitchen. When you thought you had enough of those salty packet snacks, this is SO GOOD.Both my friend and I are converted fans of their sweet potato fries which come in a little brown bag, salad served on side, and home-made curry-mayo and salsa sauces as dips. They are crispy on the outside, with a nice-sweetness of the potato on the inside, you feel good eating REAL fries for once.Classic wings ($9) are tasty and succulent too. We dare say, better than IKEA’s!Not all dishes worked for us though. Their creamy seafood pasta ($16.80 for a set with soup and tea) was too starchy for our liking. Ironically, too much potato in the sauce. Go easy on the potatoes yah?PoTeaTo also serves desserts and cupcakes supplied by one of my favourite My Fat Lady. Now you know Tiong Bahru is a great place for you to jiak kantang and lim teh.PoTeaTo
78 Yong Siak Street #01-018 Singapore (10 mins walk from Tiong Bahru MRT), Tel: +65 6221 2488
Opening Hours: 11am – 10 pm Tue to Sun (closed Mon)Other Tiong Bahru Entries
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
The Orange Thimble (Tiong Bahru)
Social Haus (Tiong Bahru)
Drips Bakery Café (Tiong Poh Road)
Centre Ps (Tiong Bahru)
2012-08-15 00:00:00
Café & Meal Muji  – 3 Stories of Muji at Ginza, a Must Visit for Mujirers
[Tokyo, Japan] For true blue Mujirers aka Muji fans, a visit to Muji Yurakucho 無印良品 有樂町 is a must. This houses a three-story Muji flagship store which sells every possible Muji item you can think of – stationaries, household, clothes, appliances, Muji music, and travel items.  There is even a Muji optician and florist within.And for food lovers, there is the largest Muji café, with a bakery with fresh breads, and a separate section selling snacks and deli items.Muji is short for 無印良品 Mujirushi Ryōhin, which means ‘no brand quality goods’. In a brand obsessed world, Muji’s popularity is indeed intriguing. There are no logos on any of its items. And I love love love its minimalist design and colour schemes of white, beige, earth and grey.While my present room is already decorated with some Muji items, my future house will definitely be very ‘Muji-like’.Which is why I can spend almost an entire afternoon just Muji and its café. (I almost bought a Muji luggage back, but I was stopped).Compared to the other café at Shinjuku, Café & Meal Muji is huge. It is almost like a canteen, sitting almost a hundred Japanese tai-tais chit-chatting about their latest buys, while they savour little pieces of delicate cakes.You can order main meals, pasta, salads from the Deli, or get bread items from the next door bakery.  A banana cake or caramel pudding can set you back by about 400 Yen (USD$5.11 or SGD$6.36) and a chocolate croissant at (USD$2.56 or SGD$3.18).Muji’s café is not just a café – it is a lifestyle. Though it is hugely popular and crowded, it is still very quiet and you can always have a loveliest conversation with your best friends. (I know their cafes won’t work in Singapore because we speak too loudly.) Service is top-notch, even though the Japanese understand minimal English.About a 10 minute walk from downtown Ginza, make your way there for a light tea break after you are done with your shopping spree.Café & Meal Muji Yarakucho 無印良品 有樂町
Marunouchi, Chiyoda-ku, Tokyo Japan 3-8-3 Tel: + 03-5208-8241
How to get there: From JR Yurakucho Sta. Kyobashi Exit past Tokyo Kotsu, Kaikan (2-3 min). From Yurakucho Subway, exit A9 (1 min) or Ginza-Itchome Tokyo Metro Station (10 min)
Opening Hours: 10am – 9pm.Other Tokyo Entries
Sugamo Konaya (Roppongi, Tokyo)
Tsukiji Honten (Shibuya, Japan)
Mutekiya Ramen (Ikebukuro, Tokyo)
Menya Musashi (Shinjuku, Tokyo)
2012-08-14 00:00:00
Poulet – Thai Express Opens a Délicieux French Restaurant at Bugis+
Poulét (pronounced Poo-lay, meaning chicken) is a new French casual dining restaurant at Bugis+ offering adorable French classics to the masses. Some still call it Illuma, or Bugis Plus. (Read: New Poulet branch at Great World City)The French-themed bistro is at an open dining area opposite Ramen Champion. The vibes are modern, comfortable and contemporary, and can be a pleasant place for a two-person dinner, or group outing of ten.If ‘French’ to you means romantic candle dinner, then you are looking at the wrong place. But skeptics can be rest assured of its taste. I was surprised myself. Maybe it is because Head chef Nelson craved his skills in France, and the kitchens of Les Amis and Au Petit Salut.While its French Onion Soup ($5.80) may not be the most authentic (where’s the gruyère cheese?), the broth which comes from the Oxtail de Bourguignon is thick and flavourful, with abundant soft caramelized onions. If you are still looking for the cheese, it is sprinkled on the croutons.The star of the restaurant has to be its Poulet Roti ($15.80 for half, $28.80 for whole), or chicken – brined for a full day in a traditional recipe and placed in a rotisserie for a slow roast to tan to a golden brown. Its home-made white and creamy mushroom Chardonnay Sauce is probably one of the best and addictive chicken sauces I had in a long time.I have tried quite many bad chickens in Singapore. (But this is different. I was half thinking if the sauce is good, the chicken must be so-so to mask its taste.) The chicken meat itself is succulent moist and tasty, and chicken skin so crisp that I gobbled it away.The other favourite is the Oxtail de Bourguignon ($15.80) – pressure-cooked oxtail in red wine sauce which has melt-in-your-mouth meat and fats. Oh, the fats. I finished that too.Poulet is under Thai Express Concepts, who seem to have the midas touch to Xin Wang Hong Kong, New York New York, Shokudo, Buffet Town and Heng Heng Curry Café. Poulet can very well be the next Xin Wang – French version of course. Look out for it.Poulet
201 Victoria Street, Level 4  Bugis+ (former Illuma, Bugis MRT Station), Singapore 188067, Tel: +65 6509 9411
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pmOther Chicken Entries
Poulet (Great World City)
The Rotisserie (China Square Food Centre)
Charly T’s (Nomu Building)
Nandos (Plaza Singapura)
Charly Ts (Katong 112)
2012-08-13 00:00:00
Menya Musashi Kodou – Another New Ramen Place at Ion Orchard
Menya Musashi opens another branch at Ion Orchard, replacing the lackluster Aoba Ramen, with a lot less fanfare as the Raffles City outlet.For those new to the name, Menya Musashi exploded in the ramen scene in 1996 Tokyo, and have been called “pioneer of the Japanese ramen boom”. Their food and décor is inspired by legendary swordsman Miyamoto Musashi, and therefore continue to challenge themselves every day, creating up to 140 ramen ever since.Their first shop in Shinjuku Tokyo has only 20 seats, but can sell 750 bowls of ramen daily. For all the ramen I have eaten in Tokyo, Menya Musashi ranks as my Top 3, with an unforgettable Tsukemen (dipped noodles).Menya Musashi at Ion Orchard is called the Kodou, meaning ‘tiger’s cave’, with the special begin the Kodou Tsukemen ($15.90) which comes in white (original), red (spicy), or black (fried garlic and onion) soup stock.I noticed many customers around not knowing how to eat the dipping noodles, or they would finish drinking the soup and then complain it’s too salty! This is NOT Bak Chor Mee.So here are some tips on how to eat Tsukemen
- Lift a small portion of noodles
- Dip the noodles into the bowl of thick soup
- Slurp up the noodles from the bowl of thick soup
- Don’t just drink the soup!While this Kodou Tsukemen with slightly overcooked noodles and uninspiring stock is nothing compared to the one I had in Shinjuku, it still beats several of the other tsukemen I had in Singapore. Oh, skip the gyoza ($5.90) too. They taste like out-of-the-supermarket.Instead, I found the seasonal special Tokyo Akiba Curry Ramen ($14.90) rather refreshing and tasty. The ramen comes with a thin curry soup based, topped with a half-cooked egg, and tender slices of beef cooked shabu-shabu style. Let this noodles stay on the menu.(Just in case you do not know, Menya Musashi is brought to Singapore by Japan Foods Holding who coincidentally owns Aijisen and Aoba.)Menya Musashi Kodou 麺屋武蔵 虎洞 (Ion Orchard)
2 Orchard Turn #B3-25 Ion Orchard (Nearest MRT Orchard, one floor above Muji, next to Bali Thai), Tel: +65 6509 9394
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pmOther Related Entries
Menya Musashi (Shinjuku, Tokyo)
Menya Musashi (Raffles City)
Keisuke Tontotsu King (Orchid Hotel)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
Daikokuya (Orchard Paragon)
2012-08-10 00:00:00
The First #CookForFamily Initiative – Kudos to All 111 Bloggers!
The inaugural #CookForFamily Bloggers’ Initiative took place on 6th August 2012, with a total of 111 bloggers who took part and cooked for their family!When I first started this #CookForFamily initiative back in July, some had told me 20 was enough, and if I could get 80 I would very lucky. I am very heartened to see so many bloggers lend their support, and #CookForFamily even trended on twitter that day.For those who has yet to hear about this, here’s what happened…Chicken kebab which I #CookForFamilyWhat is The #CookForFamily Initiative?
The #CookForFamily is a Singapore food bloggers initiative – there is no competition, sponsors, or hidden agenda involved. It is created with a simple objective of getting more bloggers, and hopefully their fans and followers, to start cooking and bonding with their families.Yes, I rejected every sponsor who came and offered a prize. Because I felt that bonding is the family is the greatest priceless prize. Why need the incentive? In fact, from this we know that every blogger who joined truly wanted to take part.Why did I start organising #CookForFamily?
Frankly, I have had enough of the very negative vibes that the online sphere has been heading towards – lots of complaining, criticisms, and gossips. I wanted to do something, something meaningful to gather everyone together. Yes, this is likely to be the first bloggers’ group initiative of its kind in Singapore.Also, I was quite affected when I first heard a story from a famous blogger’s family member: This blogger is always out for tastings almost every day, and that the blogger never really eats at home. Family members complain, but I suppose blogging take first place in this situation.What happened during #CookForFamily?
The bloggers have picked a day in July to cook a meal for their family or loved ones, and have blogged about their cooking, experience and thoughts all on the same day – 6th August 2012.Recipe of Simple & Easy-to-Cook Fried Bee HoonWhen I was younger, I liked to eat my mum’s bee hoon and she would fry it almost every morning. My mum does not cook anymore because she has difficulty in walking, and I feel bad that I have to buy takeaways for her all the time. She will sometimes complain that it is salty or not to her liking – especially fried bee hoon outside. So that’s why I cooked Simple Fried Bee Hoon for The #CookForFamily Initiative. My mum doesn’t say much (sometimes she complain that I mess up the kitchen.) But when she finished the entire plate, or say “quite ho chiak”, there is immense joy in my heart.These are some #CookForFamily entries that I really enjoy:Most Supportive: Cuisine Paradise and Ah Boy  (Photo credits: Ellena Guan)Cuisine Paradise had 3 generations cooking together for the #CookForFamily initiative, prepared many many dishes, and also encouraged many other bloggers to join in. Her Ah Boy also volunteered to join where he marinated the chicken wings using Wokkingmum’s “Grilled Chicken Wings with Fermented Beancurd” recipe. He chose this recipe because he knew that both his grandma and mummy enjoyed fermented beancurd which they always had with their porridge. Very sweet of him!Most Touching: Melicacy  (Photo credits: Melissa Koh)For a person who had zilch experience in the kitchen, Melissa overcame her phobia of cooking (because she was badly scalded once) to cook Pesto Spaghetti for her family. The dish for her mum even came with a heart-shaped cheese cracker. What is really touching is that she also cooked for her domestic helper – how many children out there you know would cook for their maids? Also, her busy working mum purposely came back early for dinner and even posted her daughter’s cooking on FaceBook. So moved reading it!Longest Distance: You Got Me Blogging  (Photo credits: Razlan Manjaji)Razlan grew up ten years in Singapore, but is now based in Hong Kong due to his studies and career. However, he still continues to straddle between the two countries because Singapore is where he considers as home. He decided to spread the word to his other Hong Kong friends – E-ting Food, Chopstixfix and Joie De Vivre to join in #CookForFamily Wow, I do hope one day that this Singapore-started initiative can go international.Most Glam Family: Cheryl Wee (Photo credits: Cheryl Wee)Singer Cheryl Wee had the challenge of pleasing both her dad and mum, who are famous hair stylists Mervin Wee and Jean Yip. As mum Jean Yip is a huge believer of cooking things from scratch, it was extra work for both daughters to cook laksa using fresh ingredients and no premixes.  So the entire family had to get up earlier to accompany mummy to get fresh coconut milk, laksa leaves and also work doubly hard to pound the rumpah and spices. It is quite heartening to see the entire family – all very busy people – get together to enjoy cooking and eating.Thank you to all 111 Bloggers involved in #CookForFamily
365days2play (Dawn Huang), A Juggling Mom (Susan), A Winsome Life (Melvin & Jacqueline), A&W Couple’s Blog (Abbey & Will), Acquisition of Taste (Andy and Ashley), AiMakan (Hazel Tay), Alvinology (Alvin Lim), An Escape To Food (HL Tay), AnythingAlsoEat (CY), AromaCookery (Julia Khoo), AspirantSG (Wee Heng), AteTooMuch, Calvin Timo, Celestial Delish (Celes Fernandez), Cheekiemonkie (Kelvin), Cheryl Wee Xin Hui, Chrispytine (Christine), ChopsticFix, Chunky Cooky (Joyce), Cloudy Windz , Coffee Table People, Cookieologic (Huijin), Cooksnapeatlove (Jacob Leong), Cuisine Paradise (Ellena Guan), Daniel’s Food Diary (Daniel Ang), Danny Love To Eat (Danny Tan), Darren Bloggie, Dominique’s Desk (Dominique Goh) , Double Image (Kevin Soh), Dreamers Loft (Meg), Dream2breakaway (Ying Zi), E-tingfood (Janice Leung), Fighting Fires & Baking Buns, Flora Yeo, Food Friend Or Foe (Brenda), Food.Recentrunes (Ivan Ng), Foodie Ah, Foodie FC (Fengchen), Foodie’s Kitchen , G.Nome Chromosome, Gastronautdiary (David Yip), Gninethree (Charleen), Gourmetestorie (Justin Daniel Pereira), HazelHearts (Hazel), HazelNutLife (Hazel Lam), HisFoodBlog (Rayner Ng), Hpility (Hong Peng), iisjong (Joey Ong), J Babies Dad (Isaiah), Jessie Food Trip (Ong Meng Ching), Joie De Vivre (Gary Suen), Keropokman (Philip Lim), Lady J’s Musings (Joanne), Lazy Foodies (Kaiyi), Le Petit Connoisseur (Stargirl), Little DinoEgg (Jenn Lim), Lobster Paints (Shi Ting), Lovin Greens (Huiyuan), Luxury Haven (Shirley Tay), Maameemoomoo (Sherie), Mamawearpapashirt (June), Melicacy (Melissa Koh), Memoirs Of Food (Daniel Hung), Mint Leong, Miss Tam Chiak (Maureen Ow), Miss Tiffany (Tiffany Wong), MissyGlutton, MoonBerry (Irene), Ms SkinnyFat (Cheryl Ng), Msfoodaholic (Karina Lee), Missuchewy (Charlene Chew), Mummy Blogs (Sandra Tan), Pengs Kitchen (Veronica) , Perhaps Always (Samuel), Pixieprodigy (Calvin Wong), Pling Thinks (Tracy Chua), Priscias (Priscilla), Raising Rock Star, RubbishEatRubbishGrow (Nathanael Ho), Rynaque, Sakura Haruka, Sarahs Loft (Sarah Khaw), Seng Kang Babies (Andy), SgFoodonFoot (Derrick Tan), Simple Happiness (Christina Teong), SkiesofLove (Angie), Slurp (Jason), Smithankyou (Smith Leong), Story of Bing, Super Adrian Me (Adrian Eugene Seet), Superfinefeline (Karen), Teru2xBozu Goes Hungry, That Silver Girl (Silver Ang), The Dead Cockroach, The Dessert Prince (Edward), The Dining Table (Javan), The Dirty Stall, The Fatty Rie (Siew Lin), The Food Canon (Terry Wong), The Food Recipe (Jozel), The Gingerbread Mum (Adora Tan), The Hungry Cow (LeRoy), The Love of my Life, Twice As Delicious, The Super Girl, Velvet Chronicles (Nuramima), You Got Me Blogging (Razlan), Yummy Koh (Chris), Yumyumformytumtum (Peter Oh)I hope that our little initiative has convinced you to spend a little more time with your family. Yes, we all have busy lives and stress, but this is no excuse for us to keep a distance from our families. Try cooking for them – you are likely to find immense joy.Yes, I will definitely continue with #CookForFamily during Year 2013. Let us target… 200 Bloggers!Other #CookForFamily Entries
Join The #CookForFamily Initiative
The #CookForFamily Update – 83 Bloggers Have Joined!
The #CookForFamily Update – 97 Bloggers Have Joined! 
More Than 100 Singapore Food Bloggers To Cook For Their Families 
I Love To #CookForFamily – Recipe of Simple & Easy-to-Cook Fried Bee Hoon
2012-08-08 00:00:00
Celebrate Singapore National Day with Good Ol’ Days Buffet
What better way to celebrate Singapore’s 47th National Day than with a buffet with the best of Singapore’s signature hawker fare. Silver Shell Café at Shangri-La’s Rasa Sentosa Resort is having a Good Ol’ Days buffet with a touch of nostalgia, which is timely and refreshing.Chilli crab, bak kut teh, laksa, prawn mee, rota prata, chicken curry, satay, mee rebus, otah otah, hokkien mee, oyster omelette, carrot cake, kueh pie tee, lor mee … you name it, they probably have it.There are many live cooking stations with the chefs preparing the dish right in front of your own eyes (yes, including a prata man). The good of it – you can request a little more of this, and less of that – all arriving fresh and piping hot.In terms of food, there are some hits and misses. To help you save space and calories, my top three favourites are the carrot cake and orh luak combi (had best of both worlds on a single plate), satay, and kueh pie tee. The curries are quite lemak and yummy too.Plus points. There are childhood games where you can try your hands on. Yes, play Snap while you are waiting for your food. And there will be various traditional dancers who will provide entertainment. Watch out for the banghra dance, it was amazingly good.Good Ol’ Days is priced at $58++ per adult and $25++ per child from 6 to 12 years, and available every Thursday in August, from 6 to 10 p.m. For reservations, please call 6371 1966 or e-mail fbreservation.sen@shangri-la.com[Contest Ended] Seafood Trail by the Sea @ Barnacles Vouchers Giveaway
Shangri-La’s Rasa Sentosa Resort is giving away 3 sets of Seafood Trail by the Sea @ Barnacles to lucky Daniel’s Food Diary readers. All you need to do is to *likes* the FaceBook Page of Daniel’s Food Diary AND Share this post on Facebook or Retweet on Twitter.Leave a comment below to say you have done so. Results will be announced on Friday 10th August 2012. Contest winners must furnish a Singapore postal address to receive the vouchers.Note: Each set of voucher is for 2 adults to dine. Seafood Trail by the Sea @ Barnacles is available only on Thursdays, vouchers valid till end-AugustSilver Shell Cafe
101 Siloso Road, Level 3, Shangri-La Rasa Sentosa Resort (Harbourfront MRT), Tel :+65 6371 1966
Opening Hours: 6:30am – 11pmOther Related Entries
Silver Shell Café (Shangri La Rasa Sentosa)
Plaza Brasserie (Park Royal)
10 at Claymore (Pan Pacific Orchard)
Chiso Zanmai (Clarke Quay Central)
Tiffin Room (Raffles Hotel)
2012-08-07 00:00:00
Prosperous Kitchen – Zhi Char with Curry Horfun & Salted Egg Pork
For a restaurant called Prosperous Kitchen, it doesn’t look very prosperous – there are always just a few tables occupied (if any), and usually by Westerners around River Valley looking to eat some Chinese chao mien. A stark contrast to Spizes the Makan Place and Boon Tong Kee just a few shops away, which have tables spilling all the way out.Maybe it is the feng shui. Irvin’s the Handsome Zhi Char did not survive at that corner unit long. Maybe it is the ugly green colour they picked to paint their exterior.Prosperous Kitchen or Tien Wang is  better known at its Sembawang Shopping Centre branch for its variety of authentic Cantonese cuisine, dim sum and double boiled soups.With that said, this is one of the rare occasions where I gave the restaurant three opportunities because I deliberately want to give them a chance. That also means dragging my friends along knowing it can be potentially disastrous.My first experience of having some Wok Fried Mee Swa ($8.00) was bad – bad food, bad service, long waiting time and not exactly cheap, till I commented it was “doomed to fail”.The subsequent time I was more adventurous and ordered its Pork Ribs in Coffee Sauce ($12.80) and Curry Horfun ($6.00). Both were surprisingly decent offerings, especially the horfun in a thin curry gravy topped with vegetables which was neither heavy nor weird.My most recent try was their signature Salted Egg Pork Chop ($16.80), while at a not-so-happy price, is definitely worth a go with its tender pork slices fried with absolutely addictive salted egg sauce that made me wipe clean the plate.There are other interesting selections such as Creamy Pumpkin Prawns ($18.80) and Creamy Black Pepper Prawns ($18.80) which seems worthwhile enough to pile up the calories.Let’s hope Prosperous Kitchen can remain prosperous – I can’t bear to see it close. If only they can lower the prices, and change that ugly green wall.Prosperous Kitchen 天旺 (River Valley)
397 River Valley Road Singapore 248292 (diagonally opposite Great World City, near Spizes the Makan Place) Tel: +65 6737 3549
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 2:30amOther Related Entries
Yong Kee Seafood Restaurant (Jalan Besar)
Cz’Zar (Great World City)
Must-Have Zhi Char Dish
Putien (City Square Mall)
Xiao La Jiao (I12 Katong Mall)
2012-08-06 00:00:00
I Love To #CookForFamily – Recipe of Simple & Easy-to-Cook Fried Bee Hoon
Every day a week, I will set aside at least one meal to cook for my mum. Not that I am a very good cook, but this is perhaps my little way to show that I care for her, and I love her.When I was younger, I liked to eat her bee hoon and she would fry it almost every morning. So what I always fry is very close to what she has always cooked – not based on any recipes, but trial and error.My mum does not cook anymore because she has difficulty in walking, and I feel bad that I have to buy takeaways for her all the time. She will sometimes complain that it is salty or not to her liking – especially fried bee hoon outside. So by cooking at home, we can choose ingredients that our family really likes. (Read about the The First #CookForFamily Initiative )So that’s why I cooked Simple Fried Bee Hoon for The #CookForFamily Initiative. My mum doesn’t say much (sometimes she complain that I mess up the kitchen.) But when she finished the entire plate, or say “quite ho chiak”, there is immense joy in my heart.Fried Bee Hoon
Ingredients
One packet beehoon (I like the Thai brands because the beehoon is thinner)
Yifon mushrooms (They have many delicious flavours – take your pick)
Eggs (1 or 2 – your preference, fried and shredded)
Ham (shredded)
Vegetables (shredded)
Shrimps (fried)
Hoisin sauce, oyster sauce & salt (a little for seasoning)
Chicken stock (alternative)Preparation Method
1. Soak beehoon in water for about 20 minutes. Drain and leave aside.
2. Marinate egg with a little soya sauce and pepper. Fry and cut into shreds.
2. Chop vegetables into shreds.
4. Fry shrimps or prawns.5. Set aside the ingredients (eggs, mushroom, ham). You can mix and match the ingredients depending on your preference. I like to shred the all because they look better when fried with beehoon. If it’s rice, I will dice them.
6. Heat the wok with some olive oil, fry with garlic till fragrant. Add the bee hoon, then seasoning or soup stock and fry evenly.
7. Add the ingredients, and the vegetables last so that they stay freshly green and will not be overcooked.
8. A cheap trick I use is to place the cooked beehoon into a bowl, and invert on a plate before serving for better presentation. Garnish with parsley, spring onions or fried shallots.The common excuses of not cooking is “I don’t know” and “I am too busy.” You know deep in your heart they are just excuses, and what really is your priority. I remember that the CEO of Crystal Jade told me he would always dedicate one weekend to cook for his family even though he owns a chain of restaurant, and he still works more than 12 hours a day.Try frying some simple bee hoon for your family, it took me less than 30 minutes. If not, search for #CookForFamily, and you may find yourself surrounded by 100 over bloggers sharing their receipes and experiences. Tell me how it goes.Other Related Entries
Honey & Pineapple Tart Ice Cream
Recipe Ketam Masak Lemak
Cold Shrimp with Mayo in Vol-au-vent shells
Grill Fillet With Vegetable
Recipe of Grilled Slipper Lobster
2012-08-05 00:00:00
Happy Birthday Doraemon! Plus Food at Harbour City that Doraemon & Friends Will Like
[Hong Kong] This is exciting. Huge fans of Doraemon would know that his birthday falls on September 3rd 2112. You are not reading wrong, this means we will be counting down to his birthday 100 years early!This is kind of embarrassing, for a huge guy my age to confess that I like Xiao Ding Dang aka Doraemon.I have the whole set of 12 McDonalds Doraemon Horoscope! Imagine how many Happy Meals I ate.The truth is when I was young, I liked Nobita first because I felt like a complete nerd and loser like him. We had some many resemblances – short-sighted, lazy, did not like to do homework, and kept getting nagged by my mum (this doesn’t change). That was when I craved for a friend like Doraemon.Of course I am a lot more hardworking now, and it was Doraemon’s cartoons which taught us life lessons.
Lesson 1: Although there are quick gadgets to get past problems, hard work prevails all.
Lesson 2: Help a friend in need, and they will help you back in need.
Lesson 3: Always be well-equipped, you never know when you need those tools. (That’s why my bag is full of things, that people call it the Doraemon bag.)Doraemon and I have one thing in common – the love of DorayakiGood news for Doraemon fans (especially if you stay in Hong Kong), Harbour City will be hosting the “100 Years Before the Birth of Doraemon” Exhibition from August 14 to September 16.  It will be the start of the one hundred year countdown to his birthday!The exhibition will showcase 100 unique Doraemon figures along with 100 different pieces from his well-known repertoire of secret gadgets. It would be like a dream come true to see my Top 3 favourite gadgets which are 1) Dokodemo door (can travel anywhere) 2) Take-copter (put on your head to fly) and 3) Big light torch (can enlarge objects – I need to enlarge some of my jeans after all that eating).The ‘Dokodemo’ door (ren yi men) which will lead to Harbour City at Hong Kong.The BO-LO’GNE café and bar located inside Harbour City’s LCX will also be transformed into a pop-up Doraemon themed café, where you can enjoy Doraemon spaghetti and hamburger set. I would so want to eat this.Talking about food, Hong Kong’s Harbour City is a diner’s paradise and there are so many restaurants that I would want to try. If Doraemon and friends are indeed around, these are some food found at Harbour City I would recommend them.The 5 Food at Harbour City that Doreamon & Friends Will Like…Gong Cha for Doraemon ドラえもん
Doraemon favourite food is dorayaki, because he loves sweet cakes with red bean paste within. He should also like the sweet beverage of Gong Cha Milk Tea with Bubble pearls for him to slowly chew on. Since Doraemon has the tendency to panic, sipping on the cold bubble tea can also calm him down.Zone：Star ANNEX, Shop No. 316A, Telephone：3485 5543, Opening Hours：11:00am – 8:00pmGreyhound Café Hong Kong for Nobita Nobi 野比 のび太 
Doreamon’s owner Nobita is unfortunately a little slow, frail, unlucky, weak, and worse of all … lazy. The recommended food for lazy people like Nobita is the Greyhound Café Chicken Wings. These crispy addictive noms are cut to half the size of the usual wings, so that you can even eat it with just two fingers. Really! Since Nobita likes to suck his thumb sometimes, he can just suck it after savouring those chicken wings marinated with fish sauce.Zone：Harbour City．Ocean Terminal, Level：G, Shop No.：G01, Telephone：2383 6600. Opening Hours：11:00am – 11:00pmagnès b. CAFÉ L.P.G. for Shizuka Minamoto 源 静香
Shizuka is the girl that Nobita likes, and is pretty, smart and very kind. She has a talent for music and love to eat sweet things. Any girl like her should like the cosy and classy agnès b. CAFÉ L.P.G. at Harbour City, where she can indulge in French delicacies, pastries and elegant little chocolates.Zone：Harbour City．Gateway Arcade, Level 2, Shop No.：2402K. Telephone：2956 1258. Opening Hours：10:00 AM – 9:00 PMItacho Sushi for Takeshi Goda 剛田 武
Takeshi, is better known as Gi-an, because he is a giant – big, strong and with a huge appetite. Unfortunately, his fierce mother does not cook very well. I recommend Itacho sushi for big-sized boys like him, because he can savour all the delicious Japanese sushi of different varieties at a very budget price. Also, “Itacho” means “Chief Chef” in Japanese, and I think Gi-an does look like a leader and chief.Zone：Harbour City．Ocean Terminal, Level 3, Shop No. LCX, Telephone：2736 2731, Opening Hours：11:30 – 22:30Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao for Suneo Honekawa 骨川 スネ夫
Suneo is the rich kid who loves to flaunt his material wealth before everyone. I ought to recommend him something classy. Other than COVA Patisserie, he should enjoy Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao which provides quality Chinese cuisine with superior service. As Suneo is also very self-conscious about his height, maybe he can try eating some hand-pulled La Mian as some Chinese feel this would length years and height.Zone：Harbour City．Gateway Arcade Level 3, Shop No. 3328, Telephone：2622 2699 Opening Hours：11:00 AM – 11:00 PMWith fantastic celebrations for Doraemon, great shopping and dining, it is time to make your way to 海港城 Harbour City! Where’s my Take-copter to Hong Kong?Exhibition Details
Organizer: Harbour City and Animation International Ltd.,
Curator: AllRightsReserved Ltd.
Date: 12 August – 16 September, 2012
Time: 11:00 – 21:00 (Monday – Sunday)
Venue: Gallery by the Harbour- Shop 207, Ocean Centre, Harbour City, Tsimshatsui (next to Fendi), Hong Kong
Harbour City Hotline: (852) 2118 8666
Website:www.harbourcity.com.hk
“100 Years Before the Birth of Doraemon” Official Facebook Page: http://facebook.com/100doraemon
2012-08-03 00:00:00
The #CookForFamily Initiative – More Than 100 Singapore Food Bloggers To Cook For Their Families
The #CookForFamily initiative has attracted more than 100 Singapore bloggers to take part! When I first started this, some had told me 20 was enough, if I could get 80 I would very lucky, now there are over a hundred.Interestingly, a recent research from Monash University, the National Defence Medical Centre, and the National Health Research Institute Taiwan has also found that people who eat home cooked food tend to live longer.The study looked at the cooking habits of Taiwanese living independently aged over 65 years, and found that frequent cooking was a significant factor in their health and long life. Cooking at home helped in their mental and physical agility, these elders paid more attention to their nutrition.The #CookForFamily Initiative
The #CookForFamily is a Singapore food bloggers initiative – there is no competition, sponsors, or hidden agenda involved. It is created with a simple objective of getting more bloggers, and hopefully their fans and followers, to start cooking and bonding with their families.The bloggers have picked a day in July to cook a meal for their family or loved ones, and will blog, tweet and instagram about their cooking, experience and thoughts all on the same day – 6th August 2012 (Monday), with the hashtag #CookForFamily.This is likely to be the first bloggers’ group initiative of its kind in Singapore.The bloggers include singer Cheryl Wee (daughter of Jean Yip), actress Silver Ang, and even two bloggers from Hong Kong.  Janice from Hong Kong says she is doing this because we lead such fast-paced lives and eat so much “good food” outside that we forget where our taste were developed – at home!The 109 Bloggers Who Will #CookForFamily
365days2play (Dawn Huang)	http://365days2play.com/
A Juggling Mom (Susan) 	http://ajugglingmom.com/
A Winsome Life (Melvin & Jacqueline)	http://awinsomelife.org/
A&W Couple’s Blog (Abbey & Will) 	http://reviews-all.blogspot.sg/
Acquisition of Taste (Andy and Ashley) http://www.theacquisitionoftaste.blogspot.sg/
AiMakan (Hazel Tay) 	http://www.aimakan.wordpress.com
Alvinology (Alvin Lim)	http://www.alvinology.com
An Escape To Food (HL Tay) 	http://www.teczcape.blogspot.sg/
AnythingAlsoEat (CY) 	http://anythingalsoeat.wordpress.com/
AromaCookery (Julia Khoo) 	http://www.aromacookery.com
AspirantSG (Wee Heng)	http://www.aspirantsg.com/
Ate Too Much	http://atetoomuch.blogspot.sg/
Calvin Timo	http://calvintimo.com
Cheekiemonkie (Kelvin)	http://www.cheekiemonkie.net/
Cheryl Wee Xin Hui	http://cheryl-wee.blogspot.sg/
Chrispytine (Christine) 	http://www.chrispytinetoo.blogspot.sg/
Cloudy Windz 	http://cloudywindz.blogspot.sg/
Coffee Table People	http://coffeetablepeople.blogspot.sg/
Cookieologic (Huijin)	http://cookieologic.blogspot.sg
Cooksnapeatlove (Jacob Leong)	http://www.cooksnapeatlove.com
Cuisine Paradise (Ellena Guan)	http://ellenaguan.blogspot.sg/
Daniel’s Food Diary (Daniel Ang)	http://danielfooddiary.com
Danny Love To Eat (Danny Tan)	http://dannylovetoeat.blogspot.sg/
Darren Bloggie	http://method86.wordpress.com/
Dominique’s Desk (Dominique Goh) 	http://dominiquegoh.com/
Double Image (Kevin Soh) 	http://double-image.blogspot.sg/
Dream2breakaway (Ying Zi) 	http://whirlwind-dreamz.blogspot.sg/
Dreamers Loft (Meg)	http://dreamersloft.blogspot.sg/
E-tingfood (Janice Leung)	http://e-tingfood.com
Fighting Fires & Baking Buns 	http://fightingfiresbakingbuns.wordpress.com/
Flora Yeo 	http://floraiyeo.com
Food Friend Or Foe (Brenda)	http://monstrousappetites.blogspot.sg/
Food.Recentrunes (Ivan Ng)	http://food.recentrunes.com/
Foodie Ah	http://foodieah.blogspot.sg/
FoodieDC	http://foodiefc.blogspot.sg/
Foodie’s Kitchen 	http://foodloverscreations.blogspot.sg/
Foodoshoot (Charlene Chew)	http://missuschewy.com
G.Nome Chromosome 	http://morganscarlite.blogspot.sg/
Gastronautdiary (David Yip) 	http://gastronautdiary.blogspot.sg/
Gninethree (Charleen)	http://gninethree.com
HazelHearts (Hazel)	http://hazelhearts.wordpress.com/
HazelNutLife (Hazel Lam)	http://hazelnutlife.blogspot.sg/
HerFelicity (Lirong) 	http://herfelcity.blogspot.com
HisFoodBlog (Rayner Ng)	http://www.hisfoodblog.com
Hpility (Hong Peng)	http://hpility.blogspot.sg
iisjong (Joey Ong)	http://iisjong.blogspot.sg/
J Babies Dad (Isaiah)	http://jbabiesdad.blogspot.com
Jessie Food Trip (Ong Meng Ching) 	http://jessiefoodtrip.blogspot.sg/
Justin Daniel Pereira (Gourmetestorie)	http://www.gourmetestorie.com/
Keropokman (Philip Lim)	http://www.keropokman.com
Lady J’s Musings (Joanne) 	http://j0annesim.wordpress.com/
Lazy Foodies (Kayyi) http://www.lazyfoodies.com
Le Petit Connoisseur (Stargirl)	http://petitconnoisseur.blogspot.sg/
Life As I Know It (Juann)	http://myfatpocket.com/judging-me/
Lobster Paints (Shi Ting)	http://lobsterpaints.com
Lovin Greens (Huiyuan)	http://huiyuan89.wordpress.com/
Luxury Haven (Shirley Tay) 	http://luxuryhaven.blogspot.sg/
Maameemoomoo (Sherie) 	http://www.maameemoomoo.com
Mamawearpapashirt (June) 	http://mamawearpapashirt.com/
Melicacy (Melissa Koh)	http://melicacy.com
Memoirs Of Food (Daniel Hung)	http://memoirsoffood.blogspot.sg/
Mint Leong	http://mintleong.blogspot.sg/
Miss Tam Chiak (Maureen Ow)	http://misstamchiak.com
Miss Tiffany (Tiffany Wong)	http://www.missytiffany.com/
MissyGlutton 	http://missyglutton.blogspot.sg/
MoonBerry (Irene)	http://blog.moonberry.com
Ms SkinnyFat (Cheryl Ng)	http://www.ms-skinnyfat.com
Msfoodaholic (Karina Lee) 	http://ms-foodaholic.blogspot.sg/
Mummy Blogs (Sandra Tan) 	http://www.sanses.com/
Pengs Kitchen (Veronica) 	http://pengskitchen.blogspot.sg/
Perhaps Always (Samuel)	http://perhapsalways.wordpress.com/
Pixieprodigy (Calvin Wong) 	http://pixieprodigy.wordpress.com/
Pling Thinks (Tracy Chua) 	http://plingthinks.com/
Priscias (Priscilla) 	http://priscias.tumblr.com/
Raising Rock Star 	http://raisingrockstar.com/
RubbishEatRubbishGrow (Nathanael Ho) 	http://www.rubbisheatrubbishgrow.wordpress.com
Rynaque 	http://www.rynaque.com/
Sakura Haruka 	http://www.sakuraharuka.com/
Sarahs Loft (Sarah Khaw) 	http://sarahs-loft.com/
Seng Kang Babies (Andy)	http://sengkangbabies.com/
SgFoodonFoot (Derrick Tan)	http:///www.sgfoodonfoot.com
Simple Happiness (Christina Teong) 	http://www.philchrischan.blogspot.sg/
SkiesofLove (Angie)	http://skiesoflove.blogspot.sg/
Slurp (Jason)	http://4-the-love-of-food.blogspot.sg/
Smithankyou (Smith Leong)	http://www.smithankyou.blogspot.sg/
Story of Bing	http://www.storyofbing.com
Super Adrian Me (Adrian Eugene Seet) 	http://superadrianme.com
Superfinefeline (Karen)	http://www.superfinefeline.com/
Teru2xBozu Goes Hungry 	http://hungryteru2xbozu.blogspot.sg/
That Silver Girl (Silver Ang)	http://thatsilvergirl.blogspot.sg/
The Dead Cockroach	http://thedeadcockroach.blogspot.sg/
The Dessert Prince (Edward)	http://thedessertprince.blogspot.sg/
The Dining Table (Javan)	http://thediningtable.sg/
The Dirty Stall 	http://dirtystall.wordpress.com/
The Fatty Rie (Siew Lin) 	http://efatrie.blogspot.sg/
The Food Canon (Terry Wong)	http://www.foodcanon.com/
The Food Recipe (Jozel) 	http://thefoodrecipe.com/
The Gingerbread Mum (Adora Tan)	http://gingerbreadmum.blogspot.sg/
The Hungry Cow (LeRoy)	http://www.thehungrycow.com
The Love of my Life, Little DinoEgg (Jenn Lim)	http://augdinoegg.blogspot.sg/
The Super Girl 	http://www.thesuper-girl.com/
Twice As Delicious	http://twiceasdelicious.com/
Velvet Chronicles (Nuramima) 	http://velvetchronicles.blogspot.sg/
Wokkingmum	http://wokkingmum.blogspot.sg/
You Got Me Blogging (Razlan)	http://www.razlan.net/
Yummy Koh (Chris)	http://yummykoh.blogspot.sg/
Yumyumformytumtum (Peter Oh)	http://yumyumformytumtum.com/Thank you everybody!Other Related Entries
Join The #CookForFamily Initiative 
The #CookForFamily Update 
The #CookForFamily Update – 97 Bloggers Have Joined!
2012-08-02 00:00:00
5 Best Places for Cakes at Tiong Bahru
Tiong Bahru must be the most hip areas in Singapore now, with indie lifestyle shops, cafes and new restaurants lining the entire stretch from Yong Siak to Kim Tian. Some call this the next Holland Village. I prefer to think it still has its own old-school charm. (I am a Tiong Bahru boy by the way.)This used to be the area where uncles ‘la kopi’, until an Aussie café called Forty Hands (or should I say Spa Espirit Group) came into the picture and revolutionised this olden town. If you haven’t heard, PS Café is also coming to Tiong Bahru too.  What is happening?Well, Tiong Bahru is also a popular area for cakes, starting with Caffe Parlet under Creative Culinaire where the famed Chef Judy also conducts baking classes at the Eng Hoon Street side. Here’s a list of 5 of my favourite places for cakes at Tiong Bahru. This is a tough one, so much so that I had to leave Forty Hands, Open Door Policy, The Orange Thimble and Social Haus out of the list. Perhaps I prefer the underdogs.Centre Ps (Tiong Bahru)
This is truly a hidden find, where Centre Ps stands for Centerpieces, with the Ps standing for Passionately Perfecting Personalised Premier Patisserie. The man behind the counter was Chef Patissier Steven Ong whose cakes are featured in many lifestyle magazines, having helmed the pastry kitchens of the Intercontinental and Conrad Centennial Singapore collectively for the past 12 years If you need a cake in the shape of a Coach handbag, Doreamon, Angry Bird, or Hermes, he can do it for you.78 Guan Chuan Street, #01-43 Singapore (Tiong Bahru) Tel: +65 6220 1285 Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 10am – 8pm (Closed on Sun)Drips Bakery Café 
Drips Bakery Café has a space which reminds me of a living room space I always wanted to have. White washed wall, minimal furniture and colourful touches of decoration. While most other eateries would want to pack customers, this café has so much open space with inviting sunrays laminating the area. Their Mixed Fruit Tart with blueberries and kiwis is a pretty darling, with a soft crumply crust, cool cream cheese and very fresh fruits.82 Tiong Poh Road, #01-05 Singapore, Tel: +65 6222 0400
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 10.30am – 9.30pm; Fri–Sat: 10.30am – 11pm (Closed on Tue)Tiong Bahru Galicier Pastry
Facing the main road, this old-style bakery is as old-school as it can get, selling several retro cakes and Nyonya favourites. The vibe is friendly too, where aunties and sisters come up to chit-chat if you are willing to join in their conversations. I was highly recommend the Sweet Potato Huat Kueh ($1.00) which is unlike your usual cake which is much larger in size. This is even smaller than a cupcake, light and fluffy, and contains fillings of mashed-up sweet potatoes. Eat it while it is warm and the filling will ooze. Sweet and lovely.55 Tiong Bahru Road #01-39 Singapore 6324 1686 Tel: +65 6324 1686. Opening Hours: Tue-Sun 9am-9pm, Closed MonTiong Bahru Bakery by Gontran Cherrier
This is the most hyped-up (or overhyped) bakery café at Tiong Bahru. Of course it should be. It is opened by one of the best known marquee bakery names in Paris Gontran Cherrier, and the Spa Espirit Group (which owns Tippling Club, Forty Hands, Skinny Pizza, O My Dog, ODP). Their specialty squid ink bread and croissants fly off the shelf. The café is packed to the brim during the weekends (part of the reason why I avoid it).  Try the Grapefruit and Orange Frangipane tart – it’s so strange you may like it.#01-70 56 Eng Hoon Street, Singapore 160056, Tel: +65 6220 3430. Opening Hours: 8am – 8pm (Closed on Tues)PoTeaTo
This new kid on the block are neighbours to Forty Hands, just two shops away. As the name suggests, it sells potatoes and tea – such a weird combination! Their desserts include cupcakes, eggless chocolate cakes, lemon meringue tart, and an earl grey made Tea-ramisu. That one I like. They offer some Sweet Potato Harvest Tarlets ($6.80). Don’t be tricked into thinking they are entirely sweet. There are chicken chunks within!78 Yong Siak Street #01-18 Singapore 163078, Opening Hours: 11:0am – 10:00pm (Tues-Fri), 10:00am – 10:00pm (Sat), 10:00am – 9:00pm (Sun)Share with me your favourite cake places at Tiong Bahru!Other Tiong Bahru Entries
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
The Orange Thimble (Tiong Bahru)
Social Haus (Tiong Bahru)
Drips Bakery Café (Tiong Poh Road)
Centre Ps (Tiong Bahru)
2012-08-01 00:00:00
Swirls Bakes Shop – 101 Flavours of Pretty Cupcakes in Singapore
Cupcakes are definitely one of the hottest food craze in Singapore now. Look at the explosion of number of cupcake shops, or confectionaries attempting to sell cakes disguised as cupcakes. On a visit to Swirls Bake Shop off Robertson Quay in the late afternoon, their cupcakes are almost sold clean.Swirls Bake Shop is an all-American cupcake bakery – think fluffy teacup sized cakes with creamy frostings, probably inspired by the famed Magnolia Bakery that the ladies savour on Sex and the City.Danish Dada, chief cupcake officer of Swirls, was so fascinated by a red velvet cupcake in the US that he went from San Francisco, LA, San Diego and New York just to search for the perfect one. (Actually sounds like something I would do if I had the money.) He eventually decided to make and sell his own here.So what’s the verdict? Actually, very good – so good that when I brought a dozen to a party, they were swiped clean. Of course people kept asking where I got them from.The cupcakes come in two sizes – Go for the tiny ($2.50) or cake pops if you have absolutely no space, but the regular ($3.95) would give you better moisture and feel.Their best seller is the Red Velvet, a crimson chocolate cake with cream cheese frosting. Yes, every Singaporean loves a red velvet, but I had better ones elsewhere (Twelve Cupcakes and My Fat Lady).  Generally, most of Swirl’s cupcakes are a tad too sweet for me, perhaps I have a lower tolerance.My personal favourite was the What’s Up Doc – a carrot cupcake which is light and fluffy, yet moist – almost quite hard to achieve. This is one of the best around and I would gladly have it again despite my expanding waistline.The Very Vanilla Cupcakes, where the vanilla extract is self-brewed from Madagascan bean pods, come in extremely pretty pink and yellow. They are the top choice for office ladies. Oh yes, Swirls offer up to 101 flavours. What are you waiting for?Swirls Bake Shop
8 Rodyk Street #01-08 (off Robertson Quay) Singapore 238216. Tel: +65 6634 4765
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 7:00pmOther Cake Entries
The Story Of Twelve Cupcakes
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
Dessert Cup (Raffles City)
Le Chocolat Café (Ann Siang Hill)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
2012-07-31 00:00:00
Menya Musashi – The Must-Try Ramen at Shinjuku Tokyo + How to Order Ramen via a Vending Machine
[Tokyo, Japan] If you are looking for that one ramen to try in Shinjuku, make your way to Menya Musashi 麺屋武蔵, one of the most popular ramen in Tokyo. Their accolades include several ramen awards since its founding in 1996, 8 shops in Tokyo (1 in Singapore), and is named by Frommer’s as one of the Top 6 ramen joints in Tokyo.Menya Musashi’s founder Yamada Takeshi, together with Ippudo’s Kawahara Shigemi and Nanttsutei’s Furuya Ichiro are said to be icons of the ramen industry.Musashi is a reference to the sword warrior Miyamoto Musashi, and is also short for 634 (therefore its website is m634.com). Interestingly, the tallest tower in the world Tokyo Sky Tree is also 634 metres.First things first, I was slightly disappointed with the Menya Musashi in Singapore and felt I did not warrant the queue at the Raffles City branch, as the broth lacked oomph as compared to Ippudo and Ramen Santouka. It is almost like the Japanese and Singapore branches are unrelated with different styles. (But I do intend to give the Singapore Menya Musashi another try.)However, the Shinjuku experience is almost life changing.Menya Musashi in Shinjuku probably ranks as one of my best (and I tried more than 10 worthy Tokyo ramen joints), and does attract a long queue during peak hours. Both its signature and tsukemen dipping noodles (1000 Yen, SGD$16.00, USD$12.80) are basic but spectacular – with chunks of melt-in-your-mouth pork, chewy noodles and addictive soup which made me finish till the last drop.Its highlight has to be the broth, a flavourful shoyu soy sauce base made with pork and chicken bones, with taste slightly ‘seafood-y’ due to the addition of dried saury fish. What’s really amazing is that the tsukemen soup dip still remains very hot after a while, which makes it continually delightful to slurp the strands.Its noodle texture is slightly different from the usual, flat and semi-thick which is suitable for shoyu base broth.However, the flavours are not too heavy or strong, and can be seen as too basic, which may not appeal to some.What is really impressive is the visual experience the cooks present – it’s almost as if they are presenting a martial arts dance as they cook and dry the ramen noodles in the open kitchen with such great force, adding collective yells of “Hey-Hai” and Japanese idioms.Personally, Menya Musashi makes one of my best ramen experiences. To help you to prevent confusion from ordering (especially for non-Japanese speaking foreigners like us), here are some tips to order ramen using the vending machine. It is not as idiot-proof as you would think.How to Order Ramen in Tokyo via a Vending Machine
1) Know what you want to order even before you enter. Look out for a picture menu if they have. You do not want to hold back a queue by only making the decision when you reach the machine.
2) Put in your notes and coins first before making selection, not after. Make sure you have lots of 1000 Yen notes and coins ready. Some machines do not accept 10,000 Yen notes.
3) Make your selections. When in doubt, pick the first choice (usually the basic), the most expensive (usually their best with most toppings), or osusume (recommended specialty)
4) You can also add-on toppings and beer, usually below the ramen selections.
5) Collect the ticket.
6) Hand the ticket to the counter staff when they ask.
7) They are likely to ask you for
   – soup base preference: Asari (light) or Kotteri (oily and heavy)
   – type of noodles: futsuu (regular) or futo (fat)
   – size: sho (small) or dai (large)Menya Musashi 麺屋武蔵
Shinjuku-ku, Nishi Shinjuku 7-2-6, Tokyo Prefecture, Japan, Tel: +03 3796 4634
東京都新宿区西新宿7-2-6 ビル1F  (About 5 minutes from the JR Shinjuku West Exit, near Prospect AXE or the former Oakwood Shinjuku Apartments)
Opening hours: 11:30am-3:30pm, 4:30pm – 9:30pm (Mon-Sat), 11:30am-4:30pm (Sun)Other Japanese Ramen
Sugamo Konaya (Roppongi, Tokyo)
Tsukiji Honten (Shibuya, Japan)
Menya Musashi (Raffles City)
Keisuke Tontotsu King (Orchid Hotel)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
2012-07-30 00:00:00
Bonchon Chicken – Awesome Korean Fried Chicken In Singapore, But
The awesome South Korean fried chicken restaurant Bonchon Chicken 본촌치킨 has finally reached Singapore, right at Bugis+ (the former Illuma). Not to be confused with 4 Fingers Bonchon Crispy Chicken at Ion Orchard, this is the original franchise from Korea which is popular even in New York and Los Angeles.For those who have yet to try the Korean style fried chicken, it is deep fried twice – so the skin becomes crunchier and the meat less greasy when compared to the usual American fast food fried chicken. And according to its menu, the chicken contains ZERO trans fat! Really?The ordering can get quite confusing, so here’s how it works.
Step 1: Pick a part (wings, drumstick or combo)
Step 2: Pick a size (small, medium or large)
Step 3: Pick a flavour (soy garlic, hot sauce or mix)
Step 4: Pick a side if you wish (steam rice, pickled radish, kimchi, coleslaw, edamame)It feels kind of pricy to me. A medium combo of 6 wings, 2 drumsticks with one side is $15.90, and I am only saying it because the pieces are quite small. Also, be prepared to wait due to its double-fried preparation time needed.Wow, the chicken is indeed quite different from the usual. The skin is certainly crunchy and comes off in pieces, with the sauces nicely enveloping it. The meat not quite the usual, is tasty and not too oily. Plus point, it doesn’t leave much of a stain on your fingers even if you use your hands. Flipside is this can be considered too dry. And they don’t serve tap water.There are obviously some problems with its service. Even though I was first in the queue, they let the person behind me go in and order first, as though I was transparent. And for once, I saw service staff who was visibly nervous and shaking – didn’t help when they forget my coleslaw order. Look at them also I feel stressed already.Strangely, there is a pathway in the middle of the restaurant, for those who needed to go the next restaurant Kungfu Paradise. Well, you may just want to give this Korean fried chicken a chance if you are a chicken addict.Bonchon Chicken 본촌치킨
201 Victoria Street, #01-11 Bugis+ (former Illuma, opposite Bugis MRT), Singapore 188067, Tel: +65 6884 4768
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 11:0pmOther Chicken Entries
Wingadees (Junction 10)
Popeyes Chicken and Biscuits (Airport T3)
ChicKing (Marina Square)
Wong Solo (Far East Plaza)
Charly T’s (Nomu Building)
2012-07-26 00:00:00
Wingadees – Chicken Wings with 16 Different Flavours
I love to discover new food, and the brand new F&B outlet at Junction 10 should excite chicken wings lovers – a shop selling deep fried wings with 16 different flavours!Junction 10 (the former Ten Mile Junction) does feel far for many, but its latest redevelopment should appeal better with a range of restaurants such as Porn’s, Kung Fu Paradise, BBQ Chicken and Youmenya Goemon.Over at Wingadees, other than the original flavour, the choices available include hot & spicy, wasabi, tom yam, cheese, barbeque, spicy plum, vanilla and even bizarre fruity chicken wings. Yes, that means strawberry, honeydew and lemon lime wings.I was at first sceptical, but when I sank our teeth on the original golden brown wings ($2.10 for one, $18 for ten) – I was a converted fan.Full Post at InSing.com – Wingadees opens at Junction 10Wingadees
1 Woodlands Road Junction 10 (Ten Mile Junction) #01-02 Singapore 677899, Tel: +65 6400 0820
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pmOther Related Entries
Popeyes Chicken and Biscuits (Airport T3)
ChicKing (Marina Square)
Wong Solo (Far East Plaza)
The Rotisserie (China Square Food Centre)
Charly T’s (Nomu Building)
2012-07-25 00:00:00
Dann’s Daily Pescetarian Café – Singapore’s Only Pescetarian Café
Before I even start the review, we should first talk about being ‘pescetarian’ – those who abstain from eating all meat except fish and other forms of seafood in their diet.This café started with a mother’s love for her son. She wanted him to adopt a healthy diet and lifestyle since young and therefore carried out in-depth food research and cooking experiments. The idea eventually snowballed into this first pescetarian café in Singapore, located at Eastwood Centre opposite Bedok Food Centre.And if you are wondering, her son is called Dann.Dann’s Daily Pescetarian Café has just launched a new menu of healthy treats. This includes low-carbo menus where vegetarian dishes are made with fresh vegetables, organic patties and does not contain gluten. Food is cooked using alkaline water too, we tested it.Full Post at InSing.com – Dann’s Daily Pescetarian CaféDann’s Daily Pescetarian Café
20 Eastwood Road #10-06 Eastwood Centre, Singapore Tel: +65 6449 1355
Opening Hours: 10am – 8pm (Tues-Sun)Other Related Entries
BigBank Café (Killiney Road)
Crazy World Café (Chinatown)
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
7 Sensations (Millenia Walk)
Dapao (Far East Square)
2012-07-24 00:00:00
Mutekiya Ramen – Best Ramen at Ikebukuro Tokyo
Talk about the best ramen at Tokyo Japan, and many food blogs would recommend Ippudo (Ebisu), Menya Musashi (Shinjuku), Butamen Kenkyujo (Kanda), Aoba (Nakano) Ramen Jiro (Shinjuku) and Ramen Tetsuya (Higashi Koenji) and Metekiya (Ikebukuro).What would you recommend? I followed religiously to the Taiwanese written Tokyo guidebook “东京王 Dong Jing Wang” to the ramen warzone of Ikebukuro, and found myself outside the snaking queue of Mutekiya Ramen.My trusted guidebook recommended that tourists should go at 4pm to avoid the peak hour crowd. Good advice, because when I arrived at 4:10pm, there was already a queue outside the shop of about 15 people! That translated to a 25 minute wait.Mutekiya is one of those ramen shops with only one branch, and has limited sitting of say 20 pax, but it is worth the effort and time to try its legendary ramen.Mutekiya Ramen’s “人气王 Ren Qi Wang” (popular dish) is the Goukai Men (1200 Yen, SGD$19.16, USD$15.18) which consist of a 16-hour boiled tonkotsu pork thighbone broth with thick slices of barbecued pork, a flavoured hardboiled egg, and two pinkish fresh prawns.The first few sips of the ramen are nothing short of sensational, easily beating any ramen broth I had in Singapore (not exaggerating). I knew I cannot compare, but this Goukai Men broth is Wow-tastic, said to be added with fresh pork fat and cooked for an additional 3 hours.  The soup is really really flavourful which makes you feel extremely satisfied as it slowly warms the tummy.The other popular dish is the Homaru Men (780 Yen, SGD$12.46, USD$9.87), where the noodles are medium-thick, chewy and springy, imported directly from Hokkaido Sapporo. There is so much bite, makes a perfect pairing with the melt-in-your-mouth pork slices.Mutekiya is the best ramen I had in Tokyo so far. So what’s?Mutekiya Ramen 麺創房無敵家
1-17-1 Minami-Ikebukuro, Toshima-ku 東京都豊島区南池袋1-17- (Ikebukuro Station East Exit), Tokyo, Japan. Tel: + 03 3982 7656
Opening Hours: 10:30am-4amOther Related Entries
Sugamo Konaya (Roppongi, Tokyo)
Tsukiji Honten (Shibuya, Japan)
Menya Musashi (Raffles City)
Keisuke Tontotsu King (Orchid Hotel)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
2012-07-23 00:00:00
Silver Shell Café – Meet The Meat Buffet, Eat Till You Drop
Coming to Shangri-La’s Rasa Sentosa Resort does feel like I am overseas for a holiday, with its by-the-beach view, service staff decked in flowery resort uniforms, and Filipino musicians playing some Hawaiian style music.The Dine On 3 at Rasa Sentosa features a destination dining concept with three restaurants and a bar under one roof. There is Barnacles Restaurant for fresh seafood and grills, Casserole for Western Moroccan casseroles, and Silver Shell Cafe for theme buffets.First question to answer: How to get here? The ‘easiest’ way is of course cabbing, but you can take a shuttle bus from Habourfront at the cruise centre, which comes at 20 minutes intervals. It would be a different story if you already planned to have a staycation at Sentosa.If you want to eat till you drop, there is a “Meet the Meat” promotion at Silver Shell Café every Wednesday evenings. I think this place is meat-crazy, with array of poultry, beef, lamb, cooked in roast, tandoori, grilled, barbecued, deep-fried, stir-fried, steamed… and the popular meat dishes are Slow-Roast Tomahawk Veal, Grilled German Sausages and Roast Beef Tenderloin.I probably tried only 30-40% of the selection and I concede defeat – could not eat anymore.The Grilled German Sausages are my favourite, with thick fat cheesy Knackwursts and Bratwursts being my favourites. I have not told anyone, but when I bit into one of the sausages, there was a crackling sound of the casing, and the fillings (probably fats + cheese) squirted out to probably a metre away. Yes, it was this juicy.The roast chicken with black pepper sauce, and tandoori chicken also make delicious choices.There is also some interesting selection on the other side of the buffet table – Sichuan Gong Bao Chicken, Chilli Crab, Yam Ring (very rare to see this, and customers were only taking its filling), Prawn Noodles and the restaurants most popular Laksa. A guilty choice, and I finished its gravy till the last drop.The “Meet the Meat” buffet is available on Wednesdays from 6 to 10 p.m. and is priced at $58++ per adult and $25++ per child from 6 to 12 years.Silver Shell Cafe
101 Siloso Road, Level 3, Shangri-La Rasa Sentosa Resort (Harbourfront MRT), Tel :+65 6371 1966
Opening Hours: 6:30am – 11pmOther Related Entries
Plaza Brasserie (Park Royal)
10 at Claymore (Pan Pacific Orchard)
Chiso Zanmai (Clarke Quay Central)
Feast @ East (East Coast)
Tiffin Room (Raffles Hotel)
2012-07-20 00:00:00
I Am An Instagram Addict – Are You?
Instagram, the photo-sharing app which allows anybody to be a photographer by applying that digital filter, is currently my 3rd favourite iPhone app after FaceBook and WhatsApp. Of course it is better known after Facebook offer $1billion for acquisition.For some fun facts, it took just 10 months for Instagram to reach the milestone of 150 million pictures uploaded. With 30 million register users, more than 1 billion Instagram photos have been uploaded so far, with 5 million new photos being uploaded each day. But 33% of Instagram users have never uploaded a single photo, and only 5% of users have more than 50 pictures.The photo which made it to Instagram’s Most Popular PageI am not credible enough to write “How to gain more Instagram followers”, but can share some of my own fun techniques.1. I upload only food photos.
After all, I am known as @DanielFoodDiary, and I upload the best 2-3 meals of the day. There are times when I eat something sucky, and no, they never get featured. To me, bad publicity is still publicity. (A question, should I allow more self pics huh?)Instagram #9ofpride – My favourite local dishes2. To get more followers, you #hashtag. Some of the Top Instagram Hashtags are …
#tweegram #instagood #photoftheday #instamood #igers #instagramhub #picoftheday #instadaily #bestoftheday #ignation #igdaily #instagramers #webstagram #igaddict #all_shot Yes, use it to gain followers – it works.3. Some of my favourite Instagram Hastags are …
#danielfooddiary (but of course),
#sgig, #igsg, #sgfood, #instasg, #singapore (all Singapore related),
#food #foodpics #foodporn #instafood #foodies #foodgasm #foodstagram (food related) and
#delicious #yummy #awesome (to describe my food)Instagram #9ofpride – My birthday cakes 20124. I Geotag my photos
The most commonly asked Instagram question is “Where is this ah??”. And in my head I may go, “Geotag above yah!” Geotags are useful because they help keep track where you took your photos, and help others to search.5. What filter do I use? 
Surprise, surprise, I DON’T use Instagram filters. So how do my photos look so bright and cheery? I use my trusted iPhone Camera App Camera+ and make it a point to shoot under good lighting.6. My favourite Instagrammers are …
I currently follow 198 Instagrammers (mostly my friends), and have to say that @ortega_sg @ieatishootipost and @ieatblog have awesome food photos, celebrities @fannaiaiwong @xiaxue @romeotan are very candid with their personal lives, and @aikbengchia has beautiful photography on the Singapore landscape. @igsg has over 200k followers and picks the best to feature.Oh yes, this is crazy, but here’s my id, so follow me maybe? @DanielFoodDiaryInstagram #9ofpride – Awesome beautiful dessertsOther Related Entries
Are You On Instagram?
What’s In a Food Blogger’s Bag
Join The #CookForFamily Initiative 
Daniel’s Food Diary on FaceBook
Daniel’s Food Diary on Twitter
2012-07-19 00:00:00
The #CookForFamily Update – 97 Bloggers Have Joined!
Thank you to everyone who joined The#CookForFamily Initiative, and there are now 97 bloggers, just 3 away from a 100!Plus, this has gone on to the Instagram world and Instagram Singapore InstaSG and Singapore Instagram Sgig would be both landing their support.#CookForFamily Initiative
The #CookForFamily is a bloggers-for-bloggers initiative, created with a simple objective of getting more bloggers, and hopefully their fans and followers, to start cooking and bonding with their families.To be part of it, you just have to cook for your family, blog about it on 6th August Monday, and hashtag all social media channels with #CookForFamily.Many have asked, so why I am organising the #CookForFamily?
I was quite affected when I first heard a story from a famous blogger’s family member: This blogger is always out for tastings almost every day, that the blogger never really eats at home. Family members complain, but I suppose blogging take first place in this situation.While personal relationship is affected in this case, what readers see are only the exterior – the glam factor.Actually, it is not uncommon to have food tastings for almost every single day. There was a period of time when I accepted every request that came in, and it did affect the time spent with my mum and friends, worse if the request does not allow a plus-one.How many bloggers would bring their parents for food tastings, really? So far, I know Gourmetestorie and we all met his mum, sometimes, his grandma. Good for him!It also started with a tweet.
Chrispytine tweeted that she was tired of bloggers b****ing all the time, and said we could do a greater good if we channelled our energies elsewhere. Yes, so far bloggers have been quite individualist and seldom come together to do something that has no commercial motive.Why did I reject sponsors?
Some have recommended prizes for the best blog entries. Sorry bloggers, I have rejected all sponsors, at least for this time. Because this should come from the heart, and not because we stand a chance to win something. Isn’t doing something for our family the greatest prize of all?Why didn’t you ask famous XXX & YYY blogger to join? 
Of course I did! The following scenarios happened
a)	I was ignored (most common)
b)	“I am too busy to cook for my family.” (I started asking more than a month ago, so well… proves my point that we are caught up with the wrong priorities.)
c)	“I can’t cook!” (Fair enough, but with today’s technology and equipment, it is really quite easy to put together something. What happened to the home economics lessons?)The greatest irony I got were replies from Parenting Bloggers who said they never cooked at all. Well, I am in no position to criticise anyone… but I would say every child should appreciate a healthy home-cooked meal from their parents. Wait, tell me what have you been feeding your children all these while?!Who are involved in this initiative? 
Other than Instagram Singapore InstaSG and Singapore Instagram Sgig, the 97 bloggers involved in #CookForFamily are:
365days2play (Dawn Huang), A Juggling Mom (Susan), A Winsome Life (Melvin & Jacqueline), A&W Couple’s Blog (Abbey & Will), Acquisition of Taste (Andy and Ashley), AiMakan (Hazel Tay), Alvinology (Alvin Lim), An Escape To Food (HL Tay), AnythingAlsoEat (CY), AromaCookery (Julia Khoo), AspirantSG (Wee Heng), Calvin Timo, Celestial Delish (Celes Fernandez), Cheekiemonkie (Kelvin), Cheryl Wee Xin Hui, Chrispytine (Christine), Cloudy Windz , Coffee Table People, Cookieologic (Huijin), Cooksnapeatlove (Jacob Leong), Cuisine Paradise (Ellena Guan), Daniel’s Food Diary (Daniel Ang), Danny Love To Eat (Danny Tan), Darren Bloggie, Delicious Soup Recipes (Dominique Goh) , Double Image (Kevin Soh), Dream2breakaway (Ying Zi) , Fighting Fires & Baking Buns, Flora Yeo, Food Friend Or Foe (Brenda), Food.Recentrunes (Ivan Ng), Foodie Ah, Foodie’s Kitchen , Foodoshoot (Charlene Chew), G.Nome Chromosome, Gastronautdiary (David Yip), Gninethree (Charleen), Gourmetestorie (Justin Daniel Pereira), HazelHearts (Hazel), HazelNutLife (Hazel Lam), HisFoodBlog (Rayner Ng), iisjong (Joey Ong), J Babies Dad (Isaiah), Jessie Food Trip (Ong Meng Ching), Keropokman (Philip Lim), Lady J’s Musings (Joanne), Le Petit Connoisseur (Stargirl), Lobster Paints (Shi Ting), Lovin Greens (Huiyuan), Luxury Haven (Shirley Tay), Maameemoomoo (Sherie), Mamawearpapashirt (June), Melicacy (Melissa Koh), Memoirs Of Food (Daniel Hung), Mint Leong, Miss Tam Chiak (Maureen Ow), Miss Tiffany (Tiffany Wong), MissyGlutton, MoonBerry (Irene), Ms SkinnyFat (Cheryl Ng), Msfoodaholic (Karina Lee), Mummy Blogs (Sandra Tan), Pengs Kitchen (Veronica) , Perhaps Always (Samuel), Pixieprodigy (Calvin Wong), Pling Thinks (Tracy Chua), Priscias (Priscilla), Raising Rock Star, RubbishEatRubbishGrow (Nathanael Ho), Rynaque, Sakura Haruka, Sarahs Loft (Sarah Khaw), Seng Kang Babies (Andy), SgFoodonFoot (Derrick Tan), Simple Happiness (Christina Teong), SkiesofLove (Angie), Slurp (Jason), Smithankyou (Smith Leong), Story of Bing, Super Adrian Me (Adrian Eugene Seet), Superfinefeline (Karen), Teru2xBozu Goes Hungry, That Silver Girl (Silver Ang), The Dead Cockroach, The Dessert Prince (Edward), The Dining Table (Javan), The Dirty Stall, The Food Canon (Terry Wong), The Food Recipe (Jozel), The Gingerbread Mum (Adora Tan), The Hungry Cow (LeRoy), The Love of my Life, Little DinoEgg (Jenn Lim), The Super Girl, Velvet Chronicles (Nuramima), You Got Me Blogging (Razlan), Yummy Koh (Chris), Yumyumformytumtum (Peter Oh)If you are interested in joining, leave me an email (DanielFoodDiary@gmail.com) or a comment below with your email saying “Yes, I Want To Cook For My Family!”Other Related Entries
Join The #CookForFamily Initiative 
The #CookForFamily Update
2012-07-18 00:00:00
Hog’s Breath Café – Keeps You Hungry for Aussie Steak & Ribs
Hog’s Breath Cafe’s philosophy is to “have fun and enjoy yourself”, and it is also the restaurant to enjoy Aussie steak and ribs.It has been a long time since I have been to Chijmes for a meal, and I was surprised to hear loud cheers coming from a moderately crowded Hog’s Breath Café on a weekday evening. Oh yes, it was due to the screening of a rugby match between New South Wales and Queenslands.How appropriate. Hog’s Breath Café was first opened way back in 1989 in Queensland Australia by founding partners Don Algie and Ginger White. It has since expanded to 75 outlets all over the world. The Hog’s Breath Café in Singapore’s Chijmes boasts a great atmosphere to wind down with friends after a hard day’s work.Talking about friends, the Finger Food Combo ($22.95) – a sampler plate of potato skins, buffalo wings, crumbed chicken tenders and calamari, is real enjoyment. Usually when I order a platter like this, there are one or two items I may not fancy, but this plate has everything I like.The salt and pepper dusted calamari dipped in the special Hog’s Breath honey mustard feels rather sinful, but it’s probably worth the calories.The recommended prime rib steak comes with different options of toppings such as garlic mushroom, calamari, and avocado. I was recommended the garlic prawn ($36.95 for regular, $44.95) for Aussie size). The thick slab of steak came served with three huge prawns on top, with overflowing garlic and white wine cream sauce.I would sometimes assume that you can only get good steaks at a top-notch expensive restaurant, but this dish proved me wrong. The meat was evenly cooked (still slightly pinkish, yet not too red), juicy, tasty but not overly fatty. Even though I ordered a regular size, the 200 gram portion was still too huge for me.You cannot really come to a HOG’s Breath Café without trying its signature Smoke Pork BBQ Ribs ($26.95 for half rack), which is tenderly delicious in a special smoked BBQ sauce.For those with a sweet tooth, the Mississippi Mud Cake ($13.95) which has a heavily guarded recipe since 1989, is impressive and irresistible. It comes ‘bleeding’ with chocolate sauce, served with ice cream on the side – thick, heavy, and moist. I use the word ‘bleeding’ because there is really an over-abundance of chocolate sauce.*The above entry is an advertorial.Hog’s Breath Café Giveaway
Hog’s Breath Café is giving away 15 sets of $30 Piggy Dollars to lucky Daniel’s Food Diary readers. All you need to do is to *likes* the FaceBook Page of Daniel’s Food Diary AND Share this post on Facebook or Retweet on Twitter.Leave a comment below to say you have done so. Results will be announced on Friday 27th July 2012. Contest winners must furnish a Singapore postal address to receive the Piggy Dollars.Note: Piggy Dollars come in denomination of $10 which can be redeemed with any purchase made over $30 from the a la carte menu. Multiple redemption allowed to every $30 spent. Subject to any other conditions which may be imposed by Hog’s Breath Café (Chijmes).Hog’s Breath Café (Chijmes)
30 Victoria Street, #01-26/27 Chijmes, Singapore (City Hall MRT), Tel: +65 6338 1387
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 12:00am (last order 10:30pm)*This entry is brought to you by Hog’s Breath Cafe.
2012-07-17 00:00:00
The Royal Mail – Savour Classic British Cuisine at The Ascott
Feeling English? The Royal Mail Restaurant & Bar has officially opened at The Ascott Serviced Apartment, and provides classic British favourites and lunchtime sets to attract the (higher paid) corporate crowd at Raffles Place.I already like the name, called so as the world’s first high-rise mail chute still stands in its full glory by the lift lobby of the Ascott. This English restaurant is conceptualised by veteran restaurateur Michel Lu (who also owns Lucky 13) and helmed by Chef De Cuisine Peter Koh previously Sous Chef Esquina Tapas Bar.There is no fish and chips at Royal Mail, but expect juicy Roast Chermoula Chicken, Cider & Honey Roast Lamb Leg and Roast U.S Pork Knuckle.The 3 course set lunch is at $38+, or $55+ for the USDA Prime Roast set, likely to appeal to those who need a quiet place for corporate lunches. The starter, a warm spinach salad with slow poached egg, earns a high score.The Roast Prime Rib, is served in three variations of thickness – The English Cut (200g), Our Classic Cut (280g) and The Royal Mail Cut (340g), recommended to be eaten medium-rare. Served with yorkshire pudding, creamed pea, corn and garlic potato mousseline, our ribs has a high percentage of fat, and if you can get past that, the meat is pretty tender succulent.Its duck leg confit ($38++ for 3 course set) with herb roasted chat potato, asparagus spears and thyme jus is slightly on the salty side – both on the skin and meat, which sadly was too briny for me to finish.You should always save some room for its dessert, which to me were the highlights of the entire meal. The Banoffee Tart ($13+ if ordered ala carte), which is banana, toffee and cream tart served with salted caramel sauce is sweetness haven. My friend found it too thick, but I loved every part of the caramel.The signature Eton Mess dessert ($13+), strawberries, meringue, salted caramel (more!), devon cream and hazelnut crunch in a cup, was every mouthful a delight, every savour an enjoyment.The Royal Mail Restaurant & Bar
Ascott Singapore, Raffles Place, 2 Finlayson Green, Singapore 049247 (Raffles Place MRT) Tel: +65 6509 3589
Opening Hours: 12:00pm – 3:00pm, 6:30pm-11:00pm (Mon-Fri), 6:30pm-11:00pm (Sat)Other Related Entries
Wooloomooloo Steakhouse (Raffles City)
TongKang Colonial Bar & Restaurant (Clarke Quay)
Infusion (Dempsey)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
Cocotte (Wunderlust Hotel)
2012-07-16 00:00:00
5 Strangest Durian Combinations!
The fruit that is described to “taste like heaven, but smell like hell” – Durian is many Singaporean’s favourite fruit, whose name is derived from the Malay word ‘duri’ which means thorn. While a cup of durian can have very high calories (357 calories per cup!), it is said to be rich in phytonutrients and raise serotonin levels, thereby elevating one’s good mood.Now we know why durians make people happy.The durian fruit is used to flavour a wide variety of sweet edibles such as traditional Malay cakes, ice kachang, mooncakes and pancakes. Thought you had it all? Here are five strange durian combinations, which can leave you craving for more!Number 1 – Durian Prata (Available at Plaza Brasserie Park Royal)
Combining two of Singapore’s favourite food, the durian plus prata grouping is really “win already”. Crispy salty on outside, with sweet gooey durian meat in the inside, this is surprising one very powerful reunion. I cheated a little and added more durian penyet. One word – “Power”.Number 2 – Durian Chee Cheong Fun (Available at House of Rice Roll and Porridge
The durian chee cheong fun ($5.20) is served chilled sprinkled with sugared peanuts. You either love or hate this, it’s either too strange or works well for you. Don’t worry, it is not smelly, though I must say that standard of the durian cheong fun has dropped over the years. It used to come much colder with fleshier fruit which was more ‘shiok’.Number 3 – Durian Gelato (Available at Alfero Artisan Gelato)
We have possible tried some D24 or Mao Shan Wang ice cream, and Udders serve quite a deliciously wicked scoop that makes it one of its most popular offering. But Durian gelato? Italian foreign talent Marco Alfero shows demonstrates his integration by mixing both D24 and Mao Shan Wang into his creamy gelato. And the result is something probably the Italian mafias would approve of.Number 4 – Durian Cones (Available at Goodwood Park Hotel)
The pair of mini chocolate and vanilla waffle cones filled with durian mousse delighted almost every girl in the table. So cute and petite. I never imaged anyone using ‘petite’ to describe a durian dessert. You can pop them into your mouth, and wished that it comes in an actual cone size.Number 5 – Durian Tau Huay (Available at 33 Cold Soya Beancurd, Amoy Food Centre) 
Amalak! Durian and Tau Huay?! Not considered impossible since the recent beancurd craze has mutated the original taste of tau huay to include flavours such as chocolate, strawberry, green tea and coffee. The durian tau huay is smooth and reeks of strong flavours of durian, guaranteed to give your breath a different sniff.Note: Daniel from Daniel’s Food Diary is no durian lover, but risked his breath for this entry. He grew to like durian, in any form but the actual thorny fruit.Other Related Entries
Goodwood Park Hotel’s Durians
Plaza Brasserie (Park Royal)
House of Rice Roll and Porridge (Killiney Road)
Alfero Artisan Gelato (MacPherson)
Udders (Thomson Road)
2012-07-13 00:00:00
Never Too Busy To Cook – Recipe of Grill Fillet With Vegetables
Never too busy to cook! So last week, Miss Tam Chiak and I conducted a cooking demonstration organised by omy.sg and Pansonic at the Singapore Food Trail, Singapore Flyer.We were pleasantly surprised because registration closed fast after 4 days due to over, over, overwhelming response. The organisers expected 35 pax, but more than 200 people registered! We wonder if it was due to the free cooking demo, or THE two bloggers conducting the cooking class. Whahaha *thick skin*.I must say we do not know how to cook – but we try. Sometimes, I have to be blunt and say that “being busy” has been our laziest and easiest excuse to put aside time to cook something for our families. Really, it is about how we prioritise our time.We are thankful to Theresa Wong from Panasonic for sharing her recipes and cooking tips. Here’s an easy-to-prepare dish, and one that can impress your family and friends at gathering and parties. If I say it’s easy, it is really easy.Grill Fillet With Vegetables
Ingredients
300gm fish fillet (cut into 2 pieces
120gm shitake mushroom (sliced)
120gm colour capsicum (sliced)
50gm onion large (sliced)
60g mozzarella cheese (shredded)
Paprika powder, black pepper and saltSeasoning A
40gm mozerella cheese (shredded)
2.5 tsp mayonnaise
1 tsp teriyaki sauce
1 tsp garlic mincedSeasoning B
1 tsp garlic (minced)
2 tsp teriyaki sauce
1 tbsp olive oil
Oregano leaves, black pepper, saltPreparation Method
1. Marinate fillet with pepper, salt and Seasoning A for about 15 minutes. Leave aside.
2. Mix mushroom, capsicum and onion with Seasoning B. Leave aside.
3. Place fillet with skin part on grill tray, towards outside.
4. Next place the mushroom mixture towards the inner side of the tray.
5. Sprinkle cheese and paprika on top of fillet and mushroom.
6. Set double grill for 15 min (Recommended to be cooked in Panasonic Inverter Steam Microwave over Model NN-SV30)The salmon would have a light golden brown finish, with the inner flesh being cheesy smooth and moist. Unexpectedly delicious! The vegetables on the side are colourful and delightful, and the entire dish reminds me of eating a pizza without the crust and guilt. Go try it and tell me how it goes!Other Related Entries
Honey & Pineapple Tart Ice Cream
Recipe Ketam Masak Lemak
Cold Shrimp with Mayo in Vol-au-vent shells
SoEZ Brownie Baking 101
Recipe of Grilled Slipper Lobster
2012-07-12 00:00:00
Ji Guang Xiang Xiang Ji 继光香香鸡 – Taiwan’s Most Addictive Chicken Pieces
[Taipei, Taiwan] Since everyone is talking about Scooting off to Taiwan at $88, I have my own visions of what to do when I first reach Taipei – rush off to Ximending to eat Ji Guang Xiang Xiang Ji 继光香香鸡!Talking about fried chicken street food, Taiwan Hotstar Hao Da’s super large XXL chicken cutlet, and Singapore’s version of Shilin chicken cutlet with powered spices are popular favourites. So what’s this Xiang Xiang Ji (literally ‘fragrance fragrance chicken’)?Jiguang’s savoury chicken was founded at Taichung since 1973,  almost 40 years in the business! Their bites are bigger than popcorn chicken, somewhat like packet Japanese Karage, BUT only better. (It’s seldom I say something Taiwanese is better than Japanese.)I was attracted to this kiosk with big red signboard near Ximending train station by its fragrance, which I can smell from metres away.Their chicken at 55NT ($2.30) for small and 100NT for large ($4.20) pack, is deep fried till yellowish golden brown, sprinkled with pepper specially made with some Chinese medicinal herbs, with the chicken breast meat being all super moist, juicy and tender.The chicken breast is freshly packed, and it is so soft that you can eat the chicken cartilage. They also do not double-fry their meat pieces, and oil is changed daily.The recipe is a heavily guarded one, said to use more than 10 spices. Looks like not only Colonel Sanders has secrets. Have you tried Jiguang Xiang Xiang Ji? Do you love it? Tell me “Yes!”.Ji Guang Xiang Xiang Ji 继光香香鸡
Taichung Head Office: 41157 Sunbeam Road, Taiping City, Taichung County, No. 62 Tel:0800-200 525 FAX :04-23.95503Other Related Entries
Must Try Food in Taipei
Ah Zong Mian Xian (Taiwan) 
Pork Pepper Buns (Taiwan)
Hao Da Chicken Culet (Taiwan)
Big Sausage Wrap Small Sausage (Taiwan)
2012-07-11 00:00:00
The #CookForFamily Update – 83 Bloggers Have Joined! How About You?
Wow, wow, wow!  Last week I blogged about The #CookForFamily Initiative, and there are now 83 bloggers who have joined the initiative, 17 bloggers away from a 100!The #CookForFamily is a bloggers-for-bloggers initiative, created with a simple objective of getting more bloggers, and hopefully their fans and followers, to start cooking and bonding with their families.To be part of it, you just have to cook for your family, blog about it on 6th August Monday, and hashtag all social media channels with #CookForFamily.A few FAQS
What should I blog about?
Recipes, experiences, reflection, event – I would leave it up to you as all of you have your own style. Our main objective is to encourage readers to cook for their own families.Why 6th August Mon?
It is a purely random date. No rocket science behind the logic. I was hoping if everybody posts, say between 10am-12pm on 6th Aug and RT everybody else, we may stand a good chance to be trending.Why am I wasting time doing this?
There is a long story behind. Long story short – many of us bloggers (I am so guility) spend so much time outside attending events, eating all the good food, that sometimes we just forget about to share some time with people who care most about us.Some bloggers have also suggested that we bloggers should come together to do something meaningful, rather than just rant and b**** about others. So this is it – hopefully this is a start to more initiatives in the future.I can’t cook! How? 
I really don’t think it is about cooking something fantastic. Sometimes, I believe our loved ones would appreciate a simple toast & ham in the morning, a fruit juice we blended, anything. It’s always the thought that counts.Who are involved in this initiative? 
There are 83 Bloggers in #CookForFamily! They are:
365days2play (Dawn Huang), A Juggling Mom (Susan), A Winsome Life (Melvin & Jacqueline), A&W Couple’s Blog (Abbey & Will), Acquisition of Taste (Andy and Ashley), AiMakan (Hazel Tay), Alvinology (Alvin Lim), An Escape To Food (HL Tay), AnythingAlsoEat (CY), AromaCookery (Julia Khoo), AspirantSG (Wee Heng), Calvin Timo, Celestial Delish (Celes Fernandez), Cheekiemonkie (Kelvin), Cheryl Wee Xin Hui, Chrispytine (Christine), Cookieologic (Huijin), Cooksnapeatlove (Jacob Leong), Cuisine Paradise (Ellena Guan), Danny Love To Eat (Danny Tan), Darren Bloggie, Delicious Soup Recipes (Dominique Goh), Dream2breakaway (Ying Zi), Fighting Fires & Baking Buns, Flora Yeo, Food Friend Or Foe (Brenda), Food.Recentrunes (Ivan Ng), Foodie Ah, Foodie’s Kitchen, Foodoshoot (Charlene Chew), G.Nome Chromosome, Gastronautdiary (David Yip), Gninethree (Charleen), HazelHearts (Hazel), HazelNutLife (Hazel Lam). HisFoodBlog (Rayner Ng), iisjong (Joey Ong), J Babies Dad (Isaiah), Jessie Food Trip (Ong Meng Ching), Justin Daniel Pereira (Gourmetestorie), Keropokman (Philip Lim), Lady J’s Musings (Joanne), Le Petit Connoisseur (Stargirl), Lobster Paints (Shi Ting), Lovin Greens (Huiyuan), Maameemoomoo (Sherie), Mamawearpapashirt (June), Melicacy (Melissa Koh), Memoirs Of Food (Daniel Hung), Mint Leong, Miss Tam Chiak (Maureen Ow), MissyGlutton , MoonBerry (Irene), Ms SkinnyFat (Cheryl Ng), Msfoodaholic (Karina Lee), Mummy Blogs (Sandra Tan), Perhaps Always (Samuel), Pling Thinks (Tracy Chua), Priscias (Priscilla), Raising Rock Star, RubbishEatRubbishGrow (Nathanael Ho), Rynaque, Sarahs Loft (Sarah Khaw), Seng Kang Babies (Andy), SgFoodonFoot (Derrick Tan), Slurp (Jason), Smithankyou (Smith Leong), Story of Bing, Superfinefeline (Karen), Teru2xBozu Goes Hungry, That Silver Girl (Silver Ang), The Dead Cockroach, The Dessert Prince (Edward), The Dining Table (Javan), The Dirty Stall, The Food Canon (Terry Wong), The Gingerbread Mum (Adora Tan), The Hungry Cow (LeRoy), The Love of my Life, Little DinoEgg (Jenn Lim), You Got Me Blogging (Razlan), Yumyumformytumtum (Peter Oh)If you are interested in joining, leave me an email (DanielFoodDiary@gmail.com) or a comment below with your email saying “Yes, I Want To Cook For My Family!”Other Related Entries
Join The #CookForFamily Initiative
2012-07-10 00:00:00
Wooloomooloo Steakhouse – Premium Steak Restaurant Opens at Raffles City
Beef lovers would rejoice at the opening of the new Wooloomooloo Steakhouse at Swissotel Raffles City, which offers favourites such as Black Angus from the butcher’s block.You may have thought this restaurant hails from the harbourside town of Woolloomooloo Sydney, but it is actually from Hong Kong which has branches at Central, Nathan Road, Wan Chai and Tsim Sha Tsui. One of the owners is Australian, and Singapore’s marks its first foray overseas.Before I even mention about the beef, the ambience and view here is Beautiful with a capital “B”, can I add elegant, classy and cosy as well? This 140-seater restaurant makes a perfect venue for that romantic Valentine’s Day/anniversary/birthday dinner with a view of faraway Marina Bay Sands, Singapore Recreation Club, and the F1 route (depending on where you are sitting).The Australian Black Angus Tomahawk ($125, portion for 2) is a massive whole rib steak of more than a kilo with bone in, served medium after 20 minutes in the broiler. This is a premium cut from Australia, and it is HUGE and impressive when served, and would satisfy many meat lovers.Fat content in a Tomahawk is generally higher, therefore slightly plumper and chewier – not exactly my favourite beef cut, but great if you like your slices of caramelised fats.Every steak is also served with four homemade sauces of Red Wine Madeira, Au Jus, Peppercorn and Mushroom. My favourite is a combination of Peppercorn with Mushroom which gives a stronger distinct flavour to the meat. You can pair up with side dishes such as Lyonnais Potatoes and Sauteed Spinach with Mushrooms.The dish which blew the entire table away was the Beef Wellington ($66), an 8-ounce piece of Australian fillet mignon broiled to medium rare doneness, paired with Parma ham, mushroom duxelle and foie gras and encased in a crisp butter puff pastry.Almost superb. The beef was so tender and moist, probably one of the best I had in a long time. Plus the crust which absorbed the velvety red wine Madeira sauce, makes you feel that this cow did not die in vain.Wooloomooloo Steakhouse
2 Stamford Road, Level 3, Swissotel the Stamford, Singapore 178882, Tel: +65 6338 0261
Hong Kong Branches: The ONE Nathan Road, Onfem Tower Central, The Hennessy Wan Chai, Tsim Sha Tsui Centre
Opening Hours: Restaurant Lunch 12pm – 2.30pm, Dinner 6.30pm – 11pm
Bar: 12pm – 1am (Mon – Thurs), 12pm – 2am (Fri – Sat), Sun, 12pm – 12am (Sun)
Bar Bites: 12pm – 12am (Mon – Sat), 12pm – 11pm (Sun)Other Related Entries
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
10 at Claymore (Pan Pacific Orchard)
Astons Specialities (Cathay)
Infusion (Dempsey)
TongKang Colonial Bar & Restaurant (Clarke Quay)
2012-07-09 00:00:00
Plaza Brasserie – Crab Buffet! Eat to Your Crab’s Content
Undeniably, crab feasting is one of Singapore’s favourite past-time. Chilli crab, black pper crab, butter crab, white pepper crab, crab bee hoon – we love it all. Talking about where to eat crabs in Singapore, Mellben, Uncle Leong, Long Beach, No Signboard, Jumbo, and Palm Beach are some of the favourite places.Sometimes when I organise crab dinners, the most varieties of crabs we can order is 3 as we have only that much space. For those who want to try crabs of every kind, the good news is Plaza Brasserie (which I previously featured The Seafood Buffet, Dragon Feast and Grandma’s Favourites) is launching an all you can eat Crab Fiesta buffet!You can choose from a variety of crab dishes, such as appetizers: Dijon Crab Cakes with Coriander Paste, Thai Green Curry Mud Crab in Sichuan Style and Stir-Fried Flower Crabs with Spring Onions and Ginger, Crab in ‘Sharksfin’ soup, Crab Meat Le Mein with Miso Paste and Condiments, and Braised Tang Hoon with Live Crab.Here are my 3 personal favourite crabs at Plaza Brasserie.Easily the food bloggers’ favourite, the Stir-fried Crab with Salted Egg Yolk was first to be wiped clean. I first started my crab dining with fork and knife, but gave up when I just had to lick the spicy-sweet-salty yolk coating around the crab shells. High cholesterol (!) I know, but highly addictive as well.This is Chef Jackson’s personal pride and concocted using a special recipe – The Nonya Curry Crab which is cooked with flower crabs. Great combi I thought. Flower crabs’ meat is usually sweeter and taste ‘cleaner’ than mud crabs, and goes really well with the unique slight-spicy Nonya curry gravy.The chilli crab, sometimes known as Singapore’s Number 1 dish and listed at Number 35 on World’s 50 most quite delicious foods by CNNGo, is a classic dish enjoyed by families.Although it is also considered as one of the most common crab fish, I still enjoy the semi-thick, sweet and savoury tomato and chilli based sauce which you can dip the hot piping deep fried mantou into. OR (a personal tip) spread it on the crisp prata found at the buffet spread. Chilli crab and prata? Woohoo!Sumptuous Crab Buffet at ParkRoyal on Beach Road is from 5 July to 31 August 2012. Price for Buffet Dinner: Mondays to Thursdays (Adult S$52++, Child S$31++), Fridays to Sundays (Adult S$55++, Child S$33++).Plaza Brasserie
7500A Beach Road, Park Royal on Beach Road (Nearest MRT Bugis), Tel: +65 6505 5710
Opening Hours: 6am – 12am DailyOther Related Entries
Mellben (Pasir Ris)
Chiso Zanmai (Clarke Quay Central)
Goodwood Park Coffee Lounge (Scotts Road)
Imperial Treasure Steamboat Restaurant (TripleOne Somerset)
10 at Claymore (Pan Pacific Orchard)
2012-07-06 00:00:00
House of Rice Roll & Porridge – Durian Chee Cheong Fun, Dare To Try?
You know the season of durian is here again, with durian-fanatics rattling off their favourite haunts for Mao Shan Wang, Sultan, Phoenix and D24 at Geylang and Balestier; while the tais tais savour their durian puffs at Goodwood Park.How about some Durian Chee Cheong Fun? Yikes!The two is like forbidden love, as if Hong Konger Maggie Cheung falls in love with Singaporean Mark Lee. So wrong right?Chee Cheong Fun is the Cantonese dim sum dish known as steamed rice roll, called chee cheong because it resembles the small intestine of a pig. Durian is the spikey ugly fruit with the indescribable smell.The House of Rice Roll & Porridge has moved from a few shops down from 75 to 89 Killiney Road, and I think business has been affected by the shift. (This is irrelevant but 75’s feng shui is kind of bad with Sun Coffee Planet closing soon after, and Big Bank Café struggling to get more business.)This shop sells the Hong Kong style chee cheong fun, with fillings of unusual lobster ($12.80 wah), tom yum ($8.80), abalone ($7.20), unagi ($6.20) to the more familiar chicken ($4.20) and char siew ($4.20).The savoury selections are generally try-able, and fans would like its silky slippery skin, generous fillings with the winning Hoisin dark sauce.The fruit versions come with strawberries, bananas, apples, mango (all $4.00), and durians ($5.20) – mostly served chilled sprinkled with sugared peanuts. You either love or hate this, it’s either too strange or works well for you.Don’t worry, it is not smelly, though I must say that standard of the durian cheong fun has dropped over the years. It used to come much colder with fleshier fruit which was more ‘shiok’. And the durian meat quite quite ordinary – not top grade.If durian rice roll is not your cup of tea, the yam cheong fun ($4.00) is a delicious carb-loaded alternative. If not, stick to the safer century egg pork congee ($4.50). That’s not bad lah.House of Rice Roll & Porridge
89 Killiney Road Singapore 239534 (10 min walk from Somerset MRT)
Opening Hours: 10:30am-10:00pm (Mon-Fri), 8:30am-10:00pm (Sat-Sun)Other Related Entries
Goodwood Park Coffee Lounge (Scotts Road)
88 Congee (Toa Payoh Lor 1)
Zhen Zhen Porridge (Maxwell Food Centre)
Tip Top The Puff Factory
Pizza & Empanadas (Tanglin Halt)
2012-07-05 00:00:00
The Tea Party Café – Budget Lunch at the CBD for Office Ladies
Hearing the name “Tea Party Café” alone would remind me of a cosy café with cupcakes and little porcelain cups, with a whimsical feel somewhat like the Mad Tea Party in Alice in Wonderland.The Tea Party Cafe at China Square somewhat almost has the feel – apple green painted walls with black and white book motifs and flowers as decoration.When I asked for food recommendations, I was kind of surprised I did not hear the words “tea” or “cakes”. Instead, pasta, soups, pizzas, burgers, and iced milk make up a bulk of its menu.Co-owner Felicia Wong was very straight forward in telling me that their target crowd is the office aunties and office ladies (OA & OL), who would want to dine in comfort, and not want to fight with the crowds at the food court and Golden Shoe hawker centre. Therefore the offerings are more extensive, stretching all the way from breakfast to dinner all at budget prices.How affordable?Here’s how cheap it can be – an Aglio Olio with soup at $4.90! No service charge! No GST! I would say a very rare find at inflation high, CBD area of Singapore. OA & OL, you all know where to head off for lunch now, yes?I had the Prawn and Shroom Aglio ($5.90) which came with French Onion soup that you can scoop free flow from a corner of the shop.  One reviewer said this “probably one of the best French Onion soups I've ever tasted”. Either we had different soups, or he did not have many French onion soups ever.It was too ‘Asian’, and felt like this would be what a Chinese mum would have cooked out of an internet recipe. The pasta was all right for its price though.I liked the marinate of the grilled Pork Chops ($13.00), which comes with mash and mixed green. There is a slight soy and again ‘Asian’ taste, but I did not quite mind it here – sorts of reminds me of what a very Hainanese restaurant like Hans would serve. A pity the meat was a tad too tough, and I suspect many office executives have very discerning tastebuds.My suggestion for The Tea Party Café would be to work on its cakes and muffins. After all, the OA & OLs always crave for a sweet treat after lunch.  I know them.The Tea Party Café, China Square Central
3 Pickering Street, #01-27, Singapore 048660 (Raffles Place MRT) Tel: +6536 5667
Branches at Sixth Avenue and Singapore Management University (SMU)
Opening Hours: 8:00am – 10:00pm (Mon-Sat)Other Related Entries
The Rotisserie (China Square Food Centre)
BigBank Café (Killiney Road)
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Cine Café (Shaw House)
Talent Café (Tanjong Pagar)
2012-07-03 00:00:00
Join The #CookForFamily Initiative – Be part of the 100 Bloggers to make that difference!
The following is an invite to all bloggers.Dear fellow Bloggers,This is Daniel from Daniel’s Food Diary, and I have started a little bloggers’ initiative called #CookForFamily.Most would agree that eating together with the family brings indescribable joy, along with bonding, quality time together and better relationships. And as what most moms would say, “Home-cooked food is always healthier”. However, many have moved from cooking and eating together at home, to eating out because we are just too busy.The #CookForFamily is a bloggers-for-bloggers initiative. No competition, sponsors, or hidden agenda involved. It is created with a simple objective of getting more bloggers, and hopefully their fans and followers, to start cooking and bonding with their families.How #CookForFamily Works
Here are some simple steps:
- Pick any day in July to cook a meal for a single member of your family, entire family or loved ones.
- The meal does not have to be anything fanciful, as long as it is cooked from the heart.
- Remember to take photos of your cooking.
- Blog about your cooking, the experience, your thoughts, what your family thinks of your cooking, and encourage others to #CookForFamily too.
- Publish the blog entry on 6th August Monday to generate more online hype.
- Hash-tag the different social media channels (eg twitter, instagram) with #CookForFamilyBe Part of #CookForFamily
When bloggers unite, we can make a difference – and I hope to gather 100 bloggers to be part of this simple initiative.Bloggers Already Participating in #CookForFamily – Thank You Very Much!
365days2play (Dawn Huang), A Juggling Mom (Susan) A&W Couple’s Blog (Abbey & Will), Acquisition of Taste (Andy and Ashley), AiMakan (Hazel Tay), Alvinology (Alvin Lim), AromaCookery (Julia Khoo), AspirantSG (Wee Heng), Calvin Timo , Celestial Delish (Celes Fernandez), Cheekiemonkie (Kelvin), Chrispytine (Christine) , Cooksnapeatlove (Jacob Leong), Cuisine Paradise (Ellena Guan), Daniel’s Food Diary (Daniel Ang), Danny Love To Eat (Danny Tan), Darren Bloggie, Delicious Soup Recipes (Dominique Goh), Fighting Fires & Baking Buns, Flora Yeo, Food.Recentrunes (Ivan Ng), Foodie Ah, Foodie’s Kitchen, Foodoshoot (Charlene Chew), Gourmetestorie (Justin Daniel Pereira). Gninethree (Charleen), HazelNutLife (Hazel Lam), HisFoodBlog (Rayner Ng), iisjong (Joey Ong), J Babies Dad (Isaiah), Jessie Food Trip (Ong Meng Ching),  Keropokman (Philip Lim), Le Petit Connoisseur (Stargirl), Lobster Paints (Shi Ting), Lovin Greens (Huiyuan), Mamawearpapashirt (June), Melicacy (Melissa Koh), Memoirs Of Food (Daniel Hung), MissyGlutton, MoonBerry (Irene), Ms SkinnyFat (Cheryl Ng), Mummy Blogs (Sandra Tan), Raising Rock Star, RubbishEatRubbishGrow (Nathanael Ho), Rynaque, Seng Kang Babies (Andy), Slurp (Jason), Story of Bing (Karen Lim), Superfinefeline (Karen), Teru2xBozu Goes Hungry, The Dining Table (Javan), The Dirty Stall, The Gingerbread Mum (Adora Tan), The Square Box (Jenn Lim), You Got Me Blogging (Razlan), Yumyumformytumtum (Peter Oh)If you are interested in joining, leave me an email (DanielFoodDiary@gmail.com) or a comment below with your email saying “Yes, I Want To Cook For My Family!”
2012-07-03 00:00:00
Yayoiken – Probably The Most Affordable Japanese Restaurant Meal In Singapore
Let’s first talk about the history of “Yayoiken”, started more than 125 years ago as a Western food restaurant in Kaybacho Tokyo. That was when Western cuisine was still considered rare in Japan, it is no surprise that they successfully developed a chain with 190 restaurants in Japan alone.For Yayoiken’s menu, you would find hamburger steaks, grilled mackerel, pork cutlets, beef steak and mixed grills – food more Western in flavours. Personally, I love the Japanese take on Western food, such as pasta, as they are usually lighter and more delicate.Yayoiken has just opened its 2nd branch at Bugis+ (former Iluma), and has easily the longest F&B queue in the entire mall. What’s the appeal?It is really affordable for a Japanese restaurant standard. A Buta Shogayaki, Saba miso or Oyako don set can cost only $9.90. So that’s stir fried sliced pork, with Japanese rice, miso, salad and tofu costing slightly more than $10 after taxes.The greedy-me wanted an all-in-one set. So that’s the Mixed Toji set ($13.90) with sliced beef, fried prawn, AND pork cutlet with egg served Oyako don style ALL in a single bowl. Oh, this is also called a ‘donburi’ where the parent (chicken) and child (egg) is served in the same dish.I liked almost every ingredient there, especially the rice which is so fragrant and high-quality. A pity that the pork cutlet was slightly tough, otherwise it would have been perfect.In Japan, they have a traditional culinary term called "ichijū-sansai", which means having three sides and with one soup. The food is not top-notch, but Yayoiken is probably one of the most affordable Japanese restaurant in Singapore where you can get meat, vegetables and rice all in one meal. Recommended.Yayoiken
201 Victoria Street, #01-02 Bugis+ (formerly Iluma), Singapore (Bugis MRT) Tel:+65 6636 5448
First branch at Liang Court Basement
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pmOther Related Entries
CoCo ICHIBANYA (313 Somerset)
Dulcet & Studio (Liang Court)
Tonkatsu (Mandarin Gallery)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
Saizeriya Ristorante (Liang Court)
2012-07-02 00:00:00
ShareTea – Launching 18 Hot Milk Teas
The bubbletea craze in Singapore seems to have lasted longer that the last one a decade ago, and seems to be staying for quite a while more. The way to stay ahead is really variey and innovation, and therefore Share Tea has launched 18 hot milk teas and will be introducing a new cream series very soon.Indeed, the Handmade Taro Fresh Milk ($5.40) is the next best thing I have tried at ShareTea, other than the original classic milk bubble tea. Loved that it is not overly sweet or thick, and that it has bite-sized yam bits to ‘play’ with while drinking.Daniel's Food Diary speaks to Ms Hong Ke Jia, owner of ShareTea Singapore to share her bubbletea experiences.Why did you decide to bring ShareTea to Singapore?
In May 2010, one of our shareholders came across ShareTea in Hongkong and decided to give it a try as she was intrigued by the long queue at the outlet. She ordered the Red Bean Milk Tea and was won over by the taste.After her memorable experience, we decided to do a market research on ShareTea and we discovered that the brand was in more than one way different from the bubble teas we know.The bubbletea competition in Singapore is tough. There is Koi,  Gong Cha, A-Gan Tea, Artease Café and many brands. How is ShareTea different from other brands then?
For example, ShareTea offers a fresh fruit tea series using fresh fruit juices. The juices are first frozen below 40 degree Celsius before being exported to various countries. They are later defrosted at the outlets prior to use so consumers are assured of authenticity and quality.Using real fruit juice in bubble teas is uncommon in Singapore’s market as fruit concentrate or syrups are often added as an alternative because it may cost less and is easier to obtain.ShareTea sells many types of drinks, over 50 items in the menu – the classic Taiwanese bubble tea, Yakult drink, fruit teas, fresh milk and a filling QQ Happy Family Tea with six different toppings all in one cup. What is your personal favourite flavour?
That’s a tough question, the list can get really long!My latest favourite is our Winter Melon Series, specifically Wintermelon Lime and Wintermelon with Sea Salt Crème, which will be launched in the month of July.And I understand that you also concoct special beverages for organisations. That’s quite unheard of in the bubbletea world. 
That is for SAFRA’s 40th anniversary which got me totally hooked. It is a blend of strawberry and lime. The strawberry red colour of the drink symbolises SAFRA’s 40 sweet Ruby years, while the slight tartness from the lime gives the drink a refreshing after taste.What is the top selling bubbletea flavour in Singapore?
ShareTea’s bestselling beverages from the milk tea range include the Pearl Milk Tea and Homemade Pudding Milk Tea. Most consumers tend to opt for milk teas as they seek familiar flavours.How about the non-milk tea series? 
The Aloha Fruit Tea, Ume Plum Fruit Tea and Honey Aloe Vera make up the top 3 spots.Tell us something about the differences between the ShareTea bubble tea in Singapore and Taiwan.
The R&D team is dedicated to conjuring localised concoctions that suit Singaporeans’ palate and lifestyle. One of our latest beverage additions includes the “No-Tea” (Non-Caffeinated) series which we designed for young children and pregnant ladies who may want to avoid caffeine. With these efforts, bubble tea enthusiasts can definitely look forward to more exclusive and exciting drinks to come.ShareTea Giveaway [Contest Ended]!
To celebrate the opening of three new outlets at Great World City, Jurong Point and JCube, ShareTea would be giving away 3 sets of $20 vouchers to 3 lucky Daniel’s Food Diary readers.All you need to do is to *likes* the FaceBook pages of Daniel’s Food Diary AND Share this post on Facebook or Retweet this post.Leave a comment below to say you have done so. Results will be announced next Mon 9 July 2012. Contest winners must be addressees of Singapore to facilitate postage.Other Related Entries
Share Tea (Wisma)
The Battle of the Bubble Teas
HK Gong Cha v SG Gong Cha
Koi Bubbletea (Toa Payoh)
Woobbee (Tanjong Pagar)
2012-06-29 00:00:00
Pies & Coffee – The First Gourmet Pie Café in Singapore
This café selling mainly gourmet pies is probably the first of its kind in Singapore, recently opened at the unexplored Rochester Mall.  I was initially skeptical, but were excited when I heard its offerings – Wagyu beef cheek, duck confit, lamb shank and intriguing laksa shepherd pies.This stylish 80-seater café is relatively huge, spreading over 3000 square feet (and I was wondering, how to make money like that?). You can choose to enjoy relaxing alfresco dining outside where there is a water feature and lots of greenery.The laksa shepherd pie ($8.95) sounds like a risky experiment, but it manages to reach the right balance of being creamy-salty and laksa-spicy at the same time. While most other pies have mushed–up fillings, you can still savour pieces of fish, prawns and squid for their version which gives a better bite.Full Post at InSing.com – Pies & Coffee opens at Rochester MallPies & Coffee
35 Rochester Drive, #01-02 Rochester Mall, Singapore 138639 (10 min walk from Buona Vista MRT) Tel: +65 6570 0080
Opening Hours: 9am – 11pm dailyOther Related Entries
7 KICKstart BREWiches (Armenian Place)
Drips Bakery Café (Tiong Poh Road)
Joe & Dough (Suntec)
Blackbird Café (Handy Road)
Cine Café (Shaw House)
2012-06-28 00:00:00
Dulcet & Studio – New Japanese Lifestyle Café, a Little Piece of Heaven
While Liang Court has long lost its former edge of glory over the years, it still remains as the representative Japanese mall with tenants Meidi-ya, Kinokuniya, Marutama, Saizeriya Ristorante and Tampopo holding the business together (anybody remembers Daimaru?). There is another reason to pay them a visit – Dulcet & Studio.Dulcet & Studio is a whole new lifestyle café, with a contemporary yet cosy vibes – think Muji in a restaurant form. The name ‘Dulcet’ means sweet to the taste, while ‘Studio’ is the other part of the café where customers can sign up for cooking classes.I am already quite excited as I am all of a modern Japanese café, something that is quite lacking in Singapore. The vibes are good too, and having soups served in little cups is just so wonderfully Japanese.Expect a mixture of Western meets Japanese cuisine including specialty pasta, lamb rice, beef spare rib stew, fish & chip. Lunch and dinner sets are served at a very reasonable price of below $15 and $20 respectively.All of their specialty pasta is imported from Hokkaido, which means that the noodles are more chewy and flavourful. I had the signature item – the Dulcet Special’s Seafood Black Ink Tagliolini Pasta ($14.80). It did take a little while to get used to the chewier texture. Though flavours are definitely a lot lighter than its Italian counterpart, this did not wow me.I much preferred the Black Pig Bolognese Fettuccine Pasta ($12.80) which reminds me of tomato based bak chor mee pok. The meat sauce is salty-sweet, and ladies would appreciate this as it does not leave you overwhelmed or over-full for lunch.Really, you would save your tummy space for desserts, where the cream puffs, chiffon cakes and tarts would leave you holding your breaths. If there is only room for one cake, go for the Scoop cake – essentially a fruit cake very soft and fluffy, which my friend Karen described as “a little piece of heaven”.The desserts come from downstairs Tampopo Deli, and yes, they belong to the same parent company which first brought you black pig ramen in Singapore.Dulcet & Studio
177 River Valley Road #01-41/42 Liang Court Singapore 179030
Opening Hours: 10:00am – 10:00pmOther Related Entries
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
Saizeriya Ristorante (Liang Court)
Shabu 29 (Clarke Quay Central)
Marutama Ra-Men (Liang Court)
Box n Sticks (Arab Street)
2012-06-27 00:00:00
Wee Nam Kee – Mr Wee Reveals The Secret To Its Chicken Rice Formula
Wee Nam Kee has been known for its Hainanese dishes, especially its flavourful chicken rice and tender chicken meat pieces. Its main store opposite Novena Church has been attracting crowds of supporters, many claim that this is the best Hainanese chicken rice n Singapore.Since 1989, the two generations of Wees have proudly preserve the heritage and recipes refined over the years. To my surprise, I found out that founder Mr Wee Toon Oout does not cook at all. How did he discover his delicious chicken rice recipe? And why did Mr Wee wait for more than 20 years before he opened his 2nd branch?You first started out in the print and advertising industry. How did you end up selling chicken rice?
My first job was actually in the advertising line, and it got me exposure to F&B businesses big and small. When my friend wanted to let go of his chicken rice business, I thought it was good time to move into the industry.If I am not wrong, you do not have cooking experience at all. What gave you the courage and determination to sell food?
Well, even though I cannot cook at all, and I still can’t, I knew I am extremely good at discerning and tasting. I may not know how to cook, but I pay much detail in eating, and knew how to direct the cooks to prepare what I want.20 years ago, you hired Master Chef Loh to head the Wee Nam Kee kitchen. How did the two of you work together?
You must remember chefs and cooks are very sensitive artists themselves. I won’t dare to say I teach him – it’s not right. But we experiment together – add a bit of salt, add a little less of that – and we came up with this present formula, along with the sauces.What is the secret to Wee Nam Kee’s success? 
Never put profits as your Number 1 priority. I take on a ‘motherhood’ mentality. You see, a mother will never cook lousy food for her children. If we put our heart and passion into our cooking, the customers will feel it.Wee Nam Kee has been around for 23 years. How has it evolved or changed over the last 2 decades?
Our chicken recipe has always been changing. Other than the chefs’ feedback, I keep asking customers how we can improve. Rather than say this is my formula, I prefer to say the recipe belongs to our loyal customers.Your hawker stall eventually become a family restaurant serving up a broad range of Nanyang-inspired dishes which include Curry Fish Head, Cereal Prawns, Crispy Roast Pork, Deep Fried Tou Fu, Stir fried Baby Kai Lan and other local favorites? Why did you diversify? 
I realised many customers often brought their entire families to eat our chicken rice. As a businessman, I felt something was missing – it did not feel like the families were having proper dinners. Therefore, I worked with the chefs to create an entire menu suitable for families.Talking about diversification, you waited for more than 2 decades before you opened your 2nd store. Why did you not join the footsteps of other chicken shops such as Boon Tong Kee, Loy Kee and 5 Star earlier? 
It is very difficult to maintain consistency if you open too many branches. I do not want customers to say my chicken rice from another branch tastes different.  Of course I am glad my son was willing to take over the business. After all, he is a overseas university graduate, and I never expected him to step forward.I am curious, since you are a Mr Huang 黄, why did you call your shop “Wei Nan Ji 威南记” in Chinese?
I wanted to call it Huang Nan Ji 黄南记, but it just sounds strange. ‘Wei 威’ is the same as ‘wei feng 威风’ (prestige), which sounds more magnificent.Mr Wee Sr. was clear in his pursuit of relentless innovation as a formula for success. From the early days, he constantly challenged his cooks to incorporate customer feedback into their often very personal approaches to cooking. Listening to the customer literally means that Wee Nam Kee’s secret to the chicken rice is his customer’s “recipes”.Up to this very day, you can still see him at the Novena shop, watching the customers as they eat. He says that that is the most direct feedback he can get. So when he saw that the customers did not finish a particular dish, he might taste it himself and then tell his cooks to work on it!What I learnt from him is, even though he knew that he had his weaknesses, he knew he could rely on good friends, co-workers and customers. His secret is there is never a perfect formula – you just have to keep improving. Perhaps a reminder to ourselves to always stay humble with a learning heart.Wee Nam Kee Hainanese Chicken Rice Restaurant
275 Thomson Road #01-05 Novena Ville, Singapore 307645 (opposite Novena Church and Novena MRT), Telephone: +65 6255 6396
Opening Hours: 10:30am – 12:00am DailyOther Locations:  Marina Square, Parkway Parade, 112 Katong, and Philippines – Ayala Triangle Gardens, Serendra, Alabang Town CenterOther Related Entries
Tian Tian vs Ah Tai (Maxwell)
Loy Kee Chicken Rice (Balestier)
Beach Road Scissor Cut Curry Rice (Jalan Besar)
Sin Kee Chicken Rice (Margaret Drive)
Golden Mile Claypot Rice (Golden Mile)
2012-06-26 00:00:00
Amber – The Best Restaurant in Hong Kong, Number 44 in the World
[Hong Kong] Two-star Michelin restaurant Amber is ranked Number 44 restaurant in the world, alongside with other Hong Kong entries Bo Innovation (52), Caprice (54), Lung King Heen (93). This makes Amber the top ranking restaurant in Hong Kong, and the best.This being my first try at a San Pellegrino World’s Top 100 restaurant, everything from the reservation to the good-bye was top-notch.I tried to reserve via email on a Sunday night, and was surprised to get a reply (and non-automated) within 30 minutes. Special requests were also made promptly, and if there was a smile in the email, I could feel it.Located at Landmark Mandarin Oriental near Central, Amber is at the perfect blend of the produces from East and cooking techniques from the West. Chef Richard Ekkebus, Dutch-born and French-trained, loves a light touch to his cooking, with great emphasis placed on creative beautiful presentations.I was already deeply impressed at the starter. The white asparagus veloute was unbelievably startling delicious. Egg foam, nutmeg Serrano ham and parsley blanketed the top layer, and upon sipping further, the soup beneath turned into an explosion of tastes with smooth texture.Without trying to exaggerate too much, I am starting to suspect that even ‘delicious’ is not enough to describe the sensational taste.  The main course – a wagyu beef tongue & cheek, with gratinated macaroni with beaufort silver beet, button mushroom and red wine reduction, was a melt-in-your-mouth meat while you can still savour the classic taste of the beef.Fish is delivered fresh everyday straight from the famed Tsukiji fish market in Tokyo to Hong Kong’s Amber, mainly prepared in a light and traditional French flavour. The seared line caught John Dory with Dungeness crab risotto as a base, while not as extraordinary, is elegantly simple.As if I am not impressed enough, the dessert which is Williams Pear and rum soaked raisin, baked as a crumfoutis (a French buttered dessert) served with cinnamon ice-cream is an aesthetic spectacle with subtlety sweet taste. If there is an award for best dessert I had this year, this would be it.Amber is truly in a different league of restaurants, and provides a superb dining experience. The set lunch menu I had, with 3 courses and illy coffee or jing tea at HK$518+ (SGD$86 / USD$67) makes it one of the most affordable choices in the Top 50 list. They even provided a complimentary Petit Four, all with smiles and indepth introduction. Thank you to the entire team at Amber for making this meal such a wonderfully memorable experience.Amber
15 Queen’s Road, The Landmark Mandarin Oriental, The Landmark, Central, Hong Kong, Tel: +852 2132 0066
Opening Hours: 7:00 am – 10:30 am, 12:00 pm – 2:30 pm, 6:30 pm – 10:30 pm DailyOther Related Entries
Ho Hung Kee (Hong Kong)
Mak’s vs Tsim (Hong Kong)
Must Try Hong Kong Drinks
More Must Try Food at Hong Kong
Must Try Food at Hong Kong
2012-06-25 00:00:00
Tsukiji Honten – Cheapest and Best Conveyor Belt Sushi at Shibuya Japan
[Tokyo, Japan] A trip to Japan is not complete without trying out one of its Kaiten-zushi, a sushi restaurant where plates or sushi are placed on a rotating conveyor belt. Some call this the sushi train.The benefits: You do not need to speak a single Japanese to know and see what you want to order. And the final bill is based on the number and types of plates consumed (usually each colour would represent a different price.) You don’t even need to go through the embarrassment or acting like animals to indicate a certain meat.If you are at Tokyo and do not know where to start, make your way to Tsukiji Honten 回転寿司 築地本店 which is walking distance from Shibuya Station. This is one of the most popular conveyor belt sushi restaurants amongst tourists, expatriates and Japanese youths.At a price of 120 yen per plate (that’s SGD$1.90 or US$1.50), the sushi is really cheap, for Japanese standard.Avoid peak hours unless you are prepared to wait. As it is really crowded at Tsukiji Honten, there are 4 rules you have to obey:Number 1: Each person should at least eat 7 plates of sushi
Number 2: Do not spend more than 30 minutes dining
Number 3: If you come in group of 4 and above, you may need to split up
Number 4: Do not wait for others inside the storeYou may find 7 plates of sushi a little overwhelming, but you should be able to finish them, in good time.As the fish comes directly from the famous Tsukiji fish market, you can be assured of freshness and quality. Plus, the experienced chefs would be making the sushi right in front of your eyes, pressing the rice into shape in quick time – a visual spectacle.After which, you can always make your way from Shibuya, Japan’s main fashion centre and happening nightlife area.Tsukiji Honten Conveyor Belt Sushi (Shibuya) 回転寿司 築地本店（渋谷）
Address: 24-8 Udagawa-cho, Shibuya, Tokyo Tel: 03 3464 1178
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 11:00pmDirections: Shibuya Stn. 2min. From Hachiko Exit, head right and cross the road toward QFRONT. Enter the road to the left, walk straight and turn into the second road on the right. Tsukiji will be on the right.
JR, Toyoko, Inokashira, subway Line(s)
24-8 Udagawacho, Shibuya-ku, Tokyo 150-0042Other Related Entries
Sugamo Konaya (Tokyo)
Itacho Sushi (Plaza Singapura)
Sushi Express (City Link Mall)
Sushi Tei (Ngee Ann City)
Tsukiji Gindaco (Ion Orchard)
2012-06-22 00:00:00
Fan Play Savouries – Savour Authentic Ipoh Chee Cheong Fun in Singapore
Ipoh in Malaysia is famous for so many dishes, for which Hor Fun and Chee Cheong Fun comes immediately to mind. Both are flat rice noodle dishes, so white, smooth and silky. Somehow the texture of rice noodles from other places is just not as good as Ipoh’s.The residents of Ipoh would proudly claim that karst limestone mountain water which is clear, clean and full of minerals, is the reason why rice noodles and vegetables are just so different from anywhere else.
Indeed Malaysian Robert Goh is brave enough to bring in the Chee Cheong Fun freshly straight from Ipoh to sell it here. He trusts his products.I cannot exactly comprehend why of all places, he would choose to open his shop at the far end of Carrefour Deli, even though the stall does get a crowd from New Creation Church during Sundays. Somehow a coffeeshop stall or food kiosk may make more sense.Frankly speaking, I did not expect much initially. After all, the Deli is where I buy cold sushi and roast chicken. But when I took my first taste on the Cheong Fan with Sichuan Gongpao Sauce ($2.50), I knew that Robert meant business. It was seriously so smooth the rice noodles slipped down the throat, and indeed the texture was slippery.The Cheong Fan with Curry Sauce ($2.50) and Laksa ($3.90 with 3 add-on ingredients) are experimental moves, tweaked to suit the local Singaporean palates.  The gravies though creative, did not blend in with the Cheong Fan that well, and I would suggest thinner and more sauces.When in doubt, go for the Original Authentic Ipoh Cheong Fan with Savoury Brown Sauce with a Fish & Pork meat wrapped in Beancurd Skin ($3.00 with 1 add-on), the later an innovative take on the Fuzhou fish ball.Fan Play Savouries
Suntec City Mall, 3 Temasek Boulevard, Carrefour Level 1 Deli Section (Promenade MRT Station), Tel: +65 9021 1890
Opening Hours: 10:00am – 7:00pm DailyOther Related Entries
Malaysian Food Street (Resorts World Sentosa)
Mien (Bukit Timah)
Pizza & Empanadas (Tanglin Halt)
Tip Top The Puff Factory
Eat May Know (Bendemeer)
2012-06-21 00:00:00
Keisuke Tonkotsu King – Truly the King of the Japanese Ramen Broth
Keisuke Tonkotsu King  – 3 words.First word, creator ‘Keisuke’ Takeda was selected as the top ramen chef in Japan in the Ramen Champion Series which gathered over 30,000 ramen chefs.Second word, ‘Tonkotsu’ represents one of the most popular ramen broth form, cooked with pork marrow bones and fat for hours till it is milky white and thick.Third word, Keisuke Tokyo Ramen was crowned the ‘king’ with the the title of Ramen Champion at Tokyo Ramen Championship 2011 in Japan.Do you know that there are two Keisuke shops in Singapore – Keisuke Tokyo Ramen at Millenia Walk and Keisuke Tonkotsu King at Orchid Hotel?Keisuke Takeda is precisely known for his creation of very unusual soup bases cooked with prawns and crabs, not the usual classic soup bases like shio, miso or shoyu. Ironically, Keisuke Ramen in Singapore which initially started selling only the very unique prawn based flavour, switched to selling the usual after customers’ feedback.Keisuke Tonkotsu King, the little ramen shop at Tanjong Pagar, goes back to the basics.There is always a queue here, for the reasons that the ramen is really quite authentically delicious, and the shop can only sit about twenty.You can choose between the basic Tonkotsu Ramen ($10.80), Black Spicy ($11.80) or Red Spicy ($11.80). I would suggest a Tonkotsu Ramen Special All Toppings ($14.80), and you can also indicate if you want your soup to be light, normal or strong.While I may have preferred the noodles over at Ippudo or Marutama, the char siew at Santouka, and the tamago at Miharu, the Tonkotsu soup at Keisuke is the best – thick, milky, tasteful, flavoursome and slightly salty. I finished till the last drop. The soup wins, hands down (you may still argue it is too salty).Plus, there is free beansprouts and eggs! The free eggs are not the soft yolk kind, but still can see my neighbouring table busy eating all the egg white.Loved the very traditional cosy ambience with retro posters pasted all around, and excellent service from the Japanese staff. My only complaint: they don’t accept NETs or cards, so you better come with extra cash.I would rank Keisuke Tonkotsu King the King of the Japanese Ramen Broth. How about you? Which ramen broth beats this soup in Singapore?Keisuke Tonkatsu King
1 Tras Link, #01-19 Orchid Hotel, Singapore (5 min from Tanjong Pagar MRT), Tel: +65 6636 0855
Opening Hours: 11:30am-3pm, 6pm-10:30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Keisuke Tonkotsu King Four Seasons (Bugis Village)
Ramen Keisuke Tori King (Amara Hotel)
Keisuke Ramen (Millenia Walk)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
Menya Sanji (Orchid Hotel, Tanjong Pagar)
2012-06-20 00:00:00
How On Earth Did A Food Blogger Become A Zumba Instructor?
Imagine this, in the afternoon you are at a food tasting session at a restaurant, savouring the best foods with arms holding a camera, almost burping at the sensational tastes. Right after that, you switch into your workout gear at the gym, dancing to the music with arms holding weights, and start instructing a Zumba class.I lead these two vastly different lives in a single afternoon. So how on earth did a food blogger become a Zumba Instructor?Zumba is the latest fitness craze in Singapore which is essentially a dynamic and exciting exercise session, which incorporates dance and exercise moves to Latin and international music.Many people took up the instructor course because it is really fun and effective in losing weight. The truth is, I signed up for it 5 years ago without knowing what it was. Yes, I just signed up. I am very fortunate to belong to the very first batch of instructors from Singapore taught by Zumba’s founder himself Beto Perez.Friends who know me over the years can vouch that dancing is the last thing that I can do. I DON’T and CAN’T dance. I don’t club. I have two left feet. When the university hall/college/school needed people to dance, they would pick anybody BUT Daniel Ang. The reason is obvious – I am the school nerd. I can’t dance.Huh? So how?During the course of the workshop, Beto would pick people on stage to dance with him. Everybody but me. I told myself then that this would be my personal challenge – that I would become a good Zumba instructor.Just to share, anybody can be certified to be a Zumba Instructor – you just need to go through a 3-day course. Similarly, anybody with a camera and basic writing skills can be a food blogger. But not anybody can be a good one, and I wanted to.Many of my peers became Zumba instructor straight away. It took me more than a year later as I knew I was not ready. I went for many many many many classes. And team taught with every instructor down the list, even with the most popular ones Michael Thomas and David Velez. Even though the comparison on stage would be startling, I had to learn from the best. Criticisms were plenty, but I knew I could learn from them.Of course there were many times I just wanted to give up.I remember what my dear friend Ruri told me, “Daniel, precisely because you can’t dance, if you show that you can do it on stage, the members below will believe they can do it too.”Five years later, I am teaching to extremely packed classes. Last I checked, there were more than 100 squeezed in a single studio. And it’s not like they didn’t have a choice. I guess they believed in me, and more importantly, in themselves.I think about my current students who have so much potential, but give themselves excuses of not accomplishing something. “I am not good enough. I know my limits. I have failed so many times.” And this is what I will tell them – You are good enough. You are underestimating your limits. The next time you will pass.For current Zumba instructors who may be going through my same struggles, here’s how I do it:
- Listen to the songs a thousand times. (I am not kidding when I say a thousand.)
- The best way to learn is from others.
- The class is never about yourself, it is about the people attending it.
- You are never good enough, because you can only be better.Every time I walk into a class, I still get a little dazzled by the pure number of people who are there to support what I am doing. I thank each and every one of you – and you will have my promise I would work responsibly hard.I am perhaps a living testimonial of this verse that I hold dearly to my heart, “My grace is sufficient for you, for my power is made perfect in weakness.”Other Related Entries
From “Ah Pui” to Choreographing the Great Singapore Workout 
What’s In A Food Blogger’s Bag?
How I Went from >75 to 
Daniel’s Food Diary is Being Nominated for Singapore Blog Awards Best Food Blog 2012
2012-06-19 00:00:00
10 at Claymore – Value-for-Money, All You Can Eat Beef Buffet
I love buffet, and I hate buffets. Love it for the variety, the opportunity to savour everything, but hate it for making me larger than usual, and the ugly mad rush to the buffet table.That’s why I kind of like the ala carte buffet concept where food is served to you. 10 at Claymore at Pan Pacific Orchard has the best of both world with its ‘Plates of Pleasure’ semi-buffet repertoire where you can enjoy international fare AND have food served to you where you order off the menu.And we are talking about premium beef from down under Australia here. Unlimited.How about some Gippsland Organic Angus Beef Tenderloin, Teppan-style Angus Beef Rib-Eye, and Slow Roasted Angus Beef Striploin? Or Grilled Lamb T-Bone and Braised Kurobuta Pork Belly, all served à la minute in elegantly plated tasting size portions.I emphasize again, this is unlimited. So you can have plates and plates of tenderloin to your beef’s content, or till the cows come home. But I actually suggest you to slowly savour bite by bite, because there is still a certain quality to the meats, not the usual buffet mass-cooked style.The Beef Tenderloin cooked medium-well, with a slight hint of pink, is cooked from organic free-range beef. And it was close to superb for being juicy, soft and tender – highly satisfying.Something with an Asian twist is an 8-Hours Braised Kurobuta Belly, served smacked between steamed mantou, giving ‘kong bak pau’ a new high-class dimension.Did I mention that there is ALSO a buffet spread of hearty bistro favourites, live station specialties and divine desserts? People were piling Boston Lobsters and Freshly Shucked Oysters from France, Ireland and the USA like nobody’s business.The ‘Pleasure of Oz’ Australian-theme buffet promotion is available from 4 June 2012 until 31 July 2012 with prices at S$55++ (dinner) and S$58++ (Sunday brunch).10 at Claymore
10 Claymore Road, Lobby Level, Pan Pacific Orchard (10 min walk from Orchard MRT), Tel: +6831 6686
Opening Hours: 12:00-2:30pm, 6:30-10:00pm DailyOther Related Entries
Chiso Zanmai (Clarke Quay Central)
Carousel (Royal Plaza on Scotts)
Plaza Brasserie (Park Royal Hotel)
Minoriya (Tanjong Katong)
Cocotte (Wunderlust Hotel)
2012-06-18 00:00:00
Alfero Gelato – Snow White Gelato Is The Fairest Of Them All
The taxi driver wondered why I would cab all the way to MacPherson Lane, “You mean you came all the way here just to eat ice cream??”I did. Upon reaching, the rather ulu Alfero Gelato was not easy to find – somewhere in the middle of some old housing estate next to a green field, though the district was rustic, peaceful and beyond charming.There is another branch of Alfero Artisan Gelato at a more convenient Marina Square, but MacPherson is where I can find the man himself – Marco Alfero. Since I am a fan of his gelato and described the texture as “creamy, rich, thick, smooth, heavenly”, I had meet its creator.Marco, how long have you been in Singapore for? 
I came from my hometown in Turin Italy since October 2009. I have been in Singapore for almost 3 years.Were you in the ice cream business all along in Italy?
No, I was a finance manager in the semiconductor industry for more than 10 years.I hear you enrolled into an ice cream university. Did you get a Bachelor of Ice Cream or something? 
Haha, it was a certification programme with the famous Carpigiani Gelato University. They also produced the ice cream machine that I am using here.Very smart of them. They sell machines to their students! How is your Italian gelato different from the usual ice cream? 
Alfero Gelato contains only 2-9% fat, as compared to 18-30% fat in normal ice cream. Also, we use only the freshest ingredients – fresh milk, egg yolks, real fruits and nuts from Italy. Have you tried other gelatos in Singapore?Of course, I am a fan of ice cream. But I feel they tend to be a little on the sweet side.
Yes, I have realised Singaporeans do not like overly intense and sweet things. That’s why I modified the recipe so that is less sweet.Posing with the Italian ‘Godfather’Yours is the first cafe in Singapore to store your gelato in covered pozzettos containers.
Yes, so that air and light do not affect the quality of the product. Customers used to wonder what I sell. Singaporeans are very visual people, and business was affected initially until they found out.Any thoughts of opening a 3rd branch? 
Yes, I am looking for a shop space now, probably by the end of this year.I told Marco I almost tried every flavour available already, my favourites being the nuttier Bacio (kiss), Nocciola (hazelnut) and pistachio. Its turns out he just created two new flavours – the Snow White (Milk) and Tiramisu ($6.50 for a 2 flavour cup).The Classic Tiramisu made with coffee, Marsala wine and Mascarpone cheese felt almost like I was eating the Tiramisu cake, only better because it was cold and creamy. While the Snow White felt a tad sweet initially, the simplicity of its flavour grew in me and you could appreciate the texture of the gelato on its own – truly the fairest of them all.Alfero Artisan Gelato (Macpherson)
81 Macpherson Lane #01-37 Singapore (10-12 min walk from Tai Seng MRT) , Tel: +65 6848 4269
Opening Hours: 12pm – 9pm (Tues – Sat), 12pm – 6pm (Sun), Closed on MonOther Related Entries
Alfero Artisan Gelato (Marina Square)
Ci Gusta! (Anchorpoint)
Cold Stone Creamery (Orchard Central)
Island Creamery (Serene Centre)
Udders (Thomson Road)
2012-06-16 00:00:00
Chocolate Origin – Chocolate Love at First Bite
Chocolate Origin has been known for its extremely chocolate cakes, and they have only 3 products in its shop – The original chocolate, dark and lava cake. This reminds me when Awfully Chocolate started out selling just chocolate cakes as well.While they have been dishing out chocolate goodness in Changi Village (who can be very far for many) – the good news is they have opened a new branch at 313 Somerset.They do not sell by the slice, the smallest size being a 6 inch cake ($29) which can serve about 6 persons.When my friends and I first savoured their original cake, it is what we call “chocolate love at first bite”. The chocolate literally melted in the mouth, bursting with such sensation that we almost went on a ‘chocolate coma’. Probably the best chocolate cake in Singapore.Full Post at InSing.com – Chocolate Origin opens at 313@SomersetChocolate Origin
313 Orchard Road, #B3-10A 313 @ Somerset (Somerset MRT) Singapore
Opening Hours: 10am – 9:30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Le Chocolat Café (Ann Siang Road)
Obolo Galeria (Rochester Mall)
Twelve Cupcakes (Millenia Walk)
3 Inch Sin (Millenia Walk)
Drips Bakery Café (Tiong Poh Road)
2012-06-15 00:00:00
Brunetti Melbourne – The Cafe of Italian Desserts. How Does It Compare To Singapore’s?
[Melbourne, Australia] Some say a visit to Melbourne is not complete without a trip to Brunetti – the Italian café famed for its cakes, gelatos, chocolates, crepes and coffees. You may say there is already a Brunetti at Singapore’s Tanglin Mall, but trust me, they are really quite different.While there are branches in Melbourne’s City Square, Camberwell, Fitzroy and Myer, the one to visit is at the iconic Carlton near Lygon Street, one of its most original locations.The moment I stepped in, I went “wah-wah-mamma-mia”, and was immediately greeted by the high and mighty Profiterole right at the display, along with other mouth-watering desirable cakes that makes you go “Dear Profiterole, I want to savour you!”The café is spacious and grand, like a supermarket, just that all your products are uncountable desserts and gelatos. I went up and down, not knowing even where to start. It was buzzing with energy and crowds – and spotted nuns lost in their desserts.On one side is the Paninoteca savoury selection selling Italian savouries including panini, focaccia, bruschetta, fresh salads, savoury croissants and crepes, flat savouries, and pizza a taglio.The food, such as my Lasagna and Insalata Di Proscuitto (AUD$13.90) wild rocket salad is decent, but I think you would have much wider and authentic options at “The Italian” Lygon Street just steps away.Just how much better are the cakes at Melbourne’s Brunetti compared to Singapore’s?On the left is Singapore’s version at Tanglin Mall (for real), and on the right is Carlton’s with chouz pastries filled zabaglione cream coated with overflowing generous dark chocolate ganache (AUD$7.90). Same same but different. Do you feel slightly… ‘cheated’ now?The Lemon Brulee Tart ($6.50) – a shortbread base filled with a tangy lemon custard and topped with a fired sugar crust, is part sweet part sour that would give you a dessert awakening.Brunetti Cakes began trading at the Faraday street location in 1985. The Angelé family acquired the business in 1991 and transformed the lovely café that it was into a truly authentic roman Pasticceria. They are also delighted to announce that the Brunetti café is moving back to its original home and will be located at 380 Lygon Street, Carlton from mid 2012.Brunetti Carlton
194 – 204 Faraday Street, Carlton Vic 3053, Melbourne Australia, Tel: +61 03 9347 2801
Opening Hours: 6am–11pm (Sun-Thurs), 6am-12am (Fri-Sat)Other Related Entries
Brunetti (Tanglin Mall)
Queen Victoria Market (Melbourne)
MoVida Aqui (Melbourne)
The Journal (Melbourne)
Birdman Eating (Melbourne)
2012-06-14 00:00:00
Kungfu Paradise – HK Cafe to HangOut after Midnight at Bugis+
Bugis+, the mall formerly known as Iluma, has finally reopened. Known for its illuminated façade and interesting mix of tenants, the former Iluma did not attract even patrons – largely due the lack of a flagship stores, unappealing mix of tenants, and lacklustre F&B outlets.Would history repeat itself?It has opened with Singapore’s biggest Uniqlo, attracting long queues. This didn’t appeal to me though because it was just another Uniqlo. So what’s there to eat at Bugis+?At least they beefed up the F&B selection, with Aloha Ma Maison, Astons Specialities, Bonchon Chicken, Bread & Butter Box, Chef Daniel’s Kitchen, C-Jade HK Cafe In, CoCo ICHIBANYA, Koi Bubbletea, Ramen Champion, Taipei Station, Taste of Hong Kong Café, and Kungfu Paradise. At least there are some new names there.In a “Paradise” mood, I landed at the open concept and orange coloured seats of Kungfu Paradise – the cafe with a kick. Just like any Hong Kong café which sells mannnnnny things, Kungfu Paradise puts on the dining table popular Hong Kong cuisine (such as dim sum, rice and noodles), Western picks (pasta, sandwiches and toast) and desserts.Under the “Recommendations”, I was keen to try Asian-infused flavours in creations such as KungFu ‘Master’ Salad ($5.90) and Seafood Chili Crab Pasta ($9.90) – pasta served with seafood and freshly made chilli crab sauce.The Master Salad was surprisingly a good choice – a fusion mix of East and West greens with crispy chicken, topped with special Thai spicy dressing. It was a feisty yet refreshing starter. Not meant to be corny, but it does pack a punch!I am usually sceptical of chilli crab ‘anything’, because other versions can come out with cheap tasting sweet gooey sauces. Kungfu Paradise’s pasta was HOT, almost like the real thing, with the noodles swimming in an oily, spicy and fiery mix. Yes, oily.Good news for youths (and bad news for their parents). The café which took cues from other Hong Kong cafes is opened past midnight, so you can continue to munch and get fat on their Kungfu Bumgers (didn’t spell it wrongly) after KTV and late night movies. Yeah!Bugis+, #01-13, Singapore 188067 (5 min from Bugis MRT Station), Tel: +65 6884 7375
Opening Hours: 11:00am-2:00am (Mon-Thurs), 11:00am-3:00am (Fri), 10:00am-3:00am (Sat), 10:00am-2:00am (Sun)Other Related Entries
Causeway Bay Hong Kong Café (Centrepoint)
HK Kim Gary Restaurant (Vivocity)
Wong Kok Char Chan Teng (Bugis Junction)
Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong (TripleOne)
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
2012-06-13 00:00:00
ShareTea – Love for Bubbletea
ShareTea remains one of my favourite bubbletea shops, so much so that I even went to Taipei for a one day training course. It was very enriching and made me realise so much work goes into a single cup.A fan of ShareTea too? The good news is Daniel’s Food Diary is giving away 5 x $20 Sharetea vouchers, and you would be able to try their unique chilled beverages such as Aloha Fruit Tea, Ice Cream Milk Tea, Handmade Taro Fresh Milk and hot milk teas. Yums.All you need to do is to *likes* the FaceBook pages of Daniel’s Food Diary and Sharetea SingaporeLeave a comment below to say you have done so. Results will be announced next Wed 20 June 2012. Contest winners must be addressees of Singapore to facilitate postage.Sharetea News
Sharetea, one of Singapore’s premium Bubble Tea brands – recently opened its three latest outlets at Great World City, Jurong Point and JCube – bringing the number of stores to 11 since it was brought here from Taiwan in 2010.Sharetea has also launched a campaign promoting its extensive range of hot milk teas, unique selection of bubble teas and signature cream beverages as a trendy lifestyle drink to be enjoyed by customers of all ages and from all walks of life.Other Related Entries
Share Tea (Wisma)
The Battle of the Bubble Teas
HK Gong Cha v SG Gong Cha
Koi Bubbletea (Toa Payoh)
Woobbee (Tanjong Pagar)
2012-06-12 00:00:00
How I Went from >75 to 72 kg in 4 days! Plus Before & After Pictures
Everybody should have somewhat of a weight limit. Mine’s 75kg. The recent weeks have been worse with friends saying, “You look kind of swollen”, “Have you stopped exercising?” and “Your face very round ah!” All right, I get the hint and did feel horrible about myself.It is true that I have exercised a lot less due to an injury incurred earlier this year. I never really took slimming pills and stuff, but when I read a write-up in 8 days on The Slimming Quencher by Olive & Green, a “delicious meal-replacement health drink that brings your body back into balance”, it called out to me to give it a try.Made from organic cactus honey extract, organic citrus extract, herbs and spices, this meal-replacement drink is supposed to detox and “wake up” the metabolism from its slumber. Sounds simple right?Here’s the catch – You cannot eat anything for 4 days! It may be easy for you, but never easy for a food blogger who eat good meals 4 times a day.I need to say that Olive & Green did not endorse me to write this. I do not get paid for this. I will be happy if they would (Haha. Any slimming company can write to me too, yah?) So I will say the truth.Not eating anything is NOT easy at all. And the drink is Not “delicious” – quite horrible tasting in fact, somewhat a cross between diluted tom yum and chilli water. Day 1 was terrible, though by Day 3 I got very used to the taste. It became bearable. I reminded myself it was honey.Going to dinner at Cocotte and drinking Still water (true story), watching Prometheus with your tummy calling out to you (also true story), and doing 3 Zumba classes (another crazy true story) in between was mental and physical torture. You need A LOT of determination.And so after 4 days, here are the results! But prior to that, the BEFORE pictures.Am slightly embarrassed myself, my tummy seems to be a permanently bloated stage and I had to keep wearing black tees to cover up. Call myself a fitness instructor! Oh well, I did stop exercising for a while. Here’s the AFTER pictures. (Taken by iPhone, NO photoshop)Amazing right? From 75.8kg to 71.7kg, in 4 days! Though my weight fluctuates between 72 and 73kg these few days after the programme.My friends say that my face do not look so bloated, as though I got rid of my water retention. Other than looking sharper, most commented that my face looks clearer, glower, with lighter eye bags too. I do notice during Day 3, my faces were very pinkish.I need to emphasize I do not advocate fast slimming. There is a part of me that feels it is still somewhat unhealthy, and eating healthily and exercising should still be the way to go. But I do value that Slimming Quencher helps me in detoxing. Some would say I would be just losing fluids. We shall see.Watch out for this space one month later.Other Related Entries
From “Ah Pui” to Choreographing the Great Singapore Workout 
What’s In A Food Blogger’s Bag?
How I Went From >75 to
2012-06-11 00:00:00
IKEA Swedcook Class – Cold Shrimp with Mayo in Vol-au-vent shells
Talk about IKEA’s Swedish food, the traditional dish of meatballs with cream sauce and lingonberries, Najad salmon and Saithe Herb Crusted Fish comes to mind. Want to learn how to prepare some of this Nordic delights?I was invited for a Swedcook session by IKEA at Cookyn Inc, and Chef Mervyn and Rayner (from HisFoodBlog) personally taught us how to create some Swedish dishes. The food was very simple to make (really, if I can do it, so can you) and brought out the best of the ingredients.Here’s an easy starter you can try, especially when you are organising a party. Guaranteed to wow your guests.Cold Shrimp with Mayo in Vol-au-vent ShellsIngredients
For the fillings:
500gm of coldwater shrimps, cooked and peeled (can buy from IKEA or supermarkets)
1 avocado, skinned and seed removed, diced to small pieces
1 mango, diced to small pieces (makes a whole lot of difference to the fillings)
2 tablespoons of chopped chivesFor the sauce
1 cup of Japanese mayo (if you ask me, Japanese mayo always taste best)
1 teaspoon of paprika powder (adds some flavour and colour)
1 lemon (for few drops of juice)
1 garlic clove, minced
2 anchovy fillets, minced (too add slight saltiness in the sauce)Vol-au-vent shells (light, round bite-sized shell of puff pastry, sometimes with a pastry lid)
You can probably use other forms of puff pastries as substitute.Directions for Preparation 1)
Mix the lemon juice, paprika, chives, mayo, minced anchovies, garlic
2) Season with some salt and pepper
3) Add the cooked shrimps with the avocado and mix well
4) Assemble – stuff the shrimp mayo mixture into the vol-au-vent shells and serve immediately.Looks awesome right? I am already salivating just looking at the fillings. And the good news is, if you love to cook and would like a chance to join the IKEA SwedeCook session on 29th June 2012, send them a photo of your “Pretty Smart Kitchen”.Details of the contest here. Good luck, and tell me if you win! Here are some photo inspirations of happy people in the kitchen.MoonBerry helping me with the seasoning, and we were in matching blue!Lovely girls Karen (PR from One9Ninety), Agri Velt and Cheryl Wee (Up and coming singer)Group picture with Shi Fu Mervyn and Rayner in greenOther Related Entries
Recipe of Grilled Slipper Lobster
Honey & Pineapple Tart Ice Cream
Recipe Ketam Masak Lemak
SoEZ Brownie Baking 101
Steamed Mandarin Orange Cake Recipe
2012-06-08 00:00:00
Ho Hung Kee – Hong Kong’s One Star Michelin Wonton Noodles
[Hong Kong] Wonton Noodles with Michelin Star? Yes, Ho Hung Kee is one of the few Wonton Noodles shop that is actually awarded the One Michelin Star. You would have thought only fine dining restaurants would get accolades like that.Founded in 1946, Ho Hung Kee has only one branch at Causeway Bay, refusing to open more to maintain high standards and quality.I expected to wait for a long time on a weekend – surprisingly it took me 15 minutes before I was shepherded upstairs, to sit with two Hong Konger ladies who appeared frightful of my camera.The food: House Speciality Wonton Noodle in Soup (HK$33), Sliced Beef Fried Rice Noodles (HK$69), and Liver Congee with Intestines and Meatball Congee (HK$45). They even have Rice Vermicelli Singapore style (HK$69) but you can probably give it a miss. Singaporeans seem to love dry versions of noodles, but in Hong Kong, you should really go for the soupy ones.So is Ho Hung Kee deserving of its Michelin Star?The signature Wonton Noodles is really quite exceptional. My friend says it is the best he ever had. I say it’s probably second to Mak’s . You may beg to differ. (I did eat five different wonton noodles this trip.)The noodles are thin, really thin and springy. The ‘seven-parts shrimp, three-parts pork’ wontons had addition of ‘wood ear’ fungus within, delicious though small – can be fuller and better.The Pork Meatball Congee (HK$40) is wah wah wah wah smooth, soft-textured, tasty, top notch quality… it is beyond words. You probably cannot even feel the texture of rice because it is so smooth, and the handmade fresh meatballs are wonderfully appetising. Finally real meatballs in my congee, not factory made ones.I hear that the pork-lard fried Sliced Beef Fried Rice Noodles is the best thing here, that even food guru Chua Lam is full of praises. And what luck I have, it was sold out! Have you tried Ho Hung Kee’s Beef Noodles, is it really THAT good?Ho Hung Kee Congee and Noodle Shop 何洪记
2 Sharp Street East, Causeway Bay, Hong Kong (MTR Causeway Bay Station Exit A, turn right to Matheson St and walk for about 3 min, diagonally opposite G.O.D), Tel: 852 2577 6558
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 11pmOther Related Entries
Mak’s vs Tsim (Hong Kong)
Tsim Chai Kee (Hong Kong)
Must Try Hong Kong Drinks
More Must Try Food at Hong Kong
Must Try Food at Hong Kong
2012-06-07 00:00:00
Goodwood Park Hotel – Who Wins the Showdown of the Durian Puffs?
The durian season is here again, as the main fruiting season occurs from June to August – which means the durians you get now are more ‘fragrant’ and yummy. Fragrance for durian is really subjective. As what Anthony Bourdain says, you either love or despite it, and your breath will smell as if you’d been French-kissing your dead grandmother.I hope nobody has ever done that.Talking about durians, the best place to get your durian puffs and desserts has to be Coffee Lounge at Goodwood Park Hotel. Apart from the signature Durian Puffs and legendary Durian Mousse Cake, there are also all time favourites such as the Durian Crepe, Durian Strudel and Durian Cappuccino Cake.I am no durian lover, but for the sake of this review, I ate each dessert twice with a showdown of its 5 popular durian desserts. *burp* (durian breath)Number 1: “Mao Shan” Power Puff ($16.80+ per piece) comes in a shape of a powerful flying saucer, with creamy pulp in a mega choux pastry. This is crazy rich, and after having a quarter, the other durian puffs pales in intensity.  Beware, this is limited stuff only for the month of June sold from noon to 7pm.Number 2: Durian Puff ($6 for 2 pieces). I am sure this is the number 1 seller, looking like a profiterole with light mousse-y durian flesh. I like it that it is dainty, and fits into one mouthful.Number 3: Durian Mousse Cake ($10.80 per slice).  This star which kicked off their famous promotion in 1983 stood the test of time.  The slice is velvety, yet not incredibly heavy.Number 4: Durian Cones. The pair of mini chocolate and vanilla waffle cones filled with durian mousse delighted almost every girl in the table. So cute and petite. I never imaged anyone using ‘petite’ to describe a durian dessert. I was just okay with this, and wondered how it would be if it comes in an actual cone size.Number 5: Durian ‘Pengat’ with Glutinous Rice and Gula Melaka only tastes good with the gula melaka sauce. On its own, the rice is too dry and ordinary. This is only available at the dessert buffet.Some of the durian pastries are served in addition to the regular dessert buffet at the Coffee Lounge, $32.80++ with dessert only, $26.80++ additional top up with main course order, and $48.80++ with Taiwan Porridge buffet.Warning though, bringing mints may not be enough, a toothbrush and paste is necessary for the attack of the durians.Coffee Lounge, Goodwood Park Hotel
22 Scotts Road, Singapore 228221 (10 min walk from Orchard MRT), Tel: +65 6730 1786
Opening Hours: 9am to 9pm daily (for Deli)Other Related Entries
Carousel (Royal Plaza on Scotts)
Plaza Brasserie (Park Royal Hotel)
Chiso Zanmai (Clarke Quay Central)
Kopi Tiam (Swisstel The Stamford)
Prima Taste Kitchen (Centrepoint)
2012-06-06 00:00:00
Sushi Tei – They Are Back at Ngee Ann City Level 5
Years ago, I had a first date at Sushi Tei Takashimaya. That was when the restaurant was still hidden behind the crowded taxi stand. Time flies. The Sushi Tei chain of restaurants has already been around since 1994, with 15 outlets in Singapore, and a new larger premise on the fifth floor of Ngee Ann City.They have just launched a “We Are Back!” promotional menu with exclusive specialties available only at Ngee Ann City. And since this is ‘Sushi’ Tei, here are three recommended sushi dishes.The Vietnam Harumaki ($8) is a cross between a Vietnamese spring roll and maki, and should delight non-carb lovers with its rice paper wrap with avocado and crab meat fillings. I really liked this refreshing sweet Harumaki especially (eemmmmm) I can never finish the rice on my sushi. Please tell me you do it too.The Kurenai Roll ($12) is presented like a flying dragon. Just when I thought it was only a pretty thing till I had a bite, and was surprised by the crunch of crispy deep-fried breaded sashimi-grade prawns on the inside. Definitely a pleasing “wow” moment. Plus there was a sweet aftertaste since the sushi was rolled with sweet mango and cucumber. This Kurenai is both beautiful and appetizing.The table’s favourite seems to be the Kani Mentai Mayo Roll ($8) – it already sounds good. Imagine a uramaki where the rice is on the outside, seaweed sheet on the inside, topped with generous mentai mayonnaise cod rice, and crowned with crispy thin fried carrot shreds.Sushi Tei has always been comfort Japanese food. And if I feel like going light, the Sushi Tei salad with Zuwai crab meat and thick slices of salmon sashimi, topped with goma or special citrusy sauce is a must-have. How about you – where do you like to go for your sushi fix?Sushi Tei
391 Orchard Road #05-30/31 Podium Block Ngee Ann City (5 min from Orchard Road MRT), Singapore 238873, Tel: +65 6737 8878Other Related Entries
Itacho Sushi (Plaza Singapura)
Sushi Express (City Link Mall)
Chiso Zanmai (Clarke Quay Central)
Saizeriya Ristorante (Liang Court)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
2012-06-05 00:00:00
Kay Lee Roast Meat – Is Their Char Siew Shop Worth $3.5 Million?
Singaporeans should be familiar with this story – The Kay Lee Roast Meat Joint is selling their business for $3.5 million – the amount includes $2 million for the recipe and $1.5 million for the shop space at Paya Lebar.Owners Betty Kong and husband have received bids of up to $3 million, but they will not accept a cent less. Their children did not want to take over the business.I wanted to wait till the hype dies down to find out if this is really worth $3.5 million. On a weekday afternoon at about 2.30pm, there were still about 6-7 people in the queue. The inside of the shop, which looked quite run-down and a blast from the 80s, was fully packed.We ordered a mix plate of char siew, roast pork belly and duck – 3 of their specialities. Prices start with $4 onwards for a plate of char siew rice.I could not help noticing that despite being 6th in the queue – it took more than 20 minutes before we could even order our food, partly because people in the front were taking away packets. But more because the lady boss Betty, was cutting their meats really, really, really slow.She was jovial, but one could not help noticing her tiredness, her bent body, the speed sh took to chop the meat, slice by slice, piece by piece. My friends and I deliberated if chopping it unhurriedly would make the meat more even, or that she was just freaking tired of chopping. (We wondered what the rest of the staff were busy with too.)Kay Lee’s char siew arrived looking dark coloured, very lean (can’t see the fats) and crisp on its skin –its style originating from Zhu Jiang China.The meats were indeed very delicious, my favourite being the char siew for being quite original in taste, and tender despite being lean. The roast pork belly is crispy and decent, while the roast duck is on the dry side – it needed the sauce.I actually thought the winning formula is in the combination of three sauces – the dark Hoisin sauce, brownish duck sauce and pinkish sweet chilli sauce that gets passed from table to table.Delicious roast meat, but worth its $3.5 million? I shouldn’t comment on the property price, but it does not wow us enough to warrant its $2 million recipe price. We jokingly said we would just consider if there is one zero less.How about you? If you had the extra cash, would you part away $3.5 million for Kay Lee?Kay Lee Roast Meat Joint 琪利珠江烧腊
125 Upper Paya Lebar Road (after Pereira Road Junction), Singapore 534838, Tel: +65 6743 8778
Opening Hours: 10:30am – 7:30pm (Closed on Tues)Other Related Entries
Tian Tian vs Ah Tai
Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodles (Maxwell Food Centre)
Beach Road Scissor Cut Curry Rice (Jalan Besar)
Golden Mile Claypot Rice (Golden Mile)
Sin Kee Chicken Rice (Mei Ling Street)
2012-06-04 00:00:00
Gold Kili Coffee and Frezfruta Jams
Daniel’s Food Diary is giving away 5 gift sets of Gold Kili and Frezfruta – This includes Gold Kili Double Shot Milk Tea, Double Shot White Coffee, Frezfruta Kaya, Peach Jam and Apple Blueberry Jam (formally known as Sinsin Jam).All you need to do is to *likes* the FaceBook pages of Daniel’s Food Diary and Lion City DistributionsLeave a comment below to say you have done so. Results will be announced next Monday 11 June 2012. Contest winners must be residents of Singapore to facilitate delivery.Gold Kili’s New Products
Double Shot Instant White Coffee ($6.50)
This drink features the strong full-bodied taste of the finest Arabica Beans blended with a rich creamer.  It is also the first instant coffee in the market that has the added benefits of Inulin*. Its called double shot because an extra shot of coffee gives its taste extra “oomph”.Double Shot Instant White Tea ($6.50)
A rich, intensive fragrant tea extracted from premium grade black tea leaves. Its taste is reminiscent of Hong Kong’s famous si mat nai cha (“stocking milk tea”). An extra shot gives extra “oomph”.Frezfruta’s New Products
Apple Blueberry Jam ($3.00)
The first apple blueberry jam in the market made from IQF* fresh fruits, with a high fruit content of 50% – this is natural goodness at its best. Singaporeans love apple jams and blueberry jams so this is a marriage of the best flavors.   IQF* fruits are frozen when the fruits are at its freshest, and IQF* fresh fruits make jams that are delicious, bottling freshness at its best.Peach Jam ($3.00)
Made from IQF* fresh fruits with a high fruit content of 50%. This jam is natural, wholesome, flavorful and ever-so-popular.
2012-06-04 00:00:00
The Story of Twelve Cupcakes – A Candid Interview with Jaime Teo
Twelve Cupcakes was founded by Jaime Teo and Daniel Ong – the celebrity couple who met on the set of Mr Kiasu, got married, had a kid, and opened 4 cupcake shops.Their cupcakes had earned very positive reviews from critics, fans and friends, with some saying this is probably the best cupcake found in Singapore.When I received an sms from Chef Willin Low saying “Yoz! Just walked past bugis junction n saw ur new place!! Congrats man!!! So happy for u guys!”, I knew it was a case of mistaken identity again. I am Ang, the famous Ong married Jaime.But Daniel Ang knew it was time to visit Jamie, to try her so-wonderful Rose on a Rose cupcake, and to share with everyone this exclusive candid interview.Hi Jamie, why Twelve Cupcakes? Not Nine, Ten, Eleven? 
If you noticed, there are 12 holes in a baking tray. And 12 is a very auspicious number?Let’s see. There are 12 signs in a horoscope, 12 animals in the zodiac calendar, 12 months in a yea…And 12 numbers on a clock. If you are a bowler, 12 strikes equal a perfect to a perfect game. And Daniel used to bowl quite often.You have opened so many branches of Twelve Cupcakes in a span of one year. Congratulations!
Yes, response at the first outlet was overwhelming, so much that we felt the need to cater to more customers and also grab hold of the opportunity.Opening a shop is not easy. There will be so many things to do. How do you manage? 
Daniel will be helping with the admin and paperwork, while I keep myself busy in the kitchen.You are a superwoman! You need to oversee Twelve Cupcakes, ‘take care’ of Daniel and your kid, plus host gigs with Fly Entertainment. 
Actually, the husband and shop are quite manageable. Hahaha. It is being a mother which is the most challenging –there is no rest time. A mother is on standby 24 hours a day.You have such multiple roles. You were Miss Singapore Universes, an actress, host, and even a singer with the pop group One Fifth. Oh yes, I remember the song “Ai De Man Dong Zuo”.
Aiyah, don’t bring out the history already! So long ago. (I think she wants people to forget that she was in a girl group which I think sang quite good songs.)Few people know you are in fact a food blogger! And hosted many other food programmes. If you would want to introduce one F&B shop, what would it be?
I didn’t know about this shop till I opened Twelve Cupcakes at Millenia Walk – Pullman Bakery. I get to buy the freshest items because my shop is nearby. My recommendations are raisin milk bread and Danish roll. Do you know females like to eat bread that are longer in shape because they are less messy? And the ingredients such as the sausage do not feel processed – very gourmet in fact.Let’s talk about your cupcakes. If you can recommend only one flavour, what would it be?
The Red Velvet. Customers go like “Wow, so pretty”. Its charm is that it is not too sweet and fluffy. Customers also like fruity cupcakes, such as the mango, lemon and lychee flavours.How about Daniel? Which flavour does he like?
Daniel is a model husband – he is very supportive and eats EVERYTHING that I bake. He is the one who persuaded me to open a shop like this.Where do you learn how to bake these delicious cupcakes?
The truth? From the internet! But I experimented with many versions because many online recipes are too sweet.Thank you Jaime. Can I take a few photos?
Sure, but please please upload only the pretty ones.When I first visited Jaime, I was kind of surprised to see her wearing her nerdy specs, face slightly covered with baking flour, wearing an apron… kind of like a housewife – very unlike the glam Ms Universe look she portrayed on televison.But what I saw was her determination. She was really in the kitchen icing all the cream, making sure every cupcake looks perfect and to her requirements. Surely being famous did help her in the business, but we also know of many other celebrities who failed in F&B business. And this girl really works hard.Twelve Cupcakes
B1-60 United Square, 01-52 Millenia Walk, 01-28B Golden Shoe Carpark, B1-03B Bugis Junction
Opening Hours: 11am – 730pm (Golden Shoe), 11am – 9pm (The rest) Daily or till stocks lastOther Related Entries
Twelve Cupcakes (Millenia Walk)
Keith Png Wants to Design Hawker Food
Bakerzin’s Daniel Tay and His Greatest Regret
Interview with Francesca Scarpa Da Paolo
MOF’s CEO did not have enough to eat Lor Mee
2012-06-01 00:00:00
Sophisca – Taiwan’s “Choco Is Better Than Sex” Store Is Here In Singapore
[Taipei, Taiwan] One of my favourite souvenir candy shop in Taiwan is Sophisca. If you haven’t been there before, be ready to be chuckled by the kind of products you would come across.Let’s see… Candy bras, edible Sophie sanity pads (my favourite, lol), sweet medicated oil, tasty mahjong tiles, chocolate band aids, and strawberry flavoured condoms – chocolate ones I mean. The box says “Choco is better than sex”. This is crazy I know.Sophisca started in 1997 as Taiwan’s first specialised candy store, and stands for Smile, Oishii, Personal, High Quality, International, Sentimental, Care and Artlessness.  Whatever it means.They sell some  1,000 varieties of hard and soft candy, marshmallow, chocolate, healthy fruits, and honey — all manufactured in Taiwan, with such cute packaging that you would have thought only the Japanese are capable of.The chocolates are not top-notch quality, and candies not exactly cheap (I spent more than $30 just buying sweets). But imagine the shock of the birthday boy’s face when he receives sanitary pads, which are in fact candy floss. The look will be priceless.If you are thinking of getting a box of edible chocolate condoms just to sabotage tease your friends, you may not need to travel to Taiwan anymore – just slightly to the West at Jurong Point. Can I say “Hooray!”Sophisca
Taiwan: Various branches– Xi Men Ding, Gong Guan, Shi Lin, Jiu Fen, Yong He, Hsin Zhu, Tan Shui, Tai Chung etc
Singapore: 1 Jurong West Central 2 , #B1-80/81/82 Jurong Point Shopping Centre S648331 (Boon Lay MRT), Tel: +65 67928413Other Related Entries
Chef Tony’s Popcorn Company (Marina Square)
Sticky (Central)
Candylicious (Resorts World)
Candylicious Takashimaya
2012-05-31 00:00:00
E.clat Gourmet Canteen – New F&B Canteen with All Day Breakfast
I am probably the first to write about this very new E.clat Gourmet Canteen. You may wonder what “E.clat” (pronounced ‘a-kla’) is – Not a long choux French pastry, but French meaning “great brilliance, as of performance or achievement”.Great performance for a canteen? Well, the restaurant is owned by a group of property agents. Probably made a lot of money.E.clat is an F&B canteen featuring Western, Italian, & Asian Cuisine as well as All Day Breakfast & Desserts. Calling themselves “fine dining for the masses”, prices are indeed more affordable than usual, with no service charge or GST.  A cooking studio is in its works.Finding this place can be present a little challenge for first timers. Worry not. Sultan Link is a ‘artistic-looking’ silver building diagonally opposite Studio M Hotel. Once there, take the stairs to the 3rd floor. If you are taking the escalator, press 1st floor. Yes, 1st floor, note the difference.The European Big Breakfast ($12.90) is gorgeous – with an assortment of chicken sausage, bacon, baked beans, breakfast potato and grilled toast. The scrambled eggs are creamy, best part to the plate.The Eggs Benedict ($10.90), with poached egg, honey baked ham, citrus hollandaise on foccacia served with fresh green, is probably one of the more reasonably priced ones around. Though one of the eggs awkwardly stayed un-flowingly in its yellow (the other fortunately oozed), while the foccacia is on its tough side. A muffin would have been a much better choice.Interestingly, the W.O.W Chicken Wings ($4.50 for 3, $6.90 for 5) seems to be the highlight of the meal. There are 8 preparation sauces, with choices of “Japan, Singapore, USA, Thailand, Spanish, Greek, China, Brazil”. (I typed it as it is on the menu – would have called it Japanese, American, Thai etc for consistency.)The “China” honey sesame wings has a light tinge of sweetness to the crispy fried wings, while the “Singapore” Nonya is a creative take, combing the curry version with deep fried wings.Nice ambience, open space, reasonable prices, a little hard to find but nothing is too far for Singaporeans. Food can be further refined but E.clat should be able to work to greater brilliance.E.clat Gourmet Canteen
63 Mohamed Sultan Road #03-14 Singapore 239002 (diagonally opposite Studio M Hotel), Tel: +65 66047998
Opening Hours: 9am – 8pm (Mon-Fri), 9am – 2pm (Sat), Closed on SunOther Related Entries
Cocotte (Wunderlust Hotel)
Wild Honey (Scotts Square)
Eggs & Berries (Changi City Point)
Jones The Grocer (Dempsey)
Singapore Loves Food That Oozes
2012-05-30 00:00:00
Baja Fresh – Popular Mexican Chain Opens in Singapore
Mexican food is not exactly a big thing in Singapore. But fans of Mexican cuisine can now enjoy bold and fresh flavours from Baja Fresh which has opened its first Singapore branch at Rendezvous Hotel.Founded in 1990, Baja Fresh has already established its name in the United States and Dubai with more than 250 restaurants in 28 states. It continues to serve Mexican favourites such as tacos, burritos, fajitas, quesadillas and nachos.Singapore’s outlet has a fast-food restaurant vibe. What we like is that many items are customisable with healthier options, sizes and different fillings. On the flip side, first timers may get confused with its varied combinations.For examples, it burrito alone can come with different versions of Mexicano, baja, ultimo or bare, with choice of fillings such as fire-grilled chicken, steak, shrimp, vegetables and mahi mahi fish, plus add-ons of guacamole or sour cream. Confused yet?Full Post at InSing.com – Baja Fresh Mexican Grill opens at Rendezvous HotelBaja Fresh
9 Bras Basah Road, #01-03 Rendezvous Hotel Gallery, Singapore 189559 (Bras Basah MRT) Tel: +65 6337 7300
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm (Sun-Thurs), 11am – 10:30pm (Fri-Sat)Other Related Entries
The Mexican (Bras Basah)
Lucky 13 (TripleOne Somerset)
Dapao (Far East Square)
ChicKing (Marina Square)
Wendy’s (Lau Pa Sat)
2012-05-29 00:00:00
Cocotte – Wunderlusting Over Their Weekend Brunches
The most enquiries I have received of late are, “Where are the best brunch places in Singapore?” Before you even scream ‘all-day breakfast’ and ‘eggs benedict’ which is probably the next fashionable thing in this island, how does Foie Gras Egg Cocotte and Croque Monsier sound to you?Cocotte at the Wunderlust Hotel (at Rochor area) has brought a complete new a la carte brunch menu with a French twist available every Saturday and Sunday, 11.30am to 3pm.I felt in love with the place before even starting my meal. The boutique hotel was originally a school built in the 1920s, the outside looking extremely historical and the inside contemporary and comfortable. Cocotte on its ground floor is suitable for communal dining, and with decors that makes me believe that I am a holiday elsewhere.All the egg dishes are delightful choices – from the fluffy Omelette with Sauteed Mushrooms and Truffle Oil ($18.00) to the Brandade Egg Cocotte, a Creamy Homemade Salt Cod Mashed with Potatoes ($25.00). The later begin one of my favourite dishes of the day for being soft, delicate and tantalising. Price a little on the high side for me though.If you are ordering a Croque Monsier, top it up with a fried egg to make it a Madame ($18.00). You shouldn’t regret this choice when you see the egg yolk trickling down the perfect combination of broiche, béchamel, dijon mustard, ham and gruyere. This comes with a lovely buttery outer crust on its broiche.By looking at this picture, I do not think the Pain Perdu ($16.00) would need much recommendation. A picture can speak a thousand words – Beautiful, tempting, mouth-watering, seductive, sweet, what else?So that’s two thick slices of brioche soaked in beaten eggs and pan fried then served with freshly whipped chantilly and topped with homemade cherry glaze. Oh yes, so wunder-lustfully delicious.Cocotte
2 Dickson Road, Ground Level Wanderlust Hotel, Singapore 209494 (near Jalan Besar & Sungei Road), Tel: +65 6298 1188
Opening Hours: Lunch 1200-1430 (Mon-Sun), Dinner 1830-2230 (Mon-Thurs) and 1830-2300 (Fri-Sat, closed Sun dinners), Brunch 1130 – 1500 (Sat-Sun)Other Related Entries
Wild Honey (Scotts Square)
Eggs & Berries (Changi City Point)
Jones The Grocer (Dempsey)
The Tastings Room (Marina Square)
Singapore Loves Food That Oozes
2012-05-28 00:00:00
Menya Musashi – Worth To Queue For The Coveted Ramen?
Good news for ramen lovers! Menya Musashi, one of Japan’s most highly rated ramen shop, has arrived to Singapore. Menya Musashi is featured on Japanese television frequently for its famous ramen, and its most popular branch at Shinjuku keeps packing in the crowd. (My verdict of the Menya Musashi main outlet at Shinjuku Tokyo here.)We do not have to buy an air ticket to try this, and the newly opened shop at Raffles City has also attracted many ramen fans to queue for a coveted bowl.The shop’s name comes from famous Edo-era swordsman Miyamoto Musashi, and operates on the five key ramen principles of ‘chi, sui, hi, kaze and ku’ to create an ideal bowl of Japanese ramen.There are three types of ramen soup base to choose from: the white (original), black (black sauce) and red (spicy). The black kakuni ramen ($14.90) is ‘oishii’, with a thick and salty broth cooked from a mixture of pork bones and dried saury fish.Compared to the other popular ramen shops Ippudo and Ramen Santouka, Menya’s version feels lacking in oomph. I will definitely go back to try again, but only when the hype and queue subsides.Full Post at InSing.com – Japan’s famous Menya Musashi ramen in SingaporeMenya Musashi
#01-16 Raffles City Shopping Centre, 252 North Bridge Road, Singapore (City Hall MRT)
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pmOther Related Entries
Ippudo (Mandarin Gallery)
Keisuke Ramen (Millenia Walk)
Ramen Santouka (Central)
Marutama Ra-Men (Liang Court)
Ramen Play (313 @ Somerset)
2012-05-25 00:00:00
Birdman Eating – Super Crazy Good Baked Eggs at Fitzroy
[Melbourne, Australia] Fitzroy is one of the inner city suburbs of Melbourne you should visit if the arts, galleries, live performances, pubs, indie shops and cafes call out to your name.God must have planned me to eat at Birdman Eating because I was looking on the map for this shop ranked #50 out of 2416 restaurants in TripAdvisor, only to realize the car was parked right in front.Birdman Eating (nevermind the shop name sounds offensive in Hokkien) is quite a breakfast and brunch place, somewhat like a hole in the wall café with an ambience which makes you feel like you are a time traveler back to the 90s.You won’t miss the blackboard which jots down some of their specialties, such as Birdman’s Baked Eggs (AUD$14) with choices such as pork, lemongrass & ginger, and chilli beef & beans. Their coffee is excellent stuff too.The chicken, mushroom & tarragon Baked Eggs comes served in a hot iron plate, with a toast and slab of butter. This is one of those things I would say is “Super crazy good” .It IS super crazy good – warm creamy sauce flowing on soft rice with chunks of chicken. Definitely a sight when you poke into the egg yolk and it overflows all over, coating the mushrooms and rice. Yummy decadence.The honey roasted root vegies & fetta did not impress my friend though – too healthy tasting perhaps. I enjoyed it too! If sweet carrots and soft potatoes in egg are your kind of stuff too – go for it.Birdman Eating
238 Gertrude Street, Fitzroy, Melbourne, VIC 3065, Australia Tel: +61 3 9416 4747
Opening Hours: 7am – 10:30pm (Mon-Fri), Sat-Sun (8am – 10:30pm)Other Related Entries
Queen Victoria Market (Melbourne)
The Journal (Melbourne)
MoVida Aqui (Melbourne)
Cupcake Central (Melbourne)
2012-05-24 00:00:00
Zaffron Kitchen – A Hip Indian Restaurant In The East
Many have a certain image of Indian restaurants in Singapore – family style, a little backward, selling mainly prata, briyani and curries. Thus, Zaffron Kitchen (not to be confused with Zaffron at Maxwell Chambers) is a refreshing change from the usual, which my friend calls “Fish & Co Western décor, selling Indian food”.The colours scheme of orange and grey is bold. There is a designated children’s play corner, and waiters are wearing cleverly crafted aprons that say “Be Naan the Wiser” and “The Devil Eats Prata”. I have to admit that Indian food is not exactly my thing, but I immediately liked this restaurant with a young and colourful vibe.The trendy style restaurant features a good mix of North, South and local Indian favourites, with goodies such as Chicken Tikka, Naan bread, Tandoor Gobi, Butter Chicken and Tandoori Mixed Grill. Are you salivating yet?The Dum Chicken Briyani ($11) changed my entire perspective of this dish. Coming looking like cheese-baked rice, the dish is sealed with a thin crisp layer of dough, with a well spiced tender chicken thigh and hard-boiled egg within.A clever way I must say. The flavours of the spices are locked in, with the rice staying moist and warm. Probably the best local briyani I ever had.The other sinful dish that deserves your calories is the Butter Chicken, with chicken tikka marinated in a delightful yogurt spice mixture, simmered in a rich tomato, cashew nuts, butter flavoured gravy accented with dry fenugreek. The gravy deserves your lick to the final drop. If you come during lunch, you can have it as a set which includes a drink. Ice limau please.With a Z added to ‘Saffron’ suggesting a hip and cool factor, this Indian eatery is like no other, and should appeal to the young, executives and families.Zaffron Kitchen
135/137 East Coast Road, Singapore 341137 (diagonally opp Katong 112), Tel: +65 6440 6786
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 10pm (Mon – Thurs), 11.30am – 10.30pm (Fri – Sun)Other Related Entries
Yantra (Tanglin Mall)
Song of India (Scotts Road)
Tiffin Room (Raffles Hotel)
Gajalee (Cuppage Terrace)
Feast @ East (East Coast)
2012-05-23 00:00:00
Academy Bistro – Ever Tried Lunch At The Supreme Court?
This is no ordinary food review – it is food at the Supreme Court. I bet half of you do not even know there is a restaurant inside.According to the Singapore Mediation Centre (SMC), mediators take disputing parties to lunch at the Academy Bistro in the Supreme Court so that they can get to know each other better. The rationale is after lunch and interaction; parties are more inclined to come to a settlement.Cases handled by the SMC can range from business, family, to construction disputes, and since their settlement rate is quite high (75-80%), the food at the Academy Bistro has to be good.The The Academy Bistro at the High Court used to be helmed by celebrity chef Jimmy Chok, but has changed its menu to include more Asian fare. The good news is, food is cheaper now than the past.The local delights included Salted Fish Fried Rice ($8.50), Seafood Mee Goreng ($8.50), Beef with Bittergourd Hor Fun ($8.50), Sliced Fish Noodles ($8.50), and Szechuan Chicken ($8.00).Though not a recommended dish in the menu, the Seafood Crispy Egg Noodles ($8.50) with its generous ingredients of sliced fish, squid, prawns and vegetables is a decent choice. Firstly, eating zhi char fare in a ‘proper’ setting is a mental barrier you need to cross. And while it does not have the ‘wok hei’ flavours, I felt that it did not affect this dish as much as compared to say, dark sauce hor fun.The Sambal Seafood Fried Rice ($8.50) with seafood and vegetarian char siew and bull’s eye egg is quite fragrantly fried, with the rice evenly coated with the sambal sauce. Not every dish is fantastic though. Generally, the noodles and Western style dishes seem to fare better.It is not all the time that ‘ordinary’ people would say “Hey, let’s go makan at the courts,” and you may find yourself eating next to Chief Justice or high profile lawyers. I would say, give it a try, get past the security gantry for your metal devices, and (food bloggers) leave your DSLR cameras behind.And if you are going for mediation at SMC, I hope you settle after lunch.The Academy Bistro
1 Supreme Court Lane, GF Supreme Court, Singapore 178879 (nearest MRT City Hall), Tel: +65 6339 2827
Opening Hours: 8am – 5:30pm (Mon-Fri, closed Sat/Sun/PH)Other Related Entries
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
Crystal Jade Kitchen (Scotts Square)
Astons Specialities (Cathay)
OverTime (Dempsey)
The Rotisserie (China Square Food Centre)
2012-05-22 00:00:00
Salt Tapas & Bar – By Oz Celebrity Chef Luke Mangan
Luke Mangan is one of Australia’s most celebrated celebrity shop, with his first restaurant Salt at Sydney receiving rave reviews and great popularity. Salt grill & Sky bar at Ion Orchard is also a fashionable urban restaurant delivering the Luke Mangan style of contemporary Australian cuisine.And so when 2 beauty bloggers (MoonBerry & Claire’s Flair) whom we met during Valentine’s wanted a Saturday meet-up with me (the food-blogger who is known to them as the ‘walking food directory’), I thought that the new Salt Tapa & Bar at Raffles City would be the kind of place they would enjoy – Spanish vibes, laid-back ambience, light food with an Australian twist.Service was excellent, and the waiter promptly introduced us the recommended dishes twice with a slight sense of humour – Oysters with smoked salsa sauce ($5 for one), Wagyu sausage ($25 for large), Iberico pork loin charcoal gilled ($27), Kingfish sashimi ($21) and Tuna tartare ($27 for large). Warning: Prices appear to be steep for tapas portions.I loved the Sumac spiced veal & pork meatballs ($22 for 5 pieces) – meaty, tasty, juicy with an excellent sauce, without the usual starchy taste, a perfect blend with the Fontina mash. Though if you do some calculations, one meatball is more than $5 (with taxes).The Crispy soft shell prawns with chilli and garlic aioli ($15) appeared to be oriental looking and tasting, like you could find this at a Cantonese zhi char shop. I do not mean it the bad way because I finished it. They were soft enough to be savoured with the shells, though could be fried crispier for a crunch which was lacking.As for the ladies’ favourite, the Gooey hot chocolate tart, caramelised banana and salted caramel ice-cream ($14) stole their hearts. The big-sized guy in me would prefer a thicker cake and more goo. Ice cream was splendid though.Luke Mangan has also created his own take on a Sangria recipe and serves a number of other unique cocktails, including his own signature – The Australian.  My dining partner MoonBerry testifies that the Sangria is very good “I haven’t had good and/or memorable sangrias in Singapore, but this one tastes just like the sangrias that I’m used to having at the Spanish tapas joints back home in NYC.”Salt Tapas & Bar
#01-22A Raffles City Shopping Centre, No 252 North Bridge Road Singapore 179103 (City Hall MRT Station) Tel: +65 6837 0995
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
TongKang Colonial Bar & Restaurant (Clarke Quay)
TAB (Orchard)
Singapore Sling Boutique (Clarke Quay)
Infusion (Dempsey)
Aerin’s (Raffles City)
2012-05-22 00:00:00
Daniel’s Food Diary is Nominated for Best Food Blog of Singapore Blog Awards 2012!
Daniel’s Food Diary has been nominated as one of the top ten finalists in the Domino’s Best Food Blog category of Singapore Blog Awards 2012!Other than thanking Omy.sg for organising the competition and giving me this opportunity, I would like to thank Cuisine Paradise & MoonBerry for the nomination. And of course, all supporters and readers of Daniel’s Food Diary. When I first started writing, I never expected myself to proceed this far.And to answer some questions:How do you feel about being one of finalists in Singapore Blog Awards 2012?
A combination of being happy, excited and nervous. Although it sounds cliché, it is a vote of confidence for the hard work I have been putting in the past year. Blogging IS very time-consuming.When did you start blogging and what drew you to it? Where do you get inspiration for your blog content?
I started blogging about 4 years ago, but only launched DanielFoodDiary.com last year. Since God created so much wonderful food for us, why not make a record of it?There are 3 common things you would find in my Food Blog: New food, interesting food, and stories. To get inspiration, you just need to talk to the owners or chef. I always believe there is a story behind every dish of food.How do you feel about the other Finalists in your category this year? How do you think you will fare compared to them?
Most of the nominees have become friends – The food bloggers are a tighter community I must say. We meet up for makan sessions quite often!Competition is very strong – I would have to request for my friends and supporters to work harder to vote this year. Haha.Give a reason why readers should visit your blog and vote for you?
My tag-line this year is “The Fitness Instructor Who Eats Too Much”. I must be the only food blogger who is a fitness instructor. It already sounds ridiculous. I want to prove the point that you can eat your food and be healthy at the same time.I think winning this award can propel me to do more and greater things. Other than publishing a book on food stories, I hope to promote both healthy eating and living, perhaps starting with the school canteens.How do I vote for you?
You need to go to the following link and vote, once a day till 30 June. If you have not registered, there are a few simple steps to follow. I look forward to your support!Vote for Daniel’s Food Diary
2012-05-21 00:00:00
RWS Malaysia Food Street – Don’t Have To Travel North for Malaysian Hawker Fare
Fans of Malaysian hawker street fare do not have to travel north anymore for a taste of mouth-watering dishes, but south instead over to Resorts World Sentosa.As Resorts World is under Genting, it ‘feels right’ for them to bring in these authentic Malaysian dishes over.Critics may say that street food in another country will not feel the same. And it is in a man-made air-conditioned area which steals away the authenticity.True enough, everything is organized, clean, proper, and overly wholesome but it is as good as it can get. The team did spend over a year planning for these celebrated stalls to come down.Here are 3 dishes that left an impression:Famous Jalan Alor KL Hokkien Mee
Unlike Singapore’s version of Hokkien Mee, the Kuala Lumpura version is oily, dark and salty – yes, yes yes. I have tried many so-called KL noodles at other foodcourts, but they are always a mess to begin with, tasting like char kway tiao fried with fat noodles. This is one of the better ones I taste HERE, and its winning formula has to be the aromatic dark sauce.Heun Kee Claypot Chicken Rice
This stall took the longest persuasion by the RWS team for them to come over, because the owner ( a granny) was very sceptical. I am glad she changed her mind. Be prepared to wait, especially during peak hours. You may think that claypot rice cooked on charcoal is typical. But every pot is cooked with charcoal covering from top to bottom, ensuring the heat is evenly spread out. Three different kinds of rice are used (!), soaked in fragrant sesame oil with a hint of Chinese wine.  I really loved this.Penang Lim Brother’s Char Koay Teow
I was surprised this noodles looked healthy, almost oil-less – lessening the ‘Malaysian’ factor. But the prawns and lup cheong came in generous portions.Other stalls include Fung Wong Confectionery, Petaling Street Famous Porridge, Ah Mei Hokkien Prawn Mee, Hai Beng Hainan Lor Mee, Penang Ah Long Lor Bak, Roti Canai & Nasi Biryani, Kampung Nasi Lemak, Malacca Chicken Rice Ball, Petaling Jaya Dim Sum and Drinks, Ampang Yong Tau Foo, Klang Bak Kut The, KL Wanton Mee and Penang Cuttlefish Kang Kong. 17 all together.I was most surprised that the prices are kept affordable, say between $4-$6, considering this is RWS (it’s a different story at MBS’s Rasapura). The famous stalls are not opened every day. If in doubt which stalls to try, go for the ones with longest queues.Malaysian Food Street
Resorts World Sentosa, The Bull Ring, 8 Sentosa Gateway, Sentosa Island, Singapore 098269 Tel: +65 6577 8899
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm (Mon – Thurs), 9am – 12am (Fri – Sat), 9am – 10pm (Sun)Other Related Entries
Singapore Food Trail (Flyer)
The Gallerie (Marina Square)
Prima Taste Kitchen (Centrepoint)
Kopi Tiam (Swisstel The Stamford)
Anar Restaurant (Resorts World)
2012-05-18 00:00:00
MoVida Aqui – Seriously Good Spanish Food
[Melbourne, Australia] Spanish food was never really in my food radar, perhaps because I never tried anything exceptional here, until MoVida. Winning awards like Two Chef’s Hat in The Age Good Food Guide Awards and the Dish of the Year for its Cecina, you need to book extremely early (say a month) for MoVida.Fortunately, my friend Stragen residing in Melbourne booked MoVida Aqui. He is a lawyer, who probably tried everything good in Melbourne, and was also looking forward to its virgin visit to the famed restaurant.This 3rd installment of the MoVida family occupies a much bigger space by the dome of the Melbourne  Supreme Court. And the ambience is exhilarating.Not trying to exaggerate too much, the inside is what I imagined a real Spanish restaurant to look like – fire pit in the middle, chefs cooking right before you, and personalities of every sort having a drink. It is an energetic happy place. Or a freaking awesome place!The menu which has words like “Para Empezar”, “A La Parrilla”, “Verduras” and “Arroces” did not make much sense to me. But the bubbly waitress was sprouting out every recommendation and must-haves as though she is my much-needed friend.I did not know what made me order my most expensive prawns ever. The Gamba Con Sobrasada (AUD$8.50) was so ridiculously delicious that I felt good parting SGD$11.05 for ONE smoked prawn.Another must-have is the Arroz Ahumado (AUD$29.50) – smoked wet rice with duck shanks and duck ragu. The duck meat was tender delicious, and you could actually taste the quality of the rice. It was Paella in its very delicious form. My friend subsequently spent his next 5 meals in Melbourne eating rice hoping to find that same taste. He didn’t.Every dish from the Cured Pork Loin Truffle Salami (AUD$28.50), Fig Salad (AUD$17.00) and Calamari Sandwich ($7.00) was nothing short of brilliant.The recommended desserts are the Flan ($14.50) crème caramel served with pestinos and Spanish Churros ($12.50) with rich chocolate you can dip into. Or drink the whole cup like I did.A wonderful Spanish meal. “Muchas gracias” to my friend Stragen and the team at MoVida!MoVida Aqui
Level 1, 500 Bourke Street, city (access via Little Bourke Street), Melbourne Australia Tel:+61 3 9663 3038
Opening Hours: 12pm – Late (Mon-Fri), 5pm – Late (Sat)Other Related Entries
The Journal (Melbourne)
Cupcake Central (Melbourne)
Queen Victoria Market (Melbourne)
2012-05-17 00:00:00
The Journal – The Library Cafe at Flinders is an Absolute Charmer
[Melbourne, Australia] You can almost walk past and miss Journal, but thanks to 4Squares, I found one of the most excellent cafes at Flinders. I would call this the ‘Library Cafe’ as it is housed within the City Library and Council of Education building.There is no obvious sign that there is a vibrant café right behind these dark yellow walls, but yellow words spelling “Journal” on its glass windows. Go in through the sliding door at the side.The dark interior looks like it can be a club at night. Yet there is a strong feeling of reading room charm here. And its crowd – tertiary students reading their texts, executives grabbing a cuppa, and business people having quick meetings – makes this the place to people watch. Or you can choose a seat by the window looking out Flinders Street.The Journal Café downstairs serves great coffee and simple fare which you can check on its blackboard; while the Canteen upstairs offer simple Italian style cuisines and New York Delis.Amidst the great breakfasts, salads, bruschetta, and specials, I had an egg and ham roll which was more than what I expected. This tastes better than it looks – fluffy bun which is a delight and goes easy on the teeth.The ham and cheese croissant with its buttery fragrance, is an example of how you can make simple things taste delicious and right.And its coffee is better than good. This café has all the right energy. Journal is an absolute charmer.Journal
253 Flinders Lane (Near Degraves Street) Melbourne VIC 3000,  Australia (Nearby Stations: Flinders St),Tel: +61 3 9650 4399
Opening Hours: Mon-Fri (7am – 9pm), Sat-Sun (7am-6pm)Other Related Entries
Queen Victoria Market (Melbourne)
Cupcake Central (Melbourne)
MoVida Aqui (Melbourne)
2012-05-16 00:00:00
Tian Tian vs Ah-Tai – Who Wins The Chicken Rice War?
Tian Tian Chicken Rice, known to be Singapore’s top chicken rice and featured on Anthony Bourdain’s programme No Reservations, had lost its ‘Master Chef’.The man, better known as Ah Tai, who has been cooking the famed Tian Tian Chicken Rice set up another chicken rice shop just 3 stalls away at Maxwell. His stall has been attracting media fanfare and a longer queue during lunch. (I sense lots of drama because he is also a relative of Tian Tian’s boss Ms Loi Mui Yin who sacked him after a quarrel!)So who wins the chicken rice war?Firstly, Tian Tian’s winning formula to me has to be its rice. Even Anthony Bourdain said that the chicken rice is so fragrant and delicious that it can be eaten on its own. Probably one of the best chicken rice in Singapore, it’s warm, fluffy, fragrant and tasty. So good I can just eat it with the chilli sauce.Ah Tai’s rice is very similar, too similar. It is served with a special sauce poured over, though I noticed the taste of the rice could be uneven at parts. Despite what many reviewers said, Tian Tian’s rice resonates better with me.Both chickens are fresh, cold and succulent. Ah Tai’s chicken came boneless, and made eating a lot easier.As Ah Tai staff was seeing me taking lots of photos of their food, I was immediately served a bowl of hot soup. Despite that, Ah Tai’s clear soup is very comfortable on the tummy, and felt ‘healthier’ and less salty.Another must-have with my chicken rice is ‘tau gay’. Tian Tian’s bean sprouts were served hot with cut chillies and shallots – very crunchy, and tasty with the dash of chicken oil poured over.Ah Tai’s sprouts lacked that same crunchiness. Though I must say their staff is very polite and tries to interact with you on a personal basis (compared to the systematic ‘cold’ queue at Tian Tian) – perhaps the cause of the longer waiting times as well.Overall, both chicken rices are definitely delicious and it is almost hard to differentiate if you do a blind-taste test. After all, Ah-Tai cooked with Tian Tian for 20 years. If I were to pick one stall to eat from, it would still be Tian Tian. I know you may disagree with me.Tian Tian Hainanese Chicken Rice
1 Kadayanallur Street, #01-10 Maxwell Food Centre, Singapore (Chinatown MRT Station) Tel: +65 9691 4852
Opening Hours: 11am – 8 Daily (Closed on Mons)Ah-Tai Hainanese Chicken Rice
1 Kadayayanallur Street, #01-07 Maxwell Food Centre, Singapore (Chinatown MRT Station)  Tel: +65 8137 6559
Opening Hours: 11am – 8pm Daily (or till sold out)Other Related Entries
Loy Kee Chicken Rice (Balestier)
Beach Road Scissor Cut Curry Rice (Jalan Besar)
Sin Kee Chicken Rice (Margaret Drive)
Golden Mile Claypot Rice (Golden Mile)
Kay Lee Roast Meat Joint (Paya Lebar)
2012-05-14 00:00:00
Pizza & Empanadas – An Argentinian “Curry Puff” anyone?
If you have not tried one before, an empanada is a baked stuffed pastry popular in many Latin American countries. The name comes from the word ‘empanar’ which means ‘to wrap in bread’. This version looks almost like our local curry puffs, except that it is baked instead of deep-fried.Attracted to the fragrant smells of the crusts, I could not help trying the beef and mushroom mozzarella empanadas ($1.30 each). The former with fillings of spice-marinated beef, hardboiled egg and chopped onions reminded us of a meatier cousin of the curry puff. The baked chewy dough tastes plainer and healthier, with delicious hot-piping minced beef oozing out. Sumptuous!Full Post at InSing.com – Argentinian dishes at Tanglin Halt Food CentrePizza & Empanadas
48A Tanglin Halt Road, #01-34 Tanglin Halt Market & Food Centre, Tel: +65 8151 1406
Opening Hours: 11am – 8pm (Daily except Thursdays)Other Related Entries
Tip Top The Puff Factory
Rolina Curry Puffs (Tanjong Pagar)
Teochew Handmade Pau (Toa Payoh Lor 1)
Ann Chin Popiah (Chinatown)
Mei Xiang Goreng Pisang (Changi Village)
2012-05-11 00:00:00
Just Noodles – Which Are Singapore’s Most Popular Noodle Stalls?
“Just Noodles 面对面” which just ended its run has rekindled my love for noodles. It does have a refreshing take as compared to other food programmes, choosing to focus on one noodle dish per week – from the old, to the expensive and the popular.Sometimes, I pity Kym Ng and wonder if she really had 15 x 7 = 105 different noodles!I managed to find old National Library Nam Seng Wanton Mee, and budget value-for-money delicious Pin Xiang Dumpling Noodles.The following are popular stalls which gathered the highest number of votes from netizens. The Blanco Court Prawn Mee, Fei Fei Wanton Mee, and Crawford Lane Bak Chor Mee which all have huge followings do not come as a surprise.Amongst which, there is my favourite Ban Mian L32 Handmade Noodles which also offers a dry meatball version.Noodles – Most Popular Stall 
Wanton Mee    飞飞云吞面 – 62 , 64 Joo Chiat Place / Blk 75 Toa Payoh Lor 5
Prawn Mee    白兰阁街大虾面 – 243/245 Beach Road
Bak Chor Mee    吊桥头大华肉脞面 – 465 Crawford Lane #01-12
Fishball Noodles   周记潮州鱼圆面 – 505 Beach Rd Golden Mile Food Ctr #B1-47
Lor Mee    新美香福建卤面粿 – Blk 51 Old Airport Road #01-116
Ban Mian    L.32 Handmade Noodles – 558 Geylang Road Lorong 32
Duck Noodle    东陵副美味鸭面 – 48 Tanglin Halt Road #01-23 Tanglin Halt Market S148813
Hokkien Mee    天天来炒福建虾面 – Blk 127 Toa Payoh Lor 1#02-27
Fried Kway Teow    老夫子炒粿条 – 51 Old Airport Road, #01-12 Old Airport Road Food Centre
Laksa    Wei Yi Laksa & Prawn Noodle – 48A Tanglin Halt Road, #01-20 Tanglin Halt Market
Chicken Noodle    Lee Fun Nam Kee Chicken Rice & Restaurant – 94 Toa Payoh Lor 4, #01-04
Curry Noodle    大坡海南鸡饭-咖哩鸡面 – 505 Beach Road，Golden Mile Food Centre #B1-53
Beef Noodle    星洲海南牛肉粉 – Blk 22D Toa Payoh Lor 7 #01-388 Singapore 314022
Dumpling Noodle    山仔顶基记面家 – #02-49 Hong Lim Food Centre
Yong Tau Fu   喜相逢酿豆腐 – Blk 724 Ang Mo Kio Ave 6 #01-23Sadly, Kok Kee Wanton Mee and Bedok 85 Noodles did not make the cut. There are some which does not seem to be as popular or delicious – Lao Fu Zi or Come Daily are decent, but never really left an impression to warrant a Number 1.So which noodle stall do you think deserve/do not deserve to be on that list?Other Related Entries
Nam Seng Noodles (Far East Square)
Pin Xiang Noodles(Toa Payoh Lor 4)
Ah Guan Mee Pok (Syed Awi)
Hua Kee Wanton Mee (Old Airport Road)
Wheres The Best Beef Horfun
2012-05-10 00:00:00
Lucky13 – Miami-style Diner Impresses with Sumptuous Latin American Food
Lucky 13 is a Miami-style diner, bar and club which just opened at TripleOne Somerset. Helmed by Chef Garfield Angove from the United States, the menu would include some of the sexy Latin American and Mexican signature cuisines which include Quesadilla, grilled achiote chicken, Mexican style grilled steak, pressed Cuban medianoche sandwich and Cajun style blackened fish tacos.I highly recommend The Chef Platter ($32 nett) which has all the Lucky 13 favourites in all, suitable for sharing among 2-3 diners. The platter is quite value-for-money as it includes sautéed tiger prawns, quesadillas, tortilla chips, spicy mojo drumlets and potato croquestas topped with homemade fresh salsa.The Cuban-style spicy mojo drumlets have left the deepest impression for me. They are incredibly delicious, bursting with flavours of sweet, salty and spiciness.Full Post at InSing.com – Lucky 13, a Miami-style diner in SomersetLucky 13
TripleOne Somerset (facing Devonshire road), 111 Somerset Road #01-02, Singapore 238164 (Somerset MRT)
Tel: +65 6733 9800
Opening Hours: Mondays & Tuesday – 5pm to 1am, Wednesday & Thursdays – 5pm to 2am, Fridays & Saturdays – 5pm to 3amOther Related Entries
The Mexican (Bras Basah)
TAB (Orchard)
Singapore Sling Boutique (Clarke Quay)
OverTime (Dempsey)
Limoncello Restaurant (Robertson Quay)
2012-05-09 00:00:00
Cupcake Central – Indulge in Melbourne’s Cupcake Wonderland
[Melbourne, Australia] Cupcake Central is Melbourne’s better known cupcake shop. Located just outside the dining hall at Melbourne Central, I felt like Alice lost in Cupcakewonderland just looking at the pretty little pinky things.You would wish you had that extra tummy to stuff in the black velvet, vanilla vanilla, devil’s food chocolate, raspberry white chocolate, citrus lemon and cherry pistachio cupcakes.And if you think only clothes have seasonal styles, Cupcake Central always offers new creations to go with the holidays and times (like an Autumn collection). Are you salivating already?With a slogan like “Hatch that dream”, this café and bakery is the story of an IT consultant Sheryl Thai who was inspired by the infamous Magnolia Bakery at New York, set up an online business, and eventually achieved that dream. A constant reminder that we should always pursue our dreams, and nothing should stop us.The Salted Caramel Cupcake (AUD$4.00) was all fluffy-sweet-delicious. The light cream cheese frosting makes it one of the best ever tasted. If only the cake was more luxurious.Perhaps the luxurious component went to the Hot Chocolate (AUD$3.30). With melted chocolate shavings on top, this is easily the most satisfying chocolate drink I had in a long time. Okay, make that the best ever.Learn from my mistakes. Leave more room for more of their delectable cupcakes. Don’t just have one.Cupcake Central Workshop
Level 2, Dining Hall, Melbourne Central, City VIC 3000, Australia Tel: +61 03 9077 4542
Another Café at Shop 7, 672 Glenferrie Road Hawthorn VIC 3122
Opening Hours: Mon – Thurs 10:00am – 7pm, Fri 10:00am – 9:00pm, Sat & Sun 10:00am – 6:00pmOther Related Entries
Queen Victoria Market (Melbourne)
2012-05-08 00:00:00
Flam’s – A New French Alsatian ‘Pizza’ Place
Flam’s, not to be confused with ‘phlegm’, is short for Flammekueche – an Alsatian bread dough that looks like the thinnest form of pizza.Flam’s is the only Flemmekueche specialist from France with a history of more than 20 years and makes it first foray in Singapore at Orchard Central. My university makan kakis were excited because it was ‘French’ – you know the romance, the love and the delicate cuisines. Though approaching the shop, it looked anything but French.The colour scheme was orange-bright with casual setting, somewhat Moroccan looking. One can be forgiven if he thinks that this is another higher-end fast food restaurant or a branch of Nandos.So I asked the waiter a Flams-101 question, “What is the difference between this and Italian pizza?”And his response is … “This is much nicer (chuckles), and comes in many flavours.” Right.Literally meaning “pie baked in the flames”, the Flemmekueche does come in several flavours, such as goat cheese with honey, fresh mushroom, chicken tarragon, parmentiere (minced beef) and authentic french camembert ($12.90 – 18.00). And it is baked in a special oven in less than 3 minutes at 360°c, so the order came fast.My Authentic Traditional ($12.90) came in a thinly spread bread dough served whole on a wooden cutting board, covered with light cream-based mix, topped with small bacon strips smoked over beech wood and onions. Even though it is not a pizza, it look like a thin or Skinny Pizza.The Alsatian ‘pizza’ indeed taste as how it looks like – light, thin, fluffy, slightly crisp and actually filling. My verdict: The food we tried (such as French onion soup and sausages) was passable, wasn’t memorable either and I wonder if this can indeed survive. I hope so.If you are a growing teenager or army boy, the All Flam’s (free flow of traditional flams!) with one free salad at $24.90 will work for you. Reminds me of the old Pizza Hut buffet days.Flam’s
Orchard Central #02-03, Singapore 238896 (5 min from Somerset MRT) Tel: +65 6884 4202
www.flams-asia.com
Opening Hours: 11.30am-10.30pm Sun-Thu, 11.30am-11pm Fri-SatOther Related Entries
Spizza (East Coast)
Peperoni Pizzeria (Zion Road)
Da Paolo Ristorante (Holland Village)
Verve Pizzeria (One North)
Covelli Italian Bistro & Wine Bar (Orchard Central)
2012-05-07 00:00:00
Pin Xiang Noodles – Value-For-Money $2.50 Delicious Dumpling Noodles
After watching the variety show “Just Noodles 面对面 by Kym Ng and Bryan Wong, I decided to make my way to find the cheapest and most delicious dumpling 水饺 noodles in Singapore. The programme features noodle stalls that sell the costliest or best value-for-money noodles, stalls with the longest historical background, most highly recommended stalls, etc. How many of you are actually fans of this programme?I have a secret to share – I am a closet fan of ‘Ms Tan’ Kym Ng, plus noodles definitely ranks top on my favourite hawker dish.In the entire hawker centre at Toa Payoh Lor 4, it was not difficult to find the featured stall – “Pin Xiang 品香” which had the longest queue (about 10 people waiting at 7plus am).The stall owner was entertaining to watch, very friendly and animated, apologizing to loyal customers for the sudden long queue.The dumpling noodles ($2.50 alone, $1 to add chicken or mushrooms) does not disappoint! The QQ noodles is coated with the tasty dark soya sauce which is very KL-style, and marinated mushrooms (must have been marinated for days) is so awesome flavourful.When you bite into the dumplings, you can see fresh shrimps and bits of water chestnut and carrots which add to the crunch.Most noodle soups are actually plain-tasting or full of MSG. Their version is cooked using anchovies and soya bean, adding sight sweetness.The drink stall auntie nearby didn’t look happy and said they must have paid for the television exposure. I do not know how much of this is true (Can anybody verify?) but this dumpling stall truly deserves to be featured.Pin Xiang Noodles 品香
Blk 93 Toa Payoh Lor 4 #01-46
Opening Hours: 4:45am – 11:00am (Closes on Mon)Other Related Entries
Hua Feng Mian Jia (Tiong Bahru)
Ah Guan Mee Pok (Syed Awi)
Hua Kee Wanton Mee (Old Airport Road)
Bugis Street Ngak Seah Beef Kway Teow (Lavender)
Ah Tee Ko Ko Mee (Golden Mile)
2012-05-04 00:00:00
Caffé B – Italian Fine Dining with a Japanese Twist
While Caffé B is thought to be a café, its food and ambience is anything about it. Located at the The Shoppes at Marina Bay Sands opposite Mont Blanc, this is nouveau Italian fine dining restaurant and bar, serving cuisines with a Japanese essence.The owner is Japanese, that’s why. The ‘B’ is said to be a random addition because the owner likes the ring of the sound.The Pappardelle with Wagyu Beef Bolognese ($28) is the best dish of the lunch, and my dining partner MoonBerry is likely to agree with the verdict. Perhaps the Japanese factor worked in well so the beef sauce is not overpowering, coating the al dente large broad fettuccine evenly. Highly pleasurable.The Le Linguine ($32), a linguine dish in a zucchini cream sauce topped with sautéed scallop is a beauty. Though the pasta looks better than it tastes. Don’t get me wrong – it is a decent light pasta with the scallop adding a delicate finish, but I expected more oomph and savour.There could be a divided view on the Porcini Risotto. My personal take is that the rice grows on you, especially it is of a high quality and unique aged Italian Carnaroli rice, a medium-grained rice native to the Vercelli province of northern Italy.On the first bite, the risotto tastes… ‘matured’, possibly because it uses porcini mushroom and a 24-month aged Parmigiano Reggiano cheese. 2 years is old for cheese. Its after taste Japanese with Italian always work for me.  is very strong, distinctly-mushroomy and definitely memorable. And strangely, I grew to like it and probably would return for this again.Caffé B is a charming place, though lunch time crowd was slightly sparse. This could be a combination of its location which is away from the restaurants, and naming causing wrong perceptions. Food-wise, Italian with Japanese always work for me.Caffé B
2 Bayfront Avenue, B1-15 & 01-83, The Shoppes at Marina Bay Sands, Singapore 018972 Tel: +65 6887 3311
Opening Hours: Lunch 12pm – 3pm, Dinner 6-11pmOther Related Entries
Limoncello Restaurant (Robertson Quay)
Covelli Italian Bistro & Wine Bar (Orchard Central)
Da Paolo Ristorante (Holland Village)
Spizza (East Coast)
Peperoni Pizzeria (Zion Road)
2012-05-03 00:00:00
Purple Mustard – Chicago-style hot dog shop opens in Singapore
Brand new hotdog shop Purple Mustard has opened its doors at Icon Village near Village, bringing American-style goodness.And who says that mustard has to be yellow in colour? One of Purple Mustard’s co-owners absolutely love the colour purple, and the culinary team decided to put together their very own purple mustard!If you are wondering, no, their purple mustard is not made of colourings but from Jim Bean-soaked blueberries. This freshly-coloured mustard is topped on their signature ‘Barnyard Dog’ ($9) which has beef and guinness sausage and generous toppings of caramelised onions. The sausage is moist and juicy, yet not too fatty. And it is the unique purple mustard sauce with a sweet fruity aftertaste which blew me away.Full Post at InSing.com -Purple Mustard, a Chicago-style hot dog jointPurple Mustard (Icon Village)
12 Gopeng Street, #01-31/32 ICON Village (near Tanjong Pagar MRT), Tel: +65 6221 8498
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri: 11am – 9pm; Sat: 12pm – 9pm (Closed on Sun)Other Related Entries
Most Original Burger MOB (Vivocity)
Everything With Fries (Orchard Central)
Burger Shack (Bt Timah)
15 Minutes (Lasalle)
Rock & Ash (Marina Square)
2012-05-02 00:00:00
Queen Victoria Market – A Must Visit To Its Sumptuous Deli Hall
[Melbourne, Australia] For first time travelers to Melbourne, a visit to the iconic Queen Victoria Market is a must. You won’t regret it. Being the largest open air market in the Southern Hemisphere 7 hectares, it sells almost from fruits and vegetables to clothing, jewellery and arts & crafts.For food lovers, simply make your way to the Deli Hall starting with McIvers Coffee & Tea. All my senses, especially my sight, were bombarded with the freshest foods, bright colours, big blocks of cheese and good-looking foods. A visual feast.Make a round first before settling on something. You only have that much stomach room. If you are just wondering, Spanish chocolate churros, American jam donuts, Middle Eastern pide bread, Dutch pancakes, classic pizzas and macaroons are just some of international delights you can find at Queen Vic.These are three food-licious choices without hurting your wallet.Borek (Shop 95, Deli Hall)
There are not many places where you can get breakfast or lunch for only AUD$2.50. Probably the Deli’s most popular stall, it sells Borek which is a long Turkish pastry filled with lamb, potato and vegetable, or cheese and spinach. The warm tasty fillings and flaky crust make this real value for your Aussie money.The Bratwurst Shop  (Shop 99-100, Deli Hall)
Choose a sausage – mild, spicy and weisswurst (I would say go for the spicy). Then top it up with one of their ten sauces, and spicy mustard should do just right. Add some caramelised onions and you are in for some old school sumptuous European treat.Café Ren Shop (Shop 93-94, Deli Hall)
This stall displays stacks and stacks of buns, burgers, rolls, wraps, foccacias and sandwiches made using the freshest market ingredient. The traffic-light colours on the toasted veggie panini are so garden-fresh they look like out of a pencil case. But I simply could not resist the ham and egg burger where the yolk just oozes with savour.After you grab your food, take a seat outside to enjoy your buys and air, buzzing atmosphere and street buskers serenating you with amazing talents.Queen Victoria Market
513 Elizabeth Street, Melbourne VIC 3000, Phone: +61 3 9320 5822, info@qvm.com.au
Opening Hours: 6am – 2pm (Tues, Thurs, Sat), 6am – 5pm (Fri) 9am – 4pm (Sun), Closed on Mon & Wed
Directions: Get on the Melbourne Free City Circle tram and get off at Elizabeth or Queen StreetOther Related Entries
The Journal (Melbourne)
Cupcake Central (Melbourne)
MoVida Aqui (Melbourne)
2012-05-01 00:00:00
Charly T’s – Not Common To Find an American Sloppy Joe Here
What’s a Sloppy Joe? Not your lazy schoolmate I hope. It is hard to find Sloppy Joes in Singapore, the American classic burger with ground beef, onions, sweetened tomato sauce or ketchup and other seasonings. Otherwise known as the “loose meat” sandwich, this burger does not come with the typical beef slices or patties, but browned minced meat.Over at lunch Charly T’s, FoodNews’s PR Karen highly recommended its Sloppy Joe ($8.50), also because I was on braces and she had one bandaged arm. A minced meat burger would just work fine for us.It was a greast choice, and thank goodness this version was not as messy as I thought. The burger arrived slightly open-faced, with the ground meat holding together like a patty by melted cheese.When you cut the ‘patty’ open, the hot beef sauce would ‘melt’ down with the bread absorbs its tomato-based seasoning. Meaty and tasty, this reminds me of a Coney hotdog, burger version.Another interesting American dish available is the Chicken Cordon Bleu ($14, and not to be confused with the cooking school), with deep fried boneless chicken breast pounded and rolled around a ham with melted cheese within. My advice: eat it hot when the cheese is still warm (which was my biggest regret this meal).For desserts, do not leave without trying the Kaiserschmarrn ($14). Loosely translated to mean Emperor’s Mishmash, this contains warm and fluffy caramelized pancakes sprinkled with powdered sugar, raisins and served with a generous scoop of French Vanilla ice cream. Even though I had no more space, I made room for the ice cream, with a texture so unique that I would come back again just for this.Charly T’s
112 East Coast Road, Level 3, I12 Katong, Singapore 428802, Tel: (65) 6636 4701 (1st Branch at Nomu Building near The Cathay)
Opening Hours: Monday to Thursday: 11am to 11pm, Friday: 11am to 1am. Saturday: 9am to 1am (Breakfast 9am to 12noon), Sunday: 9am to 11pm (Breakfast 9am to 12noon), Eve of public holidays closed at 1amOther Related Entries
Charly T’s (Nomu Building)
Most Original Burger MOB (Vivocity)
Everything With Fries (Orchard Central)
Burger Shack (Bt Timah)
Relish (Cluny Court)
2012-04-30 00:00:00
What’s in a Food Blogger’s Bag?
People who happened to carry my bag say that it is a like bag of gold – weight-wise. Other than the fact that it is always freaking heavy, I would like to think that the items inside are very precious to me.Despite using this bag for about 5 years, some people still come up to me and say they like it. And I end up feeling proud for ‘him’ because he has been through with me many highs and low. ‘He’ is a Muji, bought somewhere in Tokyo. I would like to say my bag is steady, sturdy, understated and no-frills.This camera, a Canon 550D is a prize won from the InSing hawker food lovers’ competition – whom I end up being a writer for. Despite having other cameras, this is my favourite because I had to eat and guess crocodile meat blind-folded to win it.Other than the Canon, my iPhone4 has become a reliable tool for my food shoots, especially for Instagram where iphonography is in the rage. The iTouch is my travel companion because I travel long distances to work. It is currently filled with sermons, Hillsongs and lots of Latino music.Interviewing F&B entrepreneurs, cooks and hawkers can be a challenging yet rewarding experience, allowing me to understand what goes behind that dish I am eating. Most of these recordings via this Sony mp3 recorder end up being played on my radio programme on Radio1003 every Sunday mornings.Even though my wallet is almost torn apart, there is huge sentimental value to me as it is a gift. Oh yes, other than keeping cash, I remind myself to keep all my receipts because they remind me how much I am spending on food – which can be a high percentage of my salary!This is a surprise find in a food blogger’s bag – sports attire! A reminder that we eat too much and need to say healthy. Staying in shape is really hard for me, since it’s in my genes (I used to be really fat). Food blogging doesn’t help. I make it a point to hit the gym at least 3 times a week. Crazy discipline I know. Those yellow sticks are Zumba Toning weights which add resistance while doing classes.Let me introduce you Kaze, who never fails to travel with me. I hope to bring him to 50 different countries, to try great foods from these wondrous countries. The target is still far, and my dream continues to achieve it.
2012-04-27 00:00:00
Macau Cheng Ji 成记粥品 – Best Congee Ever In A Road Side Lane
[Macau] Talk about Macanese food and the visions of Portuguese Egg Tarts, Pork Chop Buns, Ginger Milk Dessert and Crab Congee start appearing. And Macau boosts many congee porridge restaurants and stalls.After a visit to the Ruins of St. Paul’s, I saw a queue of people outside a narrow street lane. Narrow is an understatement. It is one of those lane that is in between two shophouses, potentially dirty, possibly for people to park their bikes.So imagine my surprise when I go further in and see two rows of at least 15 people slurping on fresh hot congee in a place where I would not think twice entering. How can they squeeze a shop here? But the sight and smell of the congee cannot be wrong.At 成记粥品, we sat on a flimsy stool in this dark lane, ate on a long wooden table and I just ordered “whatever the rest is having” – There is no menu.  It was quite hot as a row of women were furiously cooking away. After 10 minutes of wait, the famed congee arrived.This is possibly the best roadside congee, no, best congee I ever had. Hot, piping, smooth, silky, tasty and yet you can savour bits of the rice. The pork meat and liver slices were fresh and tender, complementing the full flavours of the porridge. Add some dough sticks, and this is what I call simple pleasures of life.However, it is the handmade juicy meatballs within which is crazy delicious and fulfilling. You can taste the real bite of the meat, and not just flour and starch. Two bowls were about 32 Macau Pataca, which is SGD$5!The boss of  the congee chatted a while with me, on how much he loved Singapore and Chinatown, but found it too expensive to visit his relatives. He is really a funny guy. And just a note, 成记粥品 is personally recommended by renowned food critic Chua Lam 蔡瀾.成记粥品
Grand Street, Avenida de Almeida Ribeiro 新馬路新馬路營地大街吳家圍 （Near Rua Da Felicidade）, Macau  Tel: (853) 6660 1295
Opening Hours: Morning 9am till noonOther Related Entries
Macau Munch (Bugis)
88 Congee (Toa Payoh Lor 1)
Zhen Zhen Porridge (Maxwell Food Centre)
Mak’s vs Tsim (Hong Kong)
2012-04-25 00:00:00
Obolo Galéria – French-styled Macarons at Rochester Mall
Obolo, a local start-up synonymous with desserts, has also opened a brand new dining concept Obolo Galéria at Rochester mall. It was first established during 2004 by chef-owners and couple Mac Woo and June Lee as an online pâtisserie and has since gained a loyal following. Other than its signature cakes and pastries, this Obolo Galéria is a bakery café that serves up a breakfast and brunch menu and other savouries such as fresh salads, sandwiches, pastas and pizzas.Obolo is known for its French-styled macarons ($2.35) and it is said to be one of the best locally-made ones around. The flavours they offer are already very appealing, such as earl grey milk chocolate, salted caramel and mango-passion. But it was the cream white champagne marcaon with golden dust on top which captured our hearts – smooth, light, not overly sweet and with a subtle touch of alcohol.Full Post at InSing.com – Obolo Galéria opens at Rochester MallOBOLO Galéria
35 Rochester Drive #01-08 The Rochester Mall Singapore 138639 (Buona Vista MRT)
Tel: 6570 0102 / Fax: 6570 1130
Opening Hours: 10am to midnight (Sun – Thu); 10am to 1am (Fri – Sat)Other Related Entries
Drips Bakery Café (Tiong Poh Road)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
Brunetti (Tanglin Mall)
Twelve Cupcakes (Millenia Walk)
Centre Ps (Tiong Bahru)
2012-04-24 00:00:00
Wild Honey – Would You Favour Eggs Over Service?
At the entrance of Wild Honey, the signature states “No Place Like Home”. I was half expecting a friendly cosy place where I could relax with my friends, while savouring All-Day Breakfast for dinner.This is only half-true. Perhaps their definition is home is where people are stone-faced and cannot be bothered to look at you. (Imagine how my brother is when I don’t do the housework.)However, no doubt about it, Wild Honey is THE place in Singapore to have your eggs and bread any time of the day.The English ($22.00) – an ensemble of scrambled eggs, back bacon, Cumberland pork sausage, mushrooms, baked beans, potatoes and grilled tomato is one of the best I ever had, even beating many versions from hotels. The eggs are creamy smooth, a perfect match with the huge juicy sausage bursting with flavours. And I haven’t even talked about the de-li-cious sautéed mushrooms.It is almost a crime to come here without trying the European ($18.00) – Wild Honey’s version of Eggs Benedict with almost perfect poached eggs and homemade Hollandaise sauce on signature brioche. This visual spectacular sent my photo straight to the popular page of Instagram.The comfortable setting and seats make this almost the best place for a tai tai dinner.However, service was not on-par. There were service staff around but I did not know where they were hiding when I needed my ketchup and refills. When I eventually got their attention, the straight-faced non-smiling service staff looked as though my entire table owed him money.Apparantly, The Wild Honey Mandarin Gallery has been slammed by netizen Gary Tan for allegedly favouring foreigners over Singaporeans. The director Guy Wachs comments on “We deeply regret your remark” probably added fuel to fire. A case of miscommunication or poor service? When a restaurant gets too popular, service may get too cocky? Maybe.For its eggs, I would still come back again, despite its service. We had a good meal. What about you – would your favour eggs over service?Wild Honey
6 Scotts Road #03-01 Scotts Square, Singapore (Orchard Road MRT) Tel: +65 6636 1816
Other branch: 331A Orchard Road, #03-02 Mandarin Gallery
Opening Hours: 9am – 10pm (Mon-Fri), 9am – 10:30pm (Sat-Sun)Other Related Entries
Eggs & Berries (Changi City Point)
Delicious (Scotts Square)
Jones The Grocer (Dempsey)
The Tastings Room (Marina Square)
Singapore Loves Food That Oozes
2012-04-23 00:00:00
Le Chocolat Café – Go WOW with The Rainbow Cake
The Rainbow Cake seems to be the next big thing in the world of cafes and cake shops. If all cakes would to join a beauty contest now, this visual treat would win hands down.Who won’t be attracted by a seven (or some six) multi-coloured cake? This is for sure to make kids jump with joy and young girls whip out their handphones for a cam moment. (Read: Rainbow Pancakes at Nook DIY House of Pancakes)The most popular Rainbow Cake in Singapore is from The Production Kitchen by Jacqui Co (in the midst of relocation), also famous for its carrot and chocolate cakes, and Madagascar vanilla bean cupcakes with salted caramel frosting. They are often swamped with orders, and making each is too labour-intensive.Its customized 7-inch rainbow cake cost a whooping 100 bucks though.I had my Rainbow Cake at Le Chocolat Café for $7 a slice, recommended by my friend Elaine and the reliable i-weekly. When the cake arrived, we almost went for an orgasmic “wow”.The bright red-orange-yellow-green-blue-dark purple cake was covered with chocolate and dripping beautifully with chocolate. It felt like chocolate rain over the velvet sky.What the Rainbow Cake can promise in beauty, it may not in taste. Every layer was almost too sweet, possible over-enhanced with the food colourings. And if you closed your eyes to eat them, it would just feel like a saccharine butter cake.Other places which sell the Rainbow Cake in Singapore include 1 Caramel Dessert Boutique, Designer Bakes at Centrepoint and My Fat Lady at Haji Lane. Drop a comment here if you know of anywhere else.Le Chocolat Café
28 Ann Siang Road, The Club Hotel, Singapore +65 6808 2188
Opening Hours: 8am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
The Story Of Twelve Cupcakes
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
3 Inch Sin (Millenia Walk)
Centre Ps (Tiong Bahru)
2012-04-20 00:00:00
Wheat Baumkuchen – Dolphin, Penguin, Whale and Seal Noodles?
It was Miss Tam Chiak who first introduced me this Japanese Baumkuchen cake shop at Toa Payoh, which diversified to sell Japanese noodles of a different style.How does cold ramen, soba and white noodles cooked ‘pasta-style’ sound to you? Or ‘Ice Cube’ ($3.00), which is cold tofu with Thai-infused sauce.My friend Kenny who just works upstairs at One Raffles Place says he never tried this noodle bar because he would never eat strange noodles called Dolphin, Penguin, Whale and Seal. True that it sounds quite wrong. But these noodles are so-called, because they are named after animals staying in the cold climate.Wheat Baumkuchen which is unglam-ly located next to an escalator, proves to be a hit with OLs aka office ladies at the CBD. Let’s just say eating these noodles feels like downing a bowl of salad. You won’t feel guilty at all eating this.The OL popular dish seems to be the Penguin ($7.80 for a set with lemon tea) – green soba noodles with shredded chicken, fried eggs, quail eggs, Japanese cucumber mixed in roasted sesame sauce. The overall combination is very refreshingly oishii, and somewhat makes you feel you are dining at some foreign country.My Dolphin ($7.80 for a set) is ramen noodles in miso sauce with prawns, carrot, lettuce and quail egg. This may not satisfy heavy eaters (esp if you finished a workout at California Fitness opposite) because the portion is rather small.This is what I call simple healthy pleasures. The creative Dolphin dish is not something you get all the time. It is like what its name suggest – tasting cold, looking cute and somewhat delightful.Wheat Baumkuchen Pastry & Noodle Bar
1 Raffles Place, #B1-15 One Raffles Place (OUB Centre), Singapore (Raffles Place) Tel: +65 6535 0277
Opening Hours: 8am – 8pm (Mon–Fri)Other Related Entries
Wheat Baumkuchen (Toa Payoh)
Salad Stop! (One Raffles Place)
Fresh+ (Asia Square)
Youmenya Goemon (Marina Bay Link)
AKB48 Café (*Scape)
2012-04-19 00:00:00
5 Oozing Food – Singapore Loves Food That Oozes
If I ask what the current food fad in Singapore is, it is undeniable that the soya beancurd would come up tops for taking over the hawker centre scene by storm.On a more up-market level, All-Breakfast joints are taking the lead and many Western eateries are coming up with their own versions of the humble poached eggs. Attacking customers after their meal is the dessert called chocolate lava cake, also making their way into many cafe menus. And on the Chinese restaurant side, how many haven’t tried the Shanghainese Xiao Long Bao?What do they all have in common? They ooze.Daniel’s Food Diary rounds up 5 popular foods in Singapore, which have captured our hearts, which ooze, literally.The Eggs Benedict is a dish that consists of two halves of an English muffin, topped with ham or bacon, poached eggs and Hollandaise sauce. Its attractiveness is perhaps because Singaporeans already like the half-cooked eggs. Look at the Yakuns, Toast Boxes and ramens shops with their half-boiled eggs. Plus who can resist when the oozing yolk flows and gets absorbed by a sweet roasted muffin.Get your supply from Wild Honey, Eggs & Berries, Choupinette and Hatched – where you can have poached eggs for dinner.Xiao Long Bao, more affectionately known as XLB, are known as ‘soup dumplings’ where the soup gelatin inside melts when they are heated. You can pop the entire XLB into your mouth, or more correctly poke a small hole at the top and suck the oozing soup stock within.The most well-liked restaurant in Singapore has to be Ding Tai Fung, the Taiwanese brand which ranked as one of the world’s Top Ten Best Restaurants by The New York Times. Paradise Dynasty with its multi-coloured XLB has earned a royal following, including myself.Word has it that the Molten Chocolate Lava Cake was created as a result of a baking mistake as the chocolate cakes were taken out too soon. Still, the warm chocolate cake oozing out decadence is a feast on the eye and the tongue, especially when sauce within is still (many cakes unfortunately don’t flow well).3 Inch Sin is perhaps one of the few cafes around in Singapore which specialize in making them, along with alcoholic flavours.I am not sure if you have passed by this bakery known as Barcook Bakery, but queues of people are there for its signature Cream Cheese Raisin Bun. What’s special about it? Its filling oozes. Eat them warm, and you won’t regret. Many bread shops have come up with their own versions, but none can compare.And there is this Chinese bao which oozes so much that its filling burst out and spilled on my white shirt and all over my hands. Caught unaware, I was both full of love and hate for the Custard Bun Liu Sha Bao – available at Victor’s Kitchen.The multi-layed sensory, the warm flow on the taste buds… Are there any other food which you love that Oozes?Other Related Entries
5 Things You May Not Know About Xiao Long Bao
Top 5 Food Fads of 2011
5 Must Try Food in Taipei
Most Visited Food Posts in 2011 
Best Food Newcomers of 2010
2012-04-18 00:00:00
Sweet Salty Spicy – Serving the “World’s Most Delicious Food”
Thai cuisine is known to have a balance of at least three to four fundamental taste senses of sour, sweet, salty, bitter and spicy, thus the naming of this Thai restaurant “Sweet Salty Spicy”. It is obvious why they left bitter and sour out.Some call this place at The Rail Mall a ‘canteen’, with a deli featuring house brand Thai goods, titbits (such as floss crackers) and curry kits.Sweet Salty Spicy’s menu is a collaboration with the famous “Sailors Thai” restaurant in Sydney’s Rock’s District. Therefore, the Thai food served generally has a modern take, with the taste rather muted possibly to suit the ‘ang moh’ expat crowd frequenting here.To introduce one sweet, one salty and one spicy dish…No visit to a Thai restaurant is complete with the sweet  signature dessert of Khao Niaow Ma Muang – Mango with White Sticky Rice ($9) which I would name the Top 10 desserts ever. Their version is surprising good because I seldom had mangoes here with are sweet and succulent, with addition of cashew nuts giving it a light crunch.Mind you, I already had 4 main courses before this, but I still finished the dessert.If you come in a group, try the Tasting Platter ($26) which consist of crispy soft shell crab, rice cakes, ‘miang’ of prawn and pomelo on betel leaves, and prawn vegetable rice roll.I would have expected the fried crabs to steal my attention (which was blah), but it was instead the rice cakes with its addictive salty chicken and prawn chilli dip. The dip reminds me of my own grandma’s cooking and can go well with any rice or crackers.For the spicy, the Curry Triplets ($18) is a value-for-money must-order, where you can select any three from Panang, Green, Massaman, Roast Duck or Jungle Curry.Do you know that the Thai Massaman Curry is chosen as the world’s MOST delicious food by CNNGo? Indeed, its taste is an exciting combination of coconut-ty, salty, spicy and slightly sweet –  which should really be the most representative dish in this restaurant.Sweet Salty Spicy
392/394 Upper Bukit Timah Road, The Rail Mall, Singapore 678047, Tel: +65 6877 2544
Opening Hours: Lunch: 11am–2pm, Dinner: 6pm–11pm (Mon–Fri), Lunch: 11am – 4pm, Dinner: 6pm–11pm (Sat, Sun, PH)Other Related Entries
First Thai (Purvis Street)
Suan Thai Restaurant (Killiney Road)
Thaksin Beef Noodles (Clementi)
Thai Noodle House (Coronation Road)
Porn’s (Liang Seah)
2012-04-17 00:00:00
Fresh+ – Fresh Salad at the New Food Garden
Salad eateries seem to be the favourite new haunt among the PMEBs and I thought of giving Fresh+ a try. Fresh+ has a tantalizing menu comprising salads, gourmet sandwiches, freshly brewed coffees, and juices.There is a ‘Create-Your-Own’ salad counter where you can select any of the 50 plus ingredients along with many choices of homemade salad dressings.Philippe Blin, Managing Director, Fresh+, says “From my experience as an Investment Banker for over 20 years, good and healthy food can bring people together and make the meeting so much more productive. Ordinary food achieves opposite results.”I had a prawn & avocado salad ($12.00) which came in a really big white bowl, with generous portions of lettuce and cucumber. The salad is indeed crisp-fresh and healthy tasting with a zest of lemon. Some may find that using only lemon juice as a dressing being too plain, but we think that the overall combination feels invigorating and reviving.Full Post at InSing.com – Eat Your Greens at Fresh+Fresh+
Asia Square Food Garden, 8 Marina View, #02-11
Opening Hours: Mon-Fri 8am – 9pmOther Related Entries
Salad Stop! (One Raffles Place)
Dapao (Far East Square)
The Rotisserie (China Square Food Centre)
7 Sensations (Millenia Walk)
Jones The Grocer (Dempsey)
2012-04-16 00:00:00
Sugamo Konaya 古奈屋 – Superb Japanese Curry Udon at Roppongi
[Tokyo, Japan] Roppongi Hills has a breath-taking sight during December where most of the trees would be brightened up with Christmas lights, to a dark-blue purple tinge. Other than that, Roppongi Hills contains the Mori Tower, stores, a museum, an observation deck, and my favourite Curry Udon shop.The idea of Curry Udon may put some off because both seem ‘thick’. Trust me, I do not even enjoy udon but 古奈屋 Konaya’s version is very memorable. Konaya is a chain of restaurant famous for its unusual take on curry udon with additional sides such as deep fried banana and onsen poached eggs, and has spread its wings to Taiwan and Thailand.Here’s what special about its curry: TWENTY TWO types of fruits and spices are thrown into a pot and cooked thoroughly for THREE days until the sauce becomes really creamy and slightly special.I had the Curry noodle with Prawn Tempura (1350 Yen, S$20.88) while the curry noodle alone is about 1050 Yen (S$16.24). My goodness, the udon noodles is cooked slightly al dente style, but it is the curry that is flavourfully delicious with a slightly sweet and spicy aftertaste. The sauce is smooth and slides down your throat, not the typical thick types that are lumpy.I just marvel at how the Japanese present their food sometimes. Their Konaya’s curry soup with rice and minced chicken and pork meat (980 Yen, S$15.16) looks exactly like what is presented in the menu. It is topped with lots of greens and carrot, aesthetically pleasing and adds a healthy touch. I love it. Yes, why can’t we add fresh greens to our curry rice? So refreshing.Every customer would be presented with a paper bib so that the curry sauce would not spill on your shirt. How thoughtful. How attentive.Sugamo Konaya 古奈屋
Roppongi Hills 六本木ヒルズ North Tower B1F, 6-2-31 Roppongi, Minato-ku, Tokyo, Japan (Roppongi). Tel: 03-5775-0578
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 11:00pm DailyOther Related Entries
CoCo ICHIBANYA (313 Somerset)
Saizeriya Ristorante (Liang Court)
Shabu 29 (Clarke Quay Central)
Tonkatsu (Mandarin Gallery)
AKB48 Café (*Scape)
2012-04-15 00:00:00
SocialHaus – New bar Opens at Tiong Bahru
Tiong Bahru is no longer just an old estate, but has transformed into a cooler and hip place within the last two years with the opening of 40 Hands, Books Actually, The Orange Thimble, Open Door Policy and most recently SocialHaus.You may have watched many American shows where friends and buddies hang out at a cheap local bar and enjoy drinks at an affordable place. SocialHaus fills that gap in Singapore where the drinks are actually quite reasonably priced.During the Happy Hours before 8pm, house pours are priced at $8. As for the usual hours, bottles such as Heineken and Asahi are at $10, and house whites and reds are at $10 per glass.I was recommended the Bob’s burger ($15.00) with all-beef patty served with fries and mixed salad. The patty was rather juicy and delicious and would make a filling meal. However, the buns and fries were a tad cold and blemished the overall experience.Full Post at InSing.com – New Opening Social HausSocialHaus
11 Yong Siak Street, Singapore, Tel: +65 6557 0286
Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 11am – 12am, Sun: 11am – 11pm (Closed on Tue)Other Related Entries
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
Drips Bakery Café (Tiong Poh Road)
The Orange Thimble (Tiong Bahru)
Centre Ps (Tiong Bahru)
TAB (Orchard)
2012-04-13 00:00:00
McDonald’s – As We Say Goodbye to King Albert Park
If you have not heard, King Albert Park fondly known as K.A.P has been sold to Oxley Holdings for $150 million. That would mean all seven units, including the favourites Cold Storage, Island Creamery and yes, McDonald’s at KAP would be closing and saying goodbye.Online voices are not too happy about it – that an “iconic 20 year place” is going to be turned into another condominium; that they are losing part of their memories; and this is coming right after the closure of East Coast Park.To many, they do not understand the “sadness” and fuss… Good riddance to another fast food restaurant. But there is another group of people who feels lost about the fate of this “heritage site”.I digged out my old photos taken at King Albert Park for your amusementWe belong to the Generation Y. Many of whom grew up studying in McDonalds throughout their teenage years, perhaps also where we celebrated our childhood birthdays, had our first Happy Meals, queued up for the Millennium Hello Kitty… where we spent our tears and joys. And we already lost Far East Plaza and East Coast.The NP, HCJC, NJC, ACJC, CHS, NYGS, and MGS students can perhaps identify more.Taken when I was 17. The McDonald’s figurines are still there!The nostalgic KAP McDonalds is where I spent many days studying my A’s, where I would hang out after tiring choir practices slurping on large coke and piled up fries, and also where I had one of my first date!The other spectrum of the population may not be able to understand. Perhaps they can if Orchard Cineleisure would to give way to an ERP one day.I went back to have some Spicy Nuggets (Yes, the McNuggets is more delicious than the normal ones, except I missed the old curry sauce). The environment feels almost the same with families chit-chatting in an friendly and open two-storey environment, and students enjoying their bonding together. The manager actually came up to small-talk with me.I am ready to let KAP go. But I do wonder about growing up in a country where I do not recognise the buildings around anymore.McDonalds
11 King Albert Park #01-01,#01-02 & #01-05 McDonald’s Place Singapore 598292 Tel: +65 6564 4881
Opening Hours: 24 hours (Fri-Sat), 5.30am – 2am (Sun – Thu)Other Related Entries
When CNY is not just about Prosperity
McDonald’s Chicken McGrill
Popeyes Chicken and Biscuits (Airport T3)
ChicKing (Marina Square)
Wendy’s (Lau Pa Sat)
2012-04-12 00:00:00
Nam Seng Noodle House – The Old National Library Wanton Mee
I found the Old National Library Wanton Mee! And it is still sold by the Granny Leong aka Poh Poh, who is probably 80 years old now.There are so many childhood foods that disappeared without a trace – because they have moved on, or that the younger generation do not want to take over the food business. The good news is Granny is still serving this same Wanton Mee at Far East Square. The bad news is, who would take over next?Nam Seng Noodle House started way back in 1957 the former Catholic High School in Queen Street selling macaroni and chicken porridge. However, it was their signature Wanton Mee when they moved to the National Library at Stamford Road where they earned their accolades. Of course, the sad thing was that the library has given away to an ERP gantry.During a lunch trip there, Granny was still there taking orders, but it was a group of workers cooking the food items. She was feisty and strong, and I could hear her nagging at her Chinese staff in Cantonese from time to time.  Hugely amusing.I used to eat this during my childhood days every 3 weeks when I went to borrow books, and it taste ALMOST EXACTLY the same. The same springy noodles, thin sliced red char siew, and the oily clear sauce that I miss so much.Nam Seng’s version ($4/$5)  is most similar to Kok Kee. Some may not like this because the sauce is not like your typical wanton mee. Made with vegetable oil, salt, sesame oil and some secret ingredients, it somewhat salty, but very tasty which blends almost perfectly with the noodles.Another popular dish among  the lunchtime crowd is the Venison Horfun ($4/$5) appearing brown and drenched, with tender slices of meat. Although there is no usual ‘wok hei’ flavour, the gooey sauce should win you over.The sad reality is – what would happen if Granny is gone? I shudder to think.  Let’s wish her the best of health, and continue to bring us this wonderful heritage dish.Nam Seng Noodles & Fried Rice
25 China Street, #01-01 Far East Square, Singapore 049567
Opening Hours: Mon to Fri: 8.00am – 9.00pm, Sat: 8.00am – 5.00pm (Closed on Sun & PH)Other Related Entries
Hua Feng Mian Jia (Tiong Bahru)
Pontian Wanton Mee (Far East Plaza)
Hua Kee Wanton Mee (Old Airport Road)
Koka Wanton Noodles (North Bridge Road)
Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodles (Maxwell Food Centre)
2012-04-10 00:00:00
Ketam Masak Lemak – Recipe for Spicy Coconut Flower Crabs
Crabs seem to be the hardest thing to cook, and definitely not a common thing to cook at home on an everyday basis. You can try this recipe of “Ketam Masak Lemak” – a famous Malaysian Nyonya dish where crabs in cooked with thick, spicy coconut gravy.The strong flavours of the spices and lemongrass, chillies, tamarind and turmeric should make it a suitable dish to go with rice. Plus, flower crabs are generally softer in the shell and easier to crack at the comfort of home. Okay, if I can do the Ketam Masak Lemak, you can probably cook it better than I do.Ingredients
Flower crabs (cut into half) – 400 grams
Coconut milk – 90 ml
Water – 40 ml
Tumeric leaves, thinly sliced – 15 gm
Tamarind, peeled – 12 gm
Lemongrass – 10 gmTo blend
Turmeric, fresh – 25 gm
Bird eye chilli – 30 gm
Shallots, galangal, green chilli (all 10 gm optional)Steps
Blend the turmeric, bird eye chilli, shallots, galangal and green chilli together.Cooked the blended ingredients into a pot with water, turmeric leaves and tamarind and let it simmer for about 3 minutes.Add the coconut milk, crabs and rest of the seasoning together and stir it gently until all ingredients are cooked for about 3-4 minutes.Lastly, add the tomato wedges before serving into a bowl and garnishing with crispy turmeric leaves.Sounds pretty simple? Mine turned out to be slightly too sour, and I learned not to add too much tomato and assam. Also don’t overcook the crabs or it would lose too much of its natural sweetness.Thank you Chef Azri Abdul Manaf, Chef de Cuisine of Makan Kitchen. If you want to try the real thing, you can head over to DoubleTree by Hilton Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia. After trying his version of the Spicy Coconut Flower Crabs, trust me, I was so tempted to.Other Related Entries
Recipe of Grilled Slipper Lobster
Honey & Pineapple Tart Ice Cream
SoEZ Brownie Baking 101
2012-04-09 00:00:00
Happy Sheep Honey Giveaway
Daniel’s Food Diary is giving away 2 bottles of Happy Sheep Honey – New Zealand’s purest and all-natural wild honey.All you need to do is to *likes* the FaceBook pages of Daniel’s Food Diary and Happy Sheep Honey(Results will be announced this Thursday. Contest winners must be residents of Singapore to facilitate delivery.)About Happy Sheep Honey
Happy Sheep Honey is sourced from artisanal beekeepers with generations of experience and the range includes a selection of four unpasteurised honeys – West Coast Honey, Active Manuka 12+ Honey, Lemon & West Coast Honey and Strawberry & West Coast Honey.Happy Sheep Honey is gathered from over 4,000 hives in the wild and remote native forests of the West Coast region in the South Island of New Zealand. With a range of four flavours, Happy Sheep Honey can be used as an unprocessed sweetener or as a perfect accompaniment to treats such as scones, waffles and beverages.
2012-04-09 00:00:00
Are You On Instagram?
Other than Angry Birds, Draw Something and Words With Friends, the iPhone app that really got me hooked in Instagram. Instagram is a free photo sharing which allows users to take a photo and share with fellow followers. I would like to think it is ‘Photo-based Twitter’.Andriod users, if you haven’t heard, the app has been launched for free fairly recently.  And reports said the download crossed the 1 million mark within 24 hours of the launch.1 billon photos already uploaded, 5 million photos daily, with approximately 30 million IOS platform users. Even President Obama (@barackobama) and celebrities such as Justin Bieber (@justinbieber) and Shawn Yue (@lok666) are on it.And the latest news which came in – Facebook bought Instagram for $1billion. (Not exactly thrilled by the news whenever a mammoth buys over anything popular.)What’s the appeal?Well, it is free, fun and very easy to use. Shoot a picture with your phone camera, apply a filtered effects (though I don’t like using the) and post. That’s it! A distinctive feature is photos are in a square shape, in homage to both the Kodak Instamatic and Polaroid cameras.It allows me to see the lives through photos of my friends, and everyday moments of people from other countries. It is such a simple way to capture the beauty of the world.My userid is @DanielFoodDiary Hope to see you on Instagram soon!
2012-04-09 00:00:00
Chiso Zanmai – $14.90++ Japanese Buffet Comes to Singapore!
You are not reading wrong – An all-you-can-eat authentic Japanese buffet priced at only $14.90++ for lunch!  And that includes a wide spread of more than 100 seasonal selections which include sushi, yakitori, okonomiyaki and desserts.  Sounds like a good deal.Chiso Zanmai is an Osaka-based Japanese buffet restaurant known for its fresh seafood, and it has opened its first outside of Japan at Clarke Quay Central, replacing the old Fisherman’s MarketLunch is priced at $14.90++ for weekdays and $19.90++ for weekends and public holidays. Dinner is at $24.90++ and $29.90++ respectively. While there are some hits and misses (eg cold tempura) in terms of food quality, its wide variety and budget price tag makes Chiso Zanmai a suitable place for youths and army boys to pig out.Full Post at InSing.com – $14.90 Japanese buffet comes to Singapore!Chiso Zanmai
6 Eu Tong Sen Street, #02-17 The Central @ Clarke Quay, Singapore 059817, Tel: +65 6221 3177
Opening Hours: Mon–Sun: 12pm–3pm, 6pm–11pmOther Related Entries
Minoriya (Tanjong Katong)
Carousel (Royal Plaza on Scotts)
Medz (Orchard Central)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
Feast @ East (East Coast)
2012-04-06 00:00:00
Plaza Brasserie – Back to the 60s Buffet with Grandma’s Favourites
It seems that many hotels and restaurants buffets are going back to the past, serving local foods from the nostalgic old days. Buffet Restaurant Plaza Brasserie decided to bring back some heritage cuisine from the 60s, such as Rojak, Cuttlefish and Kang Kong, Deep Fried Tau Kwa, Braised Pork Belly with Mui Chye, and Tau Suan Dessert.Head Chef Jackson candidly said that most of the recipes are from taken from his mother’s kitchen, and many are favourites that he grew up with.Among the notable dishes is Stirred Fried Pork Liver with Spring Onions and Ginger. Not many people dare to eat pork liver nowadays, even so, few prepare it well because the slices can get too tough with a weird savour.This dish is cooked at the ‘live’ cooking station, and really tastes best when eaten hot from the claypot. Maybe I am not a live- person, I could not go beyond three slices due to the heavy aftertaste.Another home-cooked favourite which my own grandma used to prepare is a simple dish of Meatballs with Carrots Dices. I liked it that it had more meat than flour, with slight crunchiness of the carrots. My tip is: Dip it with the chicken rice chili found nearby which adds that shiokness.I wondered what the Thai Beef Kway Tiao soup was doing in the middle of this heritage feast. Perhaps Chef wanted to get into the SongKran mood. Nevertheless, it was the single best item that dinner with its authentic spicy soup with lovely tinge of fish sauce and basil leaves, matched with delightful handmade beef balls. Sawadee-licious!Grandma’s Favourites Buffet Promotion at Plaza Brasserie cost $36++ for weekday lunch buffet, $48/$52++ for weekday/end dinner buffet respectively.Plaza Brasserie, 7500A Beach Road, Park Royal on Beach Road (Nearest MRT Bugis), Tel: +65 6505 5710
Opening Hours: 6am – 12am DailyOther Related Entries
Plaza Brasserie (Beach Road)
Carousel (Royal Plaza on Scotts)
Old Hong Kong Legend (Raffles City)
Kopi Tiam (Swissotel The Stamford)
Crystal Jade Kitchen (Scotts Square)
2012-04-05 00:00:00
Nando’s – New Portuguese Cataplana is Not Peri Hot
Many Singaporeans love Nando’s – the casual dining restaurant group originating from the Mozambiquan Portuguese community in South Africa, known for their flame-grilled hot Peri-Peri chicken. Maybe, except Ms Joanne Peh, who is probably still feeling the heat from the lack of water.Nando’s just launched another interesting signature Portuguese dish – The Cataplana. The Cataplana is the name for both the recipe of the dish, and the utensil used for cooking. The cooking ware is made of copper and shaped like two clamshells hinged at one end and able to be sealed using a clamp, keeping the food inside warm and flavorful.Service felt awkward and slow during my invited visit to Plaza Singapura, but I am willing to be not bothered about that.The Cataplana Originale ($19.90) comes with grilled Peri-Peri chicken things served on a bed of spice rice, along with colourful ingredients such as bell peppers, onions, courgettes (zucchini) and tomatoes. True to Nando’s style, you can also have your pick on sauces such as lemon & herb, mild, hot or extra hot.One would expect the rice to feel hot and steaming when it arrived simmered in a copper cookware. Unfortunately, it was lukewarm at most. The blend of tastes felt unbalanced, more to an acerbic-sour side. The good and bad news is there are always Peri Peri sauces available for the ‘rescue’.The Cataplana Porto ($19.90) fares better though. The generous servings of button mushrooms and olives worked better with the flavourings of the rice. Though again, it did not steam up the tastebuds as expected.Sorry Cataplana, you are just not Hot enough this time.Nando’s
68 Orchard Road, #04-10/11 Plaza Singapura, Singapore (Plaza Singapura) Tel: +65 6336 2555
Other branches: Tampines Mall, 112 Katong, Bugis Junction, Tanglin Mall
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pmOther Related Entries
Nando’s (Bugis Junction)
Charly T’s (Nomu Building)
Barcelos (Novena) 
The Rotisserie (China Square Food Centre)
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
2012-04-03 00:00:00
BigBank Café – New Western Food Cafe Opens at Killiney Road
This corner shop space at Killiney Road changed hands from House of Rice Roll and Porridge, Sun Coffee Planet, Ding Ji Café to the present BigBank Café in about a year. A case of bad ‘feng shui’ or poor business model?BigBank Café, a Western food eatery which serves special wines, beers and ciders, land itself along an food-enlivening road already occupied with Killiney Kopitiam, Orange Lantern, Domino Pizza, Warung M. Nasir, Song Huat Bak Kut Teh, Suan Thai Restaurant – literally food from East to the West.The menu, which calls itself “The Legendary Book of BigBank’s Appetite”, comes in a form of a yellow clear folder with printed A4 pages inside. Some of the signature mains include the Chicken Cutlet ($12.90), Pork Cutlet ($12.90), BBQ Pork Ribs ($17.90), Ocean Platter ($20.90), Black Pepper Lamb Loin Chop Hotplate ($24.90) and Tenderloin Steak on Hotplate ($28.90).I was recommended the Juicy Beef Patty Cheese Burger ($12.90), which was sadly, at most slightly juicy. I would not say to the extent that it was bad-tasting, but this burger served with thick-cut fries and sauté vegetables was ordinary ‘Singapore-Chinese-style’ Western food fare.The Sausage & Ham with Tomato Sauce ($12.90), came looking disappointedly ‘cheap’ like those coffeeshop-standard Western foods. The taste furthermore reminded me of what my hostel mates would whip up during night supper at the uni pantry. From the appearance to the taste, this feels like something we can prepare at home in a jiffty.Its Special Stuffed Wings ($8.50 for 4 pieces) was its saving grace, thankfully, crisp and not too oily.What BigBank Café need would be a strong branding (like why it is called BigBank again?) and more distinctive-tasting Western dishes, especially at this price point, and at this location. I wish them all the best.BigBank Café
75 Killiney Road Singapore 239529 (Somerset MRT), Tel: +65 6737 8515
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 12:00am DailyOther Related Entries
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Egg3 Café (Mountbatten)
Crazy World Café (Chinatown)
Joan Bowen Café (Macpherson)
Cine Café (Shaw House)
2012-04-02 00:00:00
Marukin Ramen – Hakata-style Chicken Ramen at Scotts Square
Marukin Ramen is supposedly one of the most famous ramen chains in Tokyo since 1992, renowned for its slowcooked homemade soup created from high quality ingredients featuring the use of collagen for beautiful skin.After making waves through its hugely popular franchise showing in Shanghai IFC, Marukin Ramen has made its way to basement one of the new Scotts Square at Orchard Road.The shop had an open and fastfood-like concept, which I wished that there was some form of enclosure like its neighbours Maison Kayser and Kuzumi. Customers were strangely sparse on a weekend too.Varieties includes Marukin Shio, Shoyu, Miso and Spicy Hot Ramens all at $9.80. Instead of serving its signature Hakata style ramen made from pork broth, this local chain opts for a chicken stock for its soup base. I had the Marukin Ramen Set ($15.80) which came with potato salad and a bowl of mushroom rice. Talk about carbs overload.The plus point is that its Hakata style noodles are made-to-order, rather thin, non-curly and resilient with a QQ-bite.The ramen arrived in a cream-brownish coloured soup, and strangely does not feel too hot to the touch. Its famed chicken-based broth is said to be a winning recipe cooked unhurriedly to perfection. However, it was a tad too salty, not milky enough and strange-tasting. Overall, the chicken ramen does not leave a positive impression, mainly due to the uninspiring soup base.This is personal, but Hakata ramen goes better with rich pork-bone tonkotsu broth.Marukin Ramen (Scotts Square)
6 Scotts Road, #B1-11/12 Scotts Square, Singapore (Orchard MRT) Tel: +65 6636 3468
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Ippudo (Mandarin Gallery)
Ramen Santouka (Central)
Sapporo Ramen Miharu (Gallery Hotel)
Daikokuya (Orchard Paragon)
Keisuke Ramen (Millenia Walk)
2012-03-30 00:00:00
Anping Bean Jelly – Tainan’s Super Smooth Tau Hway
[Tainan, Taiwan] While Tau Hway (also known as Tofu Pudding, Douhua or Bean Jelly) has taken waves in Singapore, I always remember that the best ones are eaten at its ‘hometown’ – Tainan. And of course, Tainan is the birthplace of Bean Jelly before it became popular in other Taiwanese cities.My Taiwanese host families highly recommended Tongji Anping Bean Jelly (同记安平豆花), a hugely popular shop with humble beginnings. It was started by a Mr Huang Qing Tong who once peddled the soy beancurd in heated wooden buckets, and subsequently a push cart with his wife in the streets. So behind this success are hard work and a simple love story.Anping Bean Jelly’s selling point is in using traditional methods and organic soy beans to create that smooth texture and natural goodness. Mr. Huang laments that too many beancurd pudding in the market have been added with artificial sweeteners and agar agar, which destroys the real flavours of the soy beans.I have to agree that nothing is worse than artificial tasting Tau Hway. And it was kind of nice to see that Anping still scoops its curd off a big barrel.With its commercialisation, you can choose to include toppings such as azuki red beans, green beans, tapioca pearls or lemon which adds a springy zest. There are also two new flavours of black charcoal beans (said to help detoxify the body) and fresh milk (really smooth).The dessert is really about enjoying the simplest pleasures of life. While eating, I recommend that you let the beancurd slip around your tongue slowly while you savour its smoothness, appreciating its history, its love story and real flavour of the beans. A must-have if you make your way to Tainan.Tongji Anping Bean Jelly (同記安平豆花)
台南市安平區安北路433號
433 Anbei Rd, Anping District, Tainan City, Taiwan (R.O.C.) Telephone:+886 06-3915385
Business Hours：09:00am – 11:00pm DailyOther Related Entries
Dong Qu Fen Yuan (Taiwan)
Big Sausage Wrap Small Sausage (Taiwan)
Coffin Bread (Taiwan)
Ice Monster (Taiwan)
Ah Zong Mian Xian (Taiwan)
2012-03-29 00:00:00
Greyhound Café – Where Fashion Meets Food in Bangkok
[Bangkok, Thailand] There are chicken wings, and there are ‘Thai’ chicken wings – chicken wings that are halved, marinated in fish sauce and deep fried.  And I swear by Greyhound Famous Fried Chicken Wings, that this is a must-visit every vacation to Bangkok, especially if you are heading over this Songkran.Greyhound is a Fashion-meets-Food café. First established in Thailand in the 80s as a casual men’s wear outlet, they have expanded to food business in 1997. Quoted by the Fortune Magazine as “the Hottest Seats in Bangkok”, Greyhound Café is the first fashion café in Bangkok offering the food concept with creative twists in a casual dining experience. Many say Singapore’s PS Cafe is inspired by Greyhound.To summarise in a line, Greyhound is about fashion, about people-watching, about good food, about art, about good living, about travel, about new tastes, and about sitting at a corner of the café watching the world go by.Back to the Greyhound Famous Fried Chicken Wings (100 Baht, SGD $4.10), these crispy addictive noms are cut to half the size of the usual wings, evenly marinated with fish sauce and still retains its moisture. You would have thought that deep frying would have dried it up, but no. An absolute pleasure to just suck the chicken wing, and this is what I call finger-licking good.The Fettuccini with Shrimp and Mushroom Cream Sauce (220 Baht, SGD$9.00 ) is all about European bistro style with a dash of Thai flavour. Cooked al dente style and topped with fresh prawns, the pasta is not overly creamy and delicate, possibly leaving you with space for more.Greyhound café introduces many new dishes everytime I go, many fusion in style, such as Deep fried Crab with Seafood, Salmon Sashimi in Spicy Hot Sauce, Thai Steak with Thai Hot Sauce, Yum Thai Steak Salad and Crispy Sweet Corn with Crab Meat. Some hits and misses as some of the street-food are probably ‘over-fushionised’.The one thing I like about many Thai cafes is that it is not just a café, but an entire lifestyle and brand. From the music they play, books they display, menu design, décor, to the individually-designed uniforms, you know there is pride in the things they sell. (Okay, but I am really fasinated by their uniforms.) The most pleasurable time spent there is to just grab a magazine, have my wings, and Thai-people-watch. Sawadee-best.Greyhound Café
Siam Center, Ground Floor, Bangkok, Thailand (BTS Siam Station Exit 1) Tel: +662 658 112 930
Other Greyhound Café branches: J Avenue Lifestyle, Emporium,  Central Chidlom, Phaholyothin; Ratchayothin; The Crystal (All in Bangkok) and IFC Mall (Hong Kong)
Opening Hours: 11:00 am – 9:00 pm DailyOther Related Entries
MBK Foodcourt (Thailand)
Thaksin Beef Noodles (Clementi)
First Thai (Purvis Street)
Suan Thai Restaurant (Killiney Road)
Porn’s (Liang Seah)
2012-03-28 00:00:00
Charly T’s – Home-styled Rotisserie Chicken with 4 Sauces & Sides to Choose From
Singapore loves chicken. We also love Rotisserie Chicken – from Kenny Roger’s, The Rotisserie to a lesser known Charly T’s. I have been to Charly T’s a few times, also because there is almost nothing decent to eat at The Cathay.I have always thought that Charly T’s is a real person (like Mr Charlie Tan or something), but he is actually a representation of a globetrotter whose goal in life is to bring travel, food, jazz, life and more together to create exciting food journeys. That should be my life objective as well. Daniel A’s Rotisserie Chicken anybody?There is no table menu so it can get a little confusing. But you are a first-timer, stick to the signature Quarter Chicken with 2 additions ($13 for original, $15 for seasonal recipe). If you can finish half, it will be $27 with 3 additions.Charly T’s chickens are never frozen to keep their freshness. Their supplies come from our neighbours up north, and then marinated for over 13 hours before they are slow-cooked -rotisserie style.I cannot help notice that my plate was almost ‘clean’ – meaning no extra oil flowing out from the sides. Just the chicken on a white plate. Some would like it because it is non-oily, some may think it is dry.Comparatively, their chicken has a thin glistering crisp exterior, and the meat seem to be able to lock in some of its natural taste. You can probably eat it on its own without the seasonings.In case you are a ‘dipper’ like me, there are 4 free flow sauces to choose from (yeah, not just chilli and ketchup!) with my favourite being the Kansas City BBQ Sauce which best complements the chicken. The creamy roasted sesame sauce feels that it is better paired with salad.To complete the meal, you can choose from the “Mum’s kitchen‟ side dishes such as the German Potato Salad, Macaroni and Cheese, Fresh Vegetables and Butter Garlic Rice.If you are used to the sides at Kenny Roger’s, Charly T’s additions may prove to be too plain and healthy-tasting (with its receipe from Rozanne Gold’s Eat Fresh Food) for you. While I am guilty of preferring a more fattening-tasting Mac-Cheese over at the competitor’s, Charly T’s Potato Salad has a pleasant rustic tasting home-cooked feel.Charly T’s
20 Handy Road, Level 1 NOMU Building, Singapore (Dhoby Gaut MRT) Tel: +65 6336 7789 (2nd Branch at 112 Katong)
Opening Hours: Mon–Wed: 11am – 11pm, Thu–Fri: 11am – 1am, Sat: 9am – 1am , Sun: 9am – 11pmOther Related Entries
The Rotisserie (China Square Food Centre)
Nando’s (Bugis Junction)
Barcelos (Novena) 
Astons Specialities (Cathay)
Blackbird Café (Handy Road)
2012-03-27 00:00:00
Garibaldi – How Does One of Singapore’s Top Italian Restaurants Fare?
It is in my wish list to try out some of Singapore’s finest restaurants – Iggy’s, Andre, Tippling Club, Les Amis, Guther’s and Garibaldi. Garibaldi is considered one of Singapore’s most popular and respected Italian restaurant, being voted 7th best restaurant in Asia in 2003 by the Miele Guide. (Though it has somehow fallen off grace after being placed 7th in 2008/2009).Foods can range in the $100s and $200, and therefore I managed to try it during Restaurant Week for $55++. The usual set lunches (which I found out later) are at a more affordable $39++ though.Located along the swanky Purvis Street which has the likes of Guther’s and Ying Thai, Garibaldi is stylish, modern and elegant at the same time. The décor is classy, not over the top with white table-clothed tables and lighted-box art pieces.The enticing menu is said to emphasize on authentic Italian cuisine prepared with the best ingredients imported directly from Italy. The executive chef Roberto Galetti is also recipient of Restaurateur of the Year 2009 (Regional) award.The starter – fresh tuna Tartare with black olive and smoked caviar, was an immediate charmer. Without the usual fishy taste, it exults a sense of delicacy with its smooth texture, not being powering in taste.It is challenging to cook Veal Cheek which can go either too tough or disintegrated. Garibaldi manages to strike that balance. While you can still savour the layered feel of the meat, it almost melts in your mouth immediately, achieving a harmonious balance with the olive oil mashed potato.The Black Ink Thin Noodle with Codfish and Grey Mullet Roe was not too bad, but did not excite too much. The pasta was evenly cooked, and the dish does not feel overly heavy. But it somehow lacked that wow factor. I had better.Strangely, the Garibaldi group with the popular Sweets Garibaldi under its chain did not impress with the dessert. I could live with the Chocolate cake being slightly dense, rich and heavy. However, my anticipation for warm flowing chocolate sauce from the inside did not realise.Overall, Garibaldi gave a memorable dining experience with fine tasting Italian food. Not sure if this constitute to the Top 20 in Asia, though service, was almost perfect.Garibaldi Italian Restaurant & Bar
36 Purvis Street, #01-02 Talib Centre, Singapore (10 min walk from Bugis MRT), Tel: +65 6837 1468
Opening Hours: 12noon – 3pm, 6.30pm – 11pm DailyOther Related Entries
Limoncello Restaurant (Robertson Quay)
Covelli Italian Bistro & Wine Bar (Orchard Central)
Da Paolo Ristorante (Holland Village)
Infusion (Dempsey)
Peperoni Pizzeria (Zion Road)
2012-03-26 00:00:00
Old Hong Kong Legend – ‘Enter The Dragon’ Lobster Feast
Old Hong Kong Group founded by Hong Konger Victoria Li has a interesting business model, with 6 different restaurants at 6 price markets. There is the casual 24-hour Old Hong Kong Tea House at Katong Village, a Bruce Café at University Town targeted at tertiary students, and the very upmarket Old Hong Kong Taste and Old Hong Kong Legend.If I ask you to name the best Cantonese or Dim Sum restaurants in Singapore, you may rattle off the likes of Crystal Jade, Imperial Treasure, Yan Ting, Royal China or Wah Lok. Few may know that Old Hong Kong Legends at Raffles City is listed among top 5 dim-sum restaurants in Singapore by Lifestyle Asia.I was invited for an Imperial Dragon Feast which has a carefully crafted with prime ingredients such as abalone, bird nest, sea cucumber and the main star – fresh lobsters. Essentially, this is the best of the best ingredients. And it is very typical Chinese to impress.Although I did think the ‘dragon’ meal may have come slightly late for the Lunar Dragon year, I was impressed by some of the courses. The appetizer – a Lobster Meat Salad with Pomelo and Mixed Fruits makes a refreshing sweetish starter, and the fruits will add a good balance for the heavier dishes thereafter.If there is one dish I want to try again, it is the Braised Abalone with sea cucumber soup. This is easily the best soup I had in a long long time. Coming in looking brownish thick, it resembles a creamy Western soup, but the taste is wonderfully lingering with collagen-rich seafood which will send you in a temporary food coma. Superb stuff.The Baked Lobster covered with a thin layer of cheese is another sumptuous creation of East-meets-West, with chunks of lobster flesh buried with a rich-tasty sauce and black truffles.The “Imperial Dragon Set Menu” is available at $99++ per person and is probably not meant for the usual lunch gatherings. Possibly works for a business lunch, or when you just want to indulge in lobsters paired with the richest ingredients.Old Hong Kong Legend
252 North Bridge Road, #02-18 Raffles City Shopping Centre, Singapore (City Hall MRT)
Tel: +65 6336 3038
Opening Hours: 10:30am – 10:30pmOther Related Entries
Royal China (Raffles Hotel)
Crystal Jade Kitchen (Scotts Square)
Yan Ting (St Regis)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
2012-03-23 00:00:00
Pavé – Cakes That Are Pieces of Art
Katong is one of those areas which is full of gems, some old and charming, some new and quirky. My ‘Katong-boy’ friend Paul wanted to introduce me this “country-looking cosy little cake shop” in which he raved about how pretty the cakes looked.Sure enough, once I walked pass dainty looking confectionary with country-green and dark pink walls, I immediately knew this was it. Pavé reminds me of one of those little pastry shops in Bangkok, and I meant it in a good way.Pavé (pronounced “Pa-Vey”) which means pavement, is a quaint cafe located along East Coast Road serving a variety of cakes and bite sized chocolate. A rather homely feeling. On the shelves are jars home-made ginger jams and almond butter, and chocolate covered with gold flakes called The Bankers Bar.Although the shop is French-sounding, they really choose strange names for their cakes. One may have expected a Le Chocolat Tarte, but instead we have a sea-salted caramel dark chocolate tart called “This is New” ($7.90).We were superficial and ordered the prettiest looking items – the Apple Tart 50 ($8.50) and Wow! Ichigo 100% ($8.50).The Apple Tart 50 looks like a piece of art itself – a towering dessert with slices of caramelised apples stacked on top of one another, with vanilla custard cream right in the middle.  This is joyful to eat. Delicate, not too sweet, with the apple having a sour-sweet bite.The Wow! Ichigo 100% ($8.50) feels like a non-potent tiramisu, with soft sponge, strawberries and vanilla cream in a square cup. This is lovely both in and out, with the fillings being really fluffy in a slightly Japanese pastry-like fashion.The chef’s wacky and creative style is said to be reflected in their creations. The chocolates (especially the Mediterranean and Rose) are God-sent. Pure indulgence, and I got myself choco-coma after two bites of those tiny decadence.Note: Pavé has decided to close down. “Thank you for following us on our journey into the food world. We have decided to stop operations at our East Coast outlet and embark on a new journey. You can continue to shop for chocolates online at www.pavechocolates.com Pavé chocolate products are now available at Marina Square – a little artisan shop called URSS Chocolatier (#02-261).”Pavé Chocolates & Confections
93 East Coast Road, Singapore (near 112 Katong Mall), Tel: +65 6342 0677
Opening Hours:  Tue: 2.30pm – 10.30pm, Wed–Sun: 12.30pm – 10.30pm (Closed on Mon)Other Related Entries
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
Twelve Cupcakes (Millenia Walk)
3 Inch Sin (Millenia Walk)
Centre Ps (Tiong Bahru)
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
2012-03-22 00:00:00
Eggs & Berries – Everything with Eggs. Berry Nice
Is this even real, an entire restaurant selling everything with eggs and berries? The very idea thrilled me a little, having my mind torn between having eggs benedict, scrambled eggs, omelettes, sunny-side-ups, Or waffles, pancakes, sliced cakes and crepes.  Decisions decisions.Let’s talk about the location first – Changi City Point. Crazy far. It is at one far eastern end of Singapore called Expo, but can be worth going to especially when you are an outlet shopaholic. Lacoste, Nike, Adidas, G2000, Royal Sporting House all house outlets there.As for F&Bs, you get a range of popular and new stores such as Tung Lok Signatures’, Ootoya, Ajisen Ramen, The Manhattan, G7 Express Café, Perkies, The Thai Kitchen & Roast, Yogurt Plus, Bagus, and  Egg & Berries. Tempted already?I first had the Omelette with bacon, onion & mushroom ($10.70) which was a big plate too full to place any more items. Three fresh eggs, three pancakes, tomato, bread, jam and butter fight for the plate space. Ironically, the eggs were blah (I needed ketchup), but the bread soft and fluffy, and pancakes working its usual wonders with maple syrup and chocolate sauce.How can you come here without trying the Eggs Benedict ($12.80) right? The two poached eggs were adorably oval looking, oozing out york goodness on top of English muffins, bacon and a rosti-tasting hash brown. Other than the cheap tasting ham, the dish was delightfully wonderful.This must be the cutest Crème Brulee ever! Housed in a real-egg shell, torched carefully before serving, resting on a tiny bowl of sugar. Soft, yummy, delicate, berry good.Eggs & Berries
Changi Business Park Central 1, #B1-37/38 Food Junction, Changi City Point, Singapore (Expo MRT)
Opening Hours: 8am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
The Tastings Room (Marina Square)
Delicious (Scotts Square)
Aerin’s (Raffles City)
15 Minutes (Lasalle)
Out Of The Pan (Raffles City)
2012-03-21 00:00:00
Selfish Gene Café – Just How Selfish Is This Cafe?
There are that many new cafes in Singapore, and a main reason I chose to come here is due to its peculiar name – Selfish Gene Café. It was then I realised Gene was ‘selfish’ not because he never shared his food, but rather he would not serve anyone food that he would not eat himself.Owner Gene Mok has an atypical background – a psychology graduate who honed his skills at Le Cordon Bleu Sydney and worked under Chef Emmanuel Stroobant of Saint Pierre. After some time in the restaurant business, Gene decided to be selfish and set up a place of his own at the edge of the Tanjong Pagar Conservation Area.What sealed the deal for me was really the banana cake ($5.80). Homemade by Gene, the cake was moist and not too sweet. We liked that he added crunchy crumble and caramelised banana for a more layered taste. As for the drizzle of peanut butter sauce on the cake, you will either like it or hate it. I loved it.Full Post at InSing.com – A selfish café opens at Tanjong PagarSelfish Gene Café
40 Craig Road Singapore 089678 (near Tanjong Pagar MRT), Tel: +65 6423 1324
Opening Hours: 10am – 6pm (Closed on Tuesday)Other Related Entries
Talent Café (Tanjong Pagar)
Blackbird Café (Handy Road)
Cine Café (Shaw House)
7 KICKstart BREWiches (Armenian Place)
The Orange Thimble (Tiong Bahru)
2012-03-20 00:00:00
Quan An Ngon – A Should Go for Foodies at Ho Chi Minh
[Ho Chi Minh City] Vietnam’s good food places are not all about Ben Thanh Market. If you have been to HCM a few times but have not been to Quan AnNgon, you do not know what you are missing out.Quan An Ngon translates to “a delicious dining place” and it feels like a Marche, marketplace or foodcourt – and a more beautiful and higher-classed one. It brings the classics to the streets.This ‘restaurant’ at Pasteur Street is located within a classic French colonial style bungalow, and food is displayed like an open-air village market setting. Many visitors enjoy Vietnam’s street food, but may worry about comfort and hygiene. Here, you can see the food prepared right in front of you, or wait in comfort under blossoming trees.Ngon provides a plethora of Vietnamese delicacies from all around the country, and some of the recommended must-haves are the “West Lake” Shrimp Patties, Vietnamese Rice Pancake “Banh Xeo”, “Mi Quang” Tumeric Noodle Soup, “Ngon” Pork Salad and Vermicelli in Soup with Pork Leg and Indian Taro Stem.The Banh Tom Ho Tay “West Lake” Shrimp Patties (45000 VND, SGD$2.70) are a speciality in Hanoi, North Vietnam. Thankfully, it was not overly greasy but I was not blown away by it, perhaps because we have something similar in Singapore.Attracted by a strong aroma I spotted a stall selling grilled seafood which I could not stop ordering. The cuttlefish, lightly salted, and grilled with spices and chilli was indeed addictive stuff. There is also a saucer of spicy salt at the side for dip.The Bun Bo Hue (34000 VND, SGD $2.10), a beef noodle soup Hue style from Central Vietnam, was deliciously prepared with thick soup, tender beef slices and noodles so slippery tasty.Even though this is like a marketplace, food is displayed like in a restaurant setting. And it is very affortable. The Vietnamese food sold may not be the most authentic, but it is a charming beautiful place. Oh, and it has free wifi.Ngon Restaurant (Quan An Ngon)
160 Pasteur Street, District 1, Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam
Tel: +848 3827 7131 , Email: quananngon@hc.vnn.vn
Opening Hours: 730am – 1030pmOther Related Entries
Trung Nguyen Coffee (Vietnam)
2012-03-19 00:00:00
Swensen’s – It’s the Mini Burger Bonanza
My memory of Swensen’s still remains at its ice cream, earthquake and Sticky Chewy Chocolate, though it has definitely revamped itself to include even Asian dishes such as Hokkien Mee and Claypot Noodles. And the 33 year-old restaurant just released a range of Gourmet Burger Bonanza, with six new mini burgers on the promotional menu.The sets include two mini burgers of your choice (size smaller than your palm) as well as a Mesclun Salad and U.S Fries ($12.90). You may like to know the buns are toasted Ciabattas.I probably dare to say I have tried all six flavours (the perils of being a true food blogger) and here goes my personal ranking: 1) Prawn Peach Salsa Burger 2) Crab Burger with Honey Mustard 3) All American Beef Burger with Pepper Sauce 4) Spicy Chicken Burger 5) Turkey & Tomato Salsa Burger 6)Lamb Burger with Mango Chutney. Maybe lamb is just not my thing.The seafood burgers generally stand out. The Prawn Burger is my favourite because the patty was deep-fried till crisp, while the inside remains juicy, think  and moist, and you can still taste traces of the prawns. It does remind me of MOS’s Ebi Burger though.The Crab Burger comes a close second. In my mind I was expecting ‘crab stick patty’ and was pleasantly surprised when it is real crab meat patty with quite a refreshing sweet mustard sauce, giving it a sweet-salty tinge.My main reservation is, the burgers are not quite filling, can be more ‘gourmet’ and may work better as a side dish or starters. Perhaps it is strategy for us to have enough room for Swensen’s ice cream buffet!Swensen’s Café Restaurant
2 Orchard Turn, #B1-31 ION Orchard (behind American Express and Popeyes), Singapore, Tel: +65 6884 5967
Opening Hours: Mon-Fri 10:30am – 10:30pmOther Related Entries
Swensen’s Chendol Ice Cream (Marina Square)
Most Original Burger MOB (Vivocity)
Everything With Fries (Orchard Central)
Burger Shack (Bt Timah)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
2012-03-16 00:00:00
Modern Toilet Restaurant – Oh Crap. You Eat From a Toilet Bowl!
[Taipei] This is as strange a restaurant as it can get. And no I am not kidding, this is the “TOILET bowl restaurant” located at Ximending. Well, the colourful Taiwan also has eating locales that resemble jailhouses and hospitals.Let’s see. You walk in, and sit on covered toilet bowls (which is kind of hard and uncomfortable). You eat on a glass table which is on top of a bath tub. The brown mushy curry comes in a mini-black plastic toilet bowl, fries in bath-tubs and drinks are served in miniature urinal. It makes reading newspaper on the bowl more appropriate.The first “Marton” Toilet Restaurant opened in 2004 in Taipei by Wang Tzi-Wei and a group of “muckrakers”, inspired by a cartoon Dr. Slump that featured a toilet drawing on a menu. It first started with selling chocolate ice cream on toilet bowl plates and has been flushing with success ever since.Anybody in the right mind should order a Modern Toilet Chicken Curry (NT 200 or SGD$8.60) which is like gooey sauce with a sad looking broccoli in the middle. The soft carrots make the dish look like a form of diarrhoea. Anyway, just eat it and it should taste like a sweeter version of Japanese curry.The Mediterranean Seafood Au Gratin (NT 250 or SGD$10.70) comes in a less exciting form – a mini bath tub. The food generally is not fantastic, but definitely decent and more fun to eat from. Not restaurant standard, but should be better than fast food.Order something like dark chocolate ice cream and you will have a shitty bizzare time, I mean fun time shooting all combinations of yourself playing with s***  This is crazy place and I love it. And let’s just say we really had a good laugh at everything we ordered.What sealed the deal was when I washed my hands… in a toilet bowl!Modern Toilet Restaurant 便所主题餐厅
Ximending Store, No.7, Lane 50, Sining S. Rd., Wanhua District, Taipei City, Telephone: 02-2311-8822 Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:00pm (Weekdays), 11:00am – 11:00pm (Holidays)Other Related Entries
Ah Zong Mian Xian (Taiwan) 
Pork Pepper Buns (Taiwan)
Hao Da Chicken Culet (Taiwan)
Big Sausage Wrap Small Sausage (Taiwan)
Spraying of Water Chicken Rice (Taiwan)
2012-03-14 00:00:00
Kopi Tiam – Satisfy Your Cantonese Culinary Cravings
Kopi Tiam at Swissotel The Stamford is no ordinary coffee shop, but one which is known to gather the best of local dishes with a heavier than usual price tag. Even though most of the hawker food served here easily cost more than $10, locals and tourists come here to savour their signatures such as Fish Head Curry, Laksa, Rojak and Char Kway Tiao.What many may not know is they actually have some special promotion every month, which all range from Teochew fare, Cambodian dishes, all-things fish, to the most recent authentic Cantonese culinary creations.This should be something to look out for because the chef helming Kopi Tiam Chef Ng Kwong Hee is a Cantonese himself. And he preferred to go more ‘heartwarming’ and ‘home-style’, and therefore the spread such as Roast Duck with Preserved Beancurd and Black Bean Sauce ($18), Braised Pork Ribs with Red Rice and Plum Sugar Sauce ($19), and Claypot Seafood Tofu ($18).The Clay Pot Rice with Chicken, Salted Fish and Pork Sausage ($18) seems to be the must-have, because it is what Chef himself recommended, plus it is one of the few carb dishes on the promotional menu.I am so used to pouring the dark sauce and oil over my claypot rice, until I saw that the seasoning has already all been added inside. This is so that the rice would not be that dry and can absorb the flavours better. I like the chicken meat pieces inside – well-marinated and tender. Though they could be more generous with the Lak Cheong. Personal preference.Most Hongkongers enjoy beef tendon, and therefore I had the Braised Beef Belly & Tendon with Relish in Brown Sauce ($18). The beef which was braised for at least 2.5 hours was indeed tender and almost melted in the mouth. But perhaps Cantonese dishes are known to be flavorsome, I found the sauce a tad too salty for my liking. Order a bowl of plain rice to go along.I went on the 2nd day of Cantonese promotion which would end by the 25th. But as what Chef Ng said, if the dish was popular, it may end up on the main menu or he would be ‘scolded’ by customers. Put the Clay Pot Rice in please.Kopi Tiam 咖啡店
2 Stamford Road, 2F Swissotel The Stamford, Singapore, Tel: +65 6431 6221
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri: 11.30am – 2.30pm, 6pm – 11pm; Sat–Sun & PH: 11.30am – 11pmOther Related Entries
Kopi Tiam (Swissotel The Stamford)
Prima Taste Kitchen (Centrepoint)
Singapore Food Trail (Flyer)
Yan Ting (St Regis)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
2012-03-13 00:00:00
Centre Ps – A Hidden Dessert Gem at Tiong Bahru
The truth is, I only found my way here because Open Door Policy was closed.  This is truly a hidden find because in terms of dessert shops at Tiong Bahru, I could only recall Café Pralet and Drips exist at Tiong Bahru. It was kind of embarrassing when I asked if Centre Ps was new, but got the reply “It has been around for 4 years”.Does Centre Ps even sound like a cake shop to you?Centre Ps stands for Centerpieces, with the Ps standing for Passionately Perfecting Personalised Premier Patisserie.The man behind the counter was Chef Patissier Steven Ong whose cakes are featured in many lifestyle magazines, having helmed the pastry kitchens of the Intercontinental and Conrad Centennial Singapore collectively for the past 12 years. Customers included Zoe Tay, Tay Ping Hui, Christopher Lee and Joanne Peh.He could customise cakes to the tee. If you need a cake in the shape of a Coach handbag, Doreamon, Angry Bird, or Hermes, he can do it for you. I have seen the catalogue. It was IMPRESSIVE.I had a Pisa ($7.00 nett), with pistachio biscuit layered with raspberry compote and vanilla bean bavariose. And the taste was delicately light and sweet, something you would never expect to find at an olden estate neighbour out of the blue.The Sapporo ($7.00 nett) is a unique unforgettable cake, comprising matcha green tea and 70% dark chocolate sachertorte added with Japanese black bean. The taste needs some time to grow on you, and that is when you appreciate that you are having the best of both Japanese and Austrian dessert world. What have I been missing?Centre Ps
78 Guan Chuan Street, #01-43 Singapore (Tiong Bahru) Tel: +65 6220 1285
Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 10am – 8pm (Closed on Sun)Other Related Entries
Drips Bakery Café (Tiong Poh Road)
The Orange Thimble (Tiong Bahru)
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
2012-03-12 00:00:00
Peperoni Pizzeria – One of the Best Wood-Fired Pizzas
This shop opposite Great World City used to house the Sum Kee zhi-char stall and a prata shop which eventually gave way to Les Amis operated Bistro Du Vin and Peperoni Pizzeria opening side by side. Talk about upmarket changes.Peperoni Pizzeria has been known to serve hearty Italian fare, especially their piping hot wood-fired oven pizzas. This is good news for me because I do not have to travel all the way to Greenwood, Binjai Park or Frankel Avenue for my favourite wood-fired pizzas. Yeah.The décor retains the usual thematic green and red Italian colours, with the signature red metal chairs suggesting a rather casual setting. At the corner of the restaurant is where the chefs churn up dough after dough of tasty pizzas.Some of the favourites are 4 Formagggi, Hawaiian (of course), Supreme, and Prosciutto Crudo di Parma ($19 for 9 inch medium and $23 for 12 inch large). If you come with a group of people, I suggest you just go for the family XXL size of 21 inches ($50) because it is freakily huge and good and fills up the entire table (and your tummy).I had a Pancetta Pork with diced tomato and a soft egg in the middle. This reminds me of the carbonara and am just absolutely delighted at the sight of runny egg spilling through to the dough. For a non-carb lover, I have to say the crust – thin, fragrant and crisp – is vaa-vaa-voom delicious. As usual.The French Onion Soup ($8) came in a really small bowl and is definitely not worth its price tag. What is an Italian restaurant serving French soup? Did this come from next door?Thank goodness the Frutti di Mare ($24), a mixed seafood tomato based pasta, has a thick edgy sauce with huge fresh prawns. Very delightful, and surprisingly my best dish for the day.Peperoni Pizzeria
55 Zion Road (off River Valley Road, opposite Zion Road Food Centre), Singapore, Tel: +65 6732 3253
Opening Hours:  Mon–Sat: 12pm – 10.30pm, Sun: 11am – 10.30pmOther Related Entries
Spizza (East Coast)
Verve Pizzeria (One North)
Limoncello Restaurant (Robertson Quay)
Covelli Italian Bistro & Wine Bar (Orchard Central)
Da Paolo Ristorante (Holland Village)
2012-03-08 00:00:00
[Closed] Broadway Cafe – Get Drunk on Alcoholic Cakes
The idea of a ‘Broadway Café’ is already enlivening, plus it sells alcoholic cakes in the likes of lychee martini, orange vodka, chocolate whiskey, blonde bailey and ribena vodka. Would we get drunk?Located at Duxton Road near my favourite Littered with Books and next to Ernest Seah’s shop  (The actor who played the Watsons salesman from Already Famous), this seems to be a ideal location for afternoon coffee and cakes.Entering the café, there is a long makeup room mirror and em, sexy provocative photos. The menu has uncharacteristic sounding items such as Mad Hatter Tea Party, Confessions of a Chocoholic, Snowing Today and The English Platter. Wait, that’s not ‘Broadway’!The coffee, unfortunately, came slightly spilled and without the usual coffee art. And after we took a sip, drank it, then unconsciously realised it was … Nespresso. (I am no coffee expert but I can taste a Nespresso.)The specialty cake Lychee Martini ($8.70) came with a little cup of alcohol on its side. Nice addition. My friend and I were trying and testing and tasting for that martini in the cake, which came too light and little for our liking.The Blonde Bailey ($8.70) was a lot more alcoholic and worthy. However, the cake decorations and cream reminded me of an old-school styled cream cake, typical in neighbourhood confectionaries of the 80s. I asked and found out that they were made by a skilled ‘auntie’ who have been baking cakes for years. No wonder.Friends may find this a small and cosy place to hold gatherings and birthday parties. I wished it could have been more ‘Broadway’ – play some musical OSTs instead of Olivia Ong (Why are so many local cafes playing Olivia Ong and Emi Fujita anyway?). Have more playful names. I would have loved a Wicked green cake, a cutesy Mary Poppins muffin and a dark Phantom of the Opera chocolate slice.[Closed] Broadway Café
Address: 15 Duxton Road, Singapore (near Tanjong Pagar MRT), Tel: +65 6224 6131
Opening Hours: Mon–Thu: 11am – 1am; Fri–Sat: 11am – 3am; Sun: 11am – 7pmOther Related Entries
3 Inch Sin (Bt Timah)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
Brunetti (Tanglin Mall)
Twelve Cupcakes (Millenia Walk)
2012-03-06 00:00:00
Spizza – Offering A Female Boat-Shaped Pizza
In terms of F&B, the East of Singapore is certainly where you go for great finds, especially at the Katong and East Coast areas. I recently went to Spizza and am surprised to find a brand new clean look with new creations in its menu.I don’t think I stepped into Spizza in the last decade – somehow pizzerias are a very ‘class-outing’ or even ‘fastfood’ venue, at least within my circle of friends. However, with whitewashed walls and Italian icon illustrations, I must say I like this contemporary yet family style look of Spizza’s.Here’s some commendable new dishes: The starter, the Portobello Al Forna ($12) would thrill mushroom and Bolognese sauce lovers. There will be two big thick fat juicy mushrooms which come in a wooden dish topped with Bolognese and Taleggio cheese and baked so impeccably that you may want to stuff that whole sumptuous thing in your mouth if it is big enough. I think the mushrooms can work perfectly if they are small as well.If you love everything cream and cheese, then you must order the Gnocchi ($17.00) which has handmade potato dumplings swimming, or drowning in a gratin tray of creamy gorgonzola (veined Italian blue cheese) sauce. It is kind of crazy thick, but my friend actually finished the sauce till the last drop.One thing to note that Spizza’s Pizza is named after women (no kidding), so there is not the usual Hawaiian and Supreme, but Isabella, Rebecca, Ursula, Yolanda and Zara.Of all the single ladies, I like Isabella ($19 for M, $23 for L) most who is really shapely. Don’t get me wrong. She is actually a pizza in a Venice-inspired Gondola boat shape filled with parma ham and rucola salad. The Head Chef said this boat shape is not only unique, it boasts a fluffier curst which also keeps the filling juicy within.Spizza (East Coast)
217 East Coast Road, #01-01 Tides (Opp Church of the Holy Family), Singapore, Tel: +65 6440 8300
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri: 12pm–2.30pm, 6pm–10.30pm, Sat–Sun: 12pm–10.30pmOther Related Entries
Verve Pizzeria (One North)
Limoncello Restaurant (Robertson Quay)
Covelli Italian Bistro & Wine Bar (Orchard Central)
Da Paolo Ristorante (Holland Village)
Singapore Sling Chilli Crab Pizza (Clarke Quay)
2012-03-05 00:00:00
Maison Kayser – For The Love of Bread
Many bread-lovers are excited over the opening of Artisanal bakery cum café Maison Kayser at Scotts Square. While it has already 18 outlets in Japan, it has also gained a loyal following in Singapore for its fresh breads, pastries and brioches.Perhaps some do not know the origins of this bakery, which is a joint venture of the two pioneers in bread-making – The original Parisian bakery with the Japanese Kimura family. Together, they created a croissant which was named the best by Paris’s Figaro newspaper.Incidentally, the croissants are also the best-selling item in the Singapore branch, with an average of 250 sold every day.Do not leave without trying some of their signature sweet items, such as the coffee éclair ($3.70) and tarte citron (S4.70) – guaranteed to send excitable sour chills down your spine.9Full Post at InSing.com – Fresh bakes at Maison KayserMaison Kayser
Scotts Road, #B1-09 Scotts Square (Orchard MRT), Tel: +65 6636 3672
Opening Hours: 8:00am – 8:00pm DailyOther Related Entries
Bakerzin Artisan Bread (MyVillage)
Joe & Dough (Suntec)
Maison Ikkoku (Kandahar Street)
Blackbird Café (Handy Road)
Delicious (Scotts Square)
2012-03-02 00:00:00
Barcook Bakery –  Why’s The Raisin Cream Cheese Bun So Irresistibly Soft?
I believe in a) the underdogs b) if you want to sell things, make that one thing, and make it really good. Barcook Bakery, the small bakery shop which started off at Hong Lim Complex off Chinatown, has done just that.Its four branches at Hong Lim, Central, One Raffles Place and OG Albert Complex has perpetual long queues. And many come for its divine Raisin Cream Cheese Bun ($1.40).I unconsciously bought one and immediately got hooked. And this flat pale plain simple sort of unattractive bun has become a weekly breakfast or comfort food when I need a quick and filling bite.Barcook’s Raisin Cream Cheese Bun is irresistibly cotton-like soft and slightly chewy, with its inside filled with light creamy cheese and raisins. Simple ingredients which work perfectly together.It turns out that their chief baker used to work for the BreadTalk chain (ah…). The chain uses a ‘sponge and dough’ baking method whereby the yeast, flour and water are first mixed together and left aside to rise before adding the rest of the ingredients. While it is more time consuming, it is said that the dough remains moist, soft and better flavoured.Barcook has other interesting offerings such as a Salty Egg Yolk Bun ($1.60) and Polo Char Siew Bun ($1.50). Let’s just say for Polo Buns, my heart has already gone to Crystal Jade’s.The winner is still the Raisin Cream Cheese Bun.  Some buy it back but nothing beats eating it on the spot straight from the oven. (At least microwave it for 20 seconds before eating if it is already cold.) I have seen many similar versions in other bread shops but they just cannot compare.Barcook Bakery 吧台料理
6 Eu Tong Sen Street, #01-09 The Central @ Clarke Quay, Singapore
Opening Hours: Weekdays: 8am – 9pm, Weekends: 9am – 9pmOther Related Entries
Bakerzin Artisan Bread (MyVillage)
PAUL Bakery (Ngee Ann City)
Maison Kayser (Scotts Square)
Drips Bakery Café (Tiong Poh Road)
Joe & Dough (Suntec)
2012-03-01 00:00:00
PAUL Bakery – From France with Love
My first encounter with PAUL was at Champs Elysées Paris. Needless to say, the ambience, the bread, the éclair, the charm… it was a truly unforgettable experience – so much so that I kept a piece of its serviette. When PAUL opened at Takashimaya, fans were ecstatic over the news because it was as though Europe has come to us.The history of PAUL is one that sounds familiar. Since 1889 when a small bakery opened in Northern France by Charlemagne Mayot and his wife, PAUL has become the story of the family’s love, commitment and traditions. Five generations down, CEO Maxime Holder continues with PAUL’s culinary heritage.Somehow, the charm seems to be lost when it comes to Singapore, with fans saying it is “a little overhyped” and a “disappointment” with its ordinary food and poor service. Especially when they have to queue that long just to get a seat.All I can say is you can import the European goods, but you cannot import the European service and European experience.As for my local experience, my wait was almost negligible on a weekday night. Service was very attentive and rather prompt (perhaps they could handle better at off-peak hours).Items available include pastries, cakes, croissants, sandwiches, soups, quiches, tarts, crepes, eggs, and over 100 types of bread. PAUL still makes their bread by hand in the bakeries every day which would take up to seven hours as that their dough can develop its full flavour with longer fermentation.My favourite bread was definitely the Fougasse Olive Bread. It was wonderful. I liked its soft texture with a slightly salty taste, perfect when dipped into the balsamic olive oil mixture. Their crisp and flaky croissants ($2.20) are also a must-have, a mile better than all the ordinary ones I ever had, but please eat it fresh.A recommended dessert can be the Millefeuille Chocolat ($6.40), their Napoleon with chocolate crème patisserie filling. It is a tad on the sweet side for me, and I much prefer its plain version with creamy custard fillings.Its Fruit Tarts such as the Tartelette Multifruits ($6.40) are a delight to look at but does not leave much of an impression taste wise. I much prefer the Éclair ($5.60) with traditional choux pastry with chocolate crème patisserie filling.The friends who went with me said their expectations were not met. Perhaps I did not go expecting ‘Paris’, and therefore had quite a positive experience.PAUL Bakery
391A Orchard Road, #03-16/16A/17 Ngee Ann City Tower A, Singapore (Orchard MRT), Tel: +65 6836 5932
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 8.30am – 10pm  & Fri–Sat: 8.30am – 11pm (Bakery), Mon–Sun: 10am – 11pm (Restaurant)Other Related Entries
Maison Kayser (Scotts Square)
Bakerzin Artisan Bread (MyVillage)
Jones The Grocer (Dempsey)
Joe & Dough (Suntec)
Da Paolo Ristorante (Holland Village)
2012-02-29 00:00:00
Drips Bakery Café – A Café Which Feels Like Home
Drips Bakery Café has a space which reminds me of a living room space I always wanted to have. White washed wall, minimal furniture and colourful touches of decoration. While most other eateries would want to pack customers, this café has so much open space with inviting sunrays laminating the area.Tiong Bahru is no longer the same. There is Forty Hands. There is The Orange Thimble. And there is Drips – a place which feels most me because I value comfort.Co-owner Alfred Chan went from baking at Shangri-la, to opening a bakery at Commonwealth, to this neighbourhood café which is inspired by PAUL. “This closeness to my customers and our casual banter is what I enjoy most. And when I’m happy, I make happy desserts.”Of all the offerings, Drips’ tarts seem to be the most popular. The Mixed Fruit Tart with blueberries and kiwis is such a pretty darling, with a soft crumply crust, cool cream cheese and very fresh fruits.The Cherry Brandy Tart is another good looker with a deliciously light texture and touch of alcohol.I suspect its savoury items are not as impressive because a chicken pie I had was not even as tasty as the brand by the name of Pxxxr.Drips use only coffee beans from Graffeo, a San Francisco brand, for their brews. The ice chocolate was both memorable in taste and looks – a smiley face which made it a very happy drink.This is a birthday cake treat from CalvinTimo and we really enjoyed lazing away the afternoon discussing about Drips’ travel inspired décor, looking at its knick-knacks on sale, and flipping magazines. Drips Bakery Café feels like home.Drips Bakery Cafe
82 Tiong Poh Road, #01-05 Singapore, Tel: +65 6222 0400
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 10.30am – 9.30pm; Fri–Sat: 10.30am – 11pm (Closed on Tue)Other Related Entries
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
The Orange Thimble (Tiong Bahru)
Maison Ikkoku (Kandahar Street)
Crazy World Café (Chinatown)
Joan Bowen Café (Macpherson)
2012-02-28 00:00:00
Da Paolo Ristorante – Boutique Italian Dining
The Da Paolo Group has just opened a Ristorante at Holland Village, the third concept there after its Gastronomia and Pizza Bar. Therefore it is not too far-fetched to say that Chip Bee Gardens has almost become a Da Daolo stretch.Slightly different from the original Ristorante at Club Street, this branch is a perfect blend with Holland Village’s charm with an outdoor al fresco area and rustic ambience. This is what I call “Boutique Italian Dining” which serves authentic homemade pasta and risotto dishes honed by Chef Gleb Snegin.Many of you have a love-hate relationship with squid ink pasta, but Da Paolo’s Spaghetti al Nero di Seppia ($26.00) would change your impression very positively. Their version is made by squeezing out fresh ink from squid in their very own kitchen, boosting a strong sea-tang flavour. While this spaghetti may leave black stains on your lips, I loved the addictive cheesy touch.Full Post at InSing.com – Da Paolo Ristorante Opens At Holland VillageDa Paolo Ristorante (Holland Village)
44 Jalan Merah Saga, #01-56 Chip Bee Gardens, Tel: +65 6476 1332
Opening Hours: Mon–Sun: 11.30am–2.30pm, 6.30pm–10.30pmOther Related Entries
Covelli Italian Bistro & Wine Bar (Orchard Central)
Verve Pizzeria (One North)
Youmenya Goemon (Marina Bay Link)
Limoncello Restaurant (Robertson Quay)
Can You Name The Pastas
2012-02-27 00:00:00
Chef Tony’s – We Have The Popcorn Fever
It seems like Singapore has caught on a popcorn fever. And popcorn can is no longer relegated as cinema food, and can be considered a ‘gourmet snack’. Other than the very popular Garrett Popcorn, I was quite excited to find a new popcorn shop at Marina Square.Chef Tony’s which originated from the Philippines will delight popcorn lovers because the entire shop sells only popcorn, with 7 different flavours. Other than the original caramel, the other interesting premium flavours include white chocolate walnut, creamy parmesan, white country cheddar, mochachino with almonds and white chocolate parmesan ($8.00 for small tub, $13.00 for big tub).The white chocolate walnut popcorn was kind of fluff and light, yet crisp. The flavour of the white chocolate is not overly strong, and the walnuts add a pleasant crunch. The best thing was the tub did not contain irritating seeds that go un-popped.Full Post at InSing.com – Popcorn Fever Hits SingaporeChef Tony’s Popcorn Co.
Marina Square, 6 Raffles Boulevard, #02-256A, Tel: +65 62236960
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 9:30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Sticky (Central)
Candylicious (Resorts World)
Candylicious Takashimaya
Alfero Artisan Gelato (Marina Square)
Swensen’s Chendol Ice Cream (Marina Square)
2012-02-24 00:00:00
Covelli Italian Bistro – Hidden Italian Gem at Orchard Central
Opening a restaurant is sometimes about location, location, location. Covelli Italian Bistro & Wine Bar is a promising addition in the Orchard Road belt, but its site at the 2nd basement of Orchard Central (besides Medz) may leave it very unnoticeable. And I couldn’t find its entrance.Its contemporary monochromatic décor and mood lighting suggests that this is going to be pricey, but looking its menu suggest otherwise. A 3 course weekday lunch at $14.90++ is rather affordable, especially when it is quiet enough for lunch meetings and a romantic date.Started by Christopher Njo (who also once brought Roti Boy to Singapore), food at Covelli range from classic pizzas, pastas, Tortellini to pan seared duck gras and sea bream fillet.The starter of Pan seared Prawns on Semi Sundried Tomato Puree & Scallops on Onion Confit topped with Avruga Caviar Lemon Butter ($23) is a memorable one. Freshly juicy prawns with semi-sweet puree work perfectly together, with the caviar adding a touch of class.I liked the Orata Con Pasta Stoglia, with Sea Bream Fillet wrapped with crispy hyllo on Butternut Pumpkin Mash topped with Tomato Salsa ($26). While biting into the fish, there is a paper-thin crisp giving it a layered and varied texture, with the mash nicely complementing and not overpowering the main.The Quarantaotto ($34) which is a 24 hours slowed braised U.S.D.A boneless Beef Short Ribs served with ide Truffle Mash already sounds exciting. The beef indeed melts in your mouth, though the broth is on the side of heaviness.A pity the dessert, a traditional Italian Tiramisu ($12) topped with shaved Chocolate is rather ordinary and can do with a stronger touch of alcohol.If you are in the vicinity and crave for a cosy Italian meal, you know where to navigate to now.Covelli Italian Bistro & Wine Bar
181 Orchard Road, #B2-13/22 Orchard Central, Singapore, Tel: +65 6238 6400
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Medz (Orchard Central)
Limoncello Restaurant (Robertson Quay)
Verve Pizzeria (One North)
Infusion (Dempsey)
The Tastings Room (Marina Square)
2012-02-22 00:00:00
Alfero Artisan Gelato – Creamy, Rich, Thick, Smooth, Heavenly
3 different friends recommended Alfero Artisan Gelato, and it was a sign I should have it since ice cream is quite my thing. Located right next to the entrance of Marina Square opposite Killiney Kopitiam, the cheerful staff of the gelato shop was very friendly to get customers in. Sometimes too friendly.Started by Marco Alfero, he was a finance manager who decided to pursue his dream and got trained by the Gelato University of Carpigiani in Italy. He opened his first shop at Marina Square, and the second retail shop/laboratory opened a month later at MacPherson Lane.Unlike other ice cream places, Alfero stores his gelato in a pozzetto cabinet which are little ‘wells’ to retain the freshness. While you cannot see the exciting offerings, feel free to try out samples before you commit yourself to buying a cup.The single cup is $4.5 and medium with 2 flavours cost $6.50. The flavours include Bacio (Kiss) Nocciola (Hazelnut), Mandorla (Almond), Vanigla (Vanilla), Marroni (Chestnut), Te’ Verde (Green Tea) Cioccolato (Chocolate) and something you would not expect here – Durian!I ordered a Bacio purely because I liked the very Italian sound of the name. And taking my first mouthful, it was an “OMG!” moment. The gelato was creamy, rich, thick, smooth, heavenly. This part hazelnut, part milk, part chocolate flavour would delight those who enjoy either Ferrero Rocher or Kinder Bueno. It is like mixing these two into my gelato. Yums.The dark chocolate flavour is also very intense, yet not overly rich.  It is made of 72% Venezuela cocoa, and it was the dense texture that won me over. Generally, most flavours worked for me other than the fruity (raspberry, mango) one which were too sweet for me.If you are a pistachio lover, their gelato is made from pistachios from Bronte Sicily which makes this flavour delicate and naturally green. Lovely experience to just hang out here, with a cup, and indulge in gelato spoon by spoon.Even the Godfather will love it.Alfero Artisan Gelato
6 Raffles Boulevard, #02-226A/B Marina Square, Singapore, Tel: +65 6848 4269
Opening Hours: Mon–Sun: 10am – 10pmOther Related Entries
Ci Gusta! (Anchorpoint)
Cold Stone Creamery (Orchard Central)
Island Creamery (Serene Centre)
Ice Cream Chefs (East Coast)
Udders (Thomson Road)
2012-02-21 00:00:00
Xiao La Jiao – Hot! Sichuan Food To Awaken Your Taste Buds
I fondly remember my Sichuan Chengdu trip some 10 years ago during the filming of Tian Ya Ren Wo Xing. Other than the impossibly beautiful scenary and pandas, Sichuan is also widely known for its food. Being a huge fan of Sichuan cuisine, I can rattle out some of its iconic signatures – Kung pao chicken, mapo tofu, hot and sour soup, water-boiled fish, dan dan noodles and twice-cooked pork.So I am somewhat trilled that Xiao La Jiao (meaning Little Chillies) has opened at I12 Katong Mall offering authentic Sichuan cuisine. (Incidentally, my Sichuan travel mate Magdalene was also nicknamed “Xiao La Jiao”.) As for its authenticity, the chefs all hail from Chengdu, who only use imported spices from there.I was first recommended the griddle-cooked dishes ($17.90) and manager Zi Qiang humorously asked if I wanted “local-styled” or “Sichuan-styled” which I opted for “somewhere in the middle”. The griddle pot arrived with deep-fried prawns and potato strips overlaid with peppercorn, chill oil, onions and spices. Without any mental preparation, I took a bite and was triggered by a tingly numbness of the tongue. It was Hot! But shiok because the type of peppercorn spiciness reminded me of Sichuan immediately.Full Post at InSing.com – Authentic Sichuan eatery opens at 112 KatongXiao La Jiao
112 East Coast Road, #03-05, I12 Katong, Singapore 428802, Tel: +65 6636 3736
Opening Hours: 12pm to 9.30pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
HonGuo (NEX)
Chong Qing Hot Pot (Suntec)
Noodle Star (Bugis Village)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
2012-02-20 00:00:00
Limoncello Italian Pizza & Grill – Food from the Amalfi, For that Romantic Date
Limoncello Restaurant is the restaurant which hosted the Sold.sg and Omy.sg Valentine’s Dinner Date. Since many are curious about my date, some wanted to know about the food as well. Its address at the “Rivergate” may surprise some. In a condominium? Yes it is, but it’s also at one end of Robertson Quay with a connecting bridge to River View Hotel and Grand Copthorne.The restaurant is the brainchild of Restaurateur Mark Anthonisz and Fabio Iannone who brought a team from Amalfi Coast. While this is no Amalfi, it faces a peaceful Singapore River with a huge alfresco dining area to wine and dine away.Limoncello’s Napolitana wood fired pizzas and charcoal grilled meats and seafood are said to be what distinguishes them from the rest. Indeed, its Rucola e Prosciutto di Parma ($27.50) with tomato, mozzarella, parma ham, cherry tomatoes, fresh rocket salad and parmesan cheese is a noteworthy choice. Its crust borders between thick and thin, with rustic wood fired touch and crunch.Its Cannelloni Di Vitello, a homemade cannelloni filled with ricotta and veal is one of my favourites that day. Served very warm, its creamy tomato base does not leave a thick lingering taste with pasta not being overcooked. Nice.The Scialatielli Amalfitana ($21.50), a homemade Amalfi Coast udon-like pasta with fresh seafood, is supposed to be a highlight but did not resonate with the guests. Arriving looking like a plate of ee-fu noodles served during Chinese weddings, it also tasted almost like one – thick noodles with a salty seafoody sauce.I do realise that several of the dishes her makes suitable sharing dishes. Rather than serving a beef steak of its own, it’s beef came in the form of Bistecca Grigliata ($68.00) -grilled ribeye tagliata surrounded by dark greenly servings of wildrocket. It is easy to divide the meat into pieces, but I did wish to be able to savour a slab of juicy beef.If you have space for a medley of desserts (I would encourage you to leave some though the portions here are huge), go for the Profiterols ($9). Thecream filled choux pastry topped with warm chocolate sauce will make you craving for more.Limoncello Italian Pizza & Grill
95 Robertson Quay, #01-19/20 Rivergate, Singapore, Tel: +65 6634 5117
Opening Hours: Mon: 6pm–10.30pm; Tue–Sun: 12pm–2.30pm, 6pm–10.30pmOther Related Entries
Verve Pizzeria (One North)
Youmenya Goemon (Marina Bay Link)
Pete’s Place (Hyatt Hotel)
Infusion (Dempsey)
Can You Name The Pastas
2012-02-17 00:00:00
And My Valentine’s Day Date Is…
Before I go into the Valentine’s Day Date story, the long-story-short is that I auctioned my Valentine’s Day dinner date on Sold.sg and raised a decent sum of money for The Spastic Children’s Association of Singapore.Some say I am very brave (I think the girls in this auction are braver). When Alvinology from omy.sg invited me for this project, my first question was “Who would bid for me?!!” But since it was for a good cause, and it only cost me a night, I was all game for it in the end.My bid remained at 15 cents for the longest time, slightly embarrassing, with an actual facebook comment of “Who the F is Daniel Ang?” adding a bit of insult.Therefore, I am thankful for my friends and supporters for pushing the bid up all the way to $82.65 from 15 cents. Each auction jump on Sold.sg was 15 cents and cost 75 cents, which means a total of $495.90 was raised for charity.Being on a date was actually slightly quite nervous for me (even though I am a guy). I haven’t been on a date for a long time! With a small bouquet of red rose, a newly bought red bow tie, and spending actually 15 minutes doing up my hair, I went to Limoncello Restaurant in anticipation.And here is my charity bid Valentine’s Day date…Without wanting to disclose too much, haha…. She works at a music school and we actually first met about 10 years ago when she was a guest on my Radio1003 programme. She once sang a MediaCorp Programme theme song which I liked a lot.I was even more surprised she told me she bought me a birthday present by adopting a child from World Vision (because I was just looking at the World Vision catalogue in the morning!) Yesterday was the 3rd time we met over 10 years.As it was a group date with all the bloggers and the Sold.sg founders at Limoncello Restaurant, it turned up to be a crazy and enjoyable night with never-ending food and laughter. I am in fact glad that we bloggers (whom some may deem as not credible,) can do something for this society. What I hope is, the charity does not stop here, and this Valentine’s Day dinner will be the start to many more good causes.Thank you Omy.sg, Sold.sg, the other 9 bloggers (Ang geck geck, Calvin timothy, Claire, Chrispytine, Eric Lim, Joanne-marie sim, Kanny Theng, Moonberry, William Tan) my bidders and friends for doing their part for The Spastic Children’s Association of Singapore.Other Related Entries
I Was ‘Sold’ for $82.65
Going Once, Going Twice. I am auctioning my Valentine’s Date for Charity
Limoncello Restaurant (Robertson Quay)
2012-02-16 00:00:00
Recipe – Making Honey Ice Cream with Pineapple Tarts Bits
When faced with a tub of leftover pineapple tarts from the Chinese New Year, I decided to make them into pineapple tart ice cream. Crazy idea for my day off, and I thought it should go well with honey. So after an ice cream making course at Tom’s Palette and a $108 investment in an ice-cream maker, it was proud moment when I tasted my first ice cream. Hard work of course!Ingredients (makes about 800ml ice cream)
200ml whipping cream, 200ml full cream milk, 5 egg yolks, ½ cup honey, pineapple tarts/cookies pieces1. Pour milk into pan and stir on low heat. Turn heat off once milk steamed. (Took me about 5 min to stir.)2. Mix egg yolks with honey and beat till pale yellow.3. Pour egg-honey mixture into milk and stir on low heat. Cook till it forms a custard-like texture. Pour whipping cream in slowly and continue to cook till custard is formed (Whole process took me close to 10 min. You have to be very patient in stirring here or the eggs would become scrambled!).4. If you want to ice cream to taste smoother, pour the custard mixture through a sieve.5. Freeze the custard for about an hour. Churn with a whisk in its semi-frozen stage. The more you churn, the more ‘airy’ the ice cream gets.6. Freeze custard for about half hour. Churn for a second time. It is at this stage when you could add pineapple tarts/cookies for extra bite.7. Leave in fridge to firm.
(The above steps 5-6 are for hand-churned ice cream. I used a Kenwood ice cream maker, which still required steps 1-4. Do note that most ice cream makers require you to leave the churning bowl in the freezer for at least 24 hours.)The most important stages to me are the custard and churning stages. You really got to stir and cook till the mixture is thick enough, yet not scrambling it. The churning stage affects how dense your ice cream is. My advice is, start with small portions and experiment. Have fun!Other Related Entries
CNY Almond Cookies Recipe
Steamed Mandarin Orange Cake Recipe
SoEZ Brownie Baking 101
Recipe of Grilled Slipper Lobster
2012-02-16 00:00:00
I was ‘Sold’ for $82.65!
Last week, I blogged about auctioning a Valentine’s Date for charity.  I am very happy to say that I have been ‘sold’ for $82.65! That means a total of $495.90 is raised for the Spastic Children’s Association of Singapore.As one token for a 15 cent bid cost 75cent,  a final price of $82.65 would mean (82.65/0.15 x 0.75 + 82.65) = $495.90.In addition, Sold.sg is going to contribute $1 for every $2 raised! Although it is a small sum of money, we hope this can do something to help SCAS to support their work in providing early intervention, special education and rehabilitation services those suffering from Cerebral Palsy.This online had another special meaning to me because it was held exactly on my birthday, very coincidentally. Therefore, I spent the last minutes of my birthday looking at people bid for me – which is rather… (I can’t find the right words). Though the auction was supposed to end at 12:00 midnight, it lasted all the way till almost 3am. Maybe the amount would have been more if it was earlier. Haha.Thank you Omy.sg and Sold.sg for inviting me for this project and friends for all for your support!
2012-02-13 00:00:00
Loola’s – The New Restaurant by Awfully Chocolate
This restaurant with a rather quirky name is the latest addition to the Awfully Chocolate group. Loola is also the nickname of the daughter of co-owner Lyn Lee. Other than the famed chocolate cake shop, this group has an impressive resume with Everything with Fries, JooJoo and Moshi Bakes.Located at the Esplanade, do leave aside at least an hour for dining if you do not want to miss the entrance to your next show.Many of their dishes are modern interpretations of the traditional Asian recipes, such as the Crab Cheese Soufflé, Fremantle Octopus and Salted Vegetable Duck Soup. The duck soup aka ‘kiam chye arg’ ($9) is a twist to the Peranakan’s traditional dish ‘tek tim’, but this version has a thick creamy texture made from egg emulsion. This delicious starter will zest up your taste buds with its unique flavours.Full Post at InSing.com – New Restaurant by Awfully Chocolate opensLoola’s by Awfully Chocolate, 8 Raffles Avenue #02-14 Esplanade Mall S039802
Tel: 63369563
Opening Hours: Sun to Thu: 12:00 – 22:30; Fri to Sat: 12:00 – 00:00Other Related Entries
Everything With Fries (Orchard Central)
The Rotisserie (China Square Food Centre)
OverTime (Dempsey)
The Academy Bistro (Supreme Court)
Friends @ Jelita (Jelita)
2012-02-10 00:00:00
Going Once, Going Twice. I am auctioning my Valentine’s Date for Charity!
No, I am NOT kidding. Yes, I am auctioning a Valentine’s Date for charity.Here’s how it works: Users will place bids on me using tokens (each costing 75c) provided at Sold.sg, an online shopping auction site. The person with the highest bid would win a dinner date with me which will be held at Limoncello Restaurant. The dinner is worth $95.00++ per person. And ALL proceeds will be given to the Spastic Children’s Association of Singapore (SCAS).The truth is I was initially apprehensive about ‘selling’ myself on an auction site. What if nobody wants to buy me? In the end, I trust that everything would turn out well, and you would want to spend some time with me, and do something for charity right?I tell you what. I will donate the same final amount bided for to charity as well!About Me
This Food Blogger is probably the only one around who is also a fitness instructor. So you are getting two for the price of one. Or maybe more. He is currently single because he has no time for dates. He divides his time studying his Masters, teaching at a Polytechnic, hosting a radio programme, writing food reviews, instructing others and volunteering. However, he has decided that auctioning his time for The Spastic Children’s Association of Singapore and having a special dinner with a lovely date sounds too good to be true.Also since it is his birthday week, he thinks it will be nice to have somebody share a slice of cake with him.What You Are Getting Other Than A Dinner Date
- A Walking Food Directory (if you want to know where is the most delicious wanton mee)
- A Travel Guide (to share holiday tips)
- A Listening Ear (he promises to listen to your problems)
- A Chance to be on Radio (he brings his microphone and recorder around)
- A Blog Entry on http://DanielFoodDiary.comLink to register and get tokens
Link to my auction siteI will be waiting for you. Please support!
2012-02-08 00:00:00
B@Rochester – For That Romantic Dinner at Rochester
This is my first visit to Rochester Park, while out of the way, has been famed for its quality F&B outlets amidst the charming greenery. I arrived at B@Rochester, a contemporary Japanese restaurant set in an old-style bungalow with a huge bar serving sakes, shochu, and special cocktails.I spotted an old university mate there, who could be one of the owners as I hear B@Rochester is started by a group of young entrepreneurs. As to why “B”, the restaurant wants you to ‘Be’ there, and it does fit in suitably with its numeric address of 8.On one side is the cocktail bar with a sashimi counter, while Executive Chef Joseph could be right there creating a gastronomic delight.  The ambience is quite stunning really, which balances being Japanese themed while modern, dimly-lit and suitable for a romantic dinner with the one you love.There are many female fans who are at B@Rochester for its cocktails who dares to be experimental. You can have a Frosty Edamame, Calpis Fizz, Black Tea Martini ($12 – $22) and Unusual Mixology – a combination of kiwi liqueur, lime, pineapple, dragonfruit and premium tequila. While it looks deceivingly ‘weak’, the very fruity mixture can be alcholically potent.The experimental streak of Chef appears in most of the dinners – unusual combinations which work for me (I do think some may view the dishes as ‘unorthodox’.) For starters, I had a Momotaro Japanese Tomato Salad ($14) served on a bed of mesclun lettuce with a touch of anchovies, balsamic vinaigrette and mayonnaise. The Japanese elements comes from the infusion of shoyu and mirin, adding that slight nuance which makes the salad both refreshing and appetizing.Another light dish is the Bonito broth with seafood and shimeiji mushroom ($12). I liked that the soup reeked of seafood flavours yet not being overpowering, while being warm and satisfying.I must say though, that there are some dishes that I would remember for a long long time because of their unbelievable taste – and this would be their Signature Scampi Somen ($28). While you may be wondering how this simple noodle dish would warrant its price tag, its huge fresh prawns would already impress. But it’s the smooth thin slippery stewed Japanese rice noodles that slides down your throat in bursting flavours that demonstrates simplicity can have its beauty.B@Rochester Restaurant & Bar
8 Rochester Park, Singapore, Tel: +65 6778 1788
Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 12pm–2.30pm, 6pm–11pm; Mon–Thu:[Bar]: 6pm–1am; Fri–Sat & PH Eve:[Bar]: 6pm–2am (Closed on Sun)Other Related Entries
Shabu 29 (Clarke Quay Central)
Minoriya (Tanjong Katong)
SUN Japanese Dining (Chijmes)
Infusion (Dempsey)
Friends @ Jelita (Jelita)
2012-02-06 00:00:00
Today we say Goodbye to Bottle Tree Village
Today we say Goodbye to Bottle Tree VillageAccording to the Straits Times, Bottle Tree Village, the rustic enclave with a popular seafood restaurant in Sembawang, will bid its patrons farewell today. Its lease with the Singapore Land Authority (SLA) will run out next month and the option to extend the lease by SLA came too late for the owners.Being only 8 years old, we cannot say that we have lost a heritage site. But if this village was given the chance to exist, the story could have been different 42 years later.Yes, we may have seen many restaurants and eateries close down, even renowned ones – mainly citing high rental cost and sustainability issues. But few resonate with the heart like this. What we lost is a dream, an open space and a place to escape from the stressing city.Bottle Tree was a crazy idea of 5 friends who dreamed about creating a concept village where there will be eateries, recreational activities and a winding down space.  And this dream actually came true. The six Bottle Trees cost a whopping $30,000 each from Australia then, and I do not think any practical Singaporean would do something which would be seen as ‘senseless’. Really, who spends 6 figure sums buying trees?Everytime I go to Bottle Tree Village, I feel like I am in another world all together. It is liberating! The air, the greenery, the space to roam around, the beautiful skies, seaview and yes, the trees which we would all love to hug (not like the army ones). Children were fishing prawns with parents, and they played with ‘traditional’ games like hide and seek and slides, not ipads and iphones.We hear that this Sembawang land might be turned to a “theme park with ancillary food and beverage service”.I have nothing against theme parks and eating places. Even though the Bottle Tree Village was also ‘man-made’, what it gave was a sense of genuinely.Perhaps in Singapore, it is really inevitable that the old will give way to the new. Some things would just never be the same again. As we say Goodbye to Bottle Tree Village, I would like to say, thank you for the memories.Other Related Entries
Ulu Food Places
More Ulu Food Places
Galley By The Straits (Admiralty Road)
Sunset Grill and Pub (Seletar Airbase)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
2012-02-03 00:00:00
Taiwan’s Spraying of Water Chicken Rice – What Is It?
[Chiayi, Taiwan] Chiayi, though a lesser known area in Taiwan, is the access point of the scenic mountain area of Alishan. For those unfamiliar and wish to venture there, the popular street foods at Chiayi include Water-spray Chicken Rice, Guo’s Rice Cakes in Soup, Shrimp Egg with Preserved Mustard Green and Thick Duck Soup.Taiwan remains a special place in my heart because it is where my home-stay families are. From Day One, my hosts insisted that I try this eatery called “Spraying of Water Chicken Food” 嘉义喷水鸡肉饭. No kidding as this is what the signboard says exactly. Ignore the bad English please. This Taiwanese fast-food outlet with at least 5 branches is what I call the Chinese version of KFC.Singapore is also famous for its chicken rice. So what is the difference?Firstly, the chicken does not spray water, in case you are wondering if Taiwanese chickens are any different. It originates from a place with a fountain called 喷水. Created in 1949, founder Lin who used to be a braised rice seller attempted adding chicken strips on its rice. This dish turned out to be an instant hit.Another revelation: The meat was not ‘chicken’ but turkey instead.  (If you literally translate Turkey in Mandarin, it says ‘fire chicken’.)The bowls of rice with topped with cut turkey pieces or shredded turkey, accompanied by yellow pickled daikon radish, drizzled with a sweet salty gravy made from turkey oil and soy sauce. You should also order a mayonaised-filled seafood salad.The turkey meat was more tender than usual (very similar to a chicken texture yet with more bite). The most unforgettable part was really the gravy absorbed by the big bowl of rice. I couldn’t imagine but I finished the entire bowl of turkey rice. Prices start from 20NT (SGD$0.84) – cheap cheap and cheep cheep.Spraying of Water Chicken Rice 喷水鸡肉饭
No.325, Zhongshan Rd., West Dist., Chiayi City 600, Taiwan (R.O.C.) Tel:+886 05 2222433
No.499, Zhongxiao Rd., East Dist., Chiayi City 600, Taiwan (R.O.C.) Tel:+886 05 2719200Other Related Entries
Ah Zong Mian Xian (Taiwan) 
Pork Pepper Buns (Taiwan)
Hao Da Chicken Culet (Taiwan)
Big Sausage Wrap Small Sausage (Taiwan)
Coffin Bread (Taiwan)
2012-02-02 00:00:00
Causeway Bay Hong Kong Café – More than 300 foods at Centrepoint
Centrepoint has been off the Orchard radar for a while, and I was gladly surprised to see a new Hong Kong café opening at Level 1 within an obscure corner.What’s a Hong Kong café without a wide-ranging variety of food? The menu is huge, with more than twenty different menu sub-headings to select from – from Hong Kong style dry noodles, ‘Ta Bin Lou’ hot pot, curry spaghetti to cheese baked rice, pasta and noodle soup.All for an ‘adventure’, I tried the inexplicable combination of cheese “gong zai” noodles with egg and char siew ($10.30). The cheese with instant noodles merged surprising well together, giving a salty creamy tinge. The glazed char siew not only looked temptingly delicious under the light, the slices were both tender and sweet.Full Post at InSing.com – Causeway Bay Hong Kong Cafe opensCauseway Bay Hong Kong Café
176 Orchard Road, #01-105/ 106/ 107/ 110/ 111, The CentrePoint (Somersert MRT) Singapore 238843 Tel: +65 6733 3353
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
HK Kim Gary Restaurant (Vivocity)
Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong (TripleOne)
C Nai Hong Kong Cafe Xpress (Marine Cove)
Wong Kok Char Chan Teng (Bugis Junction)
Central Restaurant (Vivocity)
2012-02-01 00:00:00
Crystal Jade Kitchen – Experiments With Cantonese Home-style Food
Crystal Jade Kitchen has already established a strong reputation in Singapore for its Chinese food. Talk about its Kitchen and fans can call out its favourites like Cantonese noodles, congee, roast meat and dim sum. What is yours?With already more than 45 outlets in Singapore, they have a new branch at Scotts Square – this time experimenting with casual Cantonese comfort food – in the likes of new home-style dishes and soups.Talking about Scotts Square, shoppers are more likely to move downstairs to its F&B outlets of Delicious, Maison Kayser and Marukin. Go all the way and you may be surprised at a rather modern contemporary looking Crystal Jade with big LCD screen menus and service staff taking orders via hand-held devices.From the new menu, I loved the Steamed Rice with Scallion Oil ($6.80/small) most, considering I am not a ‘rice person’. This QQ Rice looks like a unimpressive dish with a glob of green on the top, but this fragrant mixed glutinous rice reminds you that simplest things can taste the best. Plain, aromatic and lingering.The rice should go well with the Sautéed Walnut with Assorted Vegetables. It feels like the chef has put together different vegetables which give a ‘crunch’ – such as red capsicum, French beans, black fungus and fresh lily bulb, all providing a different yet fresh chomp-y bite.The other dishes such as the Roasted Chicken with Special Spicy Sauce ($12.80) and Stewed Beef Tendon in Black Pepper ($14.80) are both worth a try, each with a never-tried-before sauce. My only reservation is on its aesthetical presentation, especially the chicken drowned in Macau-inspired sauce. People on the table were staggered at its ‘ugliness’ and protruding head, but the roast was delicious lah.Crystal Jade Kitchen
Scotts Square, #03-06, 6 Scotts Road, Singapore 228209, Tel: +65 66361836
Opening Hours: Monday to Saturday: 11.30am – 3pm; 5.30pm – 10.30pm. Sun & PH: 10.30am – 3.30pm; 5.30pm – 10.30pmOther Related Entries
Crystal Jade Dining IN (Vivocity)
Putien (City Square Mall)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Plaza Brasserie Dragon Feast (Beach Road)
HonGuo (NEX)
2012-01-30 00:00:00
Korea Samgyetang – The 1st Korean Ginseng Chicken Soup Restaurant in Seoul
[Seoul, Korea] While I had the signature hot piping Korean Ginseng Chicken during winter because it feels warm and fuzzy to the tummy, most native Koreans prefer it during the hottest summers.  They believe this is a dish with high nutrient content, and can help regain stamina lost by excessive sweating. And the three specific days in summer they would take are the “Chobok” (초복), “Jungbok” (중복), and “Malbok” (말복).The main reason why I recommend this Samgyetang restaurant is because my tour guide from CTC Travels brought the group here (and I thought it was a tourist trap). My friend working in Korea also took me to exactly this same place, and it is listed as 50 Top “Hi, Seoul Korean Restaurants” by Seoul City Government.Its big orange signboard reads that “1st Korean Ginseng Chicken soup restaurant since 1960” which is as good as saying they invented this dish. Well, the restaurant was buzzling and filled all 4 floors by locals and tourists on a weekday night.The basic Chicken Broth with Korean Ginseng cost 14,000 won (SGD$15.60), and there are other options and additions of black-bone chicken, Korean wild ginseng and abalone. And they also sell the western style Rotisserie Chicken! (for 15,000 won = SGD $16.75)Korea Samgyetang’s secret is using very special ingredients, such as specifically 49-days old farm-grown native chicken and 4-year old Geumsan cultivated ginseng.The soup boiled with ginseng, Chinese dates and garlic, and topped with ginseng wine after serving, was surprisingly light and bland. My guess is this is traditionally a summer dish and thus cannot taste too heavy and strong.My favourite part was not the chicken meat, but the glutinous rice within which had absorbed flavours of both the chicken and the broth. If you manage this remove all the bones first, it actually feels like a nutritious bowl of ginseng chicken congee. They should also do away with the noodles though – it was carb overkill.Korea Samgyetang (고려삼계탕)
Seoul-si Jung-gu Seosomun-dong 55-3 (close to Deoksugung Palace), Tel: +82-2-752-9376, 2734 (Korean)
Directions: Subway Exit 10 of Subway line 1, 2 Cityhall. From Korean Air head office proceed 50m toward Sinchon. Across from Shinhan Bank, next to Woori Bank
Opening Hours: 10:00am – 10:00pm DailyOther Related Entries
Chang Korean Charcoal BBQ Restaurant (Bugis Iluma)
Just Acia (Dhoby Ghaut )
Ya Zhou Café (Suntec)
2012-01-26 00:00:00
Wheat Baumkuchen – Sleigh-ride with Reindeer and Penguin Soba
Who would have thought this humble shop at Toa Payoh is selling the famous German Baumkuchen (pronounced without the ‘c’), also known as the “tree cake”?Located at the revamped Food Alley at Toa Payoh Central, Wheat Baumkuchen has also just introduced cool noodle dishes, named after animals living in the cold climate such as Dolphin, Penguin, Seal, Polar Bear and the very Christmassy Reindeer. Very cute.The Reindeer is grey soba noodles with mushroom, edamame, seaweed and sunflower seed tossed in light miso sauce. The cold soba just slips down the throat. I definitely love this noodles of being lightly flavoured, healthy tasting, and packed with ingredients. Who would have known this dish cost just $4.80 such value-for-money.Full Post at InSing.com -King of cakes found in Toa Payoh!Wheat Baumkuchen
Blk 190 Lorong 6, Toa Payoh, #01-530, Tel: +65 6356 5529
Opening Hours: 10am – 9pm DailyOther Related Entries
My Peranakan Spice Box (Toa Payoh)
AKB48 Café (*Scape)
Aijino Chanpon (Plaza Singapura)
Box n Sticks (Arab Street)
Saizeriya Ristorante (Liang Court)
2012-01-25 00:00:00
Plaza Brasserie Dragon Feast – Presenting the Three Kingdom Yu Sheng
Feasting for the Chinese New Year has not officially ended. Remember there are 15 days to it. Somewhat traditionally, another important day is the 7th day known as the ‘Ren Ri’ (the common man’s birthday) when ‘yu sheng’ is eaten for continued wealth and abundance in this part of the world.Plaza Brasserie has a Three Kingdom Yu Sheng which contains the three popular CNY ingredients of Abalone, Sea Cucumber and Sharksfin (though I think we can really leave the fins out since it doesn’t add to the taste). This version does not have the conventional items, and instead includes lobster, salmon, silver fish, chicken floss, chinese sasuages, enoki mushrooms, and crispy fish skin.This really sounds like a gathering of the best of the best lo-hei.  The XO sauce created by Chef Jackson has a fruit-ish sweet tinge that really enhances the vegetables, with my friend saying this was the best he eaten in the whole season. My take is – any vegetable that is fresh usually taste good.What really ‘wowed’ me are the buffet stations with more Cantonese-Chinese offerings such as poached ‘live’ drunken prawns with Chinese Wine, Eight Treasures Soup, Durian Nian Gao with Bak Kwa (!) and the Lobster Congee with Fish Maw Soup and Shredded Abalone which has such generous servings that you do not have to ‘dig’ further for the lobster meal.I could not help but to consume the chunks of abalone slices. ‘Chunk’s the word. And there are thick, juicy and un-rubbery. And here’s a DanielFoodDiary suggestion: Go to the Chef’s live stations for their signature local laksa, and add a few slices of abalone on top of the fishcake. I assure you, Abalone laska is that one dish you will never forget this Dragon CNY.(The Chinese New Year Prosperity Feast at ParkRoyal on Beach Road cost $42.80++ for lunch and $52.80++ for dinner.)Plaza Brasserie, 7500A Beach Road, Park Royal on Beach Road (Nearest MRT Bugis), Tel: +65 6505 5710
Opening Hours: 6am – 12am DailyOther Related Entries
Plaza Brasserie (Beach Road)
Mandarin Court (Meritus Mandarin)
Crystal Jade Dining IN (Vivocity)
Fisherman’s Market (The Central)
Carousel (Royal Plaza on Scotts)
2012-01-20 00:00:00
When CNY is Not Just About Prosperity
This Chinese New Year seems to be a crazier rush as it is this early in the year. Sometimes, we can just get too caught up with buying, giving and eating that we forget that the festival is really about togetherness and family moments.When omy.sg invited me for a CNY dinner with a group of underprivileged seniors, it seems like a great opportunity to give back to society.The dinner was at a beautiful scenic McDonald’s (perhaps the most scenic fast food restaurant in Singapore) located within Ridout Garden Queensway.  Ronald McDonald himself made a surprise appearance (speaking Mandarin!) and many of the elders were extremely delighted like their own grandchildren.You know how when we do volunteer work, we feel we are helping others – you know the ‘do a little something to feel good’?  Is this really the case? This time I felt that I was learning a lot from the seniors instead, and indeed gained a lot from them.The truth was when the senior group came down from the bus, I was not exactly sure how to approach them. How would they react? How should I react? And all of them were speaking in a dialect, then I have unfortunately left behind. You know what – I just pulled out a chair and sat down with them. I decided that language and unfamilarity should not be my barrier.And then I spent some time speaking to a happy group of grannies. Auntie Chen was an 80-year old grandmother but never had fast food in her life ever. She laughed that her grandchildren would cry burgers every other day, and yet she never had the chance to try one. And there I was thinking, we could really have it any time we wanted. She kept laughing as she was having her fillet-o-fish, and I asked what made her so happy.“It’s about enjoying the every little thing in life, even this fry. We have been through hardship and wars – What is there to worry about life now?”Then I saw Auntie Chen requesting for a plastic bag, later packing her uneaten pack of fries. And I asked why did she not finish up her food, since she seemed to enjoy the indulgence. And she said, “Gei Wo De Sun Zi.” To them, their grandchildren always come before them. But how much do we ‘rank’ our own grandparents?Auntie Siew Ping, at age 72, is still a staff at McDonalds. Her energy is bountiful, clapping away and singing songs to cheer the group up. She would jokingly ask people to guess her age – and she would reveal 22. I asked her why she was still working as she could stay at home to enjoy life.“I can’t enjoy life doing nothing. Working keeps me happy. Working keeps me healthy. I smile when I see others smile.”She herself was full of joy volunteering for the other senior citizens, because she wanted them to feel that if she could be happy with life, they could be as well. After speaking to me, she immediately went off to clear the tables and continue to speak to the rest.She made me realise that it was not about how much we have, but how much we treasure what we have. Really, what is there in life to be so unhappy about?Have a Prosperity and Meaningful meal
McDonald’s will be sharing the gift of prosperity by donating 10 cents from the sale of each Prosperity Feast Meal and Prosperity Extra Value Meal. All proceeds will go towards the Movement for the Intellectually Disabled of Singapore (MINDS) where it will be used to help needy families with children with intellectual disability.Other Related Entries
A Wagyu Burger with Aston Soon
Bakerzin’s Daniel Tay and His Greatest Regret
The 23-year girl behind Wow Wow West 
MOF’s CEO did not have enough to eat Lor Mee
Laurentia Tan – Overcoming That Pair of Chopsticks/a>
2012-01-19 00:00:00
Cookies Passion – One of the Best Almond Cookies
There are so many different varieties of Almond Cookies and biscuits, with the more popular ones coming from Hong Kong or Macau. Always crunchy, and sometimes crumbly, these have recently become the must-have Chinese New Year snack.Before I talk about the taste of this particular Almond Cookies, this bottle did not come to my door either from any PRs or my generous aunties.  In fact, I was searching for Almond Cookies online and landed on this website of CookiesPassion.com.sg .  They do have a facebook page, but well with 5 likes.Their physical store at Hong Lim was closed. In the end, I actually took a bus all the way to Blk 168 Toa Payoh and waited under the hot sun for a while before I got my cookie bottles.  So why am I still writing about them? The only reason is because the cookies are unbelievably good!Cookies Passion started with a family’s love for baking, and word-of-mouth has made them one of the favourites among corporate clients and confectionaries. Other than their signature All Almond Cookies ($16.80) freshly baked with California almonds, their raisin almond, cranberry almond and molasses spice versions will certainly strike a chord with your guests.The rectangular-shaped and flat raisin almond cookies are just too hard to resist. The combination of the nuts and sweet-sour fruits make every bite remarkable, and feel like a more exquisite form of butter cookies. Try dunking the cookies into milk, and they will become an instant hit with the children.I hope Cookies Passion can find the right branding and marketing, because they deserve to be known.Other Related Entries
Favourite Chinese New Year Goodies
Crystal Jade My Bread Bolo Tarts
Le Café Confectionery (Middle Road)
SunnyHills Singapore (Raffles Hotel)
Kedai Kue Kue (Great World City)
2012-01-18 00:00:00
The CNY Calories Showdown
A long time ago, being fat during the Chinese New Year equates to prosperity and a huge pinch on the cheeks (until I couldn’t fit into any pair of decent jeans). In today’s context, you need to be both slim and fit. After all, this could be the only time you are showing off to your relatives and friends in the entire year.So what’s stopping you? That very bag of bak kwa you queued up for an hour at Chinatown for.Before you continue munching on them while watching TV movie reruns, think about it, you need to run for 47 minutes to ‘get rid’ of a single slice.  For 3 pineapple tarts, that is a 30 min jog. Three seemingly harmless thin fluffy love letters would take 21 minutes as well.Don’t you love yusheng? This ‘Chinese salad’ containing fresh vegetables and salmon does not seem to add inches to the waist. That’s if it is without the oil, golden pillows and so much plum sauce.According to Health Promotion Board (HPB), these are an estimated calorie intake for our favourite Chinese New Year goodies.Snack (Portion size) – Calories
Peanut Crackers (3 rolls) – 418
Bak Kwa pork (1 slice) – 370
Pineapple Tarts (3 pieces) – 246
Kueh Lapis (1 slice) – 240
Twisted Cookies (3 pieces) – 201
Love Letters (3 rolls) – 168
Yusheng (1 serving) – 145
Roasted nuts salted (1 handful) – 123
Kueh bangkit (4 pieces) – 61
Nian Gao non-fried (1 piece) – 46To put it further into perspective, that single innocent looking pork bak kwa slice at 370 calories is ‘worth’ more than a prate with egg (288) and prawn noodle soup (293). Help!People ask how I stay, emm, in shape. My only advice is take everything in moderation. After all, CNY is a once a year affair to try out these goodies. And perhaps eat only those you really like and of reasonably good quality. No point grabbing a handful of mediocre tarts just to past time or pretending to act busy. Sugared drinks are probably a killer for your waist too.If not, help your mum with the household chores. Washing and cleaning burn a lot, yah? Happy and HEALTHY New Year everyone!Other Related Entries
Favourite Chinese New Year Goodies
Crystal Jade My Bread Bolo Tarts
Le Café Confectionery (Middle Road)
SunnyHills Singapore (Raffles Hotel)
Kedai Kue Kue (Great World City)
2012-01-17 00:00:00
Mandarin Court – Abundant Pen Cai & Bak Kwa Nian Gao
Have you realised that the Pen Cai has become a local Chinese New Year staple in recent years? This Big Bowl Feast is a traditional Hong Kong village cuisine, said to origin during the late Song Dynasty when locals collected all their best food to serve a fleeing Emperor.It is not difficult to understand why the Poon Choi came so popular – its auspicious abundance symbol and ability to sustain for days. In fact, some say the longer you keep the dish, the better it taste (not past expiry please).As for the ingredients, there is something for everybody. At Mandarin Court Chinese Restaurant (formally known as Pine Court) helmed by Executive Chinese Chef Sunny Kong, the $368 Fortune Pot has crazy generous amount of ingredients of baby abalone, dried oyster, pig trotter, roasted duck, live prawn, sea cucumber, goose web, drunken chicken, dried scallop, black mushroom, ‘Tientsin’ cabbage, carrot, black dace, gluten puff, black moss, pacific clam, Chinese sausage and shark’s fin (which can be replaced.)The plus is every piece of ingredient is glazed with its absolutely tasty gravy which has absorbed the essence of the rich offerings; and the down side is that there is probably one or two things you do not like in that pot and find it to avoid when everything is almost the same colour.If you have colleagues who likes grandness, then the extremely huge plated Salmon & Crispy Fish Skin Prosperity Yusheng ($108 for 10 persons) should please them. Being on Level 35, this restaurant offers a spectacular view of downtown Grange and River Valley Roads. (I also remember the last time I dined here at Pine Court, they offered a creative huge round-shaped bak zhang.)My favourite dishes are the Typhoon Shelter’ Roasted Chicken, inspired by the Hong Kong Cantonese versions, made more scrumptious with its crunchy almond bits and addictive XO sauce chilli sauce so good you can eat on its own.Just when you thought you ate all types of Nian Gao, this Bak Kwa Nian Gao ($50.80) is like the impossible combination – though the sweet sticky cake with salty pork bits strangely works.Mandarin Court Chinese Restaurant
333 Orchard Road, Level 35, Orchard Wing Mandarin Orchard Singapore, Singapore (Nearest MRT Somerset), Tel: +65 6831 6262
Opening Hours: Lunch: 12pm–2.30pm (Mon–Fri); Dinner: 6.30pm–10.30pm (Mon–Sun)
Brunch: 11–12.30pm, 1pm–3pm (Sat–Sun & PH)Other Related Entries
Crystal Jade Dining IN (Vivocity)
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
Le Café Confectionery (Middle Road)
SunnyHills Singapore (Raffles Hotel)
Kedai Kue Kue (Great World City)
2012-01-16 00:00:00
Le Cafe – Best Golf Ball Pineapple Tarts in Singapore!
Some food reviewers claimed that “they are the best pineapple tarts” and “the king of pineapple tarts”.These tarts from Le Cafe Confectionery & Pastry, better known as ‘golf balls’, are big, fat and huge – almost the size of a ping pong. One or two may be enough to make you feel slightly full this Lunar New Year.My take? They are not lying. Le Cafe’s pineapple tarts are truly one of the best around.Le Café has come a long way from being a humble neighbourhood cake shop (and before that a zhi char stall!). They say that they produced Singapore’s 1st round pineapple tarts.If you like your tarts buttery and crumbly, you would fall in love with this. These golf balls are quite difficult to pop into your mouth because it is larger than the usual. So get your tissues ready to collect the butter crumbs.The winning strategy? Their balls are heavily packed with home-made pineapple jam which are all manufactured in-house.  In fact, you would not see them franchising or setting up kiosks in shopping malls. The golden-yellow pineapple jam is really quite a mouthful, rich and extremely addictive.Their shop at Middle Road reminds me of those old traditional pastry shops I see in Hong Kong – very retro looking and full of buttery fragrance. Their oven keep churning out other speciality items such as coffee cookies, rum balls and bean curd tarts (Their tau hway tarts are superb smooth!).The shop is plastered with newspaper reviews, and 2 photos of Andy Lau who had his birthday cake ordered here!$8.50 for a box of 10, and $16 for a box of 20 – Le Café’s Pineapple tarts shouldn’t disappoint. Le Café’s Lady Boss Betty recommended for the tarts to be heated in a toaster for a minute before consumption, and add a cup of teh-si kosong. Wonderful suggestion.Le Café Confectionery & Pastry
264 Middle Road (Opposite Wilkie Edge behind Rochor Beancurd), Tel: +65 6337 2417
Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 10.30am – 7.00pm ; Sun & PH: 10.30am – 3.00pmOther Related Entries
Favourite Chinese New Year Goodies
Crystal Jade My Bread Bolo Tarts
Crystal Jade Dining IN (Vivocity)
SunnyHills Singapore (Raffles Hotel)
Kedai Kue Kue (Great World City)
2012-01-13 00:00:00
Kedai Kue Kue – Flowery Floury Kueh Bangkit
The Kueh Bangkit, also known as Tapioca Flour or Coconut Cookie, is originally used as an alter offering. Therefore, they are usually shaped like a golden coin to symbolize prosperity. Those shaped in other forms usually represent fertility.Kedai Kue Kue, known for their authentic Indonesian cakes, has their lovely Kueh Bangkit shaped like petite flowers. The off-white cookies are hand-made in Indonesian-style, produced by layering the dough so that they do not crumble.These morsels do not break apart easily and retain their shape well. When popped, they melt in the mouth smoothly without that chunky feeling while savouring the fragrant coconut milk essence. A tip: Pair them with Chinese Jasmine or floral teas which will further sooth your throat.Kedai Kue Kue (Tampines 1 , Great World City, Changi Airport Terminal 2)Other Related Entries
Favourite Chinese New Year Goodies
Crystal Jade My Bread Bolo Tarts
Crystal Jade Dining IN (Vivocity)
SunnyHills Singapore (Raffles Hotel)
2012-01-12 00:00:00
Crystal Jade My Bread – Divine Bo Lo Pineapple Tarts
Talking about pineapple tarts, these bite-sized pastries are perhaps the most representative item of the Chinese New Year in Singapore. Topped or filled with pineapple jam, the tarts are a must-have for many because the pineapple in dialect is called ‘ong lai’, symbolising the arrival of prosperity.You may have tried the popular ‘bo lo’ bun at Hong Kong’s cha chan tengs. Also known as the pineapple bun, the checkered top of the bun resembles the outer of a pineapple but does not really contain the fruit. I love it for the sugary top crust which contrasts with the soft buttery soft dough.The very creative Crystal Jade My Bread has R&Ded ingenious pineapple ‘bolo’ tarts. Imagine that same bun in a bite-sized tart, with the same crumbly goodness, centered with delicious pineapple jam.It is just amazing how the entire texture of the tart feels exactly like the ‘bo lo’ bun, except it is much smaller. Having the best of both worlds, this tart is almost unbelievable and extremely addictive. A tip: Have them chilled and the cold jam adds a whole new dimension.This is the updated price as for 2013 for Crystal Jade My Bread Fortune Bo Lo Pineapple tarts:  Double Happiness Pack – $17.80 (16 tarts) Classic Happiness Pack – $17.80 (18 tarts)Happiness Quartet Pack – $31.80 (32 tarts) Abundance Pack – $15.80 (24 tarts)What you see in the pictures are the Golden Pineapple Tarts, while the Fortune Bo Lo versions are exceptionally divine – so much so that my family finished a box of 8 in a matter of minutes before I could shoot pictures of them!Crystal Jade My Bread (Thomas Plaza, Ang Mo Kio, IMM Building, Takashimaya, Junction 8, Suntec City Mall)Other Related Entries
The CNY Calorie Showdown
Le Café Confectionery (Middle Road)
Crystal Jade Dining IN (Vivocity)
SunnyHills Singapore (Raffles Hotel)
Favourite Chinese New Year Goodies
2012-01-09 00:00:00
My Peranakan Spice Box – Nyonya Cuisine with a Creative Twist
Buah keluak toast? Babi chin la mian? Terong assam fries? We bet you have never tried them before till you visit My Peranakan Spice Box. This shop is quite well-hidden opposite HDB Hub, behind the famous Tiong Bahru Pao and Koi Bubbletea shops.  I would say this is worth its find with over 30 dishes of Nyonya goodness such as black sauce pork siew rice, chap chye, crabmeat meatball soup , laska lemak and seafood assam rice.I was initially sceptical of the pork stew la mian ($4.50) mainly because we are used to having nyonya babi chin (stewed pork belly) served in a restaurant, and this dish is too affordable to be true. Who would know I was  won over by the soft tender braised pork, with a slightly layer of fats which melted easily in the mouth.Full Post at InSing.com -Nonya ‘Caviar’ Toast, anyone?My Peranakan Spice Box
Blk 190 Toa Payoh Lorong 6, #01-528 (At Toa Payoh Central)
Opening Hours: 7am – 8.30pm (Closed on Tue)Other Related Entries
Gurney Drive Restaurant
Jason’s Penang Cuisine (ABC Market)
Penang Road Cafe (Novena)
Daisy’s Dream Kitchen (Tiong Bahru)
IVINS Peranakan Restaurant (Jalan Leban Road)
2012-01-06 00:00:00
SunnyHills Pineapple Cakes – Taiwanese Delights for Chinese New Year
The last time I visited SunnyHills, they were a kiosk at Funan The IT Mall. A year later, they are occupying an entire shop at Singapore’s very renowned Raffles Hotel.  I would say this is a major upgrade for the Taiwanese pineapple cakes sellers.While having Ah Teng’s Bakery, Royal China and Tiffin Room as neighbours, SunnyHills holds its own with a very contemporary yet earthy -setting, serving customers Chinese tea while they order takeaways.  It appeals to the tourists and upper middle-class. The humble cake has become a classier item. Good move.Selling at $25 for a box of 10, Sunnyhills have no other booths so you have to order at the Raffles Hotel shop or online.While many celebrate the Lunar New Year with the traditional ‘ong lai’ tarts, a way to impress your relatives and friends is to serve them Taiwanese pineapple cakes – all individually wrapped and very presentable looking.I have tried many Taiwanese pineapple cakes. But these made with Nantou’s indigenous pineapples, New Zealand butter, Japanese gourmet flour, and plump-yolked eggs where the chickens listen to classical music, are buttery fragrant and pleasant tasting.The jam has a mellow sweetness without being overpowering. My personal favoured way to savour them? Refrigerate them and serve with a scoop of Vanilla gelato.  I have to remind myself to go easy on them though before I gain that extra 205 calories.SunnyHills Singapore
328 North Bridge Road, #03-05 Raffles Hotel Arcade (Cityhall MRT), Singapore, Tel: +65 8522 9605
Opening Hours: Tue–Sat: 11am – 8pm, Sun: 11am – 3pmOther Related Entries
The CNY Calorie Showdown
Favourite Chinese New Year Goodies
Le Café Confectionery (Middle Road)
Crystal Jade My Bread Bolo Tarts
Kedai Kue Kue (Great World City)
2012-01-05 00:00:00
Crystal Jade – All Set to Impress with Eight Treasures Pagoda
Come Lunar New Year, every restaurant seems ready to outwit, outplay, out last all others with interesting (and sometimes strange) takes on Lo Hei and Peng Cai. For this 2012 Chinese New Year menu, Crystal Jade seems all set to impress with their innovation of the Pagoda of Eight Treasures, a Chinese take on the traditional Indonesian dish Nasi Tumpeng.The $88.80 dish came out like an impressive masterpiece of art, so much so that my table was ‘wowing’ non-stop at the creation, hands whipping out their camera to take hot shots of this festive dish. The centerpiece of a large cone made of fried glutinous rice with conpoy and mushroom is marvel-worthy. We are all kind of worried it would topple, but it didn’t. Great dish for superstitious Chinese – you can shout your ‘bu bu gao shen’ (climb higher) with this tower of rice looking like a majestic dragon.The other seven treasures include preserved sausage, sautéed shrimps, octopus, chicken, French beans, quail egg and mushroom. I specially loved the fragrant well-fried rice, which is a luxurious combination with the lap cheong, the entire thing tasting somewhat like a more delicate bak chang.The Golden Yu Sheng of a steep price tag of $88.80 too (prosperity!), served with thick fresh slices of salmon. This version has a sweeter sauce, best for those who want to start the year feeling romantic ‘tian tian mi mi’.Of all the dishes I tried such as the Braised Dou-miao with Assorted Dried Seafood ($12) and Double-boiled Quail soup with Chinese herbs ($22), the one I savoured most was surprisingly a simple Steamed Sea Bass with Preserved Vegetables ($12). The thick-sliced fish meat was simple yet fresh, with the chai poh adding a tinge of saltiness that breathes home-cooked goodness.Crystal Jade Dining IN, 1 Harbourfront Walk, #01-112 VivoCity (HarbourFront MRT), Singapore, Tel: +65 6278 5626
Opening Hours: Mon – Fri: 11.30am – 3.00pm, 6.00pm – 10.30pm
Sat: 11.00am – 4.00pm, 6.00pm – 10.30pm
Sun & Public Holiday: 10.30am – 4.00pm, 6.00pm – 10.30pmOther Related Entries
Favourite Chinese New Year Goodies
Imperial Treasure Steamboat Restaurant (TripleOne Somerset)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
HonGuo (NEX)
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
2012-01-04 00:00:00
Most Visited Food Posts in 2011
To kick off the new year, I’d like to share with you some data on your Daniel’s Food Diary’s activity in 2011. The website Daniel’s Food Diary started on a humble day on 15th July 2011, and had 121 new post that year. Not too bad for a start.And for the Top 5 Most Visited Posts, it is no surprise that 4 out of 5 restaurants serve buffets, which really serve the needs to buffetlicious Singapore. After all, if we are going to part with that part money (and most likely the whole group of friends’ pot), we jolly well do some proper research.Tiffin Room (Raffles Hotel)
The Top Post of 2011 went to an Indian buffet restaurant at Raffles Hotel. I was very surprised at the number of hits, and perhaps the $75++ price tag caught your attention. The truth was, I almost did not want to write this post as I did not take many shots, but since I paid so much…Fisherman’s Market (The Central)
This buffet restaurant opened with lots of hype, and many queries of “worth it or not”? I can’t eat much, but if you can stuff yourself with fresh oysters, prawns, sashimi and mammoth amount of seafood, why not?Minoriya (Tanjong Katong)
This is a spill-over effect online coupon purchase. Whether it is Groupon or Streetdeal, another restaurant which is featured would immediately get more search. We all know that being on coupon deals is a double-edged sword – You would get customers, but whether they would return again and again is a different question.Imperial Treasure Steamboat Restaurant (TripleOne Somerset)
There are many many many steamboat restaurants in Singapore, especially at Bugis, Chinatown and Geylang, but quality ones are few. 2011 told me that quanlity matters a lot more than quantity. With a brand name like Imperial Treasure starting a steamboat place of a different league, this place should come packing this Chinese New Year.Saizeriya Ristorante (Liang Court)
With rising cost of everything, finding a meal in a restaurant in town for less than $10 is a mean feat. Saizeriya Ristorante is the answer for your craving of Italian-Japanese food, at low cost, for the entire class to have their outing at.Other Related Entries
Tiffin Room (Raffles Hotel)
Fisherman’s Market (The Central)
Minoriya (Tanjong Katong)
Imperial Treasure Steamboat Restaurant (TripleOne Somerset)
Saizeriya Ristorante (Liang Court)
2012-01-03 00:00:00
Top 5 Food Fads of 2011
It all started with Lao Ban at Old Airport Road Hawker, which revolutionised the familiar taste of the humble soya beancurd. Their soft and silky take of the tau hway is like an oriental crème brulee, which inspired several other shops to sell similar versions. I say the tau hway will continue to be the next big thing during 2012.Full Post at InSing.com – Food fads that are here to stay in 2012Other Related Entries
Lao Ban Beancurd (Old Airport Road)
Twelve Cupcakes (Millenia Walk)
The Orange Thimble (Tiong Bahru)
The Battle of the Bubble Teas
Salad Stop! (One Raffles Place)
2011-12-27 00:00:00
Delicious – KL’s Popular Delicious Comes to Scotts Square
There are a few good reasons to visit the new Scotts Square. It offers an upmarket shopping experience, and a fine mix of dining options such as Wild Honey, Crystal Jade Kitchen Restaurant, Kazumi, and the popular Delicious.Delicious has a huge fan base at Kuala Lumpur and Penang, and this marks its first foray into Singapore. It has an menu that features a mouth-watering array of Western meets Asian favourites such as pastas, salads, and desserts that satisfies many hungry palates.When the spicy crabmeat linguini ($15), we were slightly surprised at the portion – huge and we almost regretted ordering too much. Tossed with roasted cherry tomatoes and arugula, my friends and I went “wooooo” as the pasta was close to perfection with thick delicious sweet sauce and generous servings of crab meat. Definitely one of the better versions around.Full Post at InSing.com – Delicious Comes to Scotts SquareDelicious
6 Scotts Road B1-16/19 Scotts Square, Tel: +65 6636 0903
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
OverTime (Dempsey)
The Rotisserie (China Square Food Centre)
Toby’s The Dessert Asylym (Parkway Parade)
The Tastings Room (Marina Square)
15 Minutes (Lasalle)
2011-12-23 00:00:00
Salad Stop! – Veggie’s The Next Big Thing
Trust me, veggie’s going to be the next big thing. Healthy living, the need to look fabulous, easy to takeaway – are all good reasons to take your greens. Plus, salads are now longer the same as the past, and are actually becoming delicious.A walk down the CBD and you would be greeted with up-and-coming bars like Salads & Wraps, Munch, Mescluns, Sumo Salad, The Green Bar, Grand Salads, and Fresh+, just to name a few. Salad Stop!, with 8 shops and counting, is probably the most popular.SaladStop! is the brainchild of father & son team, Daniel and Adrien who were both from the hospitality industry. They also opened Doodle.The greatest chore (to me) in terms of salad-making is buying the ingredients, cleaning and washing everything up. So SaladStop!’s formula would work: Fresh ingredients (160kg lettuce a day!), 20 different homemade dressings, innovative tastes and the possibility of creating your own salad.Since it is the Christmas season, I had the Classic Christmas Salad ($12.50) which had mixed greens with roast turkey. The cranberries, walnut and apple cinnamon dressing danced wonderfully together to give this zest – and it does taste Christmassy (better that they were playing Michael Bublé). I wondered what the roasted pumpkin was doing there as Halloween was over, but figured they needed carbs to make us feel full.The Oh Crab Lah! ($10.00) is nothing like crap. Imagine your favourite Singapore chilli crab dressing on mixed greens – It actually works!  The team cleverly added mashed hard-boiled egg, vermicelli and crab sticks (urgh-not the real thing) to create this huge bowl that was spicy, fun, and healthy.I know what you thinking. $10 and more for veggies sound unordinary extravagant. Those who want to lose weight, are willing to pay.Salad Stop! #B1‐02A UOB Centre, 1 Raffles Place (Direct underground link from Raffles Place MRT), Tel: +65 6820‐0160.
Opening Hours: 8am – 8:30 pm (Mon – Fri), Closed on Sat-SunOther Related Entries
Dapao (Far East Square)
7 Sensations (Millenia Walk)
2011-12-21 00:00:00
Bakerzin – All I Want For Christmas Is Stollen
While the Christmas ‘staples’ in Singapore are usually fruit and log cakes, those wanting to be more adventurous and less boring can always try a Galette Des Rois, Julekage, Panettone or Stollen – all of European origins. Let’s be a little different.The Stollen which came from Germany Dresden (You would fall in love with amazingly classical Dresden), is a rich yeast bread that is loaded with dried fruits and raisins. Its taste come from being soaked in rum and also flavored with lemon zest, nuts, candied peel, and spines. My friends said this is the bread covered with powdered sugar, or a French loaf in donut icing.The Christmas Stollen actually symbolises the baby Jesus Christ wrapped in swaddling clothes, with the name referring to its short prop like shape. No wonder I had the urge to hug that bread.I had a Bakerzin’s Stollen which special part was the centre roll of buttery almond cream – lovely and smooth. While I would have imagined the dough to be extremely sweet and rich like a fruit cake, this was nicely tame and fluffy. The best way to savour each slice is to toast them warm, with a huge scoop of vanilla gelato. Perfect!Bakerzin, 3 Temasek Boulevard, #B1-016 Suntec City Mall, Singapore, Tel: +65 6338 4656
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 10.30am – 10.00pm; Fri–Sat & PH Eve: 10.30am – 11.00pmOther Related Entries
Bakerzin Artisan Bread (MyVillage)
Bakerzin’s Daniel Tay and His Greatest Regret
N.Y.D.C (Bugis Junction)
Friends @ Jelita (Jelita)
IKEA Restaurant (Alexandra)
2011-12-19 00:00:00
IKEA Restaurant & Café – Their Swedish Christmas Platter
Another place which would be very crowded this year end period is IKEA, where purchases for the New Year, and Christmas presents are aplenty.After queuing for a good 15 minutes at 9:00pm, I wondered what made me give up my beloved Swedish meatballs and chicken wings for the Christmas Platter.IKEA’s 2011’s Christmas Platter ($9.00) is a plate of Turkey Breast, Turkey Ham and Chicken Cheese Sausage. Add $4.90 and you would get a soup of the day, pancakes, and apple or peach juice. Actually, $9.00 is superlatively bloody cheap for a Christmas platter in Singapore.I generally do not think highly of ham made of turkey, so the piece being dry and tough didn’t work for me.  While the oozing cheese sausage was satisfactory, the whole plate was kind of cold – and looked as though I could assemble the entire thing together on my own at home.  (That is the whole point of IKEA I guess.)The new item – an organic pancake filled with spinach and cheese – was good effort, acceptable, strangely not pleasing. Lesson learnt: Meatballs, I would not ditch you the next time.317 Alexandra Road, 2F IKEA Alexandra, Singapore, Tel: +65 6378 1604
Opening Hours: 8am – 10pm (last order 9.30pm) DailyOther Related Entries
N.Y.D.C (Bugis Junction)
Friends @ Jelita (Jelita)
Halia Restaurant (Botanic Gardens)
The Rotisserie (China Square Food Centre)
The Tastings Room (Marina Square)
2011-12-16 00:00:00
Halia Restaurant – Restaurant In The Garden
This is literally a restaurant in the garden – and within Singapore’s most iconic Botanic Gardens. “Halia” drew its name from the Ginger Garden nearby, and is indeed a scenic get-away place for that relaxing brunch or romantic dinner in earthy greenery.Halia Restaurant is not the most accessible place in Singapore, but getting here is worth it if you want to indulge in a quiet dreamy dinner, especially if the weather is cooling. After 10 years, it has also gone through a facelift with a new menu and a young Chef de Cuisine Reynaldo Arriola.I had a Christmas seasonal special with modern European cuisine enhanced with the occasional touch of Asian spices. The appetiser – Crystal bay king prawn cocktail with beetroot mango salad ($32++) boosts of beautiful unruffled prawns, which would have been bare on its own, but heightened with a sharp calypso sauce.The Honey-baked Kurobuta Ham ($32++) was more impressive for the same price. While the meat could still be tenderer, the caramelised fig on top worked in a subtle balance both in taste and texture.What’s Christmas without turkey? Rather than the usual roasted whole bird, Chef transformed the meat into a Turkey Roulade ($68++), rolled with apricot and raisins for a sweeter inside. Perhaps it was served in a thicker chunkier roll; the result was rather dry and could do with more of its red currant jus.Similar happened to the grilled blue eye cod fish ($78++). The pan-fried spinach polenta on side did not serve to add any more moisture, and more passion fruit sauce would ease the dryness.Perhaps the best was saved for its desserts. Try the Mille feuille of pistachio and cream, eggnog ice cream and stewed cherries ($$22++). The Christmas soufflé with white chocolate, cinnamon and nutmeg base, sided with salted caramel ice cream ($22++) was one word – heavenly. The fluffy soufflé collapsed and settled well in the tummy.I also need to add that The Halia Infusion ($10++) made with imported Vietnam sundried ginger and wild mountain honey is the best ‘teh halia’ I ever had – Simply wonderful.Halia Restaurant
1 Cluny Road, Singapore Botanic Gardens (enter from Tyersall Avenue off Holland Road), Tel: +65 8444 1148
Opening Hours: Lunch – Mondays to Fridays, 12 noon to 5pm (set-lunch only till 2pm); Dinner – Daily, 630pm to 11pm (last seating at 10pm; Brunch – Saturdays, Sundays & PHs, 10am to 4pm; Tea – Saturdays, Sundays and PHs, 3pm to 5pm; From 5pm to 630pm daily, only drinks will be availableOther Related Entries
Infusion (Dempsey)
The Tastings Room (Marina Square)
Friends @ Jelita (Jelita)
Ulu Food Places
More Ulu Food Places
2011-12-13 00:00:00
Friends @ Jelita – Festive Cuisines infused with Kronenbourg 1664
A good meal is sometimes not only about the food and service – And Friends @ Jelita wants to create this atmosphere where friends can just gather for an enjoyable time together with polished modern European dishes.The last time I been here has been more than a decade ago (and that was the 1st Pizza Hut in Singapore). This restaurant located at an expat-surrounded community of Jelita is comfortable and stylish, creating dishes that are innovative and interesting.Few know that this food and wine group owner cum chef Thomas Chiam is an ‘IT person’ who only picked up cooking while studying overseas, and he demonstrates his dynamic and lively personality through his food experiments – therefore this beer-infused fare.My favourite dish of the day was easily the Chilled Angel Hair Pasta & ‘Kronenbourg Blanc 1664’ Fish Roe ($13.90). This makes a cooling refreshing start, with the simple tossing with Japanese konbu, chives and white truffle essence giving the appetiser full favours.I am guilty to say that I have never had Turducken (Turkey-Duck-Chicken) and this could be my new favourite Christmas dish replacing honey-baked ham. Chef Thomas’s version of Turducken ($49 for 1 kg, $23.90++ for dine in) is a multi-multi layered one with turkey pastrami, smoked duck and chicken wrapped with bacon. While the bacon could have overpowered the rest of the meats, this pig in a bird in a bird in a bird in a pig is succulent and not too heavy on the taste.Another choice dish could be the ultra slow-cooked Pork Collar with ‘Kronenbourg 1664’ ($29 per kg – good for 5 people). Few actually use this part of the pig. Coming from the neck, the texture is slightly fatty ad does dry out when cooked for a long period of time, remaining firm yet tender.Friends @ Jelita
293 Holland Road, #02-04 Jelita Shopping Centre (3 bus stops away from Holland Village), Tel: +65 6463 1011
Opening Hours: 12noon – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
N.Y.D.C (Bugis Junction)
Infusion (Dempsey)
The Tastings Room (Marina Square)
Singapore Sling Boutique (Clarke Quay)
TongKang Colonial Bar & Restaurant (Clarke Quay)
2011-12-09 00:00:00
N.Y.D.C – Hearty Roast Platter for Christmas
N.Y.D.C used to be THE place for my class outings – where we laugh over school and teachers over a big mug of Elephanccino, gorging down the Ally’s New York Cheesecake, Elmer Fudge with an E=MC2 in hand. Remember those days?During a recent visit to the Bugis branch, I realised it had a more lively vibrant New Yorker look, but still serving the familiar favourites.As it is beginning to look at lot like Christmas, my friends and I had the Hearty Christmas Roast Platter for ($98). This festive combination has marbled sirloin steak, herb roasted chicken, pork cheese cracker, bratwursts, onion rings, potato gratin, salad mix … topped up with 4 drinks and 4 log cake slices. If you like variety, this is for you.We immediately attacked the steak, prepared medium-well and nicely grilled, and still tasting rather fresh because it is flown vacuum-packed .  The meat was cut up into long strips though – the pro camp would enjoy the convenience of eating without even lifting our knives; but the against camp would prefer a slab to savour the mouth-watering juice within.Our favourite part was collectively the spring chicken. The skin was indeed crispy thin with a slight ‘crunch’ when bitten, with the inside staying lusciously moist. The marinate was flavourful enough and you probably won’t need additional sauce to top up.Being the dessert café, N.Y.D.C offers two decadent log cakes – the “Yule love it” chocolate mousse ($51 for 1 kg) and divine white chocolate cheese ($56 for 1 kg). Over the two, I much preferred the white version, not only because white chocolate is my thing, but the Philadelphia cream cheese centre evens out the velvety texture, and makes the experience oh-so-complete.N.Y.D.C Cafe & Restaurant
200 Victoria Street, #02-47/48 Bugis Junction, Singapore, Tel: +65 6333 3161
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 11.30am – 10.30pm, Fri–Sat & PH Eve: 11.30am – 11pmOther Related Entries
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
Nando’s (Bugis Junction)
The Rotisserie (China Square Food Centre)
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
The Tastings Room (Marina Square)
2011-12-06 00:00:00
Hot Star – Taiwan’s Most Popular Fried Chicken is in Singapore
Haven’t you heard? Taiwan’s most popular Hot-Star fried chicken (otherwise known as Hao Da Ji Pai) has arrived in Singapore! Located at City Square Mall, Singapore is the second overseas country after Hong Kong to obtain this franchise (after much persuasion I heard).The main feature is that the fried chicken is ridiculously huge – measuring up to 30cm long, easily bigger than a palm, and almost the size of a face.Taking a huge bite off the coated batter, the chicken breast meat remains very succulent, as though as the juice is pumped into it.  The dusted red chilli powder adds a layer of spicy kick. Staying true to its authenticity, the local Hot-Star store will not cut the meat up, even if customers request for it.Full Post at InSing.com – Taiwan’s Most Popular Fried Chicken Is HereHot-Star Large Fried Chicken
City Square Mall #B1-K7 (Farrer Park MRT) Tel: +65 6634 8032
Opening hours: 10.30am – 9.45pm DailyOther Related Entries
Hao Da Chicken Culet (Taiwan)
Ah Zong Mian Xian (Taiwan) 
Big Sausage Wrap Small Sausage (Taiwan)
Xi Men Ding (Vivocity)
Must Try Food in Taipei
2011-12-02 00:00:00
3 Inch Sin – Chocolate Cakes Are Very Sexy
Just imagine digging into a warm molten lava cake, with unadulterated chocolate oozing from within, flavoured with Baileys to add that alcoholic touch. This is what we call … seduction.The popular 3 Inch Sin from Cluny Court, known by many foodies for serving one of the best lava cakes around, continues to tempt with a 2nd branch at Millenia Walk. They have also introduced 2 new flavours of Baileys and Cherries Jubilee, along with the other originals such as lemon, peanut butter, hazelnut and bitter orange.The new Baileys flavoured molten cake ($7.5) is perfect indulgence with a trace of the Irish cream liqueur goodness. The coffee and cocoa in Baileys makes a seamless blend with the French Valrhona chocolate used, creating a taste of luxury.And did I mentioned I was the shop’s very first customer?Full Post at InSing.com – 3 Inch Sin Opens at Millenia Walk3 Inch Sin
9 Raffles Boulevard, #01-103 Millenia Walk (Promenade MRT), Tel: +65 6333 4562
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 9.30pm DailyOther Related Entries
3 Inch Sin (Bt Timah)
Twelve Cupcakes (Millenia Walk)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
Brunetti (Tanglin Mall)
2011-12-01 00:00:00
Prima Taste Kitchen – A Taste of True Singapore Cuisine
When overseas for some time, some of the things I miss most about Singapore is its food . And I usually come across some “Singapore Restaurant” that never really serves authentic Singapore food. – What’s with sweet diluted curry and Sin Chew bee hoon. Back home, such restaurants are also few and far between.Perhaps people are not away of Prima Taste Kitchen,  offering  a more comprehensive menu of Singapore cuisine such as Popiah, Bak Kut Teh, Mee Goreng and Satay Bee Hoon.  How many would know that it exist (well-hidden at the back) at downtown Centrepoint?To be honest, I have given this place a miss a few times as I thought it was possibly another tourist trap!The must-order dish is the Laksa ($5.50 for standard, $8.00 with cockles and chicken), which has a generous portion of prawns, fish cake and tau pok. Compared to most versions which can be too watery and muted, this huge offering has rich lemak and medium-spicy gravy – it is hard to imagine that the entire bowl was cooked using the premix sold in boxes.This Mee Siam ($5.00 for standard, $7.00 with prawns) also satisfied my craving. So beautifully presented with a row of pinkish prawns, the gravy was well-balanced with a touch of tangy assam. Yes it is also cooked from the party pack, and it comforts me to know I can possibly prepare this myself at home.A friend who came along, despite having the Chicken Rice, Mee Siam AND Laksa, finished the Fried Hokkien Prawn Noodles ($6.50) to the last drop gravy. Reason being that same fragrant prawn-pork stock for their prawn mee soup, is used to stir-fry the yellow noodles which have absorbed the ‘jing hua’ (essence). I watched on, wishing there was more ‘wok-hei’ as the taste was too ‘clean’ for me.From a modest flourmill in 1961, Prima is now a brand name known for packing Singapore’s favourites in ready-to-cook pastes. I know of mothers who send cartons of Prima Taste mix boxes to their homesick children studying abroad.  If you are overseas at selected countries and reading this, say Hooray because you also try this taste of Singapore by an online order.Prima Taste Kitchen
176 Orchard Road, #01-63 Centrepoint, Tel: +65 6887 3786
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Singapore Food Trail (Flyer)
The Gallerie (Marina Square)
Kopi Tiam (Swissotel The Stamford)
Plaza Brasserie (Beach Road)
Galley By The Straits (Admiralty Road)
2011-11-28 00:00:00
Burger King – Spicy Panini Tendergrill Chicken Sandwich
Burger King is probably one of the more adventurous fast food restaurants, with new burger flavours introduced regularly and a series of slapstick chicken videos done Stomp style. Which fast food restaurant tells you “How to deal with seat hoarding aunties” and “fart attacks in the MRT”?On the path of “BK way of chicken”, they have just introduced a new Spicy Panini Tendergrill Chicken Sandwich and Spicy Panini Tendercrisp Chicken Sandwich.The Panini bread is a welcomed changed from the familiar sesame seed bun – soft when heated and seasoned with aromatic rosemary and olive oil. The more regular shape makes it easier to consume without making too big a mess.The flamed grilled chicken thigh meat is really the selling point. Some other burgers could taste artificially spiced up with the token chilli powder, but this has an interesting blend of spices such as black pepper, mustard and cayenne pepper. The cayenne, which has its roots from the capsicum family, adds a Latin American zest to the meat very close to flavourings of Buffalo wings.For a price of S$5.95 for ala carte and S$7.95 with meal, I did expect a bigger portion with more meat, more juice, more veggies and more tomatoes. I come to terms that fast food never looks like those in the pictures. At least this sandwich is worth coming back for, and should stay in the menu.Stand a chance to win these Spicy Panini Tendergrill Chicken Sandwich. Find Out Here!Burger King
238 Thomson Road, #01-09/10 Velocity @ Novena Square Tel: +65 6253 1953
Opening Hours: 8am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Everything With Fries (Orchard Central)
Burger Shack (Bt Timah)
McDonald’s Chicken McGrill
Wendy’s (Lau Pa Sat) 
Most Original Burger MOB (Vivocity)
2011-11-25 00:00:00
The Orange Thimble – Where Art Meets Café
The quaint old Tiong Bahru had a breath of fresh café air with the inception of 40 Hands last year. It will definitely attract café-goers hunting for the less-discovered spots with the opening of The Orange Thimble, Drips Bakery Café and Open Door Policy – all charming in their own ways.The Orange Thimble is where art meets café, with collaborations with neighbours White Canvas Gallery, also featuring works of notable local artists.My recommendations include Miss Portobella ($7.50) and the English breakfast burger ($5.50). The former is a soft bread roll with portobello mushroom baked in honey and balsamic vinegar, while the latter packs pork sausage, bacon and wild rocket in one wholeness goodness. Made to order on the spot, the bread was chewy soft, with the ingredients tasting hot and fresh.Full Post at InSing.com – Quaint new café opens in Tiong BahruThe Orange Thimble
56 Eng Hoon Street, #01-68 Tel: +65 6223 8068
Opening Hours: Tue–Sun: 11am – 9pm (Closed on Mon)Other Related Entries
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
Maison Ikkoku (Kandahar Street)
Talent Café (Tanjong Pagar)
Blackbird Café (Handy Road)
7 KICKstart BREWiches (Armenian Place)
2011-11-23 00:00:00
Anar – Simply Magical Middle Eastern Cuisine
If I asked you to name three Middle Eastern cuisine, could you? Middle Eastern food has been very unfamiliar to many, like a mysterious belly dancer. Even when I asked my friends to come along for a treat, many declined due to the unfamiliarly with an idea that the fare would taste strange.This has been one of my most ‘magical’ meal this year. Anar at Resorts World Sentosa is like a mini-palace set in a lush rust red tone – with huge chandeliers, Turkmenistan rugs, Moroccan lanterns and Arabic-styled furniture. Beautiful, simply beautiful.Anar is the Persian word for “pomegranate”, and therefore many dishes are ornamented with the red arils. For starters, I had the Mohammarah ($12), an exotic brick-red dip of thick consistency, extremely delicious when spread on pita bread.  The taste was something I never experienced before, but certainly memorable.A traditional Middle Eastern starter is the Hummus ($12), made of pureed chick peas with sesame seed paste. Compared to the Mohammarah, it was a healthier tasting dip not as striking.There were times when I felt like a prince, especially when the Shish Taouk ($32) was served. A traditional Babylonian recipe, the chicken breast came aesthetically presented smoking on top of a charcoal grill served with traditional Syrian garlic paste.  Every bite of the tender meat was juicy, sometimes exploding with a fusion of savours.The Chelow Kebab Kubide ($38) – Minced lamb kebab served on a bed of steamed Persian saffron rice “chelow” was even better than the chicken, almost heavenly.Save some room for the Mohalabieh ($12), a smooth Arabic milk pudding made with sugar and rice powder, drizzled with chopped pistachio. I have new found respect for Anar which recreates that luxurious Middle Eastern dining experience, paying attention to every detail. Lunch is estimated at $60 and dinner $80 per pax.26 Sentosa Gateway, #01-291 Resorts World Sentosa, Tel: +65 6884 6989
Opening Hours: 12pm–3pm, 6pm–10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Medz (Orchard Central)
Don Quijote Spanish Restaurant (Lor Kilat)
2011-11-22 00:00:00
Pu Tien – Tis The Season For Hairy Crabs
If you still have not got your claws on the hairy crabs, you probably have about two weeks before you say bye and wait till 10 months later. These gorgeous Chinese mitten crabs are Shanghai’s best delicacy in the autumn season, with Chinese spending hundreds of yuan just for a bite.I had mine for $38++ at Putien, where the ‘Da Zha Xie’ 大闸蟹 come from the Taihu Lake in Eastern China – reputed to be the most succulent. Well the truth was I chose the cheapest in all the offerings, with the crustacean costing up to $100 at some restaurants.Male crabs which have more meat are best eaten in September while female are saved for later in the season till early December for its rich golden roe.The most classic method to cook the hairy crab is through steaming – which preserves the original fresh flavours of the crab meat. You can choose to tear the entire crab apart with bare hands, or leave the artwork to a skilled waitress which will cut the crab up like an experienced surgeon.My favourite part is definitely the bright orangey intense crab roe. Smell it, savour it, flavour it, relish it, take your time to let it go down your pellets. This is where the females are better, because the man (crabs) don’t get it.This may sound strange, but eating the crab legs are really kind of fun and pleasurable. You either suck the meat from the legs, or use a chopstick to push it out into your mouth. I didn’t say it won’t be messy. Dip into a specialty concocted vinegar-soy-ginger sauce and it will make your autumn just so perfect.Pu Tien, 180 Kitchener Road, #02-51/54 City Square Mall, Tel: +65 6509 6015
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri: 12pm–2.30pm, 6pm–9.30pm; Sat–Sun: 11.30am–2.30pm, 5.30pm–9.30pmOther Related Entries
Pu Tien Restaurant (Kitchener Road)
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Mellben (Pasir Ris)
2011-11-18 00:00:00
Hua Feng Mian Jia – The Longest Queue at Tiong Bahru Market
Tiong Bahru market has many famed stalls that need no further introduction – chwee kueh, porridge, fish cake, pau, lor mee and char siew – All reputable ‘legends’ in their own right. If you come during the weekends, almost every stall would have a queue, even for the coffee. Those without, you could probably give a miss.There is this one stall which is almost never opened. If it does, it has the longest queue easily with more than 20 pax.Hua Feng Mian Jia 华丰面家 may not be widely known, but its fan base is huge. Some things you may like to note: It is opened 2-3 times a week, only a few hours each time till noon at most. The days they are opened are purely random (I tried to spot a trend but failed miserably).And despite the rampant inflation, the noodles are still at an affordable $2! Yes, $2. They do not need any Retail Price Watch Group sticker, or MakanSutra / Yummy King award to proof that they mean something.While the thin char siew is nothing to scream about, the noodles are springing with joy and are scrumptious lip-smacking good when it absorbs the oily sauce and special chili. The taste is very old school. Sometimes it feels like my primary school canteen noodles, at times a close substitute to Lavender’s Kok Kee.For $3, there were about 5 wantons swimming in the hot delightful soup which is one of the best around.
My tip is, ‘tabao’ a packet home for the noodles to absorb all the sauce. It may taste better the next day. That’s if you even manage to catch the stall open.Hua Feng Mian Jia 華豐麵家
30 Seng Poh Road #02-24 Tiong Bahru Market S168898Other Related Entries
Hua Kee Wanton Mee (Old Airport Road)
Koka Wanton Noodles (North Bridge Road)
Pontian Wanton Mee (Far East Plaza)
Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodles (Maxwell Food Centre)
Ah Tee Ko Ko Mee (Golden Mile)
2011-11-15 00:00:00
OverTime – You Won’t Mind Your O.T. Here
OverTime is a popular restaurant in Kuala Lumpur known for its fresh Stärker beer, live music and innovative menu, and it has brought the same formula to Singapore. Located at a quaint spot at Dempsey Hill, OverTime offer a spread of Western meets Asian favourite such as their 33 varieties of fusion skewers. The menu also consist of several Asian influenced dishes such as honey char siew, thai style chicken wings, crayfish yi mien, beef udon and lamb satay.I was brought here by Fly Entertainment artiste Benjamin Heng, who just finished filming Zombiepura. A former eatery-owner and food show host who really loves food (but is so enviously skinny), he strongly recommeded their signature Platter A.This signature Platter A ($23) consist of crunchy pork, crispy fish fillet, and cripsy mushrooms. It is rather atypical to see ‘siok bak’ in a pub menu. And the roast pork rubbed with fresh spices and basted with pan juices do make a good pairing with its fresh Stärker beer.Full Post at InSing.com – OverTime – Time to Chill OutOverTime
Blk 18 18E Dempsey Road Tel: +65 6472 4388
Opening Hours: 12pm – 1am DailyOther Related Entries
Infusion (Dempsey)
Jones The Grocer (Dempsey)
TongKang Colonial Bar & Restaurant (Clarke Quay)
TAB (Orchard)
Sunset Grill and Pub (Seletar Airbase)
2011-11-14 00:00:00
Twelve Cupcakes – The Celebrity Couple Cupcakes
There is a new life for celebrity couple Jaime Teo and Daniel Ong after they started their cupcake shop Twelve Cupcakes – the first at United Square and a second at Millenia Walk. Jaime takes control of the kitchen while Daniel is mainly in charge in the accounts office.Jaime does her own baking and developed a special recipe from repeated experiments. “Fortunately I had Daniel as my guinea pig.”The cupcakes cost $3 each, $17 for half a dozen and $33 for a dozen. Despite their smaller than usual size and slightly higher pricing, sales have been brisk especially among the office crowd. There are 12 standard flavours such as cookies n cream, chocolate vanilla and espresso, and a number of exciting daily specials, the popular ones being lychee, salted caramel, black forest, and baileys chocolate.Full Post at InSing.com – Celebrity Couple CupcakesTwelve Cupcakes
101 Thomson Road, #B1-60 United Square, Tel: +65 6256 8130
Millenia Walk #01-52
Opening Hours: 11am – 9pm DailyOther Related Entries
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
Brunetti (Tanglin Mall)
Cookie Museum (Esplanade)
3 Inch Sin (Bt Timah)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
2011-11-10 00:00:00
Lao Ban Soya Beancurd – So Smooth, Its Unreal
Miss Tam Chiak first recommended Lao Ban on my radio programme as though this was the best thing she ever eaten in her life. She “fell in love” with Lao Ban since. So did the rest of Singapore.Old Airport Road Hawker Centre has become the new tau hway land, sprouting out 51 Soy Ban and QQ Soya Bean. Lao Ban has the most accolades, with many fans claiming this is the BEST-EST tau hway ever.After queuing about 10 minutes, I got a bowl of the original ($1.50, almond for $2.00). ONE bowl. While the rest were buying 20 on average. Did they have that many family members, or they buying for the whole corridor/office/class?After my first mouthful, I must have exclaimed “OH MY GOD!” Yes, it was unreal. Yes, it was the best tau hway I ever eaten. No, it was not tau hway – it did not taste like all the rest, even the finest ones from Taiwan. I woke up from taste-slumberland to savour this texture that slipped down my throat into great satisfaction.This neither has the soya-beany taste, nor the sugar syrup. Instead Lao Ban’s version feels like some oriental crème brulee meets milk custard. Love it, or hate it.Set up by ‘Lao Bans’ husband and wife team Mr Li Hui Shing and Mdm Hui Ywai Kwai, their beancurd is freshly made on site. How many soya beancurd stall you know has a facebook page with more than 3000 likes? They already have its 2nd branch at Maxwell. With its present craze, this may become the next KOI bubbletea. Somebody tabao a bowl for me, please.Lao Ban Soya Beancurd 老伴豆花, 51 Old Airport Road, #01-127 Old Airport Road Food Centre, Tel: +65 8181 2201
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 8pm (Tue-Sat), 1pm – 8pm (Sun), Closed on MonOther Related Entries
Hua Kee Wanton Mee (Old Airport Road)
Hock Leng Satay Beehoon Lok Lok (Old Airport Road)
Rolina Curry Puffs (Tanjong Pagar)
Mei Xiang Goreng Pisang (Changi Village)
Eat May Know (Bendemeer)
2011-11-09 00:00:00
Chang Korean Charcoal BBQ Restaurant – Buffet So So Se-yo
Chang Korean BBQ started at Dempsey with positive feedback and a touch of class. It went on to open its 2nd at Illuma – to appeal to the budget conscious and youth. Did not sound like a bad plan.The thing about Illuma is, people just do not go there, so much so that the only place making good money could be Koi (which is outside anyway). As for Chang, it first started selling Korean signatures at a lower price, such as beef bulgogi, soondubu and kimchi fried rice.It has since ‘deteriorated’ to sell mass Korean BBQ. Price is $23.42 (weekday lunch), $28.13(weekday dinner/weekend lunch) and $34.02 (weekend dinner) – all Nett prices and very affordable if you compare to the other restaurants or if you order ala carte.For that price, the meat came in rather big slices, with quite a sizable variety of chicken, pork and beef flavoured in original, peppery, spicy or bulgogi marinates. Refills for the more expensive choices were also quick.The seafood choices such as fish and sotong, linger on being not too fresh. If only there was a greater variety of banchan and staples other than the usual kimchi and fried rice. Overall, a decent meal for its price – wasn’t satisfying though.Chang was packed on a Friday night, until I found out that 99% of people were using a Groupon. I shouldn’t complain that much then. People were paying $16.90 for all that I have eaten. What’s life for Chang after Groupon then?Chang Korean Charcoal BBQ Restaurant
201 Victoria Street, #04-04 Iluma @ Bugis, Tel: +65 6509 8900
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10:30pmOther Related Entries
Fisherman’s Market (The Central)
Minoriya (Tanjong Katong)
Just Acia (Dhoby Ghaut )
Ya Zhou Café (Suntec)
Plaza Brasserie (Beach Road)
2011-11-08 00:00:00
The Rotisserie – Roast, Roast I Love You
Singapore is one chicken nation. I mean, our love for chicken is evident in the number of chicken shops we have. Looking at the roasted version alone, there is no stopping for Kenny Rogers, Nandos, Barcelos, Javier’s and new eatery The Rotisserie.The Rotisserie is a 120-seater located at China Square Food Centre (not to be confused with China Square), started by Australian Jason Pope who also runs Dallas.They roast its whole chickens on a spit, ensuring that the meat is evenly cooked and the moisture is retained. The pure sight of looking at chicken turn in an oven is like watching a theatrical performance – with the actress appearing so lovingly delicious.Judging from the 100 whole chicken sold per day, people really love those spit-roasted birds.The key selling point is in its price – $10 for a quarter and $15 for half which include two side dishes. That is very cheap considering this is air-conditioned dining in the heart of CBD. For the hot sides, the default (and also boring) choice seems to be the mashed potatoes, followed by gratinated cauliflower, peas and corn. The cold sides also presents some unusual selections of a purplish looking coleslaw, Asian chicken noodle salad, and chickpea with avocado pilaf.My main gripe is you can only pick two hot or two cold dishes. Mixing is not allowed. So I couldn’t have warm macaroni with cold coleslaw.For the chicken, the meat is so tender such that you can remove the entire flesh from its bone with a slight push of the knife. The fat under the skin has dripped away, leaving the poor bird almost fat-free. You may wonder why the fat went to. It has been cleverly transformed to a salty sauce by the side, but my advice is to leave that out unless you want to bottoms up those fats.The favourite fish of the day strangely turned out to be the beer battered fish and chips ($11) – fried to a crisp golden yellow with moist chunky flesh. Marvelous.51 Telok Ayer Street, #01-01 China Square Food Centre
Opening Hours: 7.30am – 10.30pm (Mon-Fri), 10.30am – 10pm (Sat)Other Related Entries
Nando’s (Bugis Junction)
Barcelos (Novena) 
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
The Tastings Room (Marina Square)
Dapao (Far East Square)
2011-11-01 00:00:00
HonGuo – What’s The Cross Bridge Vermicelli?
Despite walking past HonGuo 红锅a number of times, I saw it as ‘just another Chinese eatery’ and never really knew what it sold. That is until I heard of its signature “Cross Bridge Vermicelli”. Known as 过桥米线, this is Yunnan’s best-known cuisine with more than 100 years of history.Word has it that a virtuous wife would bring meals diligently to her scholar husband everyday by crossing the bridge to where he was. And that was one very long bridge. She surprisingly realised that the soup would remain hot, most likely due to the layer of chicken oil and claypot used. Others eventually adopted her method of cooking, with some calling this the “Love Bridge Vermicelli” due to her devotional love.Would you do the same to your spouse? Crossing the bridge everyday to deliver a bowl of soup? Such is love.I do not think many wives in current days would do the same, but this fortunately this traditional dish remains. This meal at HonGuo turned out to be rather out of the ordinary when a huge red bowl arrived with 15 different saucers of ingredients. All for the price of $8.50. The waitress would throw in the ingredients, starting with the meat, vegetables and ending with the mee sua – just like how authentic zha jiang mian would be served in China.This bowl of various ingredients of prawns, squid, meat slices, mushroom, quail egg and vegetables reminded me of steamboat. The double boiled soup of duck, chicken and pork portions was palatable yet not salty, fortunately without MSG or that original layer of oil. There was an occasional crunch of peanuts or rubbery squid which made eating an ‘adventure’ because you did not really know what entered your mouth.I wished that the soup was really hot and boiling, as though the hot steam from the red bowl can blow into my face. Still, this huge portion could be shared between two, and makes a rather comforting and filling meal.HonGuo 红锅, 23 Serangoon Central, #B1-75 NEX Mall, Tel: +65 6634 4675
Opening Hours: 11am – 9.30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Noodle Star (Bugis Village)
Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao (Suntec City)
2011-10-31 00:00:00
Brunetti – Experience a slice of Italy
This is what I will call a dessert paradise. Entering the newly opened Brunetti at Tanglin Mall, you will be greeted by gorgeous cakes, delightful chocolates, colourful gelatos, macaroons, and a huge selection of pas tries that will satisfy your every craving.Already well-known in Melbourne Australia, Singapore is the 3rd country in the world with a Brunetti (after Dubai).  Like a child lost in a toys’ shop, I was just amazed by the spread of dessert items and an all-day selection of savoury traditional Italian dishes. You can have a quick light snack of piadina pollo ($10.90), or something heavier in the likes of Sicilian seafood stew ($19), baked macaroni ($17) and aglio olio ($17).Macaron lovers can rejoice with its selection of 10 different flavours such as strawberry, mango and salted caramel at $2 each. My favourites are the classic chocolate with a tinge of semi-sweet flavour, and blueberry which happens to be their best-seller. Some of the selection could be rather cloying, leaving me literally in a sugar-high.Full Post at InSing.com – Café Brunetti opens at Tanglin MallBrunetti, 163 Tanglin Road, #01-35 Tanglin Mall, Tel: +65 6733 9088
Opening Hours: Daily: 9am – 10pmOther Related Entries
Brunetti (Melbourne)
The Cheescake Café (East Coast)
Cookie Museum (Esplanade)
3 Inch Sin (Bt Timah)
Egg3 Café (Mountbatten)
2011-10-28 00:00:00
Maison Ikkoku – Coffee joint, boutique & cocktail bar Three-In-One
Good news for coffee-addicts, shopaholics and cocktail lovers! Maison Ikkoku, a unique three-in-one artisanal coffee joint, a menswear boutique and a cocktail bar, has just opened at the Arab Street district.The name (which came from a Manga), concept, interior design, right to the fashion labels would remind you of one of those boutique-cafes you have seen in Tokyo.Their strength has to be in the aromatic coffees, brewed using four different methods of filtered, French-press, drip and syphon. And the baristas were trained by Japanese celebrity barista Hiroshi Sawada. Drink your cuppa with the moist and decadent carrot cake, said to be “home-made” by a “very special friend”. Their lips were sealed.Full Post at InSing.com – Japan-inspired café & boutique opensMaison Ikkoku, 20 Kandahar Street, Tel: +65 6294 0078
Opening Hours: Mon–Thu: 9am – 7pm; Fri–Sat: 9am – 10pm; Sun: 9am – 6pmOther Related Entries
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
Box n Sticks (Arab Street)
7 KICKstart BREWiches (Armenian Place)
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
2011-10-27 00:00:00
The Moluccas Room – Fine Dining, Indonesian Style at MBS
Talk about Indonesian cuisine and our perception may be family-styled dining with nasi goreng, ayam penyet, sate and curries. Definitely not associated with the words “class”, “fine” and “chic”.The Moluccas Room will probably change this opinion, with its location at Marina Bay Sands, in addition to a fine-dining concept with French cooking techniques. The word “Moluccas” or Maluka represent the Spice Islands in Indonesia.This new restaurant is probably the first to redefine Indonesian cuisine, and a huge part of that influence comes from its Executive Chef Alicia Tivey – mixed parentage, Indonesian born, French taught and Australian trained.It is not too exaggerating to say The Moluccas Room is a class of its own. The presentation of the Sate Ayam Madura ($22 for 5 skewers) was already impressive. Each stick came with a specially paired sauce to ensure that the charcoal grilled meat blended perfectly with the sauce.Even the Soto Ayam Lamongan ($15) was presented differently. This signature chicken soup first came with marinated chicken shreds, subsequently with the waiter pouring warm aromatic soup into the bowl. I must say I am not used to drinking the Soto soup so delicately.The most memorable dish for me has to be the Angus Steak Rendang ($35) where the grilled tenderloin was slathered with a light-orangey Javanese style (hear it) rendang sauce. I never had my steak this way. Beyond the juiciness of the steak, the sauce was inexplicable but strangely enjoyable.While relaxing by the Marina Bayfront promenade and people-watching joggers on a hot afternoon, you may want to round up the wonderful dining experience with a bizarre tasting Sri Kaya Crème Brulee ($17) where the familiar custard dessert is flavored with pandan and gula melaka. Rather than call The Moluccas Room an Indonesian fine dining restaurant, I prefer to say that this is one fine dining place done Indonesian style.The Moluccas Room
2 Bayfront Avenue, #01-81 The Shoppes at Marina Bay Sands, Tel: +65 6688 7367
Opening Hours: 11.30am–3pm, 6.30pm–10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Bayang (Clarke Quay)
Wong Solo (Far East Plaza)
Ayam Penyet Ria (Lucky Plaza)
Waroeng Penyet (Marine Parade)
2011-10-25 00:00:00
5 Indian Restaurants to Celebrate Deepavali
With the Diwali festival of lights occurring tomorrow, it is timely to indulge in a feast of Indian cuisines. How about some iconic chicken tikka masala and lassi, if not a simpler localised meal of roti john, Indian rojak, prata and fish head curry?Singaporeans are spoilt for choices for Indian food – with the tourist-friendly Banana Leaf Apolo, Muthu’s Curry, Samy’s Curry, Zaffron and Kashmir, to some of the popular buffet spots of Shahi Maharani, Masala Hut and Kinara. And there is Thasevi.Here are 5 other restaurants you can consider to satisfy your curry cravings.Yantra (Tanglin Mall)
Yantra has to be one of the finest restaurants locally offering authentic North Indian cuisine – with a rich and elegant setting that enhances the dining experience. The space is huge, enough for events and gatherings, yet comfortable enough to feel the privacy and classiness of the surroundings. My favourite dish was the Jhinga Goa Curry ($35) which contained fresh prawns gently cooked in a coconut curry, tempered with mustard seeds and curry leaves.Tiffin Room (Raffles Hotel)
Tiffin Room specialises in North Indian food, with an extensive curry menu from prawn, chicken, lamb to vegetarian. Start with the appetizer dishes of salad, vegetables and cold seafood, move to the main rice dishes, and end with very sweet desserts. It felt really exclusive that the waiter would attentively serve you some of their daily specials personally, with explanations and all. If you do not have a Feed At Raffles card, the buffet dinner is $75++ per adult.Feast @ East (East Coast)
During this week leading up to the festival, Feast@East Buffet Restaurant has lined up a feast of Indian favourites of 40 types of curries, cold dishes and desserts to For this special promotion, they brought in Indian celebrity Chef Bhairav Singh Rajput who meticulously put together 3 different types of menu.
A simple yet special dish to try is Pav Bhaji. There is a chef at the live cooking station who will pan-fry soft buns with butter. Imagine dipping these hot piping fragrant buns into a delish mash of potato curry – Perfect indulgence!Song of India (Scotts Road)
The Song of India had been known as one of Singapore’s best restaurant, and almost seems unapproachable with its rather high end look. Situated in a prime location at the famed Scotts Road, located in a classic black and white heritage bungalow, its colonial charm suggest this is fine Indian cuisine at its priciest. The fish curry was a gravy-thick creamy-smooth version which I readily enjoyed. The best thing was really the unlimited hot breads and naans from the tandoor to relish the curries, wiped clean within minutes.Gajalee (Cuppage Terrace)
Gajalee located at a very convenient Cuppage Terrace is not the typical Indian restaurant, specialising in seafood with signatures such as Tandoori Crab, Crab Masala, Lobster Butter Pepper, Jumbo Pudina Prawns and Chinese Pomfret Green Chilly Sauce. Rates are per catch items. Its Maharashtrian style of chicken, mutton and vegetarian food also makes it one of the more popular restaurants in Mumbai.Other Related Entries
Yantra (Tanglin Mall)
Song of India (Scotts Road)
Feast @ East (East Coast)
Tiffin Room (Raffles Hotel)
Gajalee (Cuppage Terrace)
2011-10-24 00:00:00
Gajalee – The Bombay Duck Is A Fish
This is not a joke. The Bombay Duck is not a duck – it is a fish. Its other name is (gasp) lizard fish. Therefore you can try to imagine its size, look and taste – somewhat flat, dry, with little meat, without a distinctive taste, yet often eaten as a delicacy in Mumbai.The odour of the fish is said to be extremely pungent, and if someone says “You smell like a Bombay Duck”, it is time to take that shower.The Bombay Duck is actually available in Singapore, found at Gajalee near Centrepoint. The popular version is having the fish coated with masala-based batter and fried golden yellow. Do not worry about the smell as it is no longer there. It acts a greater starter item (somewhat like fried calamari), best to be eaten as an accompaniment to curry.Alternatively, you can have your duck, I mean fish stuffed with seasoned prawns and green chutney.Gajalee is not the typical Indian restaurant, specialising in seafood with signatures such as Tandoori Crab, Crab Masala, Lobster Butter Pepper, Jumbo Pudina Prawns and Chinese Pomfret Green Chilly Sauce. Rates are per catch items.Its Maharashtrian style of chicken, mutton and vegetarian food also makes it one of the more popular restaurants in Mumbai. The Singapore branch looks very quiet on the other hand.Gajalee, 17/19 Cuppage Road, Cuppage Terrace, Tel: +65 6733 3278
Opening Hours: Mon: 6pm–11pm; Tue–Sun: 11.30am–3.30pm, 6pm–11pmOther Related Entries
Yantra (Tanglin Mall)
Song of India (Scotts Road)
Feast @ East (East Coast)
Tiffin Room (Raffles Hotel)
2011-10-21 00:00:00
Tiffin Room – $75++ Indian Buffet with Class
The word “Tiffin” originally refers to a light meal in British India, but expect anything but light at Tiffin Room because it serves an all-curry buffet. In India while tiffin carriers are mainly lunch boxes for workers, tiffin has become a strong aesthetic feature at one of Raffles Hotel’s most iconic restaurant.And because it is at THE historical Raffles Hotel, it is all about class and class and class.  Patrons are advised that “singlets, shorts, bermudas, sandals, slippers and pool attire are not permitted in the restaurant”. (I actually wore pants, and took few photos because I felt ‘paiseh’.) The décor reflects the strong colonial culture, with white-jacketed waiters, palm bentwood choirs, large square teak tables and piano-playing at a faraway background.Tiffin Room specialises in North Indian food, with an extensive curry menu from prawn, chicken, lamb to vegetarian. Start with the appetizer dishes of salad, vegetables and cold seafood, move to the main rice dishes, and end with very sweet desserts. The food (tasting the same after a while) was unmemorable, so much so that the best ‘dish’ of my meal was the garlic naans.It felt really exclusive that the waiter would attentively serve you some of their daily specials personally, with explanations and all. It made a difference to the Almond Ice Cream – a milky rich dessert which compensated for all the rest. If you do not have a Feed At Raffles card, the buffet dinner is $75++ per adult. No typo. Remember you are paying for the class, and class could be that priceless.Tiffin Room
1 Beach Road, Raffles Hotel, Tel: +65 6412 1816
Opening Hours: 7am – 10.30am (Breakfast); 12pm – 2.30pm (Buffet Lunch); 3.30pm – 5.30pm (High Tea); 7pm – 10pm (Buffet Dinner); 11.30am – 2.30pm (Sunday Brunch)Other Related Entries
Yantra (Tanglin Mall)
Song of India (Scotts Road)
Feast @ East (East Coast)
Gajalee (Cuppage Terrace)
2011-10-20 00:00:00
Feast@East Buffet Restaurant – Celebrate Deepavali with a Heritage Feast
During this week leading up to the festival, Feast@East Buffet Restaurant has lined up a feast of Indian favourites of 40 types of curries, cold dishes and desserts to spice up your senses.For this special promotion, they brought in Indian celebrity Chef Bhairav Singh Rajput who meticulously put together 3 different types of menu. I hear that Chef Bhairav made his rounds around Little India prior to the launch to understand the Singapore taste buds a lot better.The essence of India’s cuisine is in its curry, and curry lovers will enjoy the variety such as Malbari fish curry, mutton pepper fried curry and butter chicken. Talking about curry, a rather simple yet special dish to try is Pav Bhaji. There is a chef at the live cooking station who will pan-fry soft buns with butter. Imagine dipping these hot piping fragrant buns into a delish mash of potato curry – Perfect indulgence!Full Post at InSing.com – Celebrate Deepavali with a Heritage FeastFeast@East Buffet Restaurant
50 East Coast Road, 3F Grand Mercure Roxy Hotel, Tel: +65 6340 5665
Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 12pm–2.30pm, 6.30pm–9.30pm; Sun: 11am–3pm, 6.30pm–9.30pmOther Related Entries
Yantra (Tanglin Mall)
Song of India (Scotts Road)
2011-10-19 00:00:00
Ci Gusta! – Italian Gelato which means “We Like It!”
Many of us have this dream of opening up a café or little dessert place. So do sisters Peggy and Claudia Lim. They went from Hong Kong, to Taiwan, to Tokyo and finally to Italy ($?) in search of that one food and fell in love with the classic Italian gelato.Therefore they brought the Ci Gusta! (pronounced “chi”) franchise to our sunny island.The question is: Do we need another ice cream store in this saturated market? The answer is a resounding “Yes”. Located at a mall filled with outlet shops and right opposite IKEA, this is the first outlet and there are already plans to open more next year ($$$!).There are more than 15 flavours of artisanal gelato to choose from, and they all sound very exciting with vanilla whisky, salted caramel, pistachio with sea salt and forest berries. Price range from $3.90 for piccolo, $5.40 for medio, and $6.90 for grande.Ice cream can be really personal, and after trying out close to 10 different types, I decide to stick to my pino pinguino with a blend of chocolate and hazelnut flavours.If you are bored with the gelato texture, maybe you have not tried the gelato tenero – a dessert combining soft serve ice cream and premium gelato. That is like the best of both worlds – except that I wished it did not melt so fast in our climate.No ice cream trip is complete without trying the freshly baked waffles or crepes, both at $8.90 with 1 scoop & topping.  While the waffle was not buttery and crisp enough for my liking, the crepe with unforgettable kaya-looking-like pistachio sauce was caloric-worthy. Delizioso!Ci Gusta!
370 Alexandra Road, #01-04 Anchorpoint Shopping Centre
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Cold Stone Creamery (Orchard Central)
Udders (Thomson Road)
Island Creamery (Serene Centre)
Ice Cream Chefs (East Coast)
Once Upon a Milkshake (Maxwell Chambers)
2011-10-18 00:00:00
Teochew Handmade Pau – Boom Boom Pau!
Teochew Handmade Pau at Toa Payoh Lorong 1 sells all kinds of traditional buns which are known for being on the tiny side and delicious fillings. The stall was started in 1993 by Mr Yeoh Eu Tie at Toa Payoh, and has earned a loyal following since.  Queues are long, customers order by the boxes, and therefore expect most of the buns to be sold out by noon.My preference is for the char siew pau – with skin so thin and fluffy, and fillings juicy and lip-smacking.  Other than the size, the other winning formula has to be its delicate and tasty skin.Full Post at InSing.com – Mini but mighty!Teochew Handmade Pau,
127 Toa Payoh Lorong 1, #02-02 Toa Payoh West Market and Food Court S310127, Tel: 62542053
Opening Hours: Tue to Sat: 06:00 – 14:00, Sun: 06:00 – 12:00Other Related Entries
Tip Top The Puff Factory
Tiong Bahru Teochew Kueh (Tiong Bahru)
Rolina Curry Puffs (Tanjong Pagar)
Mei Xiang Goreng Pisang (Changi Village)
Ann Chin Popiah (Chinatown)
2011-10-17 00:00:00
7 Sensations – A Paradiso for Vegetarians
Vegetarian Restaurant 7 Sensations has just moved from Madras Street to Parco Millenia, continuing to offer delectable and flavoursome dishes. They are called 7 Sensations to reflect the 7 culinary elements in their menu: Asian fusion, Western, Japanese, Thai, Peranakan, cakes and beverages.I thought it would be a shame if I did not try the sambal buah keluak ($18.90), a signature nonya speciality.  It is already quite difficult to find a decent meat version of this dish, let alone a vegetarian version. The meat made from mushroom roots goes well with the braised Indonesia buah keluak nuts, soaking up the thick black tasty sauce.Though owner cum chef Mrs Annie Chua is not Pernankan, she said her very critical nonya friends loved her dishes prepared with wholesome and healthy ingredients such as organic vegetables, sauces and seasonings.Full Post at InSing.com – Not your regular vegetarian eatery!7 Sensations
9 Raffles Boulevard, Millenia Walk, #03-07 (3rd Floor), Parco Marina Bay, Singapore 039596, Tel: 6298 8198 Fax: 63363194
Operating Hours: Mon – Fri: 11:00am – 3:00pm (Lunch), 6:00pm – 10:00pm (Dinner); Sat, Sun and Public Holidays: 11:00am – 10:00pmOther Related Entries
Dapao (Far East Square)
The Academy Bistro (Supreme Court)
The Tastings Room (Marina Square)
TongKang Colonial Bar & Restaurant (Clarke Quay)
Jones The Grocer (Dempsey)
2011-10-14 00:00:00
7 KICKstart BREWiches – The most ‘random’ café in Singapore
If there is an award for the most ‘random’ café in Singapore, this would be it – the 7 KICKstart BREWiches. The name comes from an interesting formula of “Cafe-BREW+Sandwich Stop-wiches=BREWiches” with 7 representing the number of perfection.Chef Swee sporting a short blonde crop and huge smiles, used to own SoHo7 Café and Bistro and is not stranger to cafe culture. She calls her new café a “micro-artisan coffee roaster” serving great cups of caffeine in a homely-friendly environment to hang out with colleagues and friends.Located right opposite the Peranakan Museum and Substation, this is indeed a prized find to spend away a lazy afternoon indulging in a cup of cuppa and desserts. Food is kind of different too – The cajun chicken sandwich ($7.70) arrived ‘frighteningly’ with a knife across to keep it stable. A bright pink-coloured sauce was oozing out which looked like it arrived from a Halloween menu. The specially-created pink sauce is actually a combination of dragonfruit, mayonnaise, juice and herbs – tasting really healthy!Full Post at InSing.com – Kick start your day at 7 KICKstart BREWiches7 KICKstart BREWiches
50 Armenian Place #01-02 Wilmer Place, Singapore 179938 (Opposite Substation)
Opening Hours: 8:00am – 8:00pm (Mon- Thurs), 8:00am – 10:00pm (Fri), 9:00am – 10:00pm (Sat), 9:00am – 6:00pm (Sun)Other Related Entries
Qafé (Tanjong Pagar)
Joan Bowen Café (Macpherson)
Talent Café (Tanjong Pagar)
Blackbird Café (Handy Road)
Cine Cafe (Shaw House)
2011-10-12 00:00:00
Bayang – Eat, Prey & Love Balinese Cuisine
In ‘Eat Pray Love’, Bali is where Elizabeth Gilbert found romance, but this island is instead a food haven for me. I was surprised to find a Balinese restaurant back in Singapore, at Clarke Quay where daytime was a much quieter contrast from its night culture.Indonesian Sumatra offers more spicy food, such as curried meat and vegetables as they are under Middle East and Indian influences; while Javanese cuisine usually comes with a sweet taste. What I enjoy is Balinese cuisine, which has a good mixture of both, with hot and powerful spices often used.Bayang, which means ‘shadow’ to symbolise the Wayang kilit puppets in Indonesia, offers many traditional Balinese fare at a purplish-toned elegant setting. Some of the signature offerings on the menu include Bebek Betutu (Baked Duck with Balinese spice in Banana Leaf), Satay Campur (marinated minced fish or meat grilled on lemongrass sticks), and Ikan Bakar Bali (Barbeque whole fish basted in special sweet sauce grilled slowly over charcoal).If you come in a group of three, the Appetizer Platter ($19) should work best for you. It comes with a combination of street food such as sate madura (skewered chicken), spring rolls, grilled prawns, and my favourite begedel potato cakes.A must-have is the Gado Gado ($14), what I would cheekily name as the ‘Indonesian salad’. The rice cakes and beancurd was a perfect combi with the thick peanut sauce. What sealed the deal was the topping of kangkong fried tempura style, a creative addition which added addictive light crisp.I also had the Hasil Laut Seafood in Yellow Curry ($22). The delicious gravy was quickly scooped with the fragrant Yellow Coconut Rice ($3.50).  Though the taste was more strangely more Thai than Balinese, I had no complains.Bayang now offers affordable weekday $15 set lunches which include an appetizer, soup, main course and drink – This is one very tempting offer.Bayang, 3A River Valley Road, #01-05 Clarke Quay, Tel: +65 6337 0144
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 12pm–2.30pm, 6pm–12am; Fri–Sat: 12pm–2.30pm, 6pm–1amOther Related Entries
Ayam Penyet Ria (Lucky Plaza)
Waroeng Penyet (Marine Parade)
Wong Solo (Far East Plaza)
2011-10-12 00:00:00
Have a Satay ‘Lok Lok’!
After watching the movie “It’s a Great Great World”, I was intrigued by the product Chew Chor Meng sold in the movie, and was on my search for the ‘Lok Lok’. It also known as ‘satay celup’ in Malaysia, is like steamboat where skewered food is dunked in thick aromatic satay sauce.This Chinese-meets-Malay fusion food is now a hard find – so imagine our excitement when we found it at Old Airport Road Hawker Centre.  You can order a $15, $20 or $25 set where you will be served an assortment of raw seafood, meat and vegetables all served on satay sticks.  If you like variety, there is quite a selection with cuttlefish, prawns, crabstick, baby clams, pork slices, pig intestines and assorted balls.Instead of rice, I had my steamboat with a small plate of satay beehoon. While the dish looked simple, the sauce was deliciously flavourful and mildly spicy, said to be made with 15 different ingredients.Full Post at InSing.com – Indulge in some ‘lok lok’ fun!Hock Leng Satay Beehoon Lok Lok
51 Old Airport Road Food Centre, Blk 51 Old Airport Road, #141
Opening Hours: 4-8pm (Closed on Mon, Tues, Wed)Other Related Entries
Soon Lee Fire-Pot Stew Beef (Alexandra Food Village)
Lao Goh Carrot Cake (Zion Road)
Tiong Bahru Teochew Kueh (Tiong Bahru)
Ann Chin Popiah (Chinatown)
Eat May Know (Bendemeer)
2011-10-05 00:00:00
The Noodee Box – Ramen in a Box
We always talk about a good bowl of noodles. Now, how about a good BOX of noodles? Take-out noodle or “mien” boxes are quite common in some overseas countries, though seldom seen in Singapore.The Noodee Box, newly opened at Marina Square, offers ramen noodles packed in cute and convenient American-style take-out boxes, and this makes it easy for carry outs. Although it is fast-food in concept, there is ample seating area if you need to dine in comfort.This new noodle concept is brought by Vincent Yap, whose father Ah Lam established the famous “Lam’s Abalone Noodle” sold at coffeeshops. Some of the interesting noodles at The Noodlee Box include savoury Japanese char siew ($6.80), hickory smoked duck ($6.80) and abalone seafood grand ($11.80). I had the original dry ramen ($5.00) which was filled with a variety of ingredients such as char siew, minced pork, fishcake and Taiwanese sauce.Full Post at InSing.com – Want some abalone noodles in a box?The Noodee Box, 6 Raffles Boulevard, #04-102C The Gallerie, Marina Square, Tel: +65 6336 0848
Opening Hours: 11am – 9pm DailyOther Related Entries
Pontian Wanton Mee (Far East Plaza)
Ah Guan Mee Pok (Syed Awi)
Hua Kee Wanton Mee (Old Airport Road)
Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodles (Maxwell Food Centre)
Ah Tee Ko Ko Mee (Golden Mile)
2011-09-30 00:00:00
CoCo ICHIBANYA – The King of Curry Arrives To Singapore
You may have seen one of the 1,275 restaurants worldwide, especially at Bangkok’s MBK and Central World where it has a huge presence. Yes, CoCoICHIBANYA Curry House has finally arrived to Singapore, and at one of my favourite malls 313@Somerset.I have walked past the basement 3 corner vacant space for a while, and am finally satisfied to find that it is now selling all-things Japanese curry. CoCoICHIBANYA (CoCo = Here, Ichiban = No.1, Ya = Shop) has been around more than 30 years, and has the record of most number of curry branches around the world. What took them so long to come here?Like all decent bubbletea shops, the key feature of CoCo Ichibanya is that it allows customers to customise their rice in the following ways.- Spicy level from 1 to 5
- Rice from 150 gram to 550 gram
- Different kinds of sauces such as spicy, non-spicy Hayashi hashed beef
- Addition of toppings from the usual boiled egg, cheese, bacon, corn spinach to the stranger clams, fried squid and kimcheeTo play it safe, I had a pork cutlet curry with cheese ($14.00) on Level 2 spiciness with 150 grams of rice. The good news was I got to eat less carb and even had a $1 discount. The rice arrived in a huge plate with my rice swimming in a half-filled pool of hot curry. I was glad this shop was generous with their gravy because that is the way I like it.The curry sauce was indeed thick, tasty and a tad spicy – so good that I finished all of it (minus the rice). The pork cutlet though, was slightly too tough and lean for me, and could do with more tenderness.The other must-have is the creamed mushroom omelette curry ($13.00). The smooth runny egg plus a combination of spicy-sweet Japanese curry with creamy mushroom sauce will send you on a  sauce high.If you are wondering if Level 5 curry would make you high, I finished another bowl of that gravy – full of shiokness, tongue burning, face blushing and head sweating. A must-try.CoCo ICHIBANYA, 313 Orchard Road, #B3-25/27 313 @ Somerset, Tel: +65 6636 7280
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pm (Mon–Fri), 10am – 11pm (Sat–Sun & PH)Other Related Entries
Saizeriya Ristorante (Liang Court)
AKB48 Café (*Scape)
RamenPlay (NEX)
Pepper Lunch (Shaw House)
Tonkatsu (Mandarin Gallery)
2011-09-29 00:00:00
RamenPlay – The Ramen Shop Introduces New Rice Dishes
Most ramen restaurants would be satisfied with concentrating on a few key items, but RamenPlay is pushing boundaries further with 31 new items! And that includes 16 new desserts and beverages.This is probably in line with its fun image, and BreadTalk’s brand philosophy of innovation as seen from its other brands such as Toast Box, Din Tai Fung and The Icing Room. I personally think this is a good move to differentiate from its very strong ramen competitors.A main highlight of the revamped menu is the usage top-grade Japanese rice imported from Niigata Prefecture of a premium quality. Other than the new Sanpou Double Soup Ramen and Corn Miso Ramen, the Black Sesame Fried Rice, Butariki Ishinabe and Katsu Curry Rice should appeal to customers.I was really intrigued with the Black Sesame Fried Rice ($10.80) because I have never heard of such a combination. The rice is fried with chicken, egg, black sesame seeds, and yes, black sesame paste. It felt as though somebody poured a ‘zhi ma hu’ (black sesame dessert) into rice and mixed it up. However, this was my favourite simply because I am always keen to try new innovative things, and the taste does grow on you.The Butariki Ishinabe ($12.80) is like a cross between the Korean Bibimbap and local claypot rice. Before eating, you have to mix the barbequed pork, onions and raw egg together (like the Bibimbap) and you will land up with slightly charring of the rice on the stone pot (like claypot rice).If you like a carb overload, try the Chicken Katsu Curry ($12.80) which also comes with a crunch piece of toast. The curry interestingly feels part Japanese and part Chinese, and I wished the sauce came in a huger portion because I like my grains to be submerged in this fragrant sweet curry.RamenPlay, 23 Serangoon Central, #B2-58 NEX Mall, Tel: +65 6634 4089
Opening Hours: 10.30am – 10.30pm (Sun–Thu), 10.30am – 11pm (Fri–Sat)Other Related Entries
Ramen Play (313 @ Somerset)
AKB48 Café (*Scape)
Pepper Lunch (Shaw House)
Tonkatsu (Mandarin Gallery)
Box n Sticks (Arab Street)
2011-09-28 00:00:00
Shabu 29 – It’s a Shabu Shabu Heaven
Some people call this the Japanese version of steamboat, with the name “shabu shabu” derived from the “swish swish” sound of cooking the meat in the pot. For fans of shabu shabu, you will be excited to know a new restaurant has opened at Clarke Quay Central. Managed by the same group who brought us Tampopo and Tarafuku, you can be assured of quality food.This restaurant is called Shabu 29 because “29” in Japanese is read as “ni-jyu kyu” and “niku”, which also means meat. Incidentally, the 29th of each month is a specially dedicated ‘meat day’ in Japan.If you prefer something more savoury and sweeter, opt for the sukiyaki soup. Though it is a little on the salty side (the soup is not meant to be drunk on its own), the meat slices cooked has a tastier bite and goes really well with the tofu and leafy vegetables.Full Post at InSing.com – The New Shabu Shabu HeavenShabu 29, 6 Eu Tong Sen Street, #03-88 The Central @ Clarke Quay, Tel: +65 6327 7887
Opening Hours: Daily: 11.30am–3pm, 6pm–10.30pmOther Related Entries
Fisherman’s Market (The Central)
Minoriya (Tanjong Katong)
Itacho Sushi (Plaza Singapura)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
Saizeriya Ristorante (Liang Court)
2011-09-27 00:00:00
Never leave Vienna without trying the Sachertorte
Other than France and Japan, some of the best cakes I have tried come from Vienna. Vienna, capital of Austria, is the land of music, theatre and opera and can I add – beautiful beautiful cafes.  And never leave Vienna without trying the Sachertorte.The Sachertorte is a chocolate cake and one of Vienna’s most famous culinary specialties.  The Original Sachertorte is only available in Vienna and Salzburg. As with all types of popular food, there are many variations around, with the “Original” being sold at Sacher Hotel and the other “original” at Demel café.The story of this cake began in 1832 when the coachman of Europe ordered a particular dessert but the chef was not unavailable. The young and quick witted apprentice Franz Sacher came up with a soft and fluffy chocolate cake with tasty apricot jam under the icing. Sacher’s son Eduard continued his legacy and this cake was later served at Hotel Sacher since 1876. And that is a very long history.The hotel was an easy find even though we were all first time visitors, located between the State Opera House and famous shopping street Kärntner Straße. Both the exterior and interior were impressively elegant – full of the artistic spirit and olden day charm.The waiter was also a charmer, slowly introducing all the brilliant delights of the café and making the girls laugh hard at his jokes.We finally got hold of the world famous Sachertorte, with two layers of dense and rich chocolate cake, a thin layer of apricot jam in the middle and dark chocolate icing on the top and sides.  As most Viennese consider the cake too dry, it was also served with unsweetened whipped cream on the side.If there is one word to describe this cake, it would be “Royal”.The other desserts such as the apple pie and ice coffee were equally a joy to have. Having your cake in the middle of a stunningly scenic Vienna is indeed a wonderful life moment.  (The Original Sachertorte can also be ordered online – $29 Euros for 1 kg excluding shipping.)Sacher Hotel, Betriebsgesellschaft mbH, Philharmonikerstraße 4, A-1010 Wien, Vienna Austria
Opening Hours: 9:30 am to 6:00 pm (Mon – Fri), 9:30 am to 5:00 pm (Sat)Other Related Entries
Figlmüller Schnitzel (Vienna)
2011-09-26 00:00:00
Cine Café – The Cinema Café by Les Amis
Movie goers of Shaw Lido would have noticed a huge change not only in their cinemas, but F&B outlets. Gone are the fast food outlets like McDonalds, KFC, Long John Silvers and local chain Glory, but replaced by classier looking Canelé, Cine Café and Cine Bar.All are opened by Les Amis. To some, it could mean being able to try that brand for a lower price. To others, it may mean no more cheap food if you need a bite before the movies.Cine Café is a cosy semi-self serve cafe with an Asian and Western menu, said to boost great food at ‘economical’ prices.  ‘Economical’ is subjective.Food is grouped under 4 sections of lightbites, forks & knives, chopsticks and thirst quenchers. The forks & knives should appeal to most, with Western delights such as Bangers & Mash ($13.00), Terikayi Chicken Burger ($12.00) and Seafood Marinara ($14.50) that seems to go well with movie-watching.The more surprising fact is the range of Asian items such as Ayam Panggang ($12.50), Bah Kut Teh ($10.50), Grilled Unagi Don ($17.00) and XO Sauce Lo Shi Fun ($12.50).The Ayam Panggang came looking more like western-style chicken chop than Sulawesi grilled coconut chicken. Nevertheless, the fusion dish with delicious sayor lodeh (vegetable in coconut milk curry) and sunny side up made a rather satisfying meal.The Thai Red Curry Chicken ($12.50) looked neither fiery nor spicy, but the gravy was still appetizing and went very well with the fragrant jasmine rice. If you are not looking for authenticity, this would still work.On a weekday evening, the Cine Café was well-presented on the outside, though sad looking within with some old movie posters as décor and no music. I do not know about you, but I like fries, pizzas and milkshakes before a blockbuster. And I miss my Glory curry puff.Cine Café, 350 Orchard Road, #05-21 Shaw House, Tel: +65 6735 8858
Opening Hours: 10am – 11pmOther Related Entries
Artease Café (Cineleisure)
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Talent Café (Tanjong Pagar)
Blackbird Café (Handy Road)
Crazy World Café (Chinatown)
2011-09-21 00:00:00
From “Ah Pui” to Choreographing the Great Singapore Workout
If you have taken an MRT train, or waited at some MRT station, you should have seen the video of The New Great Singapore Workout. You may have found the person leading the workout kind of familiar. Haha.Most people would know me as the Radio1003 DJ hosting the food programme, or the food reviewer who really eats a lot. So I am probably the last person you would think about leading, let alone choreograph and plan an entire new workout.How did it come about?Long story. Let’s just say that I started to get more involved in fitness because I (the “Ah Pui”) was constantly facing a weight problem. Being a food reviewer does not help at all. I started doing a variety of exercise classes, and somehow landed up to be an instructor for the last 6 years.It was indeed a great opportunity to be given the chance by HPB to choreograph a new Great Singapore Workout. There were several other fitness companies who pitched for the deal, and thank you to them for believing in me. I wanted to make it a fun full-body workout for all ages, with moves that are very “Singaporean”. The workout may not please everybody, but I am glad people who actually tried the full workout do enjoy it and felt they really burned.Filming was tough work over two days but really fun as well. I was glad that HPB found contestants from Lose to Win to be part of the filming project, and not just some perfect-bodied trainers or slim dancers like what you would expect in a fitness DVD. It really meant that everybody can enjoy exercising and being healthy. And they could really move!I do not have the perfect body. I am not the fitness freak. In fact, I am this ordinary Singapore boy who really enjoys his char kway tiao and carrot cake – and exercises hard for a balanced lifestyle. Come to think of it – I am rather “Lose to Win” too.Yes, who would have though a food reviewer would be the one choreographing a workout for the country?  In a way, I feel that I have helped continue my father’s goal of being healthy and more importantly helping others to be healthy at the same time. I hope I have done him proud. So never underestimate “Ah Pui”! =)
2011-09-20 00:00:00
Gurney Drive Restaurant – Penang Food Haven from George Town
My first family holiday was at Penang, when I was 12, fresh out of PSLE, intrigued by this little town very different from Singapore. And there was Gurney Drive, a food street famous for its roadside food stalls serving hawker food. The fried koay tiao, laksa and prawn noodles then were very different from what I was familiar with.  But I fondly remembered those tastes.Two decades later, a “Penang Kia” has brought over these memories from George Town to Suntec City, with the Heaf Chef Wong Thin Lipp and a team also coming from Penang.So if you have a craving of lok bak, rojak, fried koay teow, hokkien prawn noodles and assam laksa, the fountain terrace can be where you want to head to. The ID and ambience could remind you of Old Town White Coffee, where they also serve breakfast and toast sets.Of the many dishes I tried, I would recommend the Penang Rojak ($3.90) with a strong distinct flavour of ‘hae koh’ (fermented shrimp paste) that is a very much thicker and darker version. Along with crunchy you tiao and fruits and roots such as green mango, guava, pineapple and turnip, this makes a delicious starter to the meal ahead. Of course the dough stick is wiped out first.I like my prawn mee stock to be thick, tasty, flavoursome and therefore this Penang Hokkien Prawn Noodles ($5.90) hits the right notes with me.  The bowl had a mixture of bee hoon and yellow noodles, tender pieces of pork rib, huge prawns and generous serving of prawn head broth which I finished till the last drop.The Penang Cendol is a must-have at $2.50, made up of shaved ice with generous drizzling of brown sugar syrup, rich coconut milk, green cendol jelly and red kidney beans.  While I am constantly reminded of the calories pounded, this very lemak dessert is a good-to-share with friends.This is really one place to satisfy your Penang cravings at so affordable prices. Did I mention I am already the mayor of this restaurant on FourSquares?Gurney Drive Restaurant, 3 Temasek Boulevard, #B1-058 Fountain Terrace, Suntec City Mall, Tel: +65 6336 8847  (Also available at Ang Mo Kio Jubilee Entertainment Centre)
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Jason’s Penang Cuisine (ABC Market)
Penang Road Cafe (Novena)
Chinta Manis (MyVillage)
Daisy’s Dream Kitchen (Tiong Bahru)
OldTown White Coffee (Bt Timah)
2011-09-16 00:00:00
The Gallerie Opens At Marina Square
Shoppers and food lovers at Marina Square have one new reason to cheer – A new food establishment, The Gallerie, has just opened. This 889-seater food space has a selection of 29 stalls and kiosks in an open dining concept. What is different is that it also integrates restaurants within a food court, offering a wider range of mouth-watering cuisines.Operated under Koufu, The Gallerie has a modern contemporary setting that makes it more upmarket and comfortable than the usual food court. A major plus point is that it has a panoramic view of the Marina Bay district and waterfront, offering a beautiful view of the skyline while you dine.Other than the usual local delights, there are a few stalls that would make us stop in our tracks such Hakka claypot rice, thunder tea rice, Indonesian BBQ, Japanese cuisine, soup empire, yoghurt place and my favourite Wee Nam Kee chicken rice.Full Post at InSing.com – New foodie Gallerie comes to Marina SquareThe Gallerie, 6 Raffles Boulevard
#04-101/102 Marina Square S039594, Tel: 63362958
Opening Hours: 11am – 9pm dailyOther Related Entries
Singapore Food Trail (Flyer)
Medz (Orchard Central)
Kopi Tiam (Swissotel The Stamford)
Plaza Brasserie (Beach Road)
Fisherman’s Market (The Central)
2011-09-14 00:00:00
Plaza Brasserie – I Sea Food Buffet
Plaza Brasserie has a certain place in memory for me as it was where my ex-colleagues treated me to a farewell lunch. This is also somewhere you may want to celebrate a family birthday, job promotion or special days like Christmas.Yes, this is one of the hotel buffets where you can indulge in a huge variety of food, with lots of space to saunter around. What I really like about this place is many dishes are prepared on the spot right in front of you at the live stations – ranging from a very intriguing durian prata (which is very worth the calories), delicious oyster omelette, signature laksa, chicken rice and sushi.For fans of seafood, the best news is there is a “Treasures of the Sea” buffet where you can feast on flower crabs, queen scallops, tiger prawns, oysters, mussels, and different kinds of fish. If you are a fish fan, then you will get all your money worth here.It is not too far-fetched to say I had a very fishy lunch, with Chef Jackson Goh preparing different fresh catch such as promfret, sea bass, milk fish and tilapias cooked in your choice style of Hong Kong, Teochew, Nonya, Thai Lime, with black bean sauce or sweet and sour.So from Mondays to Fridays, you can pick your favorite fish from their “Catch of the Day” section and the chefs will have it cooked in your preferred sauce and style. My favourite fish goes to the classic basic of Teochew-style steamed snapper with little seasoning, where you can really taste the freshness and goodness of the fish. Chef also shared that this was his personal choice, and he could have two of these fishes per day!The other few dishes I really enjoyed with the black mussels cooked in a thick spicy sauce similar to a chilli crab sauce, top shells cooked in zesty black pepper and the deep fried soft shell crab that you sink your teeth into.Dinners are at $45++ (Mondays to Thursdays) and $48++ (Fridays to Sundays). Get on a sea food diet – see food and eat it!Plaza Brasserie, 7500A Beach Road, Park Royal on Beach Road (Nearest MRT Bugis), Tel: +65 6505 5710
Opening Hours: 6am – 12am DailyOther Related Entries
Fisherman’s Market (The Central)
Carousel (Royal Plaza on Scotts)
Minoriya (Tanjong Katong)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
Galley By The Straits (Admiralty Road)
2011-09-13 00:00:00
The Tastings Room – Where Food Marries Wine
The new restaurant The Tastings Room at Marina Squares seek to make food and beverage pairing a painless experience with suggestions within the menu. Every food item listed has 3 or 4 recommended wines to go along, which also saves any embarrassment from ordering ‘wrongly’. The main concept behind such pairings is that the ‘marriage’ of food and wine will get both their flavours enhanced and make the entire dining experience more enjoyable.The Tastings Room recommended a lighter Shiraz or Riesling to go along with duck meat. Served with smooth potato mash, grilled pear and tangy orange sauce, the confit of french duck leg ($22.90) is so tender and soft that the meat comes off the bones very easily.Full Post at InSing.com – Wine Pairing Made EasyThe Tastings Room
6 Raffles Boulevard, #01-08 Marina Square (Facing 1 Raffles Link), Tel: +65 6338 1829
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 10am – 10pm; Fri–Sat: 10am – 12amOther Related Entries
Infusion (Dempsey)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
TongKang Colonial Bar & Restaurant (Clarke Quay)
Sunset Grill and Pub (Seletar Airbase)
Singapore Sling Boutique (Clarke Quay)
2011-09-12 00:00:00
TongKang Colonial Bar & Restaurant – Colonial Classics on a Bumboat
You may have eaten on a cruise, ship, or ferry, but how about on a tongkang? Imagine the excitement when we found this last surviving pair of tongkangs berthed on the banks of the Singapore River serving food and drinks.To retain this part of history, the last two tongkangs left in Singapore has been restored to its form glory with refurbishing costing over a million. What is now present is The TongKang Colonial Bar & Restaurant – one tongkang housing a gin bar, the other serving exquisite colonial cuisine.The food served is influenced by traditional cultures of our forefathers, with cuisines of that suggest a blend of old English and Indian flavours. The old English lamb and kidney pie ($18) was very satisfying. Beneath its crumbly pastry crust is tender kidney evenly stewed in an addictive sauce that would go very well with the crust.Full Post at InSing.com – Colonial Classics on a TongKangTongKang Colonial Bar & Restaurant
3D River Valley Road, #01-06 Clarke Quay (Opposite Hot Stones)
Tel: +65 6333 4986
Opening Hours Daily: 12pm–2.30pm, 6pm–1amOther Related Entries
Kopi Tiam (Swissotel The Stamford)
Singapore Sling Boutique (Clarke Quay)
Yantra (Tanglin Mall)
Song of India (Scotts Road)
The Ship Restaurant & Bar (Shaw Centre)
2011-09-08 00:00:00
Wok & Barrel – Madam Tan’s Nasi Lemak is Simply Sedap
One of my greatest worry about food is that the local traditional tastes will be all lost by the next generation.  When I tried Madam Tan’s Nasi Lemak and Curry Chicken, there was sudden warmth in my heart – I know I have found that taste back.Madam Tan is the owner cum chef of Wok and Barrel, a new restaurant at Duxton Hill which serves many home-styled dishes with a modern twist. Those local favourites, along with some refreshing beer and lager, complete the Wok & Barrel picture.I was a keen follower of Madam Tan’s tweets. And looking at her avatar, you would have imaged that she is some Peranakan nonya well-trained by her mother-in-law in rempah and sauces. Instead, this is a former director of Forbes who spots a short crop and wears a loose black tee, slightly embarrassed by her Chinese name “Xian Hui”.The self-taught chef whips up dishes which will make any mother proud. Forget Changi and Boon Lay – Madam Tan offers one of the best Nasi Lemak ($1.90) around. The fragrant rice is painstakingly cooked by twice steaming over a three-hour period, ensuring a fluffy texture and a lemak taste which is not too heavy.  This is complimented with its unique brands of both home-made sambal belachan and sweet nasi lemak chilli. That is two chills for the price of one.The rice should go well with either chicken curry or crispy chicken. The chicken curry ($8.90) is created by a special recipe, richly lemak and on the drier side which she confessed that not a single drop of water was added.The crispy chicken ($7.90) is my favourite dish with boneless chicken thighs marinated for a day. Crispy breaded and deep fried on the outside, the tender meat was slightly sweet and highly addictive.Other popular local-meets-west finds include a Bak Chor Mee Pasta ($19.90) which is 5-spice roast pork with homemade tagliatelle, and Rendang Pizza ($11.90) where fork tender beef is topped on light homemade pizza crust. Simply sedap!Wok & Barrel, 13 Duxton Hill, Tel: +65 6220 0595
Opening Hours: Tue–Sat: 12pm – 9.30pm, Sun: 12pm – 3pm (Closed on Mon)Other Related Entries
瓦 Wǎ  (Cineleisure)
Loy Kee Chicken Rice (Balestier)
Beach Road Scissor Cut Curry Rice (Jalan Besar)
Once Upon A Thyme (Golden Mile) 
Mien (Bukit Timah)
2011-09-07 00:00:00
I Made Xiao Long Bao at Din Tai Fung 鼎泰丰
As a foodie, one of the most amazing experiences for me for the SayTaiwan International Youth Week would be to make Xiao Long Bao at Din Tai Fung 鼎泰丰. The popularity of Din Tai Fung is startling, with long queues at every branch in Singapore (and other countries), especially when it was ranked as one of the world’s top 10 restaurants by The New York Times, and more recently awarded one Michelin star at the Hong Kong branch.Being a huge fan of these tiny steamed dumplings, Din Tai Fung at Taiwan is THE place to learn how to make them. (Read: Guide To Eating Xiao Long Bao The Right Way )Even before entering the kitchen at Taipei 101, there was huge emphasis on hygiene: Wash your hands, sanitise your hands, put on your headgear, put on the mask, wash and sanitise your hands again. Big reminder.The Kneading
This looked like a simple task – but of course since I did make kueh kueh at home. Nope. I had to knead the dough really fast, really thin, and really flat. The students were given a round mould as a reference so that each skin would be more or less the same circular shape.  All we had was a small stick and the bottom part of our palm.Making them flat and unbroken is one thing. Making them flat, unbroken, and round is another. Chef demonstrated and he could make about 20 plus in a minute – that’s one skin per 3 seconds. I took one entire minute to make that one piece.The Pleating
You know the Din Tai Fung secret – 18 folds.  The other ‘secret’ I learnt was to pleat it really fast and pull the dough as though you know they won’t break. After I became less careful and got into the rhythm, I thought I made a few decent dumplings. Yes, with 18 folds.While I may not have learnt enough to start my own shop, I probably gained a deeper appreciation of the Xiao Long Bao. When the staff was serving the dumplings we made, they were friendly to ensure that our seasoning consisted of the recommended vinegar to soya ratio of 3:1. I never knew that all the years I ate here.From a mere cooking oil shop to a global chain of restaurant, where Din Tai Fung proved its excellence is in its consistency – from its food production, food appreciation techniques to customer service.Other Related Entries
Shanghai Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Noodle Star (Bugis Village)
2011-08-29 00:00:00
Wong Solo – Indonesia’s famous Ayam Bakar has made its way here
Fans of Indonesia’s popular Wong Solo will be thrilled to know that its franchise has found its way here, located at Far East Plaza. Wong Solo has more than 90 stores in Indonesia and 5 in Malaysia. The difference is the brand has a colourful orange-green setting, cutesy chicken logo and fast-food format for the Singapore branch, attempting to appeal to students and young executives.Many Indonesian eateries are known for their ayam penyet, while Wong Solo is instead established for its ayam bakar. The grilled chicken ($6.90) is well-marinated with special blended Indonesian spices, making the meat sweet and rich-tasting. Served with fried batter bits, black sauce-manis, spicy chili and rice, I am glad that the skin is just slightly charred (spare me from cancer) with the inside remaining soft and moist.Full Post at InSing.com – Wong Solo’s famous ayam bakar is here!Wong Solo, 14 Scotts Road, #01-26/27 Far East Plaza, Tel: +65 6235 0523
Opening Hours: 11am – 9.30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Ayam Penyet Ria (Lucky Plaza)
Waroeng Penyet (Marine Parade)
Nando’s (Bugis Junction)
Barcelos (Novena) 
ChicKing (Marina Square)
2011-08-26 00:00:00
Homebaked Dough – The “Hunky Brothers” Ramen
This stall at a small corner of Tanjong Pagar Plaza Teck Kee coffeeshop always attract a queue during weekday lunch, with a long line of office ladies fighting sweat and time for a bowl of Japanese ramen. And I found out it was not just the noodles that were delicious.I went for this review with two other girl friends who took time off to ogle at the good-looking and hunky owners. Wearing tight-fitting black tees and short berms, the pair of closely-knitted brothers Weili and Weisheng are indeed eye-candies if you compare them to the average hawker.But the star of the stall is clearly the ramen. The ramen with soup cost a very affordable $5.50 and the minced pork dry version $3 – screaming value-for-money. The Kyushu-styled noodles are thin and chewy, drenched in thick and tasty pork bone stock simmered for hours. This is close to restaurant quality, so much so that the thinly sliced char-siew will simply melt in your mouth.Full Post at InSing.com – The “hunky brothers” ramenHomebaked Dough, Blk 1 Tanjong Pagar Plaza, #02-04/05 Teck Kee Coffeeshop
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri 11.30am – 3pm (Closed on Sat–Sun)Other Related Entries
Ramen Santouka (Central)
Marutama Ra-Men (Liang Court)
Daikokuya (Orchard Paragon)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
Keisuke Ramen (Millenia Walk)
2011-08-22 00:00:00
Blackbird Café – Chill Out with Sunday Brunch and New Zealander Coffee
Sunday brunch has become a wondrous and relaxing affair, thanks to the opening of Blackbird Café. Located at Handy Road next to The Cathay, having a meal here is all about life – where you can unwind and be free as a bird.One of the highlights is the Sunday brunch available from 10am to 3pm, serving omelettes, fruit platters and sandwiches. You should try the eggs benny ($12.00) which is poached eggs on English muffins with ham, topped with hollandaise sauce and served with mixed greens.  This is one of the best egg benedict I have tried at a café, sumptuous with lavish egg york flowing over the soft muffins.The name ‘Blackbird’ may give you a clue that the owner is a New-Zealander. Even the coffee is from the popular New Zealand brand Havana, where the beans are hot-air roasted resulting in a superior coffee taste with purer and sweeter flavours.Full Post at InSing.com – New Zealand style brunch beckonsBlackbird Café, 6 Handy Road, #01-01A The Luxe
Opening Hours: Mon–Thu: 11am – 10pm; Fri–Sat & PH Eve: 11am – 12am; Sun: 10am – 10pm; Sun Brunch: 10am – 3pmOther Related Entries
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Egg3 Café (Mountbatten)
Joe & Dough (Suntec)
Talent Café (Tanjong Pagar)
2011-08-17 00:00:00
Do You Know Where Aiyu 愛玉 Comes From?
Do not leave Taiwan without trying its famed Aiyu Jelly 愛玉冰, which can also mean ‘Loving Jade’. It is sold at most bubble tea shops, night markets, sometimes together with sago which are usually now as “Frogs laying eggs” 青蛙下蛋 in Taiwan.If you go to Alishan, there are no less than 3 shops selling this drink-dessert, indicating it’s popularity at this original site. Also it is supposedly to taste better here due to Alishan’s high altitude.I had a cooling cup on this hot summer, with soft yellowish jelly in a cup, drizzled with lemon juice and ice shavings flavoured with black sugar. The combination of ingredients made every spoonful sour, sweet and smooth at the same time. This was my antidote for a 35 degree weather, very mouthful being very refreshing and uplifting. Do you know where Aiyu comes from?The jelly is made from a gel from the seeds of a variety of fig, which is greenish and looks somewhat like a smaller version of passionfruit. Word has that a businessman discovered the fruit at Alishan while drinking yellowish yet sweet water in the river, and eventually named the jelly after his favourite daughter Aiyu.The process of extraction is sometimes known as “washing aiyu” where the seeds are squeezed and massaged – producing this soft gelatin-like texture.Taiwanese seems to have the habit of having ‘food’ in their drinks. If you need something thirst-quenching yet delicious at the same time, get on lovin’ some jade.Other Related Entries
Dong Qu Fen Yuan (Taiwan)
Big Sausage Wrap Small Sausage (Taiwan)
Pork Pepper Buns (Taiwan)
Hao Da Chicken Culet (Taiwan)
Coffin Bread (Taiwan)
2011-08-17 00:00:00
Taiwan Street Delights – Have You Ever Eaten a Coffin?
This may sound really strange – but have you eaten a coffin? If you are thinking about the other version that is used to bury people, let me clarify. I am talking about Taiwan’s Coffin Bread 棺材板,  a popular street snack similar to bread bowl soups.Knowing how superstitious the Chinese are, naming a food after a death item may not be the most auspicious thing. The reason why it is called “Guan Cai” is because it also means “Sheng Guan Fa Cai” 升官发财 – Getting a promotion and being rich.The Coffin Bread is one of the signature dishes from Tainan, created by 許六一. It is modified after the Western bread which the American sailors brought over during their marine travels in olden days Taiwan.The snack is usually shaped like a square block, with the centre portion of the deep-fried thick toast removed. The impression will be filled with plentiful of ingredients such as chicken meat, vegetables and pigs’ intestines, cooked with corn, mushroom or curry sauce.I had a rectangular version at Lao Jie 老街 AnPing Tainan. Now this version looks more like an actual coffin with its new shape. Costing only 20NT, the creator said this modification it makes a more convenient snack to eat at a night market. She also replaced with intestines with vegetables to cater to a health-conscious youth population.With a crisp golden brown older layer, fluffy bread and sweet creamy sauce, the Coffin Bread a rather satisfying snack. Hopefully I will get a promotion and become prosperous after this.Other Related Entries
Big Sausage Wrap Small Sausage (Taiwan)
Pork Pepper Buns (Taiwan)
Hao Da Chicken Culet (Taiwan)
Deng Long Lu Wei (Taiwan)
Dong Qu Fen Yuan (Taiwan)
2011-08-15 00:00:00
Taiwan Street Delights – Big Sausage Wrap Small Sausage 大腸包小腸
Ask any Singaporean about Taiwan’s night market, and most will say Shilin. The lesser known Feng Jia Night Market 逢甲夜市 located in the Xitun district in Taichung is claimed to be the largest night market in Taiwan.Right next to the Feng Chia University, 3 stalls attract long queues of patrons, more than all the rest. And they are all selling the same thing – Da Chang Bao Xiao Chang 大腸包小腸, otherwise known as ‘Big sausage wrap small sauage’. Some would have thought it was big intestines wrapping the small intestines.The snack looks almost like the familiar hotdog bun, except that the Chinese sausage within glutinous rice. Wait, carb-loaded glutinous rice plus oily sausage seems to be an instant ticket to calorie-hell. But it is all worth it.Costing about 40NT, the Da Chang Bao Xiao Chang 大腸包小腸 is barbequed on the spot, topped up with lettuce, salted vegetables, and lots and lots of garlic which add to the whole zesty taste.  Most allow you to choose flavours from original to spicy, black pepper and wasibi, and I would suggest taking the original for the most basic taste without the chili overpowering.Isabel from Denmark said it was so-so-so-so good, trying to fill the entire thing into her mouth instantly.Eat it while it is hot, and the sticky rice along with the sausage warms your palate in no time while you much down a filling oily tasty snack.台中市逢甲路20巷口：逢甲夜市 (Near Feng Jia University)
Opening Hours: 4:30pm to 1:00amOther Related Entries 
Ah Zong Mian Xian (Taiwan) 
Pork Pepper Buns (Taiwan)
Hao Da Chicken Culet (Taiwan)
Deng Long Lu Wei (Taiwan)
Ice Monster (Taiwan)
2011-08-14 00:00:00
Once Upon A Thyme – Restaurant Quality Pasta at a Hawker Centre
This is like a fairy tale come true – I never thought I could find such delectable pasta at a hawker stall. Once Upon A Thyme may be new at Golden Mile, but it has gathered very positive feedback for its quality pasta. That is because Chef cum owner JoJo is a Filipino who honed his cooking skills working at Swissotel and P.S. Café.For tomato-lovers, you must have the spicy tomato spaghetti with chicken meatballs and mushroom ($5.50). The spaghetti is fried in spicy tomato sauce which has a sharp-tangy aftertaste, though you have been warned on its spiciness. Also slowly savour the home-made juicy chicken meatballs, deep-fried first to retain the moisture on the inside.Full Post at InSing.com – Fine Italian fare at hawker pricesOnce Upon A Thyme, 505 Beach Road, #01-102 Golden Mile Food Centre
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri: 11am – 8pm; Sun: 11am – 6pm  (Closed on Sat)Other Related Entries
Mien (Bukit Timah)
Youmenya Goemon (Marina Bay Link)
Verve Pizzeria (One North)
15 Minutes (Lasalle)
Can You Name The Pastas
2011-08-08 00:00:00
Daisy’s Dream Kitchen – Peranakan Food by Dim Sum Dolly Mummy
(Note: Daisy’s Dream Kitchen has closed at Tiong Bahru and moved to 517 West Coast Road #01-571 S120517)Do not be surprised if you spot one third of the Dim Sum Dollies serving you buah keluak at Tiong Bahru Food Centre. The self-confessed ‘Little Nyonya’ Selena Tan is actually helping her mother Daisy out at Daisy’s Dream Kitchen, a new stall serving Peranakan delights. It has always been Daisy’s dream to make this traditional and heritage food affordable to the masses, and thus this hawker stall at the family’s favourite Tiong Bahru Food Centre.Customers can choose between the assam chicken set ($6.50) or buah keluak set ($7.50). Most nyonyas would cook assam with fish, but Daisy modified the dish because her children liked a version without bones and with tender chicken meat. The result? A mouth-watering marvelous dish of spicy sourness, so good that I wiped the bowl clean.My favourite side dish is the ngoh hiang ($3 for 6 pieces) which is fully packed with minced meat, water chestnut and onions. All the dishes served contain no MSG and radiate home-cooked goodness, as though they are prepared by your best friend’s mother.Full Post at InSing.com – Nonya treats at Daisy’s Dream KitchenDaisy’s Dream Kitchen
517 West Coast Road #01-571, Singapore 120517, Tel: +65 9113 4552
Opening Hours: Tues–Sun 11:00am – 3:00pm, 6:00pm – 10:00pm (Closed on Mon)Other Related Entries
Jason’s Penang Cuisine (ABC Market)
Chinta Manis (MyVillage)
IVINS Peranakan Restaurant (Jalan Leban Road)
Penang Road Cafe (Novena)
Where To Find Nonya Food?
2011-08-05 00:00:00
Song of India – Dining in a Historic Bungalow
The Song of India had been known as one of Singapore’s best restaurant, and almost seems unapproachable with its rather high end look. Situated in a prime location at the famed Scotts Road, located in a classic black and white heritage bungalow, its colonial charm suggest this is fine Indian cuisine at its priciest.Therefore, even my surprise when I saw it on Deals.com.sg, it almost feels like Gunther’s is on Groupon. And so I grabbed the deal, and paid $19.80 nett (instead of $33) for a 40% off ‘Menu on a Song’ 3-course lunch menu.The Song of India was not unexpectedly, though not surprisingly empty on a weekday afternoon. The interior was classically beautiful, with large framed drawings, big comfortable furniture, and golden curtains. It almost felt palace-like. This was a rather well-known restaurant helmed by Master Chef Milind Sovani named Best Asian Cuisine Chef in 2007, but yet seemed to have lost its former glory.We had a chef’s special soup of the day, topped up with soft succulent kebab and one choice of curries from the meat delicacies. There was also a fresh vegetable dish, simmered lentil and saffron pulao which was a small but pleasant portion of white rice sautéed in butter and simmered with saffron-infused water.Compared to most other curries which are light and tangy, the fish curry was a gravy-thick creamy-smooth version which I readily enjoyed. The best thing was really the unlimited hot breads and naans from the tandoor to relish the curries, wiped clean within minutes.The food may not be extremely memorable, but its attentive service and sophisticated setting within this historical building makes this dining a special experience.Song of India, 33 Scotts Road, Singapore, Tel: +65 6836 0055
Opening Hours: 12pm – 3pm, 6pm – 11pmOther Related Entries
Yantra (Tanglin Mall)
Song of India (Scotts Road)
Feast @ East (East Coast)
Tiffin Room (Raffles Hotel)
Gajalee (Cuppage Terrace)
2011-08-03 00:00:00
AKB48 Café – World’s first AKB48 Concept Café Opens in Singapore
J-pop lovers and AKB48 fans will be ecstatic to know that the world’s first AKB48 concept café has just launched at *SCAPE. For those unfamiliar with J-pop culture, AKB48 is the world’s largest pop group with more than 70 members, also Japan’s top idol girl group sensation. Since the group originated at Akihabara, the café is designed with a theatre-style exterior and mini-stage within, similar to the performance space at Akihabara.The food servings are mainly modern fusion cuisine and desserts. The present set lunch includes main courses such as Japone pasta ($14.90) and omu curry rice ($15.90) which come with a choice of salad or soup. I love the omu rice with beef curry because the omelette wrap is very runny, unless many other versions which are dry and stale-looking. After pouring the Japanese curry gravy over the rice, the spicy-sweet-salty combination will make you go ‘oishii’.AKB48 Café *SCAPE Level 3 2 Orchard Link #03-02 Singapore 237978
Opening Hours: 11.30am to 9.30pm DailyFull Post at InSing.com – World’s first AKB48 café opens in SingaporeOther Related Entries
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
Let’s Sweet (Bugis)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
Box n Sticks (Arab Street)
2011-08-02 00:00:00
Talent Café – 1 Café, 2 Storeys, 7 Coloured Rooms
This 2-storey café at the end of Tras Street near Tanjong Pagar is a space we can describe as ‘artistic’. It has seven distinct areas of different colours and environment – all stylistic and beautifully done-up. You may ask why the name “Talent Café”. Owner cum chef Christopher A. revealed that this is actually a talent agency as well. Therefore, if you are an actor, performer, or model, you can take part in their occasional talent search held in their café!The food served includes Italian pasta, burgers, sandwiches, salads, desserts and ‘soul food’ which changes seasonally. You must try the apple glynn ($6.90), the house special dessert of caramelised apple slices half-submerged in a buttery cream sauce. Next, you should explore all the rooms of the various colours and perhaps have fun taking photos.Talent Café, 34 & 36 Tras Street, Singapore 079026 (5 min walk from Tanjong Pagar MRT)
Opening Hours: Mon-Thurs, Sat 11:00am-11:00pm; Fri: 11:00am – 11:30pmFull Post at InSing.com – Talent Cafe – 1 Cafe, 2 Storeys, 7 RoomsOther Related Entries
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Egg3 Café (Mountbatten)
Qafé (Tanjong Pagar)
Pitstop Café (Circular Road)
2011-07-27 00:00:00
Minoriya – No kidding. Japanese Ala-Carte Buffet at $17 Nett
Minoriya means Harvest House, and this will probably give you an indication of the variety of food items in this Japanese ala-carte buffet restaurant. There is a total of 98 choices, ranging from sashimi, sushi, temaki, makimono, ippinmono (appetizer), itamemono (pan-fried), agemono (deep-fried), yakimono (grilled), gohan, noodles and soups.The best thing about this restaurant is that dishes are served ala-carte – cooked only when ordered, and not even microwaved. Every dish comes in a relatively small portion, ensuring little wastage, and you will have stomach room for more. How pleasant it is for the food, especially tempura to come freshly fried, without having to jostle with others.The sashimi was freshly cut in a variety of styles, becoming an aesthetically elegant piece with red coloured fish alternating with white with radish strips on side. Owner Stanley Tan revealed that almost everyone would order the sashimi, and there is no limit to how much you can order. He added that some customers could just order 60 pieces sashimi at one go! My recommendation would be to savour a few fresh pieces, and leave space for other worthy items as well.One of my favourite dish was the gyu yakinu, beef pan-fried with special sauce. The result was tender juicy meat which trickled down the taste buds, though it was slightly on the salty and sweet side.
The shake wafu teppan salmon also stood out among the rest for its special teriyaki-like sauce paired with a touch of runny egg white.There were some hits and misses for the yakimono. Among which, the tsukune tare chicken meat ball – simply delicious, shiitake shio – evenly grilled, saba shioyaki – slightly dry and oily, chicken wing – nicely fried and not overly-oily, and pork belly – average.For the most important part, the price. The buffet is $29++ for lunch (both weekday and weekend) and $33++ for dinner. The best news is StreetDeal.sg is offering this all-you-can-eat buffet lunch at only $17 nett, which is 57% the usual price. This is almost an unbelievable deal, and really makes it one of the most value-for-money buffets you can find.Minoriya, 309-311 Tanjong Katong Road, Singapore, Tel: +65 6346 6686
Opening Hours: 11.30am–2.30pm, 6pm–10.30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Fisherman’s Market (The Central)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
Let’s Sweet (Bugis Junction)
Carousel (Royal Plaza on Scotts)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
2011-07-26 00:00:00
Imperial Treasure Steamboat Restaurant – 12 Sauces and 10 Soups to Choose From
Imperial Treasure has always been satisfaction-guarantee with its chain of restaurants. It is also offering exciting choices with Imperial Treasure Bakery, Steamboat Restaurant as well as Windows of Hong Kong at TripleOne Somerset Orchard.Imperial Treasure Steamboat Restaurant specialises in serving Chinese steamboat, offering both ala carte and set menus. This is quite a classy steamboat restaurant compared to those you have seen at Bugis, and do expect to pay a premium for it.The soup base alone will cost $12 per portion. The good news is there is really a wide range you can choose from. Other than the usual Sichuan spicy and healthy chicken soup, the other specialties include satay flavour, seaweeds & kelp, century egg & parsley, drunken chicken with ginseng soups. We made a wrong choice of picking chicken soup and traditional pork’s bone because they both look whitish and taste similarly bland. Perhaps we are too used to the steamboat soups which are heavier and more flavourful.The meat items such as the USA sliced kurobuta ($10), fresh pork shoulder ($6.00), pig’s kidney ($10), fresh chicken ($5), small intestines ($6) are not cheap as well. The balls are about $8-9, and vegetables $3-5 per plate.I must say the hand-made balls are rather delicate and tasty, especially the prawn and pork balls. These balls beat those machine-made ones anytime.The highlight of the entire meat has to be its condiments and sauces, ranging from peanut sauce, green and red chills, spring onions, plum sauce, chopped garlic, sambal chili and chicken rice chili … All 12 of them. It redeems every mouthful of flat soup and boring meats. It may not be far-fetched to say the condiments saved the entire meal. Now who says sauces are not important?Imperial Treasure Steamboat Restaurant, 111 Somerset Road, #02-21 TripleOne Somerset, Singapore, Tel: +65 6732 8231
Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 11.30am–3pm, 6.30pm–11pm; Sun: 11am–3pm, 6pm–11pmOther Related Entries
Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong (TripleOne)
Fortune Cuisine (Sunset Way)
Chong Qing Hot Pot (Suntec)
Sho Teppan (Ion Orchard)
Zhou Kitchen (Far East Square)
2011-07-25 00:00:00
Yantra – This Classy Restaurant Defines North Indian Cuisines
Ask any average Singaporeans about types of North Indian cuisine, and you may get the three standard replies of “Naan, Briyani and Chicken Tandoori”. I am true to admit that I am not very familiar myself, only because I have not tried something that would change my mind.Yantra has to be one of the finest restaurants locally offering authentic North Indian cuisine – with a rich and elegant setting that enhances the dining experience. The space is huge, enough for events and gatherings, yet comfortable enough to feel the privacy and classiness of the surroundings.Under the realms of the new Executive Chef Chintan Pandya (seen in CNA’s The Perfect Meal Asia), Yantra has launched a new extensive menu set to gratify your palates.What will probably excite you is the number of kebabs offered, extending to several pages of a mouth-watering pictorial menu.  The Macchi Tukda Haiyali ($33) though looking a little unattractive in a green seasoning of mint, coriander and curry leaves, is enjoyably fresh with melt-in-your-mouth fish.Almost every table was ordering a Raan-e-Yantra ($39) – tender baby leg of lamb embraced in an earthy marinade of yougurt and special seasoning. Before it is placed on the table, it is set on fire with fennel flavoured rum, thereafter giving the meat a slight-charred crisp layer.My favourite dish was the Jhinga Goa Curry ($35) which contained fresh prawns gently cooked in a coconut curry, tempered with mustard seeds and curry leaves. The gravy was thick, tasty and not overly spicy, and what won the game were the succulent prawns which worked as a perfect blend with the curry.And I must mention that the chicken biryani rice, made with specially imported basmati grains, is the best I have ever tasted in my life. My heart was crying out with a sense of satisfaction.After a heavy meal, ‘wash’ your food down at the Soma Bar next door with the signature Watermelon Rose Martini which will end the meal off in a delightful and pleasurable way.Yantra, 163 Tanglin Road, #01-28/33 Tanglin Mall, Singapore, Tel: +65 6836 3088
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 12pm–3pm, 6.30pm–10pm; Fri–Sat: 12pm–3pm, 6.30pm–11pmOther Related Entries
Song of India (Scotts Road)
Feast @ East (East Coast)
Tiffin Room (Raffles Hotel)
Gajalee (Cuppage Terrace)
2011-07-21 00:00:00
Saizeriya Ristorante – Cheap Cheap Cheap Italian–Japanese Food
You may think it is unlikely to find cheap Italian–Japanese food in Singapore, but it is actually possible.  Saizeriya サイゼリヤ is a type of Japanese chain of Italian family-style restaurants (also known as famiresu) which make up the middle range of eateries that fill the gap between gourmet restaurants and fast food joints. This works best for young students wanting a budget meal near Clarke Quay.Here is an indication of how inexpensive the food is: Spicy chicken drumlets ($4.40 for 5 pieces), black pepper smoked duck ($4.40), seafood chowder ($2.80), forcaccia ($1.80), double cheese pizza ($5.20) and gratin ($6.80). We are talking about a restaurant here. Though nobody seems to go to Liang Court anymore (really a waste), let’s not forget it is occupied with some pretty decent Japanese restaurants.You can start your meal with a minestrone soup ($2.80), well-marinated chicken wings ($2.80 for 3 pieces) and their signature oven-baked spicy sausages with grilled potato ($5.20). The good is they are actually quite eatable, and the bad is the food do look cold and miserable on their tawdry plastic plates.The must-order and most-value-item should be the pork and hamburger steak ($7.80) served on a hot-plate. Complemented with demi-glance sauce, it also includes wedges, mixed vegetables and fried egg. Very worth it.The best seller (“Ren Qi” No.1) item is the doria with meat sauce ($4.250) , which is creamy white  baked rice topped with a special recipe of meat sauce. I would not say that the food is exceptionally good, but what you pay for is what you get. My bill was less than $20 for two, and you can order free-flow drinks for $2.50. Cheap, cheap, cheap!As to why Saizeriya is so economical: the current president of the company Yasuhiko Shōgaki, wanted to sell Italian cuisine in Japan but did not get many customers. After he cut prices by 70%, the restaurant gained instant popularity and prices remained low ever since.Saizeriya Ristorante E Caffe, 177 River Valley Road, #02-22 Liang Court Shopping Centre, Singapore, Tel: +65 6337 9001
Opening Hours: 10am  – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Pepper Lunch (Shaw House)
Itacho Sushi (Plaza Singapura)
Sushi Express (City Link Mall)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
2011-07-19 00:00:00
Stacked Dim Sum Bar – Savouring Dim Sum at Night
Stacked Dim Sum Bar is a new dining haunt opened from mid-day till late. The dim sum are all stacked up in unique square baskets instead of the usual round ones, which gives the bar its name. Their signature dumplings will make you stop for a second look – from the fusion shredded dumplings, scallop pesto dumplings to the fascinating margherita dumpling (all at $8.90 for 5 in a basket).I had a stacked collection ($29.90) which included some traditional fare and fusion snacks. The thai beef basil dumpling was a refreshing twist, lightly deep fried and complemented well with the special sweet dip. Gimmicky it may be, but you now know where to go if you have both dim sum and beer cravings at the same time at night.Stacked Dim Sum Bar, 60 Robertson Quay, #01-13 The Quayside Tel: +65 9677 8281
Opening Hours: Mon–Thu: 3.30pm – 11.30pm; Fri: 3.30pm – 1am ; Sat: 1pm – 1am; Sun: 1pm – 11.30pmFull Post at InSing.com – Dim sum and cocktails for supper, anyone?Other Related Entries
Royal China (Raffles Hotel)
Yan Ting (St Regis)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
TAB (Orchard)
Singapore Sling Boutique (Clarke Quay)
2011-07-18 00:00:00
Tip Top The Puff Factory – Now Available In Town
This curry puff needs little introduction. Although it has been only been sold at an Ang Mo Kio coffeeshop opposite S11 for years, any self-respecting curry puff fan will know of Tip Top’s taste and status.Tip Top has waited for 32 years before moving into town at Plaza Singapura, looking set to be the next A1 or even Old Chang Kee.The curry puffs are known for a number of reasons: For its crunchy fragrant crust, the unique spicy fillings, huge chicken chunks and of course the ‘tax-invading’ stall which has ironically earned it more popularity and profits.You may wonder how much profit the humble curry puffs help make. The truth is the boss did under-declare his profits amounting to $1.05 million, and that was 2006 we are talking about when puffs still cost below a dollar.This modest puff now cost $1.30 at Plaza Singapura, and continues to be made from a well-guarded recipe of 18 herbs and spices, based on a well-kept Indonesian recipe.T’ea, daughter of the founder Mr Looi, switched her job from wedding planner to help expand her father’s business. She has big plans in mind – to open up at least 2 more shops by the end of the year, and to increase the variety of items sold. And the puffs still remain hand-made behind the counter, measured precisely (at 105-106gm per piece), and are freshly-deep fried.I would say that the snack still taste more or less from what I remembered. It remains addictive and I had two at a go. But somehow being more modern also stole some of the old-fashioned charm and scent of the curry puffs.Tip Top The Puff Factory, 68 Orchard Road Plaza Singapura #B2-02 S238839
Opening Hour: 10:00am – 22:00pm DailyOther Related Entries
Rolina Curry Puffs (Tanjong Pagar)
Tsukiji Gindaco (Ion Orchard)
I Love Taimei (Bugis)
Eat May Know (Bendemeer)
Macau Munch (Bugis)
2011-07-15 00:00:00
Fisherman’s Market – New Japanese Seafood Buffet Restaurant Comes To Singapore
To readers: Fisherman’s Market has ceased operations, and been replaced with another Japanese buffet restaurant Chiso ZanmaiBuffet-hungry Singaporeans will rejoice at the opening of this new seafood buffet restaurant at Clarke Quay Central. Fisherman’s Market is an “all you can eat” restaurant featuring a variety of seafood prepared in Japanese, Western and Chinese styles, with up to 90 different freshly prepared dishes available for selection.The choice of having a seafood restaurant next to the Singapore River is a perfect one – having seafood while overlooking the river nightlife, at the mall well known for its Japanese offerings.I was pleasantly surprised at its huge size and walking space. Fisherman’s Market has two levels sprawling a 300-seater upstairs and 60-seater bar downstairs. Therefore, no rushing, no squeezing and no queuing with crowds of buffet ‘enthusiasts’. Bliss.There is so much food you do not know where to start from. There is a myriad of the usual soups, pastas, pizza, sushi, sashimi to dim sum and desserts! My advice is, start with the cold salads and seafood where there are tasty offerings of jellyfish in sesame seed, pork stewed in shoyu, chicken with mustard dressing, and icy crabs.Every table will be presented with some ‘clips’ where you can use to make orders Teppanyaki and Tempura. I had salmon belly with mixed vegetables, evenly fried by a Japanese chef on the spot. I liked that it is not overly seasoned, retaining the natural flavours of the meat. For the tempura, go for the prawn and soft shell crab, deep fried with light batter.Strange observation, but I noticed many guys aiming at the fresh, juicy and large oysters, busying squeezing lemon juice in plates piled with shells. Other than the oysters being the most ‘value’ item, perhaps their high zinc content is another reason for their fast disappearance.A pleasant surprise is the availability of chilli crab and black pepper. While the sauce is almost authentically tasty, the crabs have unfortunately been put on diet.I hear varying comments from “The desserts such as Crème brûlée are to die for” to “This is a upmarket version of Sakura”. The price is $39.90++ for Mondays to Thursdays, and $49.90++ for weekends, considering slightly pricey compared to similar buffets. That is perhaps the cost to pay to feast on delicious seafood while enjoying the beautiful river scenery and ERP view.Fisherman’s Market, 6 Eu Tong St, #01-15 & #02-17 The Central, Singapore 059817
Opening Hours:  11am – 11pm (1st floor) 5pm – 11pm (2nd floor)Other Related Entries
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
Plaza Brasserie (Park Royal Hotel)
Chiso Zanmai (Clarke Quay Central)
Minoriya (Tanjong Katong)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
2011-07-14 00:00:00
Toby’s The Dessert Asylum – Are You Mad About Desserts?
Toby’s The Dessert Asylum is a prized find at Parkway Parade. Serving a wide variety of desserts, appetisers, pastas and pizzas, it is located right opposite the main entrance of the shopping mall. The ambience is casual and trendy with a chic purple colour scheme, reminding me of a local version of NYDC, Big O Café, and Café Cartel.The mouth-watering desserts come with fun names such as the Spike ‘D’ (durian mousse with dark chocolate fudge cake), Lord Vader (rum & raisin and chocolate mudpie with grand marnier), The Godfather (coffee and chocolate sponge with mascarpone) and Chimp-A-Duck (chempedak!).The house specials include Toby’s beef shepherd’s pie, spinach and mushroom pot pie, and german, bbq baby ribs and cheese bratwurst dawgs combi. It seems like many items here contain stewed pork, such as burgers, baked rice and pizzas. Very Filipino.The stewed pork in the baked penne ($12.95) was rather succulent and had a tasty tenderness in its meat. Though the overall combination with the pasta felt a little strange and at odds, and could work with the inside being wetter and moist.Oh, and the pizza was really, really fabulous – The all meat pizza ($15.95) had generous toppings of bratwurst, pepperoni and ham, layered with rich tomato sauce. The pizza arrived hot and piping, with warm melting cheese over crunchy crust that made it complete satisfaction.While the desserts may not turn you crazy (as the word ‘asylum’ suggest), the carrot cake I had was rather decent, and warning – the rum ice cream was proportionally exceedingly alcoholic. Keep it off your children. The cake was warm and soft, then even my ‘non-carrot-cake-fan’ friend said this was one of the best he had.Toby’s The Dessert Asylum, 80 Marine Parade Road, #02-68/70 Parkway Parade,Tel: +65 6346 2435
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
Let’s Sweet (Bugis Junction)
15 Minutes (Lasalle)
Out Of The Pan (Raffles City)
Aerin’s (Raffles City)
2011-07-12 00:00:00
Noodle Star –  Be Tempted by King Prawn La Mian
Yong Tau Fu maker Gao Ji has diversified into making la mian with a contemporary twist. The noodle house has just opened at Bugis Village, with a second branch at Rasapura Masters Marina Bay Sands which attracts many onlookers and tourists when chefs demonstrate their noodle-making art.The ‘noodle star’ of the meal is the la mian with king prawn in chilli sauce ($13.80). Most of us should be familiar with the local favourite chill crab. This is a similar version with the same sauce, replaced by a huge king prawn. They are generous with the sauce and so your noodles would not clump up like some others we have tried. The xiao long bao ($4.80 for 4) also scores with its rather thin skin wrapped over pork and lots of flavoursome soup.Full Post at InSing.com – Be Tempted by King Prawn La MianNoodle Star 丰面人物, 233 Victoria Street, Bugis Village Tel: +65 6399 6817
Opening Hours:  11am – 11pm DailyOther Related Entries
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
2011-07-08 00:00:00
Artease Cafe – Bubble Tea, Bentos & Burgers
Artease, which can mean putting art into tea, has been very popular with office ladies at its first outlet at Tanjong Pagar. The good news is this new shop at Orchard Cineleisure is also a collaboration with a Japanese restaurant, and you can therefore expect food such as bento sets, burgers, rice rolls, salads and munchies. As frequent movie-goers, we feel that Cineleisure just lacks a fast food concept shop like this.I was recommended the grapefruit green tea with aloe ($4.70) which was indeed refreshing and different, enhanced by the chunky aloe bits. The youths will certainly like the Artease bento sets ($13.90 – $14.90) which consist of a burger, crispy seaweed fries, meat balls, salad and fruits. The chicken burger was a winner compared to the fish. Bubble tea with fries and burger also means an instant trip to the gym.Full Post at InSing.com -Artease opens at CineleisureArtease Café, Orchard Cineleisure, 8 Grange Rd #01-03 Singapore 239695 Tel: +65 6235 6966
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Koi Bubbletea (Toa Payoh)
Share Tea (Wisma)
Woobbee (Tanjong Pagar)
The Battle of the Bubble Teas
HK Gong Cha vs SG Gong Cha
2011-07-07 00:00:00
Candylicious – A 2nd Candyland at Takashimaya
Everytime I walk into this store, I feel happy. If you are feeling stressed out right now, perhaps candies are the best solution to that problem. And the good news is, Candylicious has opened its highly anticipated second extension at Orchard Road’s Takashimaya. It also means I do not have to go to Resorts World to find that largest ‘Pick and Mix’ wall in Asia.At Candylicious, there is an extensive range of candy and chocolates that have never been
seen in Singapore; Madelaine Chocolates, Rock Candy from Squire Boone Village, Messori Italian Cones, and varieties of Belgian Chocolates. Additional brands such as novelty M&M’s with a colourworks feature, every flavour of Jelly Belly, lollipops in all shapes and sizes flourishing from floor to ceiling are the tempting treats that await you.I speak to Sunaina Gill, Director of Shopping Bag (S) Pte Ltd who brought Candylicious to Singapore, on her sweet tooth.You have such a sweet tooth. Why do you love chocolate so much? 
I have loved chocolate since as far back as I can remember. As a child, I grew up in a house where my parents travelled a lot and would bring home chocolate from all over the world. I grew up loving all kinds of milk chocolate. I definitely have a sweet tooth and need my chocolate fix on a daily basis.Tell us What is your favourite chocolate and candy?
My favorite chocolate as a child was Reese Peanut Butter Cups and my favorite candy was Gummy Bears. However, as I grew older I acquired a taste for dark chocolate and tend to have a little bit of dark chocolate after lunch and dinner (daily!).If you are customer entering Candylicious, which are your candies you will grab first?
Some of my favourite chocolates in the store are Reese Peanut Butter Cups, Hershey’s Dark Chocolate, Bloomsberry, Emergency Bars and Gummy Bears.Which candy would you recommend to relieve the stress of Singaporeans?
I would recommend dark chocolate to relieve the stress of Singaporeans. Recent studies show that eating dark chocolate may lower levels of stress hormones in people feeling stressed out. For example, cocoa has been found to be rich in a class of antioxidants called flavonoids, which have been linked to a number of health benefits. Other compounds in dark chocolate that may offer health benefits such as reduced blood pressure and improved mood.Candylicious, Takashimaya Shopping Centre, 391 Orchard Road, #B2-25/27, Singapore 238873
Operating hours: 10am-9.30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Candylicious Resorts World
2011-07-04 00:00:00
Soon Lee – Mouthwatering Beef in a Fire-Pot
Amidst all the claypot stalls at Alexandra Village Food Centre (including the famous claypot laksa), I was attracted to a stall which sold “fire-pot stew beef”. Behind the stall were two old ladies, busying preparing beef dishes of stew beef rice, stew beef noodles and the most popular stew beef and tendon fire pot.The stew beef fire pot had generous portions, with tenderness of the beef pieces will remain in your memory after they melt in your mouth. What I really like are the pieces of chunky but soft carrot beneath which gave the gravy a sweet aftertaste. You can pour the gravy over rice or mee kia which will make it a simple but satisfying meal.Be careful of your shirt and hair though, as the fire under the pot keeps burning, and burning.Full Post at InSing.com – Set your taste buds on fire!Soon Lee Fire-Pot Stew Beef, #01-16 Alexandra Village Food Centre S150120
Opening Hours: 11am to 8pm (Closed on Mondays)Other Related Entries
Thaksin Beef Noodles (Clementi)
Tiong Bahru Teochew Kueh
Eat May Know (Bendemeer)
Ah Tee Ko Ko Mee (Golden Mile)
Kidney Mee Sua (Kaki Bukit)
2011-07-01 00:00:00
Tonkatsu by Ma Maison is Pork Cutlet Heaven
Ma Maison, the popular Japanese-French fusion restaurant, has just started a new restaurant at Mandarin Gallery. Tonkatsu, named after the renowned breaded pork cutlet dish, sells all things deep fried. This gives Japanese food lovers another reason to flock there other than Ippudo.There are so many other things I love about the food here. The negi miso rosu katsu set ($27.30) had thick slices of pork which was at least 2cm thick. Even though the set menu seems a little pricey, it comes with rice and sides of tonjiru soup, shredded cabbage and pickles – all served free-flow. The fresh shredded cabbage dipped in specially made sesame sauce alone makes the meal all worthwhile.Full Post at InSing.com – Tonkatsu by Ma Maison is pork cutlet heaven!Tonkatsu by Ma Maison, 333A Orchard Road, #02-35/36 Mandarin Gallery, Tel: +65 6733 4541
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri: 11am–3pm, 5pm–10pm; Sat–Sun: 11am–10pmOther Related Entries
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
SUN Japanese Dining (Chijmes)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
Ebiboshi Shotengai(Bugis Illuma)
Box n Sticks
2011-06-29 00:00:00
Joan Bowen – A Cafe that Employs Special Needs Youths
Never underestimate the love of the parents. It can be so overwhelmingly touching. While dining at a unique well-hidden café at Macpherson, I met Yoon Kay and Jeanne Seah who were owners of Joan Bowen Café. They are also parents to a special needs daughter, but they never gave up on her. Instead, they focused very much on making their daughter’s dreams come true.The café was first set up so that Joan Bo Wen, this young and really passionate girl, can fulfil her dream of being a chef. Not only that, Yoon Kay and Jeanne went on to employ 10 youths with special needs at the café so that they can have a chance to be part of this community as well.Joan Bowen café aims to provide a secure social workplace environment that will help these youths learn and discover their special talents. While my friends and I were having our meal, we could not help notice how happy, positive and confident the special needs youths were. Maybe they needed more time to take orders, maybe they needed reminding. But as long as the customers were patient, you could really feel their passion for living.The food was pretty decent. We really enjoyed the deep fried spice battered Calamari Rings ($9.00) served with homemade tartar sauce such that we ordered two portions. The squid was lightly fried, not too oily and had a fluffy crisp outer layer.The Sesame Chicken Wings ($9) was a crowd-pleaser too. The six pieces of marinated chicken wings sprinkled with sesame seeds, were well-marinated and juicy on the inside, enhanced with a special seasoning on the outside.Other main courses such as the Bangers and Mash ($14), Fish and Chips ($10), Seafood Aglio Olio ($16) and Chili Crab Pasta ($16) were all of reasonable quality. We definitely enjoyed the evening dinner’s not only due to the food, but the casual and homely ambience as well.While talking to Jeanne, it was undeniably how proud she was of her daughter, when she was enthusiastically showing us photos she had taken. This dinner experience made me realise how often we take life for granted, and give up too easily when faced with troubles.  Joan Bowen is not just a café, but a place where dreams are built and hopes fulfilled.Joan Bowen Cafe, 9 Jalan Wangi (Near Macpherson), Singapore 349354, Tel: +65 6281 3629
Mon to Fri: 11am – 9.30pm, Sat: 12pm – 9.30pm (Break from 3-5:30pm, closed on Sun and Public Holidays)Other Related Entries
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Egg3 Café (Mountbatten)
Qafé (Tanjong Pagar)
Charlie Brown Café (Somerset)
Crazy World Café (Chinatown)
2011-06-27 00:00:00
My Fat Lady Makes Fab Cupcakes
“My Fat Lady” is actually Edna, owner of this cupcake shop found at a charming, nostalgic and less-discovered Haji Lane. I was keen to try the cakes at this shop only because of its name – It seemed to suggest very delish desserts.After making my way past indie clothing stores and a unique Japanese bicycle shop, I entered this little white retail store and found this lady, grinning with the widest smile, wearing red framed spectacles and pink apron. “Ah, you must be My Fat Lady!” I was right.I could not help not notice the very whimsical interior of the shop. It has half-coloured colurful wall, one small table in the entire shop, and tea pots and cups. Very Alice-in-Wonderland.This cake maker was actually a jewellery designer but toyed with baking to please ‘her fat husband’. Her shop only sold 6 or 7 flavours of cupcakes, and her eye for design worked well. My Fat Lady’s cakes made with creativity and honest love has gained much popularity via word of mouth, especially the customised Angry Birds and Panda cakes which are very sought after.Edna’s personal favourite cupcake flavour is the Sticky Date Pudding, with the most popular flavours amongst customers being the Rich Chocolate and Red Velvet cupcakes. The chocolate cupcake, experiemented after a hundred over tries, was simply one of the best I ever tasted. Imagine thick and decadent chocolate within a moist and warm fluffy cupcake. It is a ‘sin’ worthwhile.The red velvet with cream cheese on top, is a raspberry flavoured cake which is unique with tangy and sweet essence burstin all over. Very suitable for ladies.Edna calls her shop “The Fat Lady” because she feels that everyone should not feel the need to comply with society’s stick thin standards. She is comfortable in her own skin and believes that “There is a fat lady in every one of us” – One who is indulgent in sweet treats.My Fat Lady Cupcakes, 53 Hali Lane  Tel: +65 90254126
Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 9am – 7pm (Closed on Sun)Other Related Entries
Dessert Cup (Raffles City)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
Hairloom & Caramel (Shaw Towers)
3 Inch Sin (Bt Timah)
Let’s Sweet (Bugis)
2011-06-23 00:00:00
The Airfryer Review – I Believe I Can Fry
There are two things that are stopping me from getting that gym-fit figure – bubble tea and deep fried food. Both I am not prepared to give up yet. Not when an airfryer just landed in my kitchen.Disclosure: I did not receive payment for this review. Neither Philips nor any frozen food products/supermarket sponsored me. I was persuaded by a Bryan Wong advertisement (this guy can sell anything from interior design, tour packages to plasters) to part away with $300 over dollars.Listen out – no oil is involved. Having no oil in deep fried food is like having a ‘Bubble Tea Zero’ with minimal calories. This Airfryer’s patented rapid air technology would allow you to fry the tastiest crispy fries that contain up to 80% less fat than a conventional fryer. This is done with a unique combination of fast circulating hot air and a grill element.I love to deep-fry food, but never knew what to do with the left-over oil which would be rather black and disgusting after a while. And there is this stench and horrible cleaning that the lazy guy in me has to deal with.Some critics say that is the technology is similar to a conventional oven and therefore rather gimmicky. I agree, though it is a prettier and neater way to fry, and process time is far faster than over-roasting.For the first meal, I tried the traditional favourite of fish and chips. The airfryer’s separator accessory is a handy way to fry multiple items at the same time and prevents the flavours of different foods mixing with each other. You would first need to pre-heat the fryer (say 200 degrees for 5 to 10 minutes), though you can just watch TV while waiting.In about 25 minutes, I was done. The fried fish turned out to be quite good – very crispy, light, crunchy at parts without that greasy feeling. My main complain that the inner filling was not moist enough. The airfryer worked better for the wedges which turned out professionally even-coloured.After frying the chicken wings, there was a layer of oil collected at the bottom of the pan! That would have gone into my tummy.You know those fish fillets that always can with fried bee hoon? I always loved how it would be crisp on the outside, yet juicy on the inside. Unfortunately, these landed up to be rather shrivelled and lost the succulent essence.Overall, the airfryer seems to be a healthier and more convenient alternative– a worthwhile investment if you like fuss-free deep frying.Other Related Entries
CNY Almond Cookies Recipe
Steamed Mandarin Orange Cake Recipe
Recipe of Grilled Slipper Lobster
SoEZ Brownie Baking 101
2011-06-21 00:00:00
A Reservist’s Food Review – Army Cookhouse Cuisine
We love and hate army cookhouse food, or what Cyberpioneer describes as “cookhouse cuisine”. Before somebody from the military arrests me for taking photos in camp, I must add the disclaimer: The pictures are taken from an open house in a span of 2 days, and truly reflect what the soldiers ate. If they appear to be ‘colourless’, pictures reflect reality.Before 1997 when I was still a recruit, BMT food comprised of sand in the rice, bouncing fish balls, rubbery meat pieces, and the only good times were when deep-fried chicken patties were supplied. I prayed hard that curry would never never ever served, because lowest-rank recruits had to wash the gravy-filled containers. After 1997, it was a turn for the better with Singapore Food Industries (SFI) and Foodfare Catering (FFC) heading the commercialised cookhouses.But did it spell the end of unidentified veggies, sandy rice, and mutated meat?Yes, there were occasions during in-camp trainings when we had indulgences of Western food. That meant chicken chop with fries and mushroom soup with mushroom inside! Add a stick of potong ice cream. Though little was mentioned that the feedback survey was also coming, and what better way to score points that with ‘healthy’ deep-fried food.The army makes sure that soldiers are well-fed with at least 2,500kcal a day. That translates to five meals including two night snacks. I once had rather delicious oily fried mee goreng for ‘night snack’, though it came rather early before 6 pm.Here is a sample of the daily breakfast – Khong Guan bao with lo mai kai, or sausages with bread, soggy hashbrown and mash-potato lookalike fried egg. I would say breakfast is good 40% of the time. Still, there were often several complaints for breakfast. I suspect the complaints won’t be so much if not for rumours of army food costing $6.50 per meal, which is equivalent to a ‘Big Breakfast’ price, without that big breakfast.The platoon would delight during Day One if chicken drumstick is served. But sometimes it could mean that the same type of drumstick is served Monday, Tuesday, and Wednesday, sometimes lunch and dinner in various combinations of dark, curry, soy, curry and curry sauce. We suspect that the caterers over mass-ordered.The meats and dried items are usually better cooked than the greens, or should I say yellows. That is the result of over-frying in another unidentified sauce.Perhaps a possible gauge of whether the food is delicious is to see how much is thrown away. I do get mildly upset when I see how much land up at the trashbags sometimes, with soldiers rather having Super cup noodles. You know what I mean, it’s Super. Some may see the younger generation as spoilt children wasting food when the poor do not even have enough to survive in 3rd world countries. That is not the point. Has anything concrete been done to improve quality and reduce wastage throughout these years of implementation?Officers are usually served better food than the men, in a separate counter. Still, many are observed to still drive out or make their ways to canteen where they have to pay their food. So why?(Above image from cyberpioneerTV)True enough, in the army, it’s eat to live and not live to eat. And cookhouse food has been a huge improvement from before. I appreciate the creativity and effort put into meals with kway chap and bak kut teh. So fellow soldiers, do you love or hate cookhouse food?Other Related Entries
Cookhouse Food – Great, Satisfactory, or Lousy?
2011-06-20 00:00:00
Cookyn Inc – Recipe of Grilled Slipper Lobster with Mornay Sauce
The thing about me is that I can eat, but I may not be able to cook. Therefore, part of pastime is to sign up for a cooking lesson or experiment with ‘convenience cooking’ at home.I was highly recommended by a girl friend to join ‘Cookyn with Mervyn’ because he was patient and personable (I guess his good looks charmed my friend, and unfortunately for her – he is taken.)  Very coincidentally I had a cooking demo at Cookyn Inc – a new contemporary cooking school at Margaret Drive started by Mervyn and partners. Ten minutes walk from Queenstown MRT, it is next to where I used to borrow books and visit the polyclinic. As though it was inside an refurnished old school, there was a very retro feel.Behind this old-looking façade is a beautiful modern kitchen hub with an outdoor herbs garden. That must be every housewife’s dream to pluck your ingredients from your backyard.  Chef Ming from Cookyn Inc taught the group how to cook Grilled Slipper Lobster with Mornay Sauce. I was initially apprehensive because such a recipe was simply out of my league. It turned out to be an expensive classy looking dish that was simple to prepare, with all the ingredients easily purchased from FairPrice Finest. Now for the recipe.Ingredients:
2 slipper lobsters
2 tablespoons unsalted butter
2 tablespoons plain flour
1.5 cups milk
3/4 cup grated cheese
Salt and PepperSteps:
Melt the butter in a pan over medium high heat, and add the flour in bit by bit, stirringly well with a wooden spoon. Once flour is well incorporated, let mixture bubble for 3-4 minutes, stirring constantly.When the colour of the mixture reaches a pale golden, add the milk to the pan and stir well for 4 minutes. The mixture will thicken considerably upon reaching a boil. Add ‘pasta cheese’ if you like. Set aside when the mixture coats the back of the wooden spoon well.Rinse the slipper lobster and cut in half, lengthwise. Pour sauce over the tops of the lobsters, then sprinkle grated cheese over.Place in oven (Pre-heated oven @ 150 degrees Celsius) for approximately 15-20 minutes until cheese is golden brown. You can serve your lobsters now!(Thank you to FairPrice Finest for the cooking demo and provision of ingredients.)Cookyn Inc, 60 Jalan Penjara, Garden Hub, Block O, Singapore 149375 (near Queenstown MRT Station)Other Related Entries
CNY Almond Cookies Recipe
Steamed Mandarin Orange Cake Recipe
SoEZ Brownie Baking 101
2011-06-17 00:00:00
Sushi Express – Everything at $1.80 per plate!
With over 200 stores in Hong Kong, Beijing, Shanghai and Taipei, Sushi Express 爭鮮回转寿司 has finally arrived in Singapore. Since its opening, it has been attracting queues at City Link Mall. Because every plate is at a wallet-friendly price of $1.80 which can ensure a delicious budget meal. Plus, you do not need to fret over the different colours of the plates. Just take and eat!Other than sushi, there are also side dishes all priced at $1.80, and green tea is free! You may ask about the taste. Well, lets just say the sushi is not top-notch quality, but it makes a decent lunch-time meal. I am not complaining okay?Full Post at InSing.com – New Sushi Express – Everything at $1.80!Sushi Express, 1 Raffles Link #B1-23 Citylink Mall, S(039393) Tel: 62389811
Opening Hours – 11:00am to 9:30pmOther Related Entries
Itacho Sushi
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
SUN Japanese Dining (Chijmes)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
Tonkatsu (Mandarin Gallery)
2011-06-16 00:00:00
Mak’s vs Tsim – The 2 Best Wanton Noodles in Hong Kong
Is it chance that two of Hong Kong’s best wanton noodle shops are right opposite one another? They should probably do a rivalry love movie on Mak’s Noodle 麥奀雲吞麵世家 vs Tsim Chai Kee 沾仔记. (To be fair, Singapore also has our own version of Hua Kee vs Cho Kee at Old Airport Road.)Let’s have a look at Mak’s. How many wanton mee shops you know are on Wikipedia? The founder Mak Woon-chi has served this dish to Chiang Kai-shek. Even Anthony Bourdain has tried this legendary noodles. It better be good.For the hungry hippos, you may need to note that the serving bowls are very small, tinier than a rice bowl. The small bowls are said to keep the noodles from going soggy. Even at a pricey HK30 (SGD$4.75), I am not complaining.Because after I tried it, I have to tell you THIS is the BEST wanton noodles I ever had in my LIFE. The noodles are springy thin, as though they can go through needles. And the soup base made of powdered dried shrimp, flounder and pork bones makes such a punch. The wanton skin is oh so thin and slips down your throat. The skin wraps around a full fresh chunky prawn. Why can’t local stores do the same?I left the shop, all satisfied, for round number two right opposite.Tsim Chai Kee served just noodles with three different toppings – shrimp wonton, beef slices, or fish ball. If you are going to be hungry, greedy, or as half-hearted as I was, then opt for the all-in-one noodle soup. For just HK$25 (SGD$3.95). It’s cheaper than Mak’s, had a classier interior, more crowded, and had a bigger portion.And I told myself, THIS is the one of the BEST wanton noodles I ever had in my LIFE.The dilemma. So which is better? If you like variety and something more flavourful, then Tsim Chai Kee’s the choice. But simple and homely Mak’s good enough for me.Mak’s Noodle, G/F, 77 Wellington St, Central, Hong Kong.
Opening Hours: Mon to Sun 11am – 10pmOther Related Entries
Tsim Chai Kee (Hong Kong)
Hong Kong Sun Kee (NEX)
Old Hong Kong Tea House (Katong) 
Must Try Hong Kong Drinks
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
2011-06-14 00:00:00
MOF’s CEO did not have enough to eat Lor Mee
It is hard to imagine when the well-groomed and stylish entrepreneur Lena Sim professed not only was she not born with a silver spoon, she was extremely poor.For those who are unfamiliar, Lena Sim is the owner of the casual Japanese food and dessert chain Ministry of Food (MOF), and Italian restaurant chain LENAS- suitably named after herself. Most would have thought that such successful business owners would have been daddy’s rich girl to begin with, but the 30-something CEO really worked all the way up, and hard.Her maternal grandmother was her only guardian, both of them staying in a rented one-room flat. Other than her grandmother’s fried egg with spring onions, the only childhood food she remembered was the Lor Mee at Redhill Blk 55.During her Primary School days, she would circle around the Lor Mee stall just to take a peek, but never had the money to eat it.“It was until when I had a fever till ah-ma gave me $1.20 as a treat to make me smile. I sometimes wished I would fall sick more often”, she laughed.But when the young Lena was about to pay up, she found out that she lost the money accidentally.The Lor Mee stall owner gave her a free bowl in the end. The uncle did not mind that she could not pay, because he knew she was a fan of his stall.The media-shy Lena added, “When you are poor and sick, it’s a caring act like this that makes you feel wanted.”She described that her favourite parts were the crispy fish batter sprinkled on top, and demonstrated how she would make a ‘krap krap’ sound as she crunched on them. As she laughed again, you could sense that beneath this determined and strong-headed CEO, was a child who appreciated every simple thing she had.Other Related Entries
A Wagyu Burger with Aston Soon
Willin Low and His Favourite Hokkien Mee
Bakerzin’s Daniel Tay and His Greatest Regret
The 23-year girl behind Wow Wow West 
Interview with Francesca Scarpa Da Paolo
2011-06-13 00:00:00
Medz – Mediterranean Food All Under One Roof
If you have thought of traveling to faraway Greece or Morocco just to eat Mediterranean fare, you can now have it all at MEDZS! Offering 8 stations of Spanish, Moroccan, French, Turkish, Greek food and desserts, making a trip here feels like you are taking a cuisine holiday.The 200-seater MEDZS, located at Orchard Central’s basement 2, is probably the first restaurant serving Mediterranean fare all in one place. The concept is similar to Marché and Shokudo’s – you order your food via a card and pay as you exit.What is Mediterranean food without seafood? Have the char grilled deep sea prawns ($14), topped with meslun salad and marinated in light flavours of garlic and herbs – they were grilled to almost perfection.Medz, 181, Orchard Road #B2-01/02/03 Orchard Central, Singapore 238896
Monday to Sundays: 11:00am to 11:00pmFull Post at InSing.com – Go mad over Mediterranean food!Other Related Entries
The Mexican
Carousel
Don Quijote Spanish Restaurant
Rascals Gone Dining
Shokudo Japanese Food Bazaar
2011-06-10 00:00:00
5 Must Try Food in Taipei
There are so many of my friends going to Taipei soon and keep asking me the same question “What is there to eat?” If you haven’t been to Taiwan before, there are three types of food you must try: The street food, the desserts and the regional specialties.Do not leave Taiwan without going to one of the night markets to nibble on tempura (tian bu la), crepes, fried chicken, and stinky tofu. Also, each region has its own signatures, such as my favourite Ah Gei (tofu sealed with vermicelli and fish paste), fish balls and black iron eggs from Dan Shui.Of course, every meal must be paired with a dessert or drink such as bubble tea, grass jelly, aiyu, shaved ice and milk shakes. Some say you cannot leave Taiwan without trying the braised pork rice and beef noodles. I say match that with bubble tea.Here are some other must-try food.Taiwan Sausages
If you think they are anything close to the German franks and bratwurst, you will be in for a surprise. Taiwanese sausages are short, sweet and oily, barbequed to perfection by the street hawker. They come in a variety of flavours such as black pepper, garlic, chilli, wasabi, butter or even chocolate! If you are in something even strange and calories-inducing, try the 大肠包小肠 (literally meaning big sausage wrapping small sausage) which is a sweet pork sausage wrapper in grilled sticky rice. Guilt to the max!Xiao Long Bao
This steamed dumpling 小笼包 may have originally in eastern China, but it was Taiwanese’s Din Tai Fung which reached this dish out to the world. Awarded one Michelin Star and ranked as one of the world’s Top Ten Best Restaurants by The New York Times, the original Din Tai Feng can be found at Yong Kang Street. The dumplings are served hot in bamboo basket. Be careful when you eat them, as hot-piping soup will burst out from within.Iced Mango
Talking about Yong Kang Street, this is one of the best places to find quiet cafes and food gems. Ice Monster’s 冰馆 mango and other fresh fruits desserts are irresistible in summer. Fresh sweet mangoes topped with mango ice cream, milk, syrup and pulp, laid over thin ice shavings which melt instantly in your mouth. The servings are generous and fruits sweet and fresh.Mee Sua
You can find the best mee suah at Ximending’s Emei Street 西门丁 or Shida Night Market 师大夜市, also known as the ‘university night market’. The best around are really 阿鑫面线 and 阿宗面线. This has thin smooth vermicelli cooked for long hours in a tan brown starchy soup base. Usually large intestines and oysters are added, adding some chewiness and bite. Ah Zong at Emei Street has no seats for customers. Therefore, you will just spot crowds around holding and slurping divine bowls of goodness.Pork Pepper Buns
Found at Rao He Night Market, the secret of 福州世祖胡椒饼 success is the rich and juicy filling of its buns, made of fresh pork, marinated in a special sauce concocted using a secret recipe. The plentiful green onions and strong peppery taste is almost a perfect combination. The pepper buns, lightly sprinkled with sesame seeds on the crust, are crisp on the outside and piping hot in the inside.Other Related Entries 
Ah Zong Mian Xian (Taiwan) 
Pork Pepper Buns (Taiwan)
Hao Da Chicken Culet (Taiwan)
Deng Long Lu Wei (Taiwan)
Ice Monster (Taiwan)
2011-06-03 00:00:00
Gong Cha – HK 贡茶 vs SG 贡茶
Bubble tea fans were so worried momentarily that their favourite drink would be banned. Ever since beverages, jams and jellies manufactured in Taiwan were test for DEHP contamination, bubble tea chains in Singapore are hot on their toes.Gong Cha 贡茶 has earlier voluntarily stopped selling its fruit-flavoured drinks because the flavoured syrup comes from a Taiwanese supplier. While supplier is not one of those affected, Gong Cha wants to play extra caution. The good news is for fans is that ALL their juices have been tested in Taiwan, and has passed all the required tests.And yes, this is my first post on Gong Cha. (Don’t ask me why.) Gong Cha was first established in Kaohsiung, Taiwan in 2006, and has taken Hong Kong, China, Macau and Singapore by storm. It has 15 branches in Singapore and growing. And when I first had it years back at City Square Mall, it had no business. The service staff were bored and just sitting around. Things change.Some interesting trivia: “Gong Cha” means the ancient act of offering tea to royalty. And there are three ways of drinking Gong Cha.
1) Milk Moustache – without stirring, sip the tea from the top layer of milk creamy foam
2) Tea Off – Without stirring, sip the tea from the bottom with a straw to savour the tea first
3) All in One – stir both layers together and drink up!Though I must say Singaporeans seems to be getting less of a deal out of their Gong Cha from their Hong Kong counterparts. It came in a sturdy cup with clean clear plastic wrapper. The large cup I bought at Central (and Singapore has only one size) cost me only HK$13. That works out to be $2.06! Why are we paying so much more?! However… the tea in Singapore strangely taste better and less watery.Other Related Entries
I Love Taimei (Bugis)
Koi Bubbletea (Toa Payoh)
Share Tea (Wisma)
Woobbee (Tanjong Pagar)
The Battle of the Bubble Teas
2011-05-31 00:00:00
What Is Your Must-Have Zhi Char dish?
Every family loves a zhi char outing, where each member can order their desired dish and end up with a sumptuous feast enjoying everybody’s favourites. The hot steamy taste and wok hei of the 煮炒 is the big draw, and many zhi char stalls continue to enjoy roaring businesses at coffee shops and food centres.Wondering what everybody’s must-order dish is, I did a survey on my Facebook. While there are some shoo-ins, I must say I am quite surprised by the results. What I thought that were very popular such as san lao horfun, beef horfun, dou miao, furong egg and claypot tofu had few supporters, and the dish leading the pack is what I did not expect.Number 1 – Sambal Kangkong
Also known as Ipomoea aquatica, I would have thought many would avoid this due to the traditional myth that it makes legs weak and hollow. But every family should order a token veggie right? This simple dish of powerful sambal balacan can give people the impression they are eating their healthy greens, while having a spicy good time.Number 2 – Prawn Paste Chicken
Har Cheong Kai is my must-order food, and the best local answer to fast food fried chicken. Populated by Hong Kong Street Chun Kee, the smell of fermented prawn paste, the crisp of the skin matched with powerful chilli will blow you away.Number 3 – Hot Plate Tofu
Not exactly surprised with its popularity because it contains the best of many ingredients – deep fried tofu, fresh prawns, vegetables, the egg at the bottom, and did I mention the hot bubbly sauce?Number 4 – Sweet and Sour Pork
A traditional Jiangsu dish, 咕嚕肉 or goo lou yok is double deep fried pork pieces matched with sweetness from sugar and a salty sour taste from the ketchup and rice vinegar. It is my growing up dish that my grandma could make very well, and I sure that is for many others as well.Number 5 – Cereal Prawn
Probably the most original Singaporean of all these zhi char dishes, it is time these crispy prawns enjoy the same status as our chilli crabs. Now which do you prefer nomming – the prawn or the cereal?Continue to *likes* and vote for your favourites Here!Other Related Entries
Galley By The Straits (Admiralty Road)
Mellben (Pasir Ris)
Cz’Zar (Great World City)
2011-05-30 00:00:00
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill – 1.2 kg of Prime Rib Steak
This restaurant is not called Hippopotamus because it sells its meat. No, no. Neither does it have any significant meaning. Few would know that it is first created in Paris in 1968, with over a hundred restaurants mainly in the French regions, and finally brought over to Singapore. It was said the founder saw a Hippopotamus on one of his voyage trips and the image stayed in his mind.“Hippopotamus” may give the indication that the meat pieces they sell are of significant sizes. And yes, their signature prime rib weights a hefty heavy bulky beefy 1.2kg! That’s about four of your human palms in surface area. Lets just say it was almost the size of my big face as well.This size XXXL prime rib ($109.00) is not definitely not meant for one, and can be shared between 4-5 meat lovers. (Our table of 8 shared one.) A cut of beef from the rib section, the bones are removed resulting with fats and the lesser muscles left uncut, leaving you with melt-in-your mouth marbled goodness.You also have a choice of sauces (finally, not cheap chilli sauce) between barbeque, béarnaise, stewed shallot, pepper or roquefort cheese. My personal recommendations will be the stewed shallot which adds a fragrant dimension to the beef, or barbeque as it compliments better for a rather ‘American’ taste.The sides are also quite exciting, with 3 choices of fries, potato gratin, green beans, baked potato, ratatouille or basmati rice. The potato gratin is a must-order.If you prefer other cuts, there is a range of sirloin, tenderloin and rib steak, to the rarer hanger and skirt steaks. Prices are about $20 plus, which makes it quite reasonable.Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill, 6 Raffles Boulevard, #01-204/205 Marina Square, Tel: +65 6338 5352
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Sunset Grill and Pub (Seletar Airbase)
Nando’s (Bugis Junction)
Barcelos (Novena) 
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
Infusion (Dempsey)
2011-05-24 00:00:00
Keisuke Tokyo – Ramen by the Champion King
Food competitions are a big thing in other countries, with the reputation of both the chef and restaurant brand at stake. Do you recall catching some of those on Japan Hour, and ‘losers’ often leave emotionally devastated.In Japan, the Ramen Champion Series is an annual gathering of over 30,000 ramen chefs to compete for the coveted Ramen King title. And the winner is none other than the long-haired artistic looking Keikuke Tekeda, founder of Kesuke Tokyo. Therefore, it makes me excited to eat ramen created by this newly crowned “Ramen King”, found right at Parco Millenia Walk.In Japan, each Keisuke Ramen shops offer a different style of ramen from one other – one can sell crab ramen and the other prawn ramen. That is due to the different climate and styles of each distict. The good news is that Singapore foodies can try the best of everything in one store.Keisuke also promises something different – Ramen customisation for customers. Other than the noodle flavours, I got to choose the taste of soup ranging from light, normal to strong, and noodle texture from soft to ‘harder’ by making ticks on a paper provided. You can now enjoy ramen made to your liking and have the option of excluding certain ingredients such as pork chashu, seaweed or leek. Great service for customers.Between Tonkatsu, Tokyo Shoyu, Shio, Miso and Crab, the Watarikani Ramen ($15.80) was the one screaming for me to try. If you are expecting thick slices of crab meat, or traces of snow crab, then you may be disappointed. The ramen may not even have artificial crab sticks, but it is the thick aromatic seafoody kani-flavoured stock that makes it quite distinctive from any other ramen stocks in the local market.Ramen champion Mr Keisuke Takeda is known for his creative inputs in traditional ramen. So don’t be surprised if you find cheese strips in your Tonkatsu!Keisuke Tokyo, 9 Raffles Boulevard, #P3-02 Parco Marina Bay, Millenia Walk, Tel: +65 6337 7919
Opening Hours: 10.30am – 9.30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Yoshimaru Ramen Bar (Holland Village)
Sapporo Ramen Miharu (Gallery Hotel)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
Ramen Santouka (Central)
Can You Name The Ramen?
2011-05-18 00:00:00
Interview with Francesca Scarpa – The Woman behind Da Paolo
My first experience with Da Paolo was a takeaway tiramisu in a plastic container from Gastronomia. That blew me away. So did the crisp cheesy pizzas. You may have wondered where did Da Paolo come from?The Da Paolo group had its beginnings since 1989, opened at Tanjong Pagar during a time when there were only few established Italian restaurants in Singapore. More than 2 decades later, 5 gourmet delis, 3 restaurants, 2 themed bars and 1 dessert shop later, this home grown brand is known for its high quality and authentic upmarket Italian fare.I had the chance to speak to Francesca, daughter of Paolo and Judie Scarpa who first started the humble Trattoria Da Paolo. We met at Gastronomia where she was comfortably introducing the assortment of pizzas and pretty little desserts, in an elegant blue dress with European poise.Francesca (extreme left) with her staff

Sometimes people may be confused with the many different brands of Da Paolo: Ristorante (Classic Italian dining), Bistrobar (Alfresco, grill and drinks), Pizzabar (Pizza, salads and breakfast) and Gastronomia (Gourmet deli café). Francesca explained that the diversification gave them the possibility to serve different specialities of food in different settings.As a family member, Francesca had to pressure to mature quickly and take over the business so that her parents can take a backseat. “Although you could say food and service is in my blood, one of the biggest challenges I faced was the lack of prior experience in business administration as well as all the behind the curtains work.” She attributed the success to her hardworking and talented staff.On a lighter note, Francesca was excited to share that it was a dream come true to be selling Italian food that she loved.“I love buffalo mozzarella.  Actually I love all types of mozzarella. You can get mozzarella in different shapes in Italy and I love to eat it on its own. I love it because its soft and cold and slightly creamy. My favourite is burrata with a deliciously buttery, flowing centre.”A foodie herself, she would also love to indulge in all local food. She could not pinpoint because she enjoyed almost everything from satay, chicken rice, mee siam, rojak to all the desserts. (And there I wondering how she maintained her slim figure.)All except tofu.She found it strange that some of her local friends often compared tofu to mozzarella. “I love one and hate the other. The taste is totally different!”Other Related Entries
A Wagyu Burger with Aston Soon
Willin Low and His Favourite Hokkien Mee
Bakerzin’s Daniel Tay and His Greatest Regret
The 23-year girl behind Wow Wow West 
MOF’s CEO did not have enough to eat Lor Mee
2011-05-13 00:00:00
Swirl Art – DIY Your Own Yogurt
Some research showed that adding yogurt to your diet may rev up the body’s fat-burning engines, speed weight loss, and trim the tummy. Even if you do not lose weight, consider yogurt a good source of calcium.With yogurt providing paradise for your taste buds on a hot summer Singapore, this has already quietly becoming the next big trend in Singapore. Can you name any yogurt shops? The most prominent is likely to be Yami (not Yam Ah Mee), followed by Sogurt, Red Mango, BerryLite, Frolick and Yoguru. So which is your favourite?And there is Swirl Art.This store offers frozen yogurt by weight, and patrons can add a variety of toppings to the frozen treats. You can mix and match 10 flavours of non-fat frozen yogurt, and decorate your swirls with more than 30 toppings available. The number of DIY combinations? You do the Maths.The flavours include cookies and cream, kiwi, passion fruit, blackberry, green tea, banana with my favourite being taro. Some of the more popular toppings include mochi, QQ balls, nata de coco and honey balls. Be warned that they help your yogurt (and you) weigh more.I liked it that the yogurt is creamy yet light, sweet yet not too sour. And it does not melt that fast even under this weather. At $3 per 100g, it is easy to go ‘overboard’ because that would be about half a cup without the toppings. You do the careful estimation.Good news. Swirl Art has a promotion now – If your yogurt is exactly 100, 200 or 300 g, your cup will be given to you absolutely free! Mine was 107 g, and so…417 River Valley Road / 1 Liang Seah Street #01-13/14
Opening Hours: Sun-Thurs: 12pm – 12am; Fri-Sat 12pm – 2amOther Related Entries
Ice Cream Chefs (East Coast)
Udders (Thomson Road)
Once Upon a Milkshake (Maxwell Chambers)
The Daily Scoop (Chip Bee Gardens)
Swensen’s Chendol Ice Cream
2011-05-11 00:00:00
Verve Pizzeria – The 500 Calories Pizza
Replacing its original location at Gillman Village, the new Verve has definitely upped its style and taste factor. The menu features a host of traditional Italian favourites, and of course their popular pastas and pizzas freshly made served in classic Italian style.Weight watchers who have sworn off pizzas may be ecstatic to know that the senza pizzas ($27) are all less than 500 calories. The tripani came with the centre dough removed, replaced by lavish greens in the middle. The very very thin crust ensures a lower carb intake. And the healthy ingredients of mushrooms, broccoli, red onions, fresh basil and tiger prawns keep the eating experience taste-pleasurable yet guilt-free.Full Post at InSing.com – Verve Reopens at One NorthVerve Pizzeria, 11 Slim Barracks Rise, One North (NTU Alumni Club Level 1) Tel: +65 6776 0665
Opening Hours: 11am – 11pm DailyOther Related Entries
Singapore Sling Chilli Crab Pizza (Clarke Quay)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
Youmenya Goemon (Marina Bay Link)
The Verve (Gillman Village)
2011-05-09 00:00:00
So Hot! Time to have some Swensen’s Chendol Ice Cream
Can Singapore get any hotter? The last I checked – it was 35 degrees on my phone. Time to pile up the desserts, cheng tng, ice kachang, chendol and ice cream! How about some chendol ice cream then?For fans of the earthquake, you may be ecstatic to know that the 32-year old Swensen’s has just launched two localised flavours – Chendol Delight and Palm Paradise.As part of Swensens’ Corporate Social Responsibility drive, Swensen’s now uses healthy palm sugar from Cambodian producers. According to them, this move helps contribute to the export of palm sugar, thus improving the livelihoods of and creating sustained employment for palm sugar farmers in Cambodia. Sweet move.The Chendol Delight ($8.50) came served with bountiful scoops of chendol ice cream smothered in palm sugar syrup. It was served with a generous serving of red bean, chendol jelly and attap chee. It had a rather ‘childhood’ taste, as though you were having the dessert in an ice cream form. I liked that it did not taste artificial and in fact very true to the original chendol flavour.The Palm Paradise ($6.90) was not as sweet and had a stronger palm sugar presence. The taste resembles that of a more muted brown sugar, with slight rounded caramel tinge. The best part was desiccated coconut lightly sprinkled on the top of whipped cream. The sundae was also topped with peaches, nata de coco and palm sugar syrup.You can have the ice cream at the newly opened Clementi Mall or other branches. If not, buy a pint ($7.90) back to survive this hot Singapore fever.Swensen’s The Clementi Mall, 441 Commonwealth Avenue West, #05-31/33 Tel: 6659 2151
Opening Hours: 10:30-22:30 DailyOther Related Entries
Cold Stone Creamery (Orchard Central)
Island Creamery (Serene Centre)
Ice Cream Chefs (East Coast)
Udders (Thomson Road)
Once Upon a Milkshake (Maxwell
2011-05-04 00:00:00
The 23-year girl behind Wow Wow West
As I was taking photos of the well-liked Wow Wow West hawker stall, I was promptly stopped by a young girl who exclaimed “Who are you shooting?” She then quickly apologized for her snappiness, explaining that the stall employed several ex-offenders who did not want to appear in pictures.I introduced myself to Elizabeth Ng, the owner of this hawker stall branch. She was only 23 yet spoke with much maturity, all bursting with smiles and energy when I was there late in the evening.The western food stall supported the Yellow Ribbon Project by hiring ex-offenders and ex-drug addicts to work at its branches. Elizabeth was frank enough to say that she hersel was rebellious years back and knew what it was like to be a delinquent.  It was Jesus and her father who gave her life a U-turn.Her life as a hawker started when she was helping out her father’s first stall at Raffles Institution, which was named “Wow Wow West” by the boys. Their delicious and affordable western food fare earned much popularity from the RI boys. They made the decision to leave because earnings during the extended periods of holidays were low, “I don’t know why, but this school has too many holidays.“When asked what some of here challenges were, she said that some customers could be really difficult and ‘ngeow’. “They want many packets of chilli and extra ingredients for the same amount of price.”She would try to meet their requests, but one demand she could not meet is to remove the skin from chicken chops and cutlets. “The frying process will hurt my workers”.Elizabeth might be dismissed as just another ‘young ah lian’ from her appearance, but her entrepreneurial skills and to-do spirit is admirable. Her latest addition of selling German franks had proven to be a hit with customers because it was not readily available elsewhere.She made a promise to work superiorly hard, even though working in an oily and hot hawker environment is not what many young girls would enjoy doing. “I am thankful for my father for giving me a second chance, and the opportunity to prove myself.”Redhill Hawker Centre; or 6 Jalan Bukit Merah #01-133 ABC Brickworks Food Centre S150006
Mon to Sat: 11:00 – 21:00Other Related Entries
A Wagyu Burger with Aston Soon
Willin Low and His Favourite Hokkien Mee
Bakerzin’s Daniel Tay and His Greatest Regret
Interview with Francesca Scarpa Da Paolo
MOF’s CEO did not have enough to eat Lor Mee
2011-04-29 00:00:00
Tin Pei Ling vs Nicole Seah – Which Would You Rather Eat?!
Tin Pei Ling vs Nicole Seah – who will win the battle at Marine Parade GRC at GE 2011, it is anybody’s guess before 7th May.Presently, PAP candidate Tin Pei Ling has gathered more about 3,500 ‘likes’ on her facebook page, while NSP’s Nicole Seah has about *wow* more than 11 times more at 41000 fans, pushing close to MM Lee’s of 55,000.The comparison has amusingly and entertainingly extended to two plates of sushi. You are not reading wrong. Standing Sushi Bar has named their cooked vinegared rice after these two young candidates.First presenting Tin Pei Lin sushi, six pieces of white maki filled with salmon skin, perhaps symbolising a clean white PAP  look. Though a netizen says that sotong would have been a better ingredient, my suggestion is to pair the makis up with a halal sushi with the name of Fatimah Lateef. Aren’t they supposed to be buddies? Oh yes, throw in a huge handroll for the same price as well. (What if cannot sell well right? Don’t worry, the price will be kept the same the next 6 months.)Next presenting Nicole Seah sushi, eight pieces pretty in pink makis filled with unagi and egg, placed in a flower shape to represent her NSP colours and logo. Priced at $10 each, the owner revealed that while both sushis are selling well, the Nicole Seah version is selling twice as much.Before you cheer (or jeer), likes are likes, and sushi sales are not votes. To be fair, I would like go for the pink sushi as well, purely because it looks packed with substance, and not because the pink one is prettier. And I don’t know what to say about the white sushi.Ingenious idea Standing Sushi Bar! How about coming out a Vincent and Vivian sushi, with the Vivian sushi made of fresh smear, I mean sear fish.Standing Sushi Bar: 8 Queen Street, 1 Raffles Place and Marina Bay Link MallOther Related Entries
Itacho Sushi
Sushi Express (City Link Mall)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
Box n Sticks
2011-04-27 00:00:00
Bakerzin Launches First Bread Shop
After 13 years of bringing us scrumptious cakes, pastries and pastas, Bakerzin has just launched its first bread shop, showcasing artisanal European-style creations.As there have been numerous requests by customers to buy whole loaves of bread, CEO Daniel Tay
 finally decided to dedicate a whole store just to a range of artisan bread, danishes, sweet buns and macaroons. The loaves feel harder and look darker than what we are used to, probably because they are made from a “Type 55” premium French whole wheat flour. If you need some brioche and ciabatta, you know where to head down now.Full Post at InSing.com – Bakerzin launches first bread shopBakerzin Artisan Breads MyVillage, 1 Maju Avenue, Serangoon Gardens, #01-26, Singapore 556679
Opening Hours: 9am to 9pmOther Related Entries
Bakerzin’s Daniel Tay and His Greatest RegretSun Coffee Planet (Killiney)
OldTown White Coffee (Bt Timah)
Chin Mee Chin (East Coast)
Joe & Dough (Suntec)
2011-04-25 00:00:00
Box n Sticks – Bento and Yakimono at Arab St
Arab Street is indeed a gem in Singapore. At the corner of Aliwal Street is a casual Japanese eatery selling bentos and kushiyakis – therefore the name Box n Sticks.Box and Sticks is started with the aim of offering good Japanese food without hurting the wallet. The kushi moriwase ($22.80) mixed platter is really quite value-for-money, considering that yakimono (Japanese grill) is usually quite pricey in other restaurants (Ironic because yakimono originated to satisfy the poor people). There are some hits and misses on the plate of pork belly, meatballs, bacon with quail egg, shitake mushrooms and shishamo. My favourite remains the yakitori because the chicken meat is tender and evenly marinated.Full Post at InSing.com – The new oishii in Arab Street!14 Aliwal Street, Singapore 199907 (Arab Street)
Opening Hours: Mon-Thurs: 11:30am-11:00pm; Fri: 11:30am-2:30am; Sat: 6:00pm-2:30am (Closed on Sun)Other Related Entries
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
SUN Japanese Dining (Chijmes)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
Tonkatsu (Mandarin Gallery)
Sushi Express (City Link Mall)
2011-04-20 00:00:00
Chinta Manis – One Sweet Little Nonya
If the European countries can be so proud of their cakes and pastries, I think it is time we spread the goodness about one of our distinct heritage food – the Nonya Kueh.Kueh (or kue, kuih or kway) used to be in the domains of our skilful grandmothers and aunties, or HDB confectionaries, but has recently gained popularity as a festival goody and gift for our foreign friends. Unfortunately most around com straight from the factories.Talk about kuehs but only few brands come to mind – Bengawan Solo and Kedai Kue Kue. Chinta Manis is definitely hot on their heels with 3 retail branches and the next a new Peranakan concept café and an outlet at Changi Airport soon.Inspired by the rich tradition of Peranakan food and culture, Chinta Manis serves a range of Nonya kuehs and desserts, western cakes, savoury and sweet pastries, local Peranakan delights such as mee siam. Meaning “sweet love” in Malay, their kuehs is what I would describe as a Jeanette Aw-like little nonya – pretty, small sized, only mildly sweet and full of character.Chinta Manis currently serves over 20 types of kuehs with their top 3 being Chendol Agar Agar, Pulut Seri Kaya and Ondeh Ondeh. The Chendol Agar Agar ($0.90) is an innovative offering of one of our favourite desserts in a squarish solid form. I liked that it retained some of the coconuty goodness of the chendol, without that heavy-going sweetness.The Mango Sago Agar ($0.90) is also a pleasant find, combining the tropical sweetness of yellow mangos and lemak in a cutesy presentable dessert.Although they are faced with stiff competition from the more established branches, Chinta Manis sticks to making their kuehs fresh daily and 100% handmade with no preservatives. When asked they stay ahead of the game, they share their passion of staying with the Peranakan roots.“Conceptually- We are definitely Peranakan, represented in our logo with the Peranakan colours and symbolism. We are the 1st Peranakan Patisserie currently offering dual formats of a Patisserie and café.”The main drawback of such kuehs is they do not keep well in the humidity. If we can find a way, I know this is one little nonya which can reach beyond our shores.65 Killiney Road @ Daily Toast Mon to Fri – 7:00am – 7:30pm Weekends – 7:00am – 3:00pm; China Square Food Court Mon to Fri – 7:30am -8:00pm; myVillage Serangoon GardensOther Related Entries
Warisan Receipe (Boon Lay)
3 Inch Sin (Bt Timah)
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
Hairloom & Caramel (Shaw Towers)
2011-04-14 00:00:00
Crazy World Café 疯狂世界 – It All Started with a Crazy Dream
The introduction of this café starts with a simple love story. Boy meets girl at a MayDay 五月天 autograph session. One is a designer and the other works at the music industry. Their love for music got them together. They eventually married and gave birth to this Crazy World Café.Meet Edgar Lim and Florence Chua, the compatible looking couple who wants to pursue a dream so much that they set up such a space to support local music and design. Being fans of MayDay, the café is named after their hit song “Crazy World 疯狂世界”.However, you would not see MayDay’s albums and posters all over the place, other than an iconic Astroboy. Instead, there are locally designed nick-nacks on sale, a photo gallery, retro radio sets, music CDs of several indie acts and a small performance space.

I was recommended to Crazy World by local artiste Nat Ho, who told me that singers Tan Diya, Carrie Yeo and Kewei all loved this indie music design café so so so much.Nested in a quiet shophouse amongst the hustle bustle of Chinatown, I can totally understand why. This café sells sincerity and dreams – something you cannot duplicate elsewhere. There is a whimsical childlike and homely feel where you can hopscotch outside, and just chill out with your besties while savouring homemade Bailey’s Cheesecake.Owner Edgar is like an attentive but shy person that makes a good friend, while Florence and her mum concocts homely delights in the kitchen. The Mum’s Chicken Curry ($8.90) is a class of its own. Though it is not made with coconut milk, the gravy is so addictive that I wiped it clean with the prata.You can go for the Beer Battered Fish n Chips ($12.90) which are nicely presented in smaller pieces, coated with crispy beer batter with the cod fish within remaining warm, fresh and moist.No service charge and no GST, but this is one place which has one of the best service. Their goal is to continue to promote local music and design. Monetary-wise, they are contented for the café to break even for the moment. That’s why they say dreams are always crazy, but they do come true.Crazy World Cafe, 24 Temple St (Chinatown MRT Exit A), Singapore 058569
Opening Hours: Tues – Thurs: 12:00 pm – 10:00 pm Fri – Sat: 12:00 pm – 11:30 pm Sun: 12:00 pm – 8:00 pmOther Related Entries
Joan Bowen Café (Macpherson)
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
Egg3 Café (Mountbatten)
Qafé (Tanjong Pagar)
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
2011-04-12 00:00:00
Coffee Stars by Dao – Sawadee-licious
This shop is almost like a wish come true – where excellent Thai food meets exceptional desserts. If you have been to Wisma Atria recently, you would have noticed the new Coffee Stars by Dao. This is known as Coffee Beans by Dao in Thailand (not to be confused with Singapore’s Coffee Bean), a café-restaurant with remarkable success and popularity in Bangkok.Other than the delicious Thai cuisines, do not forgot about the desserts. We were recommended the coconut pandan roll ($5.80), which had a fragrant green spongy layer with sweet coconut corn fillings which showcased the best of Thai and Western desserts. The green tea crepe ($7.90) reminded me of a softer version of a kueh lapis, and the chocolate sauce poured on it sealed it as one of the best cakes I had in a long time.Full Post at InSing.com – Coffee Stars By DaoCoffee Stars by Dao, 435 Orchard Road, #01-37/41 Wisma Atria Tel: +65 6733 3881
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 10pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Flying Chillis (313 @ Somerset)
First Thai (Purvis Street)
Thai Noodle House (Coronation Road)
Porn’s (Liang Seah)
MBK Foodcourt (Thailand)
2011-04-08 00:00:00
Bakerzin’s Daniel Tay and His Greatest Regret
Bakerzin’s CEO Daniel Tay has gone a full circle. Few may remember that he lost a big fortune setting up a bread factory during the late 1980s, and had to start all over by making cakes for friends from home.The rest is history. With 10 Bakerzin under his belt and more stores in regional countries, he is back into the bread making business with a new shop Artisan Bread at MyVillage Serangoon Village.The stern-looking Daniel was candid and sincere in sharing his thoughts. When asked about his success, he says “Having 10 stores is not that much to be proud of. When I look at my friend who opened up more than 100 shops at China within 2 to 3 years, I feel that I lag so far behind” he said disappointedly.This is strange coming from a person whose cakes and desserts have found much popularity and appeal. The peculiar thing was when asked what his greatest regret was, it was “not going earlier to the bread business”.I might have hit the wrong buttons when I said that it was probably Breadtalk which revolutionised the bread industry in Singapore. Daniel was clear in disclosing that he was not a fan of “soft and airy” bread, but those that undergone proper fermenting.“Many Singaporeans do not appreciate true premium bread.”Daniel’s father is the owner of Seng Choon Bakery, therefore it is not surprising that bakery is in his blood. His entire mood changed to a chirpy one when we talked about bread. “My first love is baking bread. At the start of my career, I spent a lot of time learning the art and science of baking good European style breads. So I finally decided to dedicate a store just to a range of artisan breads.”In between shuffling between stores, Daniel revealed that his indulgence include duck rice from Sin Ming Road and the Outrum Park Char Kway Tiao at Hong Lim because the uncle used blood from the cockles to fry with lots of lard. “Very unhealthy but it is worth it”.When asked if he dreamt of having Breadtalk’s success of getting Bakerzin listed, he said it was impossible for now but he would take “one step at a time”.Other Related Entries
Willin Low and His Favourite Hokkien Mee
The 23-year girl behind Wow Wow West   
Interview with Francesca Scarpa Da Paolo
MOF’s CEO did not have enough to eat Lor Mee
A Wagyu Burger with Aston Soon
2011-04-07 00:00:00
Cold Stone Creamery – The Ice Cream to Dance, Cheer and Sing
Ice cream makes the world go round, really. When you are stressed out or feeling down, sometimes all you need that scoop of ice cream. And at the newly opened Cold Stone Creamery, it is amusement land with cheers that will lift you up.It was an awkward, but hilarious moment when I was ordering my Chocolate Devotion, and the staff just suddenly broke into song and dance. They sang the all so familiar la-la-la-la Smurf song, We will rock you and that Flintstone theme with the lyrics “Cold Stone, it’s a cold stone, we a modern stone-age family”. Singing-wise, Simon Cowell will go it-is-absolutely-ghastly, but J Lo will praise them for their great energy and entertainment value.If you need the entire store to sing a birthday song for your best friend, they will probably do.That is not all.  The staff will do some ‘stunts’ on request, throwing ice cream up in the air, and catching it back with their waffle bowl. Apparently, some of them were sent for a 4-week course at the Cold Stone University to learn these tricks. You can even try it on your own. Though mishaps happen, and you may find your precious dessert right On The Floor (very waste yah?).For those unfamiliar with Cold Stone Creamery, it started way back in 1988 at Tempe, Arizona, has more than 1,400 stores operating worldwide. The store at Orchard Central is Singapore’s first. Their ice cream is made fresh daily, thus ensuring a super-premium quality.The ice cream will be blended on a frozen granite stone, and you can mix-in various combinations of fruits, nuts, candy, cookies, brownies and peanut butter.For the tried and tested, go for the Founder’s Favourite which has a combination of pecans, brownie, fudge and caramel blended with smooth and creamy ice cream. It is Ooo La La.Cold Stone Creamery, 181 Orchard Road, #01-10 Orchard Central, +65 6238 9060
Opening Hours: 11am – 11pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Island Creamery (Serene Centre)
Ice Cream Chefs (East Coast)
Udders (Thomson Road)
Little Ice Cream Kafe LICK (Tanjong Katong)
The Daily Scoop (Chip Bee Gardens)
2011-04-06 00:00:00
73+1 – Big Bounchy Fishballs
Top 73+1 Handmade Fishball Noodles has been around for more than 20 years. It was first opened by old Mr Tan at Clarke Quay near the historical ‘cha chun tau’ area, which means ‘jetty for boats carrying firewood’. It was where Mr Tan would sell Teochew-style fishballs to the firewood merchants and workers.Son Ah Cai still preserved his father’s heritage. When asked what the secret to his fishballs was, he said it was a mixture of his father’s recipe, experience and dedication to making the balls fresh on the spot. Indeed, when the fishballs were running out, Ah Cai promptly went to the kitchen and made a few hundred more fishballs on the spot in front of my very eyes!Full Post at InSing.com – 73+1 Big and Springy FishballsTop 73+1 Handmade Fishball Noodle, 30 Raffles Avenue, #01-09/12
Opening hours: Sun-Thurs: 10.30am-10.30pm; Fri & Sat: 10.30am-11.30pm
(Also available at 48 Toh Guan Road East, Enterprise Hub)Other Related Entries
Singapore Food Trail (Flyer)
Ah Guan Mee Pok (Syed Awi)
Koka Wanton Noodles (North Bridge Road)
Bugis Street Ngak Seah Beef Kway Teow (Lavender)
Ah Tee Ko Ko Mee (Golden Mile)
2011-03-31 00:00:00
I Love Taimei – Enjoy a delicious piece of S.H.E!
The popular I Love Taimei opens another branch at the basement of Bugis Junction. And I ordered a Selina set ($7.20) which comprises a BBQ crispy chicken, side dish and bubble drink. While we may be familiar with deep-fried chicken pieces found at other similar kiosks, this alternative version is first deep-fried then barbequed on charcoal, showered with addictive BBQ powder. The result is a steamy piece of chicken that remains hot and moist.As to why the crispy chicken is named after S.H.E, it is to reflect the popularity of both this snack and the pop group. Similarly, their crispy cheese burger is called Jolin Tsai because of its ‘substantial size’. No joke.Full Post at InSing.com – One tasty S.H.E coming upI Love Taimei, #B1-K11a  Bugis Junction, 200 Victoria Street
Opening Hours: 11:00am – 10:00pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
I Love Taimei (Bugis Village)
Koi Bubbletea (Toa Payoh)
Share Tea (Wisma)
Drink Tea (NEX)
Artease Café (Cineleisure)
2011-03-23 00:00:00
Itacho Sushi – Now Open at Plaza Sing and Bugis
With long queues at Ion Orchard, Itacho Sushi (which means “chief chef” in Japanese) has already established a resounding reputation in Hong Kong, with 7 branches there and counting.  It has two new branches in Singapore, the second at Plaza Singapura and third at Bugis Junction.The key to any sushi is freshness. And Itacho imports its ingredients fresh directly from Japan’s Tsukiji fish market, Hokkaido and Kyushu. That is a major selling point, along with its mission to offer “first class food at a low price”.If you are a fan of chawanmushi, do not forget to try the steamed egg ($4.00). Let the smooth silky custard –like egg slip down your throat, with the crabmeat adding a touch of saltiness.Full Post at InSing.com – Itacho Sushi Opens at Plaza SingapuraItacho Sushi, Plaza Singapura, #02-35, 68 Orchard Road Singapore 238839
Mon – Thurs: 11:00 am – 10:00 pm, Fri – Sat: 11:00 am – 11:00 pm, Sun: 11:00 am – 10:00 pmOther Related Entries
Sushi Express (City Link Mall)
Tonkatsu (Mandarin Gallery)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
Box n Sticks
2011-03-21 00:00:00
TAB – All That Food, and All That Jazz
I am not sure how many of you remember the Ally McBeal series where the cast always gather at a local bar for music and drinks. Yes, Vonda Shepard. TAB at Orchard Hotel exactly reminds me of that. Finally, a place in Singapore where you can chill out and indulge in good music.Once you get past the rather dodgy Orchard Towers, you may be surprised at this live music venue, spanning three levels with a seating capacity of 250. The space is huge with an indoor mini-concert venue, think New York and London, think The Bowery Ballroom meets Ronnie Scott’s.Food wise, it is the usual pub grub, American-type mains and pasta. I was recommended the TAB Burger ($16.00), their special creation topped with cheddar cheese, cornichons and caramelised onions. Fortunately, the size of the burger was medium, not some oversized American version, suitable for my Asian gut. The bread was pan-fried tasty, but the minced beef patty could have been a lot juicier.I had a Linguine Al Funghi ($16), cooked in cream sauce with a medley of mushrooms. The cream sauce was thick and lacklustre. Let’s just say I had better.The better selections here seem to be the deep fried items, such as the Fish & Chips ($16.00). The thick dory went well with the beer batter which helped locked the moisture in. The homemade fries on side are interestingly made of sweet potato, and you can actually savour the essence of the potato within the spicy crispy batter.We had Malaysia singer Reza Salleh perform that night, and he is really one soulful crooner. Other acts include Michaela Therese, The Next Movement and Big Band group All That Jazz!  (Thank you Calvin Timo for the blog birthday treat!)TAB, 442 Orchard Road, #02-29 Orchard Hotel  Tel: +65 6493 6952
Opening Hours Tue–Thu: 5pm – 1am  Fri–Sat: 5pm – 3amOther Related Entries
15 Minutes (Lasalle)
Crazy World Café (Chinatown)
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Egg3 Café (Mountbatten)
Qafé (Tanjong Pagar)
2011-03-16 00:00:00
Mei Xiang Goreng Pisang – Go Bananas Over Them
Mei Xiang Goreng Pisang at Changi Village Food Centre has been enjoying loyal support for its crispy fried banana fritters. Owner Mdm Mary Teo proudly claims she can sell at least a few hundred a day. Judging from the long queues, yes. Other than bananas, there is a wide selection of fruits and tubers such as tapioca, yam, sweet potatoes, green bean and coconut.Do try the unique creation of the yam and pumpkin combination. Inspired by the dessert ‘orh nee’ (yam paste) at a Teochew restaurant, Mary created this ball-shaped snack resembling the Malay snack ‘banana bomb’. Best eaten piping hot, the yam-pumpkin paste will melt in your mouth, emitting fragrant goodness, and leaving little traces of oil.Full Post at InSing.com – Go Bananas Over FrittersMei Xiang Goreng Pisang, Blk 2 Changi Village Road #01-15 Changi Village Market and Food Centre
Opening hours: Tues-Sun: 9:30am-9:00pm; Closed on MonOther Related Entries
Eat May Know (Bendemeer)
Singapore Food Trail (Flyer)
Tiong Bahru Teochew Kueh
Ann Chin Popiah (Chinatown)
Lao Goh Carrot Cake (Zion Road)
2011-03-09 00:00:00
Ann Chin Popiah – The Same Goodness since 1940s
Ann Chin Popiah was founded by Mr Lim Kam Chwee, who brought this from Fujian to Singapore in the 1940s. The popiah skin is freshly made, very different from those machine-made ones which are generally hard and dry. You will get to savour the skin, which is delightfully thin and clear, and has a soft and rather chewy texture.The selling point is the fried ‘mang kwang’ (turnip), deliciously combined with the other ingredients such as hard-boiled egg, lettuce, bean sprouts and peanut. The popiah retains its moisture rather well, bursting with flavours, yet not breaking the fragile skin.Full Post at InSing.com – Same Goodness Since 1940sAnn Chin Popiah, Blk 335 Chinatown Complex Market Smith Street #02-112
Opening Hours: Mon-Fri: 10am-9pm; Sat-Sun: 9am – 9pm; closed on ThursOther Related Entries
Singapore Food Trail (Flyer)
Mei Xiang Goreng Pisang
Tiong Bahru Teochew Kueh
Bugis Street Ngak Seah Beef Kway Teow (Lavender)
Eat May Know (Bendemeer)
2011-03-03 00:00:00
McDonald’s new Chicken McGrill – Is It Any Good?
Somebody asked me as a food critic, if I eat McDonald’s? I mean, of course! A food critic should always give food a try – no discrimination right? Well, as part of its menu evolution, McDonald’s has launched the Chicken McGrill menu range.Grill is the new tasty at McDonald’s, and they are committed to using grill as a cooking style for its chicken. If there is a healthier and yet tastier option, why not?The new Chicken McGrill has a chicken thigh meat marinated with teriyaki sauce and no patty is used. The result? A rather tender, juicy, semi-sweet meat piece that actually taste real for once. The home-style chargrill sauce is nicely balanced without being too overwhelming or strong in taste.Plus, no shredded lettuce is used, so no clumsy falling off of pale-looking greens. The bakery-style sourdough bun is a refreshing change from the usual uniform buns, only that it is a tad too thick and dry for my liking.As with all new McDonald’s items, it must come with some shaker fries. This time the flavour comes in the form of Honey Chipotle. Sweet, but nothing ground-breaking. I suppose the taste complements the chargrill sauce of the burger, but I wished for a stronger and lasting powder.My main complain? The burger looked nothing like the huge glossy giant displayed in the posters. And for $8.40 for a meal, that is a sign of rampant inflation. (All right, McDonald’s is not going to get me to endorse any items with this.)Other Related Entries
Most Original Burger MOB (Vivocity)
Everything With Fries (Orchard Central)
Burger Shack (Bt Timah)
Burger, Bench & Bar (Orchard Cineleisure)
Artease Café (Cineleisure)
2011-03-02 00:00:00
Thaksin Beef Noodles – Thai Noodles Fit for Royalty
This stall has a very catchy and unforgettable name. In case you are wondering, no, it is not opened by the former Prime Minister of Thailand.Owner Jaesen Ng initially wanted to name his stall after the Thai King when he started business in 1993. But when the name of a monarchy was not allowed to be used, he went for the next best alternative – The Prime Minister.The Beef Value Bowl ($4.50) arrived blanketed with generous portions of parsley, basil leaves and beansprouts. The kway teow was slippery smooth and flat, with a distinct taste that totally reminded me of those I had in MBK Thailand.Full Post at InSing.com – Thai Noodles Fit For RoyaltyThakSin Beef Noodles, 449 Clementi Avenue 3 #01-211
Opening hours: Daily: 10.30am-10pmOther Related Entries
First Thai (Purvis Street)
Thai Noodle House (Coronation Road)
Flying Chillis (313 @ Somerset)
Porn’s (Liang Seah)
MBK Foodcourt (Thailand)
2011-02-25 00:00:00
Singapore Food Trail – Best of Singapore at the Flyer
After the success of the film It’s a Great Great World, it seems like nostalgia is the new black. The Singapore Food Trail, a unique 1960s themed food street, has officially opened at the iconic Singapore Flyer.Some people may be initially sceptical about using the olden days mood as a backdrop, “Didn’t the other food court chain already use this concept?”. The Singapore Food Trail seems to want to make it right with a combination of the best heritage hawker fare, some authentic  décor thrown in, and a lot a lot of good food. It really reminded me of the movie setting.Food lovers will be able to enjoy famous local dishes and old-time favourites like ice balls, and Kachang Puteh. The exciting line-up include 16 well-known stalls from High Street Tai Wah Pork Noodle, Boon Tat Street Barbeque Seafood, Sin Ming Road Rong Chen Bak Kut Teh, Alhambra Satay Club Satay, Whampoa Nagoh Hiang Prawn Cracker to old-time favourites like Chinatown Ann Chin Popiah and Selera’s Adam Road Nasi Lemak.What really strikes me is that many of these established stalls took some time to be convinced to set up their second stall here at the Flyer. Here are some of my favourites.Old Airport Road Satay Beehoon & Satay Celup
This satay sauce is thick and fragrant, blanketing the bee hoon with peanut and shrimp flavoured goodness. The sauce is amazingly not watery or oily, so smooth it blends so well with the rest of the ingredients.Sin Ming Road Rong Chen Bak Kut Teh
This Teochew-style soup is clear with heavy garlic and peppery flavours. While it does not look impressive, the soup is surprisingly tasty yet light without the strong porky taste. What stand out is the 7-inch long rib loins, so tender that it rips off easily from the bones.Lagoon Kampong Rojak
This famous stall at East Coast Lagoon Food Centre serves excellent rojak and cuttlefish kangkong. The youtiao remains crisp even after a long time, so irresistible and addictive. The peanut hei gor sauce is a wonderful mixture that lightly covers every part of the ingredients.In fact, every stall here is worth a try, and is probably a wise choice to bring your family or foreign friends to have a taste of Singapore’s best.Singapore Food Trail 新加坡路边摊, Singapore Flyer
Opening Hours, Sun to Thurs: 10:30am to 10:30pm, Fri to Sat: 10:30am to 11:30pmOther Related Entries
Mei Xiang Goreng Pisang
Top 73+1 Handmade Fishball Noodle
Ann Chin Popiah (Chinatown)
2011-02-21 00:00:00
Seng Kee – Kaki Bukit Kidney Mee Sua
The kidney mee sua ($5.00) from Seng Kee arrived in a dark red bowl, overspread by dark coloured thick soup which emitted steamy smells of herbal goodness. When scooped up, there were generous portions of neatly cut pieces of kidney and lean pork slices which melt tenderly in your mouth.If you like your soup herbal and slightly peppery, this will be your heaven on a cool rainy weather. Plus it is not so overpowering that is obscures the taste of the pork. The best part of the soup was the mee sua, silky smooth and not overcooked till mushy.Full Post at InSing.com – Kidney Mee SuaSeng Kee, Kaki Bukit 511 Market and Food Centre, Blk 511 Bedok North Street 3 #01-31/32
Opening Hours: 5pm-4am (Daily)Other Related Entries
Soon Lee Fire-Pot Stew Beef (Alexandra Food Village)
Tiong Bahru Teochew Kueh
Eat May Know (Bendemeer)
Ah Tee Ko Ko Mee (Golden Mile)
Ann Chin Popiah (Chinatown)
2011-02-17 00:00:00
Chilli Crab Pizza – And It Goes Oh Là Là
The combination is too good to be true – chilli crab pizza. Imagine one of Singapore’s most iconic food of chilli crab with the signature viscous spicy sauce on top of a skinny thin crusty pizza.Found at True Heritage Brew’s Singapore Sling Boutique, the pub has revamped its menu to allow its foreign customers to have the taste of the best of both worlds.The chilli crab pizza ($14.80) had a suitably thin crust, topped with a specially prepared chilli crab sauce. I thought it looked somewhat ordinary. But when I sank my teeth into it, I was taken aback when the juice spurted out of the soft shell crab, sending the warm succulent sauce lingering all over my taste buds. Never judge a book by its cover, and never judge a pizza by its appearance!Another one of my favourite was the lamb masala pizza ($12.80). While it was not recommended on the menu (possibly not many fancy lamb), I liked how the many spices blended into a mild but interesting flavour. Plus, the pizzas were freshly prepared with every order, assuring the cheese was still warm and chewy.The chilli crab spaghetti ($14.80) was another highlight. It was spaghetti topped with tempura soft shelled crab, again with chilli crab sauce poured all over. That was some creative juice, but could do with better execution with more more more sauce and more bite on the noodles.It was challenging trying to blend in Singapore’s most familiar taste into something foreign. Therefore, the black pepper crab spaghetti ($14.80) tasted too ‘ang moh’ and clean for me, and could do with more of the oily peppery spicy stuff that we liked.This East meets West culinary fusion seems to be the in-thing now. So how about black pepper chicken wings and crispy fried dipped in chilli crab sauce. Idea right?True Heritage Brew, 3B River Valley Road, #01-05 The Foundry, Clarke Quay, Singapore Tel: +65 6334 4033
Opening Hours: Sun–Wed: 1pm – 12am, Thu–Sat & PH eve: 1pm – 2amOther Related Entries
Singapore Sling Boutique (Clarke Quay)
Verve Pizzeria (One North)
Toby’s The Dessert Asylym (Parkway Parade)
LENAS (Bugis Junction)15 Minutes (Lasalle)
2011-02-16 00:00:00
Penang Road Café – Chin Ho Chiak
This restaurant is set up for a simple but beautiful reason – to fulfill the dreams of a wife. Owner Alan Lim of Penang Road Café always knew his wife wanted a little shop of her own, and decided to open this place to share her brilliant culinary skills with everyone.The Penang Char Koay Teow by Mrs Lim ($6.00) is highly recommended. The stir-fried rice noodles with prawns, cockles and lap cheong and bean sprouts is not oily or sweet, full of authentic home-cooked goodness like those I tried at George Town. Plus the fresh beansprouts are a significant crunchy bonus.Full Post at InSing.com – Penang Road Cafe Opens275 Thomson Road #01-08 Novena Ville Tel: +65 6256 3218
Opening Hours: Daily 11am–3pm, 6pm–9.30pmOther Related Entries
Jason’s Penang Cuisine (ABC Market)
Chinta Manis
IVINS Peranakan Restaurant (Jalan Leban Road)
Bugis Street Ngak Seah Beef Kway Teow (Lavender)
Singapore Food Trail (Flyer)
2011-02-11 00:00:00
Charlie Brown Café – Immerse in the Childhood Spirit
Many of us grew up reading the comic strip of Charlie Brown, the born loser with the big heart and determination. This café is likely to bring you fond memories of Peanuts and Snoopy, and is an easy and welcoming place to hang around on a lazy afternoon.The Charlie’s all-time favourite breakfast ($6.80) I had was a simple make-up of two fried eggs, turkey ham and crepes. However, the unadorned food ironically makes you feel that you are eating a kid’s meal. Never too filling, never too fulfilling. Go for the desserts then.Full Post at InSing.com – Charlie Brown Café is still child’s playCharlie Brown Cafe, 313 Somerset Orchard Road, #01-25/25A (Discovery Walk) Singapore 238895 Tel: +65 6836 5344
Opening Hours: Mon-Thurs: 8am-11pm; Fri &; Sat: 8am-12amOther Related Entries
Pitstop Café (Circular Road)
Hairloom & Caramel (Shaw Towers)
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Joan Bowen Café (Macpherson)
White Dog Café (Vivocity)
2011-02-08 00:00:00
Ah Tee Ko Ko Mee – Selling Noodles with a Rhythm
Back in the 1960s, every noodle stall from fishball noodles to wanton noodles had a different rhythm to hit on bamboo sticks to attract the attention of customers. This hitting created a “Ko Ko” sound and therefore the birth of ‘Ah Tee Ko Ko Mee’.The Ko Ko Noodles’ ($3.00/$3.50) highlight was the char siew and sauce. I could taste a touch of ketchup other than the usual combination of chilli sauce, vinegar and soya sauce.  The ketchup complimented well with the chilli sauce and gave the noodles a more layered savour.Full Post at InSing.com – ko ko mee—a taste of historyAh Tee Ko Ko Mee, 505 Beach Road #01-88 Golden Mile Food CentreOther Related Entries
Ah Guan Meepok
Koka Wanton Mee
Hua Kee Wanton Mee
Pontian Wanton Noodles
Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodle
2011-02-07 00:00:00
I Love Taimei – Order a piece of Selina, Ella and Hebe?
Consider it cheap thrill to order a piece of Selina, Elle and Hebe. I wonder how fans of S.H.E will feel to know that these are actually the names of the BBQ Crispy Chicken, Extra Crispy Chicken and Lemon Crispy Chicken sold at I Love Taimei 我愛台妹. So cute actually.The other starlets are not spared with 蔡依零, 林志零, 大S and 小S as part of the menu of this kiosk. They are just pieces of chicken (sound very wrong yah), and Taiwanese streetside food such as meesua and tempura. Clever use of the Mando-pop song. This is a total dig and I love it.So I told the cashier I wanted 杨丞零 set, and was presented with extra crispy nuggets, a side dish and a cup of bubble tea all for the price of $6.40.My 杨丞零 came piping hot, so tender moist and un-oily, blanketed with crisp batter layer, showered with peppery chili powder. Eating by the roadside on a cooling Singapore weather, it felt so Taiwan.The variety of side dishes was aplenty with tofu fries, shake2 fries, sour plum sweet potato, chicken tail, sotong ball or chicken skin. The shake shake fries with came in a conical container was just the ultimate nibble – so light and salty with curry flavoured poweder it tasted better than those offered by that other fast food restaurant. Opps.While the bubble tea was not Koi-tastic or Gong- rrific, it was still a decent cup of milky delight with chewy pearls.I hear that I Love Taimei 我愛台妹 has opened at a branch at Bugis Junction Basement. So time to pay a visit to try out 阿Mei.52 Queen Street #ABFL-21 Singapore Tel: +65 6336 5987 (At the back of Bugis Village, near Illuma)
Opening Hours: 12pm – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
I Love Taimei (Bugis)
Share Tea (Wisma)
Drink Tea (NEX)
HK Gong Cha v SG Gong Cha
Artease Café (Cineleisure)
2011-02-01 00:00:00
Sun Coffee Planet – Your 24-hour Breakfast Place
A new 24-hour coffee place opens! Located near the main Killiney Kopitiam, Sun Coffee Planet provides similar offerings such as toast and coffee, with the addition of local delights such as curry chicken, assam laska, fried kway tiao and mee goreng.I had the traditional toast set ($3.70) comprising of 2 toasts, 2 half-boiled eggs and one coffee/tea. Some patrons who do not like the thin and crunchy version of Yakun may just prefer the thicker and softer bread here. Skip the wanton mee though, for it is dry and tasteless.Full Post at InSing.com – New 24-hour breakfast place opensSun Coffee Planet has closed at 75 Killiney Road
It is still available at 54 Zion Road, Tel: +65 6737 0562
Opening Hours: 24 hours DailyOther Related Entries
BigBank Café (Killiney Road)
Chin Mee Chin (East Coast)
OldTown White Coffee (Bt Timah)
Tom N Toms Coffee (ICON Village)
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
2011-01-28 00:00:00
瓦 Wǎ – Not Your Usual Claypot Rice
This new claypot shop 瓦 wǎ  hails from a successful claypot restaurant in Petaling Jaya, which has been around for more than 30 years. The boss’s son decides to venture out to Singapore armed with his secret family recipe and creative twists to the claypot dishes.The traditional claypot rice ($9.20) has the addition of an egg prepared Japanese style. Runny and lovely, best with cripsy lightly burnt rice. Another different style is the claypot pandan rice ($10.20) which came with rendang chicken on the side. While I wished that the rice was more fragrant and coconutty, the spicy and mouthwatering chicken would appeal to those who like homely Malaysian-styled food.Full Post at InSing.com – Wa! Not your usual claypot riceWa, 8 Grange Road #04-01  Cathay Cineleisure Orchard
Opening Hours: 11.30am to 11.00pm (Sun – Thurs) 11.30am to 2.00 am (Fri-Sat, Eve of Public Holiday)Other Related Entries
Golden Mile Claypot Rice (Golden Mile)
Loy Kee Chicken Rice (Balestier)
Beach Road Scissor Cut Curry Rice (Jalan Besar)
Sin Kee Chicken Rice (Margaret Drive)
2011-01-27 00:00:00
It’s very Taiwan this Chinese New Year
It’s very Taiwan this Chinese New Year. If you walk down the Chinatown street bazaar, it won’t be too exaggerating to say that 20% of the stalls are selling some Taiwan goodie… … Mochi ball, fruit jelly, pineapple tarts, peanuts and anchovies.Why the trend? The flavours are aplenty. You can get Taiwan jellies from mango, lychee, strawberry , green apple to lychee, green tea and black sugar. They make the otherwise boring and predictable new year goodies different.Oh, and the packaging is all so pretty and cute, each item individually wrapped in colourful paper. This also ensures minimal wastage to the food. How many times have you opened an entire bottle of something, only to find it lao hong after a while?Since don’t know when I have been buying mocha balls for new year, and relatives keep asking me where I got them from. (I hate to say $5 at Chinatown for a big packet.) Having something rare to offer your auntie always helps, but hey, Taiwanese goodies are no longer unusual okay?I chanced upon this Sunnyhills stall at Funan the IT mall, which sells nothing but Taiwanese Feng Li Shu. At $13.80 for a box of 6, they are not exactly cheap but are selling well.It is not all the time you can say that your pineapple tarts are made of 100% organic pineapples, New Zealand butter, and premium eggs which come from chickens which listen to classical music. And the beautiful packaging makes all that difference for gift exchange.Serve your favourite (or least favourite) auntie a premium pineapple tart, and tell her it is from Taiwan. It will impress her.Other Related Entries
Favourite Chinese New Year Goodies
SunnyHills Singapore (Raffles Hotel)
2011-01-25 00:00:00
Eat May Know – Longest and Crispiest Yau Char Kway
Old Mr Lim was initially a rojak seller who sold youtiao after a quarrel with his supplier. The dough fritters at 食就知 are freshly made every morning in the stall by Mr Lim’s four children. The crispy and light fritters tasted best when dipped into soya bean milk. Also, these foot-long sticks were the largest I had seen sold in Singapore.According to folklore, Yau Char Kway literally means ‘deep-frying the devil’, made in this shape to represent a traitorous couple who betrayed Chinese patriot Yue Fei. Therefore, it is best eaten piping hot right out of the frying wok. Eat and you will know. 食了就知！Full Post at InSing.com – Longest and crispiest you tiao!Eat May Know, #01-32 Bendemeer Market & Food Centre, Blk 29 Bendemeer Road, Singapore 330029
Opening Hours: 8am to 6pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Lao Goh Carrot Cake (Zion Road)
Mei Xiang Goreng Pisang (Changi Village)
Tiong Bahru Teochew Kueh (Tiong Bahru)
Ann Chin Popiah (Chinatown)
Singapore Food Trail (Flyer)
2011-01-21 00:00:00
Your Favourite CNY Goodies
It’s time to pile on those calories once again with those wonderfully tasty Chinese New Year goodies. They are always all around, yet taste better as the dong-dong-dong chiang season approaches. Strange yah. Here’s rounding up some of my favourite CNY goodies. What’s yours?Egg Rolls
Hand-made love letters are really a rare find now. Many also end up being too brownish or ‘lao hong’ (not cripsy) when it is not packaged properly.  Kedai Kue Kue’s love letters are hand-made at a Central Kitchen in Singapore, and yet assures a consistent quality. Light and crisp, they are so fluffy the rolls crumble on one bite.Bak Kwa
Lim Chee Guan is Singapore’s best known Bak Kwa, attracting the longest queue every Chinese New Year. This pioneer Bak Kwa, founded since 1938, is a winner in every way.  The meat slices are addictive when barbequed to a slight charred outer layer, with its thin tender meat bursting a mix of sweet salty flavours that is so sinfully good to suck. Never too oily, never too burnt.But at the adjustment of $3 more this year to $46 per kg, these slices look set to cross the $50 mark. Still worth it?Pineapple Tarts
I enjoy the big fat golf ball type of pineapple tarts, rather than the usual flower-shaped ones as it seems to contain more pineapple paste. The pineapple tarts at Le Café Confectionery and Pastry are generously filled with tasty sweet pineapple fillings. What’s equally appealing is its crumply pastry full of buttery fragrance.Kuih Bahulu
At Warisan Recipe found at Boon Lay Shopping Centre, you’ll find a variety of the kuih bahulu, including flavours such as chocolate rice, pandan, cheese, durian and strawberry ($2.80 for 10). For something more unusual, there’s the gula Melaka flavoured bahulu ($5.20 for a box of 18). Soft, spongy and slightly dry, these traditional cakes taste best when eaten fresh and dipped in hot milo or coffee.Peanut Puff
Glory Catering is known for producing a wide range of traditional Chinese New Year and kueh kuehs. Their mini peanut puff, otherwise known as Kok Chai, is a simple snack with delicious peanut fillings. The sizes are consistent, and crust never too hard and thick.Other Related Entries
Warisan Receipe (Boon Lay)
2011-01-18 00:00:00
Dessert Cup – Sinful Indulgence in a Cup
Imagine luxurious parfaits, semi-frozen creams, fresh fruits, exciting sauces, toppings and even a lava cake found out within a cup. Dessert Cup at Raffles City serves all their gourmet desserts in a cup, thus their name.I must say that the cupcakes are gorgeous, too attractive to be eaten. I bought a pecan praline cupcake ($4.50) which was a pretty little thing that shimmered in the light with gold dust sprinkled on its topping. It was pricey but delicious – thick, moist and fluffy at the same time. The bad news – there is no seating area here.Full Post at InSing.com – Dessert Cup – Sinful Indulgence in a CupDessert Cup, 252, North Bridge Road, Raffles City Shopping Centre, B1-73
Opening Hours: Mon – Thurs: 10:30 am – 10:00 pm; Fri – Sat: 10:30 am – 10:30 pm; Sun: 10:30 am – 10:00 pmOther Related Entries
3 Inch Sin (Bt Timah)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
Hairloom & Caramel (Shaw Towers)
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
The Cheescake Café (East Coast)
2011-01-17 00:00:00
Macau Munch – Craving for Pork Chop Bun?
Fans of this bun will be surprised that such this Macau delicacy is actually available at a coffeeshop right opposite Bugis Junction.The Macau pork chop bun ($4 for a set with a drink) was one of the best I have tried here. The bun was firm on the outside, and soft on the inside. And what set it apart from the rest was its tender and thin pork, suitably marinated till sweet and juicy without the porky aftertaste.Full Post at InSing.com – Macau Pork Chop Munch;Macau Munch, 492 North Bridge Road Seng Huat Eating House
Opening Hours: 24 Hours DailyOther Related Entries
Old Hong Kong Tea House (Katong) 
HK Kim Gary Restaurant (Vivocity)
Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong (TripleOne)
Canton-I (Ion Orchard)
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
2011-01-14 00:00:00
Mien – What Pasta Meets Laksa
Laska Pasta? No, you are not reading wrong. One of Singapore’s signature local dish, Laska, has been united with Italy’s Pasta to be a fascinating out-of-this-world dish, almost like a love story come true. And it’s found at a hawker centre!Served within minutes of ordering, the Laska Pasta from “Mien” emitted a familiar spicy aroma. The portion was generous, and the moist sauce and flat texture of the pasta someone reminded me of hokkien mee. Unfortunately, the novelty combination was at odds for me, and not piping hot enough. Call me boring, but I still preferred my laksa with thick vermicelli with lots of lemak (coconut milk).Full Post at InSing.com – When Pasta Meets Laska>Mien, 116 Upper Bukit Timah Road #02-195 Bukit Timah Market and Food CentreOther Related Entries
Can You Name The Pastas
Kopitiam
Jason Penang Cuisine
15 Minutes
The Verve
2011-01-13 00:00:00
Youmenya Goemon – Spaghetti with Chopsticks
Yomenya Goemon has revolutionised spaghetti-eating in Japan, where the Italian pasta is cooked the Japanese way. The store has become extremely popular since its inception in 1976, with 2500 stores and counting. And it has finally made its way to Singapore at the new commercial district Marina Bay Financial Centre.The eatery sells only spaghettis, with an interesting and diverse variety of 32 flavours. As a lover of cream-sauced pastas, I ordered a carbonara with yolk and bacon. And it was divine!  While the sauce was creamy and cheesy, you would not really get sick eating it because it was suitably flavoursome. The lunch sets are indeed value-for-money, with a ‘half and half’ set of two spaghettis costing only $18++.Full Post at InSing.com – Pasta – The Japanese Way?Youmenya Goemon, Marina Bay Link Mall, #B2-03 Singapore 018984 Tel: 65094670
11am to 10pm dailyOther Related Entries
Tonkatsu (Mandarin Gallery)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
SUN Japanese Dining (Chijmes)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
Box n Sticks
2011-01-11 00:00:00
Tiong Bahru Teochew Kueh – A Taste of Traditional Goodness
Ever wondered why a Teochew Kueh is shaped like a peach and is usually pink in colour? The Teochew Kueh, also known as a ‘red peach cake’, is actually a symbol of longevity as peaches are often used as offerings in Chinese religious ceremonies.At Tiong Bahru Teochew Kueh, the Peng Kueh was smooth and chewy on its skin with generous fillings of glutinous rice and soft peanuts. Dipped with dark sauce and chilli, the cakes brought back several fond childhood memories. You can also choose the fragrant pan-fried versions where the outer layer will be fried crispy.Full Post at InSing.com – Zoe Tay’s favourite Teochew kueh?#02-02 Tiong Bahru Market & Food Centre
Open Hourings:7am – 2pm; closed on MondaysOther Related Entries
Soon Lee Fire-Pot Stew Beef (Alexandra Food Village)
Mei Xiang Goreng Pisang
Mien (Bukit Timah)
Ann Chin Popiah (Chinatown)
Eat May Know (Bendemeer)
2011-01-07 00:00:00
Dapao – Nasi Lemak and Briyani Wraps?
What a familiar and colloquial sounding shop name! Dapao wants to bring fun and healthy wraps to the corporate crowd around Far East Square. This can be seen from the varied flavours offered, which are created from Singaporean and Southeast Asian delights.Therefore, you will find interesting wraps such as Black Pepper Chicken, Nasi Lemak, Chicken Rendang and Curried Vegetables! Owner Christina Crane has made slight tweaks to the local recipe to make the wraps just a bit healthier, without preservatives or chemicals. Hawker food lovers may find this too bland for their liking.Full Post at InSing.com – ‘Dapao’ a briyani wrap!Dapao, 4 Amoy St #01-01 Far East Square Tel: +65 6557 0686
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri: 8am – 6pm (Closed on Sat–Sun)Other Related Entries
Out Of The Pan (Raffles City)
Barcelos (Novena) 
LENAS (Bugis Junction)Joe & Dough (Suntec)
Charlie Brown Café (Somerset)
2011-01-06 00:00:00
Ah Tai – Tai-rrific Taiwan Delights
If you crave for Taiwanese food, look no further. You can find delicious and genuine Taiwanese delights right here at Chinatown.The braised pork rice ($3.50 for set with soup) at Ah Tai was a simple dish of braised pork belly on Japanese pearl rice topped with marinated egg. Based on a Taiwanese family recipe, the rice indeed tasted homely and unpretentious.I was astounded by its superior and classic quality of the Taiwanese mee sua ($1.90), probably the best I tasted in Singapore. It was no wonder because the mee sua was imported directly from ‘Ah Zong Mian Xian‘.Full Post at InSing.com – Tai-rific Taiwanese Xiao Chi335 Smith Street #02-10 Chinatown Complex Market S050335
Opening Hours: Mon – Sat, 10:00am – 8:00pm; Closed on SunOther Related Entries
Xi Men Ding (Vivocity)
Lai Lai Family Restaurant (Bugis)
Lu Gang Xiao Zhen (Ion Orchard)
Yong He Eating House (Geylang)
Must Try Food in Taipei
2011-01-05 00:00:00
Joe & Dough – What is a Cup of ‘Joe’?
You may wonder what is a “cup of Joe”? It is commonly known as a cup of coffee, derived from Josephus Daniels, an ex-Secretary of the US Navy who banned alcohol on ships and so his men turned to the next strongest drink. A cup of coffee subsequently became known as “a cup of Joe”.New café Joe & Dough at Suntec City is the place to have an aromatic “cup of Joe” and a hearty sandwich at the same time.I had a ham, cheese & sundried tomato sandwich ($7.50) – a satisfying and filling meal with thinly sliced honey baked ham, sundried tomatoes, mozzarella cheese and iceberg lettuce. Considering that I am not a carb-person, the best part was the bread which had a crispy crust with a faint sweet tomato flavour.Full Post at InSing.com – Come Chilli Out With JoeJoe & Dough, 3 Temasek Boulevard #01-156 Suntec City Mall Tower 4 (Level 1, beside Carrefour) Singapore 038983
Opening Hours: 7.30am – 9.30pm (Sun – Fri) 9.00am – 9.30pm (Sat, Public Holidays)Other Related Entries
Charlie Brown Café (Somerset)
OldTown White Coffee (Bt Timah)
Tom N Toms Coffee (ICON Village)
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
Sun Coffee Planet (Killiney)
2010-12-24 00:00:00
Share Tea 歇脚亭 – Taiwan’s No 1 Bubble Tea is in Orchard
Wisma has a revamp to its basement with new shops such as Mr Bean, Sour Sally (a yoghurt place) and of course, a new bubble tea shop.This is Share Tea 歇脚亭 first venture in Singapore. Share Tea has over 90 outlets in Taiwan and has gained a very strong base of loyal fans, also claiming to be the No. 1 brand in Taiwan. It has a reasonable queue (less than 10 pax) even though it is at Orchard.For some basis of comparison, I ordered a Classic Pearl Milk Tea ($3.50 for L). The service staff was extremely polite, very Taiwanese in asking, and could proof to be too detailed for a very hurrying-Singapore culture.The milk tea did not have a strong tea aftertaste, and but if you liked beverage milky, this could be your best option. It was the pearls that proved to be the winning edge, very soft-spongy-squashy. In fact, the softest I have tried here, not the usual hard bouncy chewy ones.  Great to do mouth aerobics with.A friend ordered a Grass Jelly with Fresh Milk. While we are used to have soya bean milk with grass jelly, this mixture was really quite delightful. The milk had a slight sweet tinge and was thick layered, which was a pleasant accompaniment to the plainer slippery jelly. The price was pretty steep for $5 for a small cup though. Very pricery, would have cost much less in NT.Share Tea’s speciality is also in the natural fruit tea, said to be freshly squeezed and frozen to -40 degrees so that consumers all over the world are able to enjoy a consistent cup.Share Tea, Wisma Atria 435 Orchard Road #B1-45 Tel +65 6733 7507Other Related Entries
Koi Bubbletea (Toa Payoh)
Drink Tea (NEX)
Woobbee (Tanjong Pagar)
The Battle of the Bubble Teas
HK Gong Cha v SG Gong Cha
2010-12-22 00:00:00
Drink Tea 水研社 – Bubble Tea with Pink Coloured Pearls
Another bubble tea shop opens – and I have lost track on the number of newbies. Drink Tea 水研社 opens its second brand (first branch at Bedok) at NEX Serangoon Central. What’s special about the bubble tea is that the pearls are pink!Drink Tea’s signature pink pearls are made from Roselle Plant extract. The roselle plant has been said to have medical qualities, that it can be used as a treatment to reduce hypertension and fatigue. I can believe that the plant can have medicinal properties, but I hardly suspect those pearls will have any.The brand has been established in 2006 in Taiwan, with more than 30 years of professional experience in wholesale tea business. Other than allowing you to choose your sugar level, customers can choose the ice level (normal ice, less ice, no ice) for the same price. I wished all fruit juice stalls can apply the same principle.Service is slow, so do be prepared to wait.The pearls were indeed chewier and slightly sweeter than the usual ordinary brands. I like it that they were soft enough and fun to chew.While the tea was made from Taiwanese tea, and the brewed tea are not kept for more than four hours to ensure freshness and quality, the taste was nothing to scream about. Perhaps we are pampered by all the other more established brands around.Drink Tea, NEX, 23 Serangoon Central, #B2-52 Tel: +65 6634 2416
Opening Hours: 11.15am – 10.30pm (Mon–Fri) 10:15am – 10:30pm (Sat-Sun)Other Related Entries
HK Gong Cha v SG Gong Cha
Artease Café (Cineleisure)
Koi Bubbletea (Toa Payoh)
Share Tea (Wisma)
The Battle of the Bubble Teas
2010-12-20 00:00:00
Warisan Recipe – Kuih Bahulu Brings Back Childhood Memories
It never occurred to me that a shop could survive selling Kuih Bahulu. Warisan Recipe, which produces Kuih Bahulu, muffins and waffles, is located at faraway Boon Lay Shopping Centre. Surprisingly, it enjoyed a continuous flow of patrons even though I was there on a weekday afternoon.They have given the traditional cake a modern take with appealing flavours such as chocolate rice, pandan, cheese, durian and strawberry. Soft, spongy and slightly dry,  I must say these traditional cakes taste best when eaten fresh and dipped in hot milo or coffee.Full Post at InSing.com – Recipe for Sweet NostalgiaBlock 221 Boon Lay Place, #01-120 Boon Lay Shopping Centre Tel: 62652343
Opening hours: 9.30am-9.30pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
The Cheescake Café (East Coast)
Hairloom & Caramel (Shaw Towers)
3 Inch Sin (Bt Timah)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
2010-12-16 00:00:00
Best Food Newcomers of 2010
There is no stopping of new makan places opening up in Singapore, with ‘eating’ considered as one of Singaporean’s top favourite pastime. The two IRs Resorts World and Marina Sands, and new shopping malls like Ion Orchard, 313 @ Somerset, NEX, Marina Bay Link Mall has brought us exciting new food choices. 2010 is the year of new eateries, with an estimated thousand restaurants set up this year.2010 is also a year of food trends, with Taiwanese bubble tea, Japanese ramen, Shanghainese Xiao Lao Bao, fast food offering burgers, fried chicken and fries taking centre stage. Singaporeans also like to take their time in the fast-moving city, and we start seeing more cafés, tea places and dessert houses.Daniel rounds up some of the best newcomers in 2010, which brought us our favourite ramen, xiao long bao, desserts, fries and hawker food.Japanese Ramen – Ippudo Tao

Ramen fans should be familiar with Ippudo, started by Ramen King Shigemi Kawakara, which attracted queues at its branch at Mandarin Gallery and created a ramen crave. Count the number of new ramen places in 2010. With a shorter queue, more vibrant environment, Kushiyaki, and the two Tao signature ramens Kuro (Black) and Aka (Red), this is one red hot Ramen place that leaves you slurping your ramen broth to the last drop.Café – K ki ケーキHusband and wife pair Kenneth and Delphine gave up their daily jobs to set up this modest and characteristic cafe at Ang Siang Hill. The Japanese inspired cakes are divine. My love was Kinabaru layered with flavours of light coconut mousse, bright yellow passion fruit crème and a soft chocolate base. Its delicate taste would melt in your mouth, blow you away and send you to dessert heaven.Chinese Restaurant – Paradise Dynasty at IonFoie Gras and Cheese Xiao Long Bao may not be everybody’s style of XLB. This multi-flavoured Xiao Long Bao has trilled XLB fans, each dumpling promising to stimulate taste buds and thrill senses with the multi-coloured offering. To ensure the optimum tasting of the distinct flavours, you have to start eating with the white original flavour, moving along to more adventurous Black Truffle and Cheesy, ending with the reddish Szechuan dumpling.Fastfood – Rock & AshRock & Ash redefines fast-food, with a casual, cosy restaurant setting with service counters like a fast food outlet. The made-to-order thick-cut golden fries were crispy on the outside and fluffy on the inside, making it a really addictive snack. This newcomer at Marina Link has lots of potential, offering exciting homemade dips from wasabi mayo, black pepper, mayo and chilli to the rather peculiar chocolate and lemon curd sauces.Hawker Stall – Ah Tai (Chinatown)Surprise surprise, you can find delicious and genuine Taiwanese delights right here at Chinatown Complex Market. Ah Tai serves homely Taiwanese fare, takes time to serve you your chicken cutlet, along with friendly Taiwanese customer service. A crowd pleaser was braised pork rice and mee sua. The vermicelli was probably the best I tasted in Singapore. It was no wonder because the mee sua was imported directly from Ah Zong Mian Xian which had a reputation unsurpassed in Taipei.Other Related Entries
Ippudo Tao
K ki ケーキ
Paradise Dynasty
<a href="http://danielfooddiary.com/2010/12/03/rocknash/
Ah Tai (Chinatown)
2010-12-14 00:00:00
Hong Kong Sun Kee Desserts – What’s Next at NEX
The Nex in Serangoon Central is the latest shopping mall that is creating a buzz among Singaporean shoppers and diners. Despite carpark woes, narrow walkways and the ubiquitous retail shops, crowds have continued packing it in.I had a meal at Hong Kong Sun Kee Desserts. The Hong Kong Braised Beef Noodle ($6.80) had springy noodles and tender beef, but the seasoning was so plain that it felt like the cooks forgot to include any sauces.  Perhaps the strength of Hong Kong Sun Kee was really in its desserts, with many choices sold out rather early.Full Post at InSing.com – Tempting Hong Kong Style BitesHong Kong Sun Kee Desserts, B1-46 23 Serangoon Central NEX
Opening Hours: 10:00am-10:30pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Ah Chew Desserts
Honeymoon Desserts (Vivocity)
Ji De Chi (Liang Seah)
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong (TripleOne)
2010-12-13 00:00:00
Jason Penang Cuisine – He Wants You To Have The Penang Experience
Penang-born Jason Khaw and his wife are known for selling traditional Penang food, winning several hawker awards along the way. The authenticity of his signature dishes of Penang assam laksa, fried kway tiao and prawn noodles have earned his stall many fans.Unknown to many, the humble hawker was the British High Commissioner’s Resident Chef for 14 years, assuring a high quality in his food. I liked the Penang assam laksa. So authentic. So good. It was also not as sour and spicy as I expected it to be, with a wide assortment of ingredients with finishing touches of mint leaves and chilli padi.Full Post at InSing.com – An Interview with Jason KhawJason Penang Cuisine, ABC Market #01-113, Blk 6 Jalan Bukit Merah
Opening hours: 11:00am-2:30pm, 5:30pm-9:00pm (Closed Mon)Other Related Entries
Penang Road Cafe (Novena)
Chinta Manis
IVINS Peranakan Restaurant (Jalan Leban Road)
Ah Tee Ko Ko Mee (Golden Mile)
Pontian Wanton Mee (Far East Plaza)
2010-12-09 00:00:00
Qafé – Quirky Qafé by Irene Ang Opens
When a café sells dishes such as ‘Hunky beef stew’, ‘Wholesome threesome’ and ‘My macho nachos’, you know that the person naming them must be rather eccentric and quirky as well.Then you realise that this new western-fusion café is opened by none other than CEO of Fly Entertainment, comedian, host and actress Irene Ang.The menu can be described as rather ‘chapalang’ (mixed) and fun. For desserts, try the Dirty Mars ($7.90) which is deep fried mars bar with ice cream on side – crispy, gooey, yummy and quirky. It will leave you on a sugar high.  Qafé by Night – Where an entertaining menu and great food rules!Full Post at InSing.com – Quirky Qafe by Irene Ang OpensQafe, 21 Tanjong Pagar Road #01-01 Singapore 088444 Tel: 9487 1287
Tues – Wed: 5:00 pm – 11:00 pm Thurs – Sat: 5:00 pm – 3:00 am, Sun: 1:00 pm – 10:00 pmOther Related Entries
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Egg3 Café (Mountbatten)
Joe & Dough (Suntec)
Joan Bowen Café (Macpherson)
White Dog Café (Vivocity)
2010-12-09 00:00:00
Keith Png Wants to Design His Own Hawker Food
Now that you know that Keith Png enjoys his beef horfun at least once a week, which celebrity friend will he bring to a hawker centre? And find out how he maintains his weight, despite eating so much.If you were to ‘design’ your own hawker food, what would it be like?
I will design and make Hors d’œuvre out of hawker food! As I love variety in small quantity, I can get to have a taste of lots of my favourite hawker foods at one go. Usually I am like a lost child in a candy store, so many choices and so little stomach space.Which celebrity friend would you bring to a hawker centre and what food would you recommend him/her?
I would bring Lin Chiling, because she is such a sweet person. Being Taiwanese she can appreciate our hawker food culture and nothing will shock her.  I know she likes to eat stingray so I will bring her to a seafood feast of local favourites like chilli crab or black pepper crab or curry crab or salted eggs crab or salted eggs prawns or oats prawns or fried baby squid or assam fish head or curry fish head or bamboo clams or all of the above!You are such a foodie, yet you manage to maintain such a slim waist. Share with us your secret:  How do you maintain your figure?
I am greedy when it comes to food. Even if I am eating alone, I will still like to have a huge variety. I try to cut down on my carbo intake during dinner. To atone for my greedy sin, I also attend body combat classes regularly.Thank you Keith for the interview! His website and blog can be found at
Hide and Seek
Keith Png’s BlogOther Related Entries
Fashion Guru Keith Png Recommends His Favourite Beef Horfun
A Wagyu Burger with Aston Soon
Willin Low and His Favourite Hokkien Mee
Bakerzin’s Daniel Tay and His Greatest Regret
MOF’s CEO did not have enough to eat Lor Mee
2010-12-08 00:00:00
Fashion Guru Keith Png Recommends His Favourite Beef Horfun
Celebrity style guru, fashion designer, TV show host, style advisor and retail entrepreneur – Keith Png is unarguably one of the best known fashionistas in Singapore. His works can be seen on top Asia celebrities such as Zhang Ziyi, Lin Chi Ling, Stephanie Sun, Zoe Tay and Fann Wong.Little do people know that Keith is quite a foodie, often enjoying his hunt for the best food at the local restaurants and food centres.BanBan interviews fashion guru Keith, who tells him that hawker food is ‘sinfully good’, and does not think twice before chomping down his favourite deep fried chicken wing and ice lemon tea with ice cream.What are some of your favourite hawker food?
Beef horfun, black fried carrot cake, fried hokkien prawn mee, satay and nasi briyani.You seem to like all the oily food! Now, if you must choose one of these foods to recommend, which will it be?
Definitely beef horfun. I just love the texture of the horfun. It is such a simple dish, yet tasty and filling. I have to eat it at least once every week.Which hawker centre and stall will you recommend for this food?
I will recommend Quan Ji at Amoy Street Food Centre. It is not only cheap, it sells a lot of other fantastic dishes too.It serves the best beef horfun I have ever had. The kway tiao has a slightly burnt taste to it, the amount of gravy and beef are generous and the beef is ohhhhhhhhh soooooooo tender yummy.I have tried the beef horfun at Quan Ji too. The kway tiao was indeed very flat, smooth and silky, quite different from many other stalls I had tried. What are the other dishes there you would try?
Some of their must tries include the king pork ribs (pai gu wang), fried beansprouts with salted fish and also the prawn paste chicken wings.Other Related Entries
Keith Png Wants to Design Hawker Food
Willin Low and His Favourite Hokkien Mee
Bakerzin’s Daniel Tay and His Greatest Regret
The 23-year girl behind Wow Wow West   
Where’s The Best Beef Horfun
2010-12-07 00:00:00
The Mexican – Mexican Food In a Food Court?
It is hard to find authentic Mexican food in Singapore, and I do not mean just nachos, burritos and tacos. Therefore imagine my surprise when I saw a Mexican food court stall, well-hidden within Kopitiam at Plaza By The Park.The food served was inconsistent, but the Quesadillas ($8.50 for four) was the redeeming factor. The shell was crunchy, and the fillings more exciting with tender chicken, capsicum, onions and spices blending well with the chewy cheese.Full Post at InSing.com – Mexican Food in a foodcourtThe Mexican, 51 Bras Basah Road Kopitiam Food Court Plaza By The Park
Opening Hours: 24 Hours DailyOther Related Entries
Medz (Orchard Central)
Don Quijote Spanish Restaurant (Lor Kilat)
2010-12-06 00:00:00
Infusion – Scotch Whiskey and Fine Cuisine for Christmas
I am not a frequent drinker of spirits but restaurant and bar Infusion’s brand new Scotch Corner with a revamped food menu was too good to be missed.Infusion, attempting to live up to its name, is a fusion restaurant nestled in the heart of Dempsey Hill. Its contemporary relaxed environment could be suitable for that chill-out party or dinner date.Chef John See, former Chief Chef of former Australian Prime Minister John Howard, created a set menu ($80 Nett) which showcased his creativity in infusing whiskey into culinary creations.The Wild Brown Rice Salad with semi dry tomatoes, baby quail egg and Dalmore whisky aspic first arrived in a horizontal setting. Chef See quickly turned it around to a vertical setting, explaining that it would make patrons follow a certain process in eating, slowing enjoying the flavours of the rice with a tinge of citrusy orange flavour.The Seafood Bouillabaisse first arrived sans the Glenfarclas whisky crème with a fresh bouquet of shiso mix. After the mix was poured in, the blend of the spirits and seafood became a perfect blend – one of the best soups I ever tried.Many may not be fans of duck meat. Some other patrons described the Duck leg Timbale as slightly sweet. But I liked its light crusted skin which had a whisky-malted vinegar glaze with tenderized meat.Christmas seemed to arrive early with a rich fruit cake served as dessert. Whisky and fruit cake was an obvious choice, though I wished for something more imaginative, or simple like the light spirited ice cream to end a filling meal.Scotch whiskies, with a certain distinctive smoky flavour, seems to appeal to a certain target group of drinkers.  With more marketing and a fresher and younger appeal in its food, Infusion could make whiskey the new wine.Infusion, Blk 16A Dempsey Road Singapore Tel: +65 6479 6188
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri: 6pm – 11pm; Sat: 12pm – 11pm; Sun: 11.30am – 11pmOther Related Entries
Singapore Sling Boutique (Clarke Quay)
TAB (Orchard)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
The Ship Restaurant & Bar (Shaw Centre)
Sunset Grill and Pub (Seletar Airbase)
2010-12-03 00:00:00
Rock & Ash – Crispy Fries with Exciting Dips
Rock & Ash’s highlight is its made-to-order crispy fries ($3.90 for small serving). The fries came with exciting mixes of homemade dips such as wasabi mayo, black pepper, mayo and chilli to the rather peculiar chocolate and lemon curd. The good news is they are made fresh daily.I had the recommended spicy cheese sauce which complemented well with the thick-cut fries. Golden yellow crispy on the outside and fluffy on the inside, the fries at Roch & Ash were very yummy and addictive I tell you.Full Post at InSing.com – Crispy Fries with Exciting DipsRock & Ash, 6 Raffles Boulevard, #B1-03 Marina Square S039594 Marina Link at Basement 1 Tel: +65 6336 6682
Opening hours: 10.00am – 10.00pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Most Original Burger MOB (Vivocity)
Everything With Fries (Orchard Central)
Burger Shack (Bt Timah)
Popeyes Chicken and Biscuits (Airport T3)
ChicKing (Marina Square)
2010-11-30 00:00:00
Ajino Chanpon – First Chanpon Shop in Singapore
Good news for Japanese food fans.  A Japanese-style food street “Tokyo Walker” has just been launched at Plaza Singapura. Other than the familiar names of Ajisen Ramen and Let’s Sweets, Kura Ramen, Kazokutei and Ajino Chanpon are new brands to arrive that will excite your taste buds.Ajino Chanpon is the first Chanpon specialty shop to arrive Singapore. Chanpon is a traditional noodle of Kyushu, made by stir frying meat, vegetables and seafood which are then added to a pork broth. The crunchy vegetables made the Chanpon taste extremely nutritious and hearty, rather satisfying if you like to feel healthy.Full Post at InSing.com – First Japanese Chanpon Shop in Singapore!Aijino Chanpon, 68 Orchard Road, #04-01 Plaza Singapura Tel: +65 63339287
Opening Hours: 11.30am-10pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Ippudo (Mandarin Gallery)
Ramen Play (313 @ Somerset)
Daikokuya (Orchard Paragon)
Ramen Santouka (Central)
Menya Kaiko (Ion Orchard)
2010-11-29 00:00:00
Ju Hao Xiao Long Bao – Chinese Delicacies, Hawker Centre Prices
The newly opened Ju Hao at Lavender Food Square occupies a prominently located corner stall, selling la mian and xiao long bao at hawker centre prices.I was initially sceptical about the quality of the food, having doubts that a food stall could serve restaurant quality Northern Chinese cuisines. To my surprise, the Shanghai Xiao Lao Bao ($5.50 for 8 pieces) was delightful with fresh pork wrapped within thin skin and soup broth which burst out flavourful savours.Full Post at InSing.com – Little Baskets of Steamed Delights聚豪拉面小笼包 Lavender Food Square Blk 380 Jalan Besar, #01-29
Opening hours: 11:00am-11:00pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Pu Tien Restaurant (Kitchener Road)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
5 Things You May Not Know About Xiao Long Bao
2010-11-29 00:00:00
Yong Kee Seafood Restaurant – What Is This Chao Tar Thing?
From the picture alone, you might have thought this was a strange looking pancake. Well, you would never have guessed that this was a plate of bee hoon. To be more precise, a plate of chao tar bee hoon (burnt vermicelli).This crispy vermicelli ($5) is a must try at Yong Kee located within a coffeeshop along Jalan Besar Road. You might have seen this dish before in Malaysia, but it is definitely uncommon. The wait of 20 minutes was long, but it was worth every minute.Full Post at InSing.com – Chao Tar but Good!Yong Kee Seafood Restaurant, Boon Hwa Food Centre, 43 Jalan Besar (opposite Sim Lim Tower)
Opening Hours: 5:30pm-3am (closed on every first Wed of the month)Other Related Entries
Cz’Zar (Great World City)
Must-Have Zhi Char DishGolden Mile Claypot Rice (Golden Mile)
Kidney Mee Sua (Kaki Bukit)
Beach Road Scissor Cut Curry Rice (Jalan Besar)
2010-11-19 00:00:00
The Eastern Restaurant – Gathering the Best of the East
I have previously blogged about The Eastern Restaurant during the Olympic Games held in Beijing. For some continuity, it will be interesting to look at this restaurant now during the Asian Games.The Eastern Restaurant which is located at the unnoticed back part of Centrepoint, has a loyal following for its wide range of authentic Chinese delicacies.It is almost impossible to leave out the Eastern Yi Ping Steamed Pork Dumpling ($4.00 for 4 pieces) which arrived in a cabbage-based basket, containing broth filled dumplings that exposed thick fragrant broth when eaten. However, they came rather sad looking and I wished these were more attractively wrapped though.I also tried other dishes – each are signature dishes from Szechuan,  Zhe Jiang and Shanghai. How do they fare?Wanton with Hot Chilli Sauce 红油抄手 ($6.00 for 5 pieces)Also known as 红油抄手, these are literally dumplings soaked in red chili. It is not difficult to guess where it originated from – Szechuan Chengdu, famous for its fiery spicy dishes. The ‘Chap Shou’ were one of the best, fresh pork fillings wrapped with delicate silky skin. The chili oil was not overly peppery, but still had the fragrance and spikiness to stimulate the senses.So what is the difference between Sichuan Chao Shou and the usual wantons or guo ties? Well, these are wrapped with square shaped skin while the usual shape is round.Chicken Marinated with ShaoShing Wine 绍兴醉鸡 ($6.00)This well-known appetizer dish which originated from Zhe Jiang, has chicken cooked and marinated exclusively in historic Shaoxing wine to create a deep and impressionable taste. I liked it that it was served cold, as enhanced the flavours of the wine. Somehow the chicken meat tasted smoother and ‘drunk’.Shanghai Pan-fried Pork Bun 上海生煎包 ($4.00 for 3 pieces)These buns has been one of the most common breakfast items in Shanghai for the last century. Some may think that these buns are first steamed then fried, which is not the case.The name of the bun comes from its method of cooking. The buns are lined up in an oiled, shallow, flat pan. Water is placed at the bottom or sprayed onto the buns to ensure the top is cooked through heat from the steam.Similar to the Pork Dumplings, the Pork Buns came quite unevenly shaped and somehow reduced the appetizing level. Besides an appealing taste, an attractive presentation can definitely affect the desirability of a dish. Otherwise, most of the dishes such as the Furong Special Scramble Egg ($10.80) and Zha Jiang Noodles are definitely worth a try.Thank you to The Eastern Restaurant for this lunch invite.The Eastern Restaurant, Centrepoint, 176 Orchard Road Singapore 238843  Tel:+65 6736 2638
Opening Hours: 10:00 am – 10:00 pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
2010-11-15 00:00:00
Nanxiang 南翔馒头店 – Top XLB in Shanghai Opens a New Branch Here
When it comes to masters in Xiao Long Bao (XLB), Shanghai’s Nanxiang Xiao Long Bao has been known for being one of the most authentic with undisputed popularity.  Good news for fans of Nanxiang, it has just opened a new branch at Plaza Singapura, after Bugis Junction and City Square Mall.The strange thing is while Nanxiang is tops in the field of XLB in Shanghai, it has not gathered a reputation like Ding Tai Feng or Crystal Jade in Singapore. Nevertheless, I still think it serves a decent basket of juicy meaty dumpling.So how does the new branch at Plaza Singapura fare?I must say I was disappointed if you really want to compare to its branch at Yu Yuan Shanghai. Firstly, the dishes came all in a wrong sequence, with the warmer main dishes arriving before the cold appetizers.Even if you are not fussy on that, the Crabmeat and Pork Filling Steamed Bun ($9.00 for 6 pieces) committed all XLB faux pas – thick skin, little broth and indelicate meat.The award-winning King Size Nanxiang Crab Roe Steamed Soup Bun ($6.80 each) with an up-sized straw was equally unsatisfactory. The broth did not have the ‘wow’ factor and with skin dry and stiff.Lion’s head is a well-known dish in Shanghai, quite uncommon here and therefore I was excited to see it served. It supposedly consisted of giant moist meatballs stewed with cabbage and soaked in red sauce. The braised “Lion’s Head” ($5.80 for 4 pieces) were the size of ping-pong balls, and tasted like ordinary minced pork balls ie something my mum could have made at home.If you need a recommendation, the Chill Tofu with Century Egg ($4.50) topped with sesame peanut sauce was actually quite heavenly. My favourite Golden Fried Rice ($8.80) with pork floss sprinkled all over the flavourful rice, turned a non-carb eater into a temporary convert.I certainly think that this could be a result of the new opening and the staff getting into rhythm. The good news is diners at Plaza Sing will be rewarded with a cash voucher worth 50% of your bill for your next visit. I will be back.Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant, #02-01 Plaza Singapura Tel:+65 6337 7446
Opening Hours: Mon-Fri 11:30 am – 10:00 pm, Sat – Sun 11:00 am – 10:00 pmOther Related Entries
Shanghai Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant
Grand Shanghai (Grand Copthorne)
Pu Tien Restaurant (Kitchener Road)
Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
2010-11-11 00:00:00
Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodle – Spicy & Sumptuous
You have heard of black pepper steak, black pepper crab, but how about black pepper char siew?This stall at the popular Maxwell Food Centre serves unique black pepper roast pork and chicken, quite unheard of at other hawker centres. Although this stall has been around for the last 12 years, few have actually talked about it.The Black Pepper Char Siew Dumpling Noodles ($4.50) resembled those versions served in Hong Kong – Yellow springy noodles topped with thickly sliced char siew and leafy kai lan on side.I was surprised that the black pepper was not over-powering as I would have imagined it to be (like in black pepper crab). In fact, the marinate was purposefully done lightly so that children would be able to enjoy the dish as well.Full Post at InSing.com – 323 Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & NoodleBlack Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodle, 1 Kadayanallur Street , #01-42 Maxwell Food CentreOther Related Entries
Pontian Wanton Mee (Far East Plaza)
Ah Guan Mee Pok (Syed Awi)
Hua Kee Wanton Mee (Old Airport Road)
Koka Wanton Noodles (North Bridge Road)
Ah Tee Ko Ko Mee (Golden Mile)
2010-11-09 00:00:00
40 Hands – New Cafe Opens at Charming Tiong Bahru
In a coffee-loving country like ours, we welcome an atypical café unlike the commercial franchises we are familiar with. The café was interestingly named 40 Hands because 40 Hands are required in the production of coffee, from plant to cup.40 Hands’ choice of location was charming, the 20-odd seater tucked away at low-rise Tiong Bahru with a rustic-looking sundry shop and coffeeshop nearby.The décor was idiosyncratic with a mish mash of wooden crates as chairs, raw concrete floor and graffiti art on the wall in a form of a coffee bean named ‘creepy’. Food was served on plates with retro cockerel motifs, and used condensed milk cans acted as sugar containers.40 Hands had ambitious and bold visions, among which was to “become a strong advocate for sustainably produced coffee throughout the world.” Therefore, coffee was its primary selling point, more than its food.Full Post at InSing.com – 40 Hands40 Hands, 78 Yong Siak St, #01-12 Tiong Bahru Tel: 62254623
Opening Hours: 8:00am to 6:30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Sun Coffee Planet (Killiney)
OldTown White Coffee (Bt Timah)
Chin Mee Chin (East Coast)
Tom N Toms Coffee (ICON Village)
Trung Nguyen Coffee (Vietnam)
2010-11-04 00:00:00
ChicKing – Middle Eastern ChicKing chain spreads its wings to Singapore
Another fried chicken fast food restaurant has arrived in Singapore, and this is one which came all the way from the UAE. ChicKing first established its name in the Middle East and India, and now plans to reach out to Malaysia, Indonesia and Singapore.With big brother KFC and other established chicken eateries such as America’s Popeye Chicken & Biscuit, Korea’s BBQ Chicken and Singapore’s very own Arnold Fried Chicken’s having their respective fan bases, how does ChicKing fare?With a tagline like “Real Recipe, Real Taste, Real Fried Chicken”, you would expect much. I ordered a Royal Snack ($6.50) which included a standard 2-piece chicken, mash potato, coleslaw and soft drink. Firstly, I was kind of disappointed with the size of the chicken – small, shrivelled and shrunken. I must say, however, the taste changed my initial impression!Full Post at InSing.com – ChicKingChicKing, 6 Raffles Boulevard Marina Square @ Marina Link B1-16 Tel:+65 63363228
Opening Hours: 10.00am – 10.00pm DailyOther Related Entries
Popeyes Chicken and Biscuits (Airport T3)
Ayam Penyet Ria (Lucky Plaza)
Nando’s (Bugis Junction)
Barcelos (Novena) 
Waroeng Penyet (Marine Parade)
2010-11-04 00:00:00
Ximending – Easing Your Taiwan Food Cravings
Ximending 西门町 is one of the most happening shopping and dining place in Taiwan, where some of my favourite street side stalls reside. The Ximending in Singapore on the other hand is a casual dining restaurant serving Taiwanese home-styled dishes.Some of the signature dishes included Pan-fried Pork Liver ($13.90), Pork Knuckles with Peanut ($12.00), Deep Fried Spicy Pork Ribs ($15.90), Deep fried Oysters ($13.90) and Crispy Pig’s Intestine ($15.00). Though I did not remember seeing many of these dishes in Taiwan.While I was always very excited going to Taiwan for a foodelicious adventure, the menu here was strangely kind of boring despite the extensive variety.The appetizer, a clam soup, was a regretful choice to start the meal. Maybe it was how the soup was supposed to taste, but it still retained a salty seafood taste which reminded me of (sorry) brine.My theory was when in doubt, go for the dish that everybody else around ordered – The Radish and Egg Pancake ($10). It did look like what was presented in the picture, but tasted nothing more than … fried egg. The outer layer was rather greasy, and I wished there was more chai poh for a more home-feel flavour.The Braised Pork in Soy Sauce (4 pieces for $12.00) could have been stewed for a longer time so that the pork could melt in the mouth. I also preferred pieces which did not have a ‘porky’ aftertaste.Judging from the looks of this crowded restaurant, I was sure that could be some dishes which tasted more sumptuous,  but I was just unfortunate not to have ordered the right ones. Perhaps I just had Shin Yeh which tasted a lot more authentic. Perhaps I still craved for the real thing at Taipei Ximending.1 HarbourFront Walk #01-51A VivoCity Singapore Tel: 6376 8018
Opening Hours: 12pm – 10pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
I Love Taimei (Bugis Village)
Ah Tai (Chinatown)
Lai Lai Family Restaurant (Bugis)
Must Try Food in Taipei
Yong He Eating House (Geylang)
2010-10-26 00:00:00
Celeb Chef Willin Low and His Favourite Hokkien Mee
Whenever Celebrity Chef Willin Low booked out of camp during his army days every weekend, he would stomp to Nam Heng Restaurant at Simon Road even before getting home, unlike many of his exhausted army mates.“I am there in front of the straight-faced uncle in my green uniform, smelling of mud and sweat. I didn’t care. I just wanted my Hokkien Mee!”Willin exclaimed that he must tabao the noodles and not eat it at the coffeeshop. This is so that the noodles could absorb all the ‘chup’ by the time he got home. He excitedly described the best moment – it was when he opened the packet and the pork lard aroma would fill up the house.He loved it so much that he would eat it at least once every week since his childhood days. And this Hokkien Mee has very much influenced this award winning chef’s cooking style.Full Post at InSing.com – Celeb chef Willin’s Hokkien mee secretOther Related Entries
Burger Bench and Bar
Relish
2010-10-25 00:00:00
Rolina Curry Puffs – Get Them Fresh, and Get Them Fast
6 Tanjong Pagar Plaza #02-16 Singapore 082006 Tel: 9235 8093
Daily: 8:30am – 4:30pmBeyond the trusted familiars Old Chang Kee, 1A and Tip Top, hidden in a corner of the Tanjong Pagar Plaza was a treasured find – Rolina Curry Puffs.This is one curry puff that would blow your senses away. The cutesy bite-sized Hainanese curry puff was about two-thirds the size of a Chang Kee. It was tightly packed and full of goodness. Within its thin buttery skin, were brimful pieces of soft cubic potatoes in curry paste and hard-boiled egg.He would make only a few hundreds of them a day – get them fresh, and get them fast. So why is it called “Rolina” Curry Puffs?Full Post at InSing.com – Hidden Gems Curry PuffOther Related Entries
Eat May Know (Bendemeer)
Ann Chin Popiah (Chinatown)
Lao Goh Carrot Cake (Zion Road)
Mei Xiang Goreng Pisang (Changi Village)
Tiong Bahru Teochew Kueh (Tiong Bahru)
2010-10-20 00:00:00
Lau Goh Carrot Cake – He is Deaf, and Cooks with Passion
Carrot Cake seller Peter Goh might seem to be your usual hawker at first sight. In fact, he was extremely polite and smiled thoroughly, asking if you wanted more chilli and pepper (quite unlike the usual rude hawker).It was only after reading a sign that I realised that he was deaf, and had to take orders by either lip-reading or through gestures.Disability had not prevented him from taking over this popular stall from his father (who is Lau Goh). His stall is apparantly very popular among celebrities, with photos of actors such as Li Nan Xing, Chew Chor Meng, Jeanette Aw, and Thomas Ong pasted on the stall’s wall.Full Post at InSing.com – Carrot Cake With A SoulLao Goh Carrot Cake Stall, No 26 Zion Riverside Food Centre 70 Zion RoadOther Related Entries
Soon Lee Fire-Pot Stew Beef (Alexandra Food Village)
Mei Xiang Goreng Pisang
Tiong Bahru Teochew Kueh
Ann Chin Popiah (Chinatown)
Eat May Know (Bendemeer)
2010-10-19 00:00:00
Where to Eat, Pray, Love?
Liked the book, and hated the movie? Or just felt the sudden urge to dive into the lands of Italy, India and Indonesia (oh they all start with ‘I’) to indulge in one of life’s greatest pleasure – food?You may be craving for the chewiness of pizzas, spiciness of curries, and the distinctiveness of Tempe at this very moment. And here’s where you can have some Italian, Indian and Indonesian food just so that you can feel a little more in tune with Elizabeth Gilbert.EAT at Peperoni Pizzeria (Hillcrest Park, Greenwood Avenue)Under the Les Amis Group, this well-hidden and well-reputed pizzeria serves up gigantic pizzas in a wood-fired oven placed in an open kitchen. Patrons keep themselves entertained with crayon and paper on every table. So European, I like.With a country-side ambience and quirky environment, feel free to sink your teeth into the 21 inch ($45.00) family pizzas. The 4 Formaggi Pizza with mozzallera, taleggio, scarmorza and gorgonzola would just make cheese lovers insane. If that is too much cheese for you to handle, have a half and half pizza. The thin crusted base and ham-mushroom fragrance will make you call “Delizioso!”PRAY for Gajalee (Cuppage Terrace)One of Mumbai’s top seafood restaurant has opened in Singapore, yet crowds were not seen in the restaurant during lunchtime.  Specialised in Maharashtrian dishes, Gajalee does not only serve your typical biryani, chapatti, and tandoori.The signature Bombay Duck ($14.00) is not that bird you are familiar with, but fish coated with a masala based batter and fried to crisp. A delicacy in the Indian cuisine, the bones are soft and chewable. Another must have is the Butter Garlic Pepper Prawns, streamed jumbo tiger prawns in peppery garlic sauce. Never before has garlic been so tasty.LOVE not Garuda Padang Cuisine (Orchard Central)Garuda (not the airline) is one of the most successful Padang cuisine restaurant chain in Singapore. It’s buffet at $23.80++ for a weekday dinner can attract groups of colleagues and friends to try their favourite Ayam Goreng, Rendang Sapi, Sambal Udang Petai and Sayur Lodeh in one setting.Unfortunately, the cold meats, spilled curry, slow service and confused staff made an otherwise happy experience, calamitous.Other Related Entries
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
15 Minutes (Lasalle)
Rock & Ash (Marina Square)
Infusion (Dempsey)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill  (Marina Square)
2010-10-17 00:00:00
The Battle of the Bubble Teas – Which Cup Is Worth Your Wait?
Once upon a time, there were Quickly, Cool Station, Milk Girl and Happy Cup, all once taken over the country by storm in 2001, and left almost just as fast. We have seen papa rotis and donuts through this phase before. But none, and I mean none, has reached the amazing queue lines caused by the present bubble tea masters.Take for example Gong Cha in 2009, it was literally almost empty every time I went to City Square Mall. But fast forward a year later, there will be 6 branches, and there were at least 30 people in queue at Plaza Singapura when I last visited.So Koi, Gong Cha, Eskimo and WooBbee – which bubble tea is best worth your wait?Koi – Available at Ang Mo Kio, Bishan, Clementi, Bugis Illuma, People’s Park, Marina Parade and Toa PayohThe Strengths
It is not only the smoothness of the milk tea, but the chewiness of the bubbles that none of the previous local stores can quite replicate. Its premium tea quality and sturdy plastic cups reminds us of the high standards of bubble tea in Taiwan. The Hazelnut Milk Tea with Glass Jelly is a killer perfect combination.The Weaknesses
$4.30 for a large cup can be way too pricey. Plus that half hour wait with sweaty crowd can keep both outer and inner temperature up.Gong Cha 贡茶 – Available at City Square Mall, Novena Square 2, Vivocity, Plaza Singapure, with Raffles City and Bedok Point opening soonThe Strengths
Probably the one with the strongest tea taste. Its signature frothy milk added to the top of each cup gave it a cappuccino-like added dimension. Fruity versions such as the Lemon Roasted Melon Tea are really more refreshing.The Weaknesses
If you hate that froth, it will taste creamy-salty-weird. The bubbles are nothing to scream about.Eskimo – Available at Dhoby Exchange, Esplanade Exchange and Market Street CarparkThe Strengths
Two words – Mini pearls! The milk tea are probably the closest in taste to Koi, yet with a much shorter queue.The Weaknesses 
The staff didn’t look professional enough, making wrong orders occasionally. Although the queue was short, the wait was long for all 3 times I was there.Woobbee – Available at Tanjong Pagar PlazaThe Strengths
Woobbee used only raw sugar in their tea, so it would mean less calories with a more natural taste. Great for weight watchers.The Weaknesses
The newest kid in the block meant that tastes may not be consistent. What you get this week may not be the same the next.The Verdict
8 cups (2 cups each) and many calories pied up later… It’s a cliché answer and I still have to say that the longest queuing, slowest waiting KOI still serves that bubble tea which makes it all worthwhile.Other Related Entries
I Love Taimei (Bugis)
Koi Bubbletea (Toa Payoh)
Share Tea (Wisma)
Drink Tea (NEX)
Woobbee (Tanjong Pagar)
2010-10-13 00:00:00
The Sling – Have You Ever Tried Singapore’s Most Iconic Drink?
The truth was, I had never known about the existence of a Singapore Sling Boutique. And despite the Singapore Sling being one of the country’s most iconic alcoholic beverage, I had never drank one, not even when it came free on the SQ flights.Even Chow Yun Fatt mentioned the Singapore Sling in Pirates of the Caribbean.  So have you ever drank it before?If you haven’t, you probably belonged to the 80% of the population. Do you know when the drink was invented and why it was called the ‘Sling’?The Singapore Sling’s history began from as early as 1915. That is close to a century ago. It was a cocktail developed by a bartender working at the Long Bar in Raffles Hotel, ordered by an officer who wanted to use the drink to win a woman’s heart.The original recipe came with gin, Cherry Heering, Bénédictine, and the signature fresh Sarawak pineapple juice. As for the name “Sling”, it was derived from the Hainanese pronunciation from the word “Commander”  (司令). And I never knew that.True Heritage Brew’s flagship Singapore Sling Boutique at Clarke Quay was an interesting concept.  Initiated by a very passionate Mr Chow Hoo Siong, the drive started when he was surprised at how the Singapore Sling was even more recognisable than the country it came from during his university days overseas.Also disappointed with the many inferior imitations around, he went ahead to set up his bar, with the mission to re-raise the profile of this classic drink. I thought it was rather brave of him, given the recent decline.I could imagine why many locals would not want to try it. Anything branded ‘Singapore’ won’t be seen cool enough to locals. Also, the Sling might have been perceived as too sweet, too girly or too expensive. Though when I had the first glass of Sling, it was a refreshing experience which gave a summer feel with its cooling and bitter-sweet after taste.The Sling could look innocent and deceiving though, with an alcoholic content of close to 7%, sending red flushes up my face immediately.Ironicially, I preferred the clearer and less frothy pomegranate version, giving a slight sour and acidic twist, leaving a more lasting impression.Many made Slings in their own versions and ways. Where and when could we say we had tried one glass of true blue Singapore Sling? At least this is one place willing to keep it authentic. Now, Sling chocolates anyone?[Closed] Singapore Sling BoutiqueOther Related Posts
Singapore Sling Chilli Crab Pizza (Clarke Quay)
TAB (Orchard)
Infusion (Dempsey)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
Qafé (Tanjong Pagar)
2010-10-06 00:00:00
Woobbee – Another Bubble Tea In The House
Bubble Tea, Bubble Tea everywhere. And will this bubble (no pun intended) burst?There is a new kid in the Tanjong Pagar Plaza block, not another Taiwanese franchise but a local setup selling a home brand of bubble tea. Something to be proud of.This 2-month Woobbee (name derived from the Chinese word of 无比) was highly recommended a friend, who urged me to try it on Tues with a 20% discount.Started, concocted, and devised by entrepreneur Irene, it took her a good 10 years to finally decide to open her very own bubble tea shop. As a teenager, she was a helper at a popular bubble tea shop at Ngee Ann City (which I suspect was Cool Station), subsequently becoming a coffee barrister in London. Making drinks was in her blood. And her skills helped her to create different appealing flavours to an otherwise boring drink.She candidly shared that it was the taste of Koi which revived her dream of starting this place. So the two dollar fifty cent question: How did this compare to Koi?I found the frothy milk tea ($2.50) smooth and lightly flavoured, complemented with chewy large pearls. It was refreshing but could not match Koi’s distinct and unique tea taste. I preferred smaller pearls too as you would not want to spend half your time chewing.However, the Yakult Lemon Green with Aloe Vera ($3.30) was almost a perfect combination, as all the ingredients together had a fruity citrusy yet cooling taste, very suitable for a long walk back to office under the hot sun.Another recommendation would be the Caramel Milk Tea with Pudding ($3.30). The caramel was not overly sweet, though I wished the pudding could be silkier so that it would be easier to suck up the straw.Good news for weight watchers, Woobbee used only raw sugar in their tea, so it would mean less calories with a more natural taste.I had 4 cups over 2 days (Help!). While the young Woobbee was still finding its edge, I liked its colourful branding and premium refined taste, ie the tea did not taste cheap! I would come back again.Woobbee, 1 Tanjong Pagar Plaza #01-18 S082001 Tel: 62208220
Mon to Sat: 10.30am – 7.30pm (Closed on Sundays)Other Related Entries
HK Gong Cha v SG Gong Cha
Artease Café (Cineleisure)
Koi Bubbletea (Toa Payoh)
Share Tea (Wisma)
The Battle of the Bubble Teas
2010-10-04 00:00:00
Paradise Dynasty – Multi-Coloured Xiao Long Bao
Paradise Dynasty was really quite gimmicky. Waitresses in gong-fu costume, chefs serving dumplings personally, tea masters pouring from a long spouted pot, and of course a 8-coloured Xiao Long Bao.The Paradise Group of Restaurants is certainly giving Ding Tai Feng and Crystal Jade a run of their money by serving local favourites Xiao Long Bao and La Mian, yet in a classier and excitable style.The best seller Xiao Long Bao Sampler set ($13.80) came in 8 different flavours, each promising to stimulate your taste buds and thrill your senses with the multi-coloured offering. To ensure the optimum tasting of the distinct flavours, you have to start eating with the white original flavour, moving along to more adventurous Black Truffle and Cheesy, ending with the reddish Szechuan dumpling.Obviously, some worked well and some did not. The brownish Foie Gras added a rich and musky taste, and the mildly spicy Szechuan complimented well with the moist pork.  Unfortunately, the more adventurous Black Truffle was way out of place, and greenish Ginseng rather insignificant to create an impact.When in doubt, go for the original ($9.80 for 10 pieces). Packed with brothy goodness, this tasted best of the lot. I wished it was more consistently wrapped though.The La Mian in Signature Pork Bone Soup ($9.80) served with Pan-fried Chicken Chop did not disappoint. The noodles were one of the finest I had tasted, hand-made to a smooth silky quality, thin enough to slip down your throat. The texture was quite firm as the chefs soaked the noodles in ice for a good few minutes, also tasty enough to eat on its own.Though I left feeling very thirsty, the experience Paradise Dynasty created was quite uplifting. Eating Xiao Long Bao surprisingly became so fun.Paradise Dynasty, 2 Orchard Turn #04-12A ION Orchard Singapore Tel: +65 6509 9118
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri: 11am – 10pm, Sat–Sun & PH: 10am – 10pmOther Related Entries
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
Yan Ting (St Regis)
5 Things You May Not Know About Xiao Long Bao
2010-09-23 00:00:00
Ah Yat – Abalone In My Fried Rice
Just the other day, my pal was sharing what he had for lunch, “Oh, not a lot lah. Just simple shark’s fin, bird nest and abalone.”Fortunately, he did not say he had bird’s nest to rinse his mouth. It turned out he was having an “abalone three treasure meal”  at Ah Yat Tian Xia (阿一天下)  which offered all three delicacies of braised shark’s fin, superior bird nest and abalone rice for a reasonable price of $29.80. Good deal.Another promotion was the Baked Whole Abalone with Fried Rice at $16.80 with the second portion (you could choose Abalone Rice with fresh Mushroom Sauce or Superior Soya Sauce) at $5.00. Equally good deal.Unlike the other Ah Yats, this branch served food that could appeal more to the executives and younger customers, such as abalone kebabs, ramen with abalone, abalone with pork chop and abalone dim sum. Hopefully this would not be the case of another Bird’s Nest Cafe.The abalone ironically served more as an enhancer rather than the main essence. Added to the usual familiar dishes, the abalone seemed a little out of place and was nothing more than a subject of interest. It was a ‘by the way the abalone was there’.With that said, the Baked Rice was warm with thick sauce jacking around the flavourful rice. Unless most other baked rice which would be dried out due to the heat, this had a ‘mui fan’ feel which would satisfy those who liked their rice moist and soggy.Strange that the pork chop rice was kind of the opposite – it was dehydrated and plain. The fried meat and mushroom accompaniments were decent though, and more oyster and mushroom sauce to supplement should do the trick.Even though the restaurant used baby abalones, and there were complains the food tasted instant, Ah Yat still delivered quality food that was value for money. Abalone for less than $20 – where to find?Ah Yat Abalone, #05-34 Orchard Central, 181 Orchard Road, Tel: 6884 9979
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong (TripleOne)
Streets Café Restaurant (Raffles City)
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
HK Kim Gary Restaurant (Vivocity)
C Nai Hong Kong Cafe Xpress (Marine Cove)
2010-09-21 00:00:00
Candylicious – The Largest Candy Store in Asia at RWS
There are now plenty of sweet reasons to visit Resorts World, with the opening of Candylicious – the largest candy store in Asia. And I thought Candy Empire was good enough for me.I was not overly excited, as I never really had a sweet tooth. But the look-see-look-see attitude was enough to bring me all the way to Resorts World Sentosa to visit this 9000 square feet sugary shop. Plus I don’t gamble.Candylicious was indeed a Candy Heaven, a place where children could dream of (Read: dangerous for parents). And I felt 30 going on 13 again.There were giant lollipop trees, walking peeps (a giant chick looking like a marshmallow), giant M&Ms, and giant Hershey’s bars. This place could make anyone happy, well except parents who had to folk out extra cash for their screaming children.You would be spoilt for saccharine choices with the largest ’Pick and Mix’ wall where your could find gummy bears, peach rings, jelly beans and M&Ms of every colour. Plus they sold the rarer goods that could once only be found overseas such as Madelaine Chocolates, Rock Candy from Squire Boone Village, Messori Italian Cones and Peeps Marshmallow. For an indulgent treat, try the gourmet Candylicious gelato for a sugar rush. Yummilious!Although there was a ‘no photography rule’, people were cam-whoring with over-sized Hershey’s chocolate bars, large syrup bottles, Bubble Yam cushions, and Kisses plush toys. Yes, and they sold the World’s Largest Kisses.Willy Wonka might just go Ga Ga in this $1.8 million boutique store, 2nd in the world after Dubai.I came to RWS not expecting to buy anything. And I walked out with 4 bags of chocolate and 1 M&M tee-shirt in 15 minutes. Not regretting my purchases at all. Wait, they even had mints with my name!Candylicious, Resorts World, Sentosa.
Opening Hours: 10:00am – 10:00pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Candylicious Takashimaya
2010-09-17 00:00:00
MBK Foodcourt – Bangkok Delights for 50 Baht
This is strange. I miss Thailand, even though I was there just last week. Maybe that’s why.Thailand has an impeccable charm, and the food somehow cannot be replicated here. And here I am, lazing on bed on a rainy morning, dreaming about that hot piping bowl of Beef Soup from MBK Center food court.Most tour-savvy Singaporeans should be familiar MBK – There would be throngs of us there in any long public holiday weekend. You can hear it from the “lah”, “leh”, “ah-boy, stopping running ah!” and parents feeding their 7-year old children food.The MBK Food court on the sixth floor is a constant state of buzz and confusion, but is cheap food haven for the gluttons. Don’t get confused with the higher classed dining area at the fifth level. The food ranged from the usual Tom Yum Goong, Pad Thai, Sticky Mango with Rice to Dim Sum and Bird’s Nest pushed on trolleys. And you could be promised a satisfying meal for just 50 baht ($1.10)!Hygiene or convenience, you had to buy pre-paid coupons first as though you were in a carnival. There could at least be assurance that the hawkers would not be dealing with the currency directly. I usually changed for 100 baht first. But found myself doing the changing repeatedly because I wanted more.Bangkok’s food was hugely influenced by Chinese cultures. And one of the most amazing things in this food court was the Stall C11’s Stewed Pork Limb with Rice by Tokzung (40 baht). The shreds of fatty pork legs soaked in dark marinated sauce were tenderising melt-in-your-mouth smooth, and you imagined  if pork had ever been this soft. The crispy pork, though had an unrefined street hawker taste, was crunchy enjoyable as a side dish.The Beef Noodles located right at the front corner of the foodcourt drew the longest queue. Hardly surprising. The claypot was filled beef intestines, sliced beef and balls, had an incredible strong robust salty broth that you would sip to the last drop. I remembered that it used to taste better with an uncle selling, but I am not complaining.Street food with aircon comfort. MBK foodcourt just brought back so many food memories of Bangkok. So which was your favourite stall?Food court on the 6th Floor of Mah Boon Krong (MBK) plaza (Siam BTS Stop)Other Related Entries
Suan Thai Restaurant
Thaksin Beef Noodles
Coffee Stars by Dao
Thai Noodle House (Coronation Road)
Flying Chillis (313 @ Somerset)
2010-09-16 00:00:00
Porn’s – That Thai Shop Opened By Pornsak
Sorry if you have googled for sleazy “Porn” but ended up here. Although the previous shop space was “Massage King”, this is a actually month-old restaurant near Bugis, serving “Sexy ∙ Thai ∙ Food”.Porn’s was packed at 9:30pm, but I was quickly led to an inner-court yard. where you might see stars above (the real ones) and within (the local celebs). I was startled by a familiar voice “万荣！好久不见！”, and saw the jumpy cheery face from 食在好源头. I should have known. Porn’s is opened by Pornsak Prajakwit!From Radio1003 DJ, to one of MediaCorp’s most popular host, and now a young boss, this 28-year ‘boy’ is a high achiever. But his success is unsurprising. I knew Pornsak when he was still an SMU student, and his PR ∙  People ∙  EQ skills has been electrifying. He promptly jumped up the seat for a cutesy pose when I asked him to. This guy is as real as he can get.“Porn” which means “blessings” in Thai, served up the usual Thai signatures such as Tom Yum Goong ($10.90), Green Mango Salad ($7.90), Thai Green Curry ($10.90), Tod Mun Goong Prawn Cakes ($8.50 for 3), Sticky Rice with Mango ($8.50) and Thai Iced Tea ($3.90).The price was reasonable though I wished there were more carb dishes (surprisingly) such as beef vermicelli, kway tiao, and olive rice.Perhaps it was a new establishment; the service was sincere but awkward. I asked if they had Pai Thai, which was such a standard Thai dish, but the waiter looked at me bewilderedly. In the end, I had a Pad Thai Hor Kai ($9.90), a version wrapped with egg.The Pad Thai was light and not oily, nicely complimented with the condiments of chilli flakes, peanut, and sugar. It was a personal preference, and I wished there was a stronger essence of fish sauce and tamarind juice. This version was probably muted to suit the local tastes.In a supper mood, I also ordered a Pik Gai Tai Sai ($8.50 for 3) which was fried stuffed chicken wing. It was a rarer find in Singapore, because the preparation could be rather complicated and time-consuming. The finger-licking good wings were firmly packed with marinated meat, shrimps and vermicelli, made more brilliant by the sweet chili dip.The food quality was not ‘wow wow’ but decent. Plus, it would not be surprising to see boss Pornsak taking orders and serving you dishes. With his magnifying friendly charm, this place should be packed. And I will be back. All the best Pornsak!Porn’s, 28 Liang Seah Street Singapore 189049 Tel:+65 63375535
Opening Hours: Mon – Sat: 12pm – 3pm, 6pm – 10pm, Sun: 6pm – 10pmOther Related Entries
First Thai (Purvis Street)
Suan Thai Restaurant (Killiney Road)
Coffee Stars by Dao (Wisma Atria)
Thai Noodle House (Coronation Road)
Flying Chillis (313 @ Somerset)
2010-09-14 00:00:00
Imperial Treasure Windows of Hong Kong – Confusing but Appetising
TripleOne has always been behind compared to its more popular and famous ‘cousin’ 313. You may even ask where it is. (It is right opposite 313 at the Singapore Power Building.) But it offers an alternative dining venue with an interesting mix of universal tastes such as AppleBee’s, Italiannies, Sanomaru and Imperial Treasure Windows of Hong Kong.Imperial Treasure is definitely giving Crystal Jade a run of its money with a Steamboat Restaurant, Hong Kong café and Bakery, all newer ventures yet with a sense of familiarity. Cakery vs Bakery? Hmmm.Windows of Hong Kong would be what I call a corporate canteen, a huge space with a very strange ordering system. Plus various menus for different times of the day. I suppose the main characteristic of Hong Kong cafes is to Confuse.I was surprised when I was told to step outside to order before I could enter. There was a big board with specific set menus from A1-A6, with varied combinations for soup/drink changes and upgrades. And it felt pressurising!Since menus for breakfasts, lunch, tea, and dinner are all different, the flipside is if you want your wanton noodles or toasts for supper, they are not available.With all that said, the food was all worth it. It felt real, unlike some cafes which tried hard to pass off local food as Hong Kong.The beef brisket noodles spelled authenticity, with springy waxy yellow noodles, matched with an ‘I could eat it on its own’ chilli sauce. The brisket was tenderising soft, and broth bursting with flavours of bones and shrimps. It transported me to Hong Kong straightaway.<I liked my baked rice wet, creamy, soaked, drenched, cheesy and saucy. You get the drift. The Baked Pork Chop Rice had an oriental meets Western look, with a homely marinated taste of ketchup and soy.The food and ambience is not of a refined restaurant, but one would feel comfortable to dine during your lunch and tea-time if you crave for Hong Kong food. Plus, the aunties were really sincere and friendly which made me return thrice. Just hope they get their ordering system right soon.Imperial Treasure Windows of Hong Kong, 111 Somerset Road TripleOne #01-K1/24/25
Opening Hours: 11am – 9pm DailyOther Related Entries
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
HK Kim Gary Restaurant (Vivocity)
C Nai Hong Kong Cafe Xpress (Marine Cove)
Xin Wang Hong Kong Café (Cineleisure)
Streets Café Restaurant (Raffles City)
2010-09-10 00:00:00
Dong Qu Fen Yuan 东区粉圆 – Taiwan’s Ice Kachang
Now that Taiwan’s famous Din Tai Feng, Koi Bubbletea, Ice Monster, Mee Sua and Chicken Cutlet have arrived to Singapore with great success, I was thinking about the next best Taiwanese thing that could be franchised. The dessert culture in Singapore is definitely booming, so how about 东区粉圆?The story first: Running out of desserts to eat in Taipei, I asked my gym instructor to recommend something – She immediately screamed DONG QU FEN YUAN! She suddenly got excited just describing about it, told me about the different combinations you could choose from, and how cooling it was to have it in summer. “Try it now!”, despite the fact I just burned 400 calories in her class.Finding this Eastern Ice Store was not difficult, but not easy either. The closest landmarks nearby would be Ming Yao Shopping Centre (where I met William So!) and Zhong Xiao branch of Ding Tai Feng.The shop was packed to the brim, and I realised I have yet to introduce what 东区粉圆 sells. The closest identification would be Singapore’s Ice Kachang. Think about a dessert where you could choose all your favourite ingredients.You could choose your base from tau hway, red bean soup, grass jelly or sweet soup. Fill it up with crushed ice and 3 toppings all for the price of NT25 ($2.10)!The topping choices included yam, green bean, red bean, soft peanuts, passion fruit, strawberry jam, gingko, pumpkin balls, almond and the famous 粉圆 which could be described as a larger sized pearl bubbles. The QQ balls glistered in the ice, and was sweet, chewy yet soft.The hand-made ingredients were freshly prepared and would not be left overnight. You could also play with the different textures in your mouth – just like how you would to pearl bubbles. It was one of those fun-to-eat desserts, made all better by choosing a combination that you loved.Unless some local desserts where the ingredients were meagre and tasted artificial like out of a can, this cooling dessert was fresh and crammed with goodness.东区粉圆 have charmed Taiwan for more than 20 years, and there is only this one shop one branch. Somebody should just bring this to Singapore.Dong Qu Fen Yuan, No.38,216 Alley,Si Section, Zhongxiao East Road,Da’an District, Taipei, Taiwan 02-27772057Other Related Entries
Ice Monster (Taiwan)
Deng Long Lu Wei (Taiwan)
Pork Pepper Buns (Taiwan)
Hao Da Chicken Culet (Taiwan)
Ah Zong Mian Xian (Taiwan)
2010-09-08 00:00:00
Barcelos – Peri Peri Chicken Better Than Nando’s?
The signage of the big deep red rooster at Square 2 was what attracted me to dine Barcelos. It kept calling “Eat Me”, “Eat Me”. However, when you talk about Peri Peri chicken, it is inevitable to first think about the very popular Nando’s. So which is better?Barcelos, with two other branches at Holland Village and Vivocity, replaced Lerk Thai in this space with a rather strange elongated configuration.  The expressionless waitress led us to our seats expressionlessly, but the smell of the flame grilled chicken was too hard to beat and reject.Chicken lovers would be pleased that they served chicken presented in many possible ways from quarter and half chickens, pita, burgers and wraps.I had a Chicken Fillet Burger ($12.95 for single combo) with tender chicken, crunchy lettuce and fresh tomato between nicely toasted burgers. The meat was well marinated the traditional Portuguese way, softly filling up your mouth. A big no-no for many chicken burgers was that patties become too dry and artificial tasting. This had no such problems.The sauces were a huge contrast to the expressionless waitress with four zesty flavours to choose from – Tangy Lemon, Mild Peri, Veri Peri and Supa Peri. Turn on the heat with the Mild Peri Sauce which was already fiery spicy. Therefore warning, the Supa Peri might make your tongue numb to other tastes.The Tropical Wrap ($12.95) was a peri peri good and delightful choice with sweet cooling pineapple complimenting the zingy chicken meat which was said to be marinated for 24 hours.Better than expected, I found the chicken at Barcelos juicer and more flavourful when compared to its competitors. The legend of the Barcelos rooster described the roasted rooster which would get up and call. This chicken could make you sit up and want more.Barcelos, 10 Sinaran Drive #02-65/66/67 Novena Square 2 Tel:+65 6397 6927
Daily: 10am – 9pmOther Related Entries
Nando’s (Bugis Junction)
ChicKing (Marina Square)
Popeyes Chicken and Biscuits (Airport T3)
Ayam Penyet Ria (Lucky Plaza)
Waroeng Penyet (Marine Parade)
2010-09-03 00:00:00
Trung Nguyen Coffee – Don’t Leave Vietnam Without Drinking This
If there were five things I remembered about Vietnam, they would be scooters, scooters, pho, spring rolls, and coffee.Don’t get me wrong. Vietnam has many things special – but it was their coffee that would keep me WIDE awake, made me energised and wanted to have that every meal. Take note: I am usually a NON-coffee drinker.The presentation was already an eye-opener, all fascinating to watch the drip-drip-dripping of Vietnamese coffee. It made drinking coffee look stylish and NOT boring. And if packaged properly, this French inspired coffee will have no problem reaching out to the world.The iced coffee is usually made with finely ground dark roast coffee individually brewed with a small metal Vietnamese drip filter (cà phê phin). The content will drip into a cup containing about a quarter to a half as much sweetened condensed milk, stirred and poured over ice. They do not use fresh milk because it is hardly available and more difficult to store.If you are game for it, try the weasel coffee. What? Yes, Weasel coffee.Weasels are raised in the coffee plantations, where they run around and eat up the ripest coffee cherries. If you think the coffee tasted emmmmm …. different, now you know it was because of their gastric juices that made the taste earthy and chocolately. Crudely said, you would be having weasel s***.In short, the Vietnamese coffee was rich, delicious, well-roasted yet never burnt. Compared to Ang Moh coffee, I would said they had a stronger kao kao and ‘real’ taste.The most famous Vietnamese brand would be Trung Nguyen Coffee, founded in 1996 with over 1,000 coffee shops nation-wide. They were everywhere in Ho Chi Minh, with a selection so wide they needed a newspaper format for their menu. Very creative too such that they named their ‘creative’ coffee from Creative 1 to Creative 5 (for level of strongness), at the price of about 40000 dong ($2.80).Good news, if you needed that Trung Nguyen caffeine fix, you could always hop over to Liang Court and Changi Airport Terminal One. But if you were in Vietnam, don’t leave the country without drinking their coffee.Trung Nguyen Coffee, 82-84 Bui Thi Xuan Street, District 1, Ho Chi Minh City, VietnamOther Related Entries
Sun Coffee Planet (Killiney)
OldTown White Coffee (Bt Timah)
Chin Mee Chin (East Coast)
Tom N Toms Coffee (ICON Village)
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
2010-09-01 00:00:00
Honeymoon Dessert 满记甜品 – HK’s Most Delicious Desserts
In case you have not realised, Honeymoon Dessert has arrived to Singapore! I mean, for months. And that made me very excited as I did not have fly 4 hours for my 2nd favourite dessert chain.Since Honeymoon Dessert established its first store in Sai Kung in 1995, it has developed into the current chain stores offering Hong Kong desserts in a contemporary style.Xu Liu Shan did not survive in Singapore, and Xi Yang Yang folded. So could it be that Singaporeans did not embrace costlier Chinese desserts? Well, the timing and location had never been better for Honeymoon Dessert. We never really had a dessert culture years back, but the story is totally different now.The bookshelf wallpaper, red soft seats, desserts display racks, monster dome lights and signature yellow bowls brought about the old familiar feel and memories from Hong Kong. Would the taste be the same?The first choice for the familiar would of course be the Mango Pomelo & Sago Sweet Soup  杨枝甘露, rather pricey though at $5.50.  The presentation of fresh mango meat, sweet sago cream and sour pomelo was exactly the same. However, this version felt a little milkier, thicker, and sourer on the mangoes. It was not as life-changing. Perhaps the fruit was not in season. Perhaps they had too much milk added. Perhaps.Another of my favourite was the sesame soup mixed with walnuts 生磨芝麻糊加核桃露 ($3.00), said to keep youthfulness and promote memory. I was relieved they maintained consistency – it was thick yet smooth, sweet yet not over the top.The.Sweet Ball Coated with Crushed Peanut and Sesame 糖不甩 ($3.50), the symbol of reunion, was fun thing to eat, not overly sweet and did not stick to the teeth.My top recommendation would be the Mixed Fruits Sago with Coconut Juice 鲜杂果西米露 ($6.00). It would otherwise be an ordinary sago dessert. But the sweet-sour mango, soft bananas, saccharin longans and attap chee added different taste layers to this multi-dimensional dessert, being cool and refreshing at the same time.I will be back. Though I must say while the menu and outlook are the same in here and Hong Kong, something feels different here though. It is there, but not quite there yet. You think so?1 Harbourfront Walk #01-93 VivoCity. Singapore 098585. Tel:+65 6376 8027Other Related Entries
Ji De Chi (Liang Seah)
Swirl Art (Liang Seah)
Ah Chew Desserts
Dessert Cup (Raffles City)
Hong Kong Sun Kee (NEX)
2010-08-30 00:00:00
Egg3 Cafe – No Eggs in This Basket
For a place called Egg3, you would have expected all-day breakfast dishes, egg toasts, or cakes with eggs. Well, not quite.It was branched out from the Egg3 lifestyle concept store which sold home accessories, fashion and gift items. Instead, you would find mainly spaghetti dishes, finger food and desserts.Getting here was a problem, a big problem. The ‘sotongness’ in me got my friend to take me to Mountbatten Square, when Egg3 was around Old Airport Road aactually at behind Mountbatten Centre. We circled nd Guillemard Road for a long time before we found this old school.It was a hard-to-find (whether by Circle Line to Mountbatten MRT or car), but you might be just surprised at this vintage-styled café with quirky décor and a comfortable setting for that relaxing afternoon tea.Egg3 had an Alice in Wonderland in Ikea setting, kind of whimsical, unpredictable, stylish yet simple. I could spend half an afternoon here reading home décor magazines with a cup of tea enjoying the bossa nova music. Unfortunately, I went on a Sunday and children were around.  A spoiler.I had difficulty ordering food, because nothing (fish and chips, calamari, fishcake, yam cake) really appealed to me, and the widely-recommended carrot raisin cake ($4.90) was not available. (It was very unusual because I spent an hour getting here, yet did not feel like ordering anything!)The waitress urged me to try the chicken wings and satay sausages. The sausages had a strange artificial satay taste, but it liked them for its sweetness. Would have been perfect if there was pineapple satay sauce for dips. The chicken wings though light and crisp were rather ordinary. My suggestion would be to have a more unique dip (say a Singapore meets Thai sauce) rather than just chilli sauce.I would say Egg3 could focus more on their desserts. The Lava Cake with Vanilla Ice-cream was quite a delightful pleasure with soft fluffy cake with hot molten chocolate flowing out even before my spoon went within.Oh yes, you could your shopping here too. Say for example, if you liked your coffee cup so much and wanted to bring it home, just pay for it!With so-so food, inaccessible location, but cosy ambience, Egg3 might just attract a very niche crowd. Let’s hope it survives!231 Mountbatten Road #01-06 Block D, Mountbatten Centre  Tel:+65 6241 3823
Opening Hours: Tue–Sun: 10am – 9pm  (Closed on Mon)Other Related Entries
Joan Bowen Café (Macpherson)
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Qafe (Tanjong Pagar)
Charlie Brown Café (Somerset)
Crazy World Café (Chinatown)
2010-08-25 00:00:00
Ippudo Tao  – Ramen Close to Perfection
First things first – This meal was not free, and I paid more than $60 for a dinner for two.  But I am still going say that this served one of the best ramen in Singapore. Close to perfection.Ramen fans should be familiar with Ippudo started by Ramen King Shigemi Kawakara, which attracted queues at its branch at Mandarin Gallery. Wavered by the queue, I only been there twice, but both times were excellent tonkotsu ramen experiences.When I read about a review of the second branch, I promptly dropped everything and appeared at UE Square two hours later bearing high hopes.This branch had a slight different concept, bearing a stronger traditional black and red feel, called Ippudo Tao due to its collaboration with the Tao drum performance group.Most of the items were similar, with the exception of Kushiyaki served, and the two Tao signature ramens Kuro (Black) and Aka (Red).To simplify the difference, one could be called meepok (Kuro) and the other meekia (Aka). The noodles of Tao Kuro ($15) was thick, broad and chewy, swimming in Shoyu Tonkotsu broth topped with pork belly, flavoured black fungus and special blended miso paste (umami dama).My personal preference was with thinner noodles, but the soup was killer tasty. I finished up to the last few drops, with floating fragrant garlic oil giving a solid boost on its flavours.I literally thanked God immediately when I slurped on Tao Aka ($15). It had the combination I always wished for – very thin curly noodles similar to Marutama’s  and soup with spicy miso paste. I suspect some may find the red spiciness weird or overwhelming, but I felt it was tailored to my taste.A pity that the tamago (additional $2) was overly cooked. Otherwise, the ramen would have been a perfect ten for me.The Kushiyaki was ordinary and disappointing though. The Buta Bara Pork Belly ($3.50) lacked in salt and flavours, and the Tsukune Chicken Meat Balls ($3.50) had bones within. (I hope they were bones!) Maybe Ippudo should stick to what they were doing best.My girl friend was also pleasantly pleased with the toilet which provided cotton buds. The colours and drums made the dining experience very excitable as well. Officially my favourite local ramen shop, for now.Ippudo Tao, 207 River Valley Road #01-55/56 UE Square Singapore Tel:+65 6887 5315
Opening Hours: Mon–Thu: 11am–3pm, 5pm–11pm, Fri–Sat: 11am–3pm, 5pm–1am, Sun: 11am–10pmOther Related Entries
Ippudo (Mandarin Gallery)
Ramen Santouka (Central)
Sapporo Ramen Miharu (Gallery Hotel)
Marutama Ra-Men (Liang Court)
Daikokuya (Orchard Paragon)
2010-08-20 00:00:00
Tsim Chai Kee 沾仔记 – Wonton Noodle Heaven
Tsim Chai Kee 沾仔记 98, Wellington St. Central, Hong Kong Tel: 2850 6471
Daily: 8am – 10 pmMs Camemberu and I were each sharing about our favourite wonton noodles in Hong Kong.Hers was the well-known Mak’s, even patronised by celebrity chef Anthony Bourdain. 麥奀記 literally meant “Mak’s stingy noodles”, a reference to the tiny portions served in small bowls to keep the noodles from going soggy.And it turned out that my number one shop was just right opposte Mak’s at Wellington Street, Central -Tsim Chai Kee 沾仔记Tsim Chai Kee served just noodles with three different toppings – shrimp wonton, beef slices, or fish ball. If you are going to be hungry, greedy, or as half-hearted as I was, then opt for the all-in-one noodle soup. For just HK$25.Both Camemberu and I lamented that it was impossible to find Wanton Mee here which were vaguely of close standards to the ones found in Hong Kong. The noodles found in Hong Kong though were bright yellow and waxy, had an exceptional thin, stringy, chewy al dente quality that was good enough to eat on its own.The shrimp wontons at Tsim were incomparable – fresh chunky prawns and minced pork packed into a big ping pong sized dumpling that gave a tasty crunch on every bite. (Why can’t the wantons here be the same size?)Just as you thought the wontons were big, the fishballs were bigger! They were not the usual white bouncy ones that we are familiar with, but starchy versions made from minced Chinese mud crap and other ingredients. Every bite was a mirage of different tastes, as though pieces of yong tau foo were merged into one.The light brown sliced beef slices, though seldom seen as an addition to such noodles, were absolutely complimentary with its soft tender texture.Add a tinge of specially made chill sauce into the bouillon and you would be in wonton noodle heaven.Other Related Entries
Mak’s vs Tsim (Hong Kong)
Hong Kong Sun Kee (NEX)
Old Hong Kong Tea House (Katong) 
Must Try Hong Kong Drinks
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
2010-08-19 00:00:00
Let’s Sweets – Japanese Dessert Buffet in 60 minutes
It had been estimated that there may be staggering 1000 new F&B outlets opened in Singapore this year alone. That’s fierce competition – but good news for foodies like us who have been craving for variety. Food cannot be that boring.And in this buffetlicious country, a new restaurant that combined Japanese cuisines, desserts and a low-priced buffet seemed too good to be true. Let’s Sweets (Shouldn’t it be Let’s Be Sweet), a refreshing concept of Japanese dessert buffet, priced at $15.80++ for lunch and $18.80++ for dinner during weekdays, would please any sweet tooth.Walking into this colourful store at Bugis Junction, you would notice the wall tiled with chocolate bars patterns, along with counters of colourful cakes and rows of savoury items. Chefs dressed in white uniform and toques stood behind counters to prepare handmade crepes  with ice cream and ‘dancing’ Yaki Mochi.I was invited for a food tasting session, and the recommended must-haves by Head Pastry Chef Miss Chika (who resembled a Japanese Quan Yi Feng) were the Sea Salt Caramel Rolled Cake and Hokkaido Coffee Zenzai.The former had a soft sponge-like texture layered by caramel, with velvety and mixed fillings with faint sea salt which made an interesting but workable combination.The little cup of chewy Japanese rice ball soaked in sweet red bean and tinge of coffee could excite taste buds with the bitter-sweet blend. I did think they could up on the caffeine though.I would imagine patrons being pressurized by a time limit of 60 minutes (80 minutes for dinner) reminded by a baby blue alarm clock. Eating like a glutton, I got into a sugar high very quickly. And somehow everything from the crepes, chiffon, tarts and mousse tasted the same after the 6th piece.The savouries such as the Japanese Mushroom Spaghetti, Chicken Teriyaki Burger and Takikomi Rice seasoned with dashi and soy sauce worked better for me. The Potato Soup was thick and creamy, with loads of ingredients swimming within. The sweet potatoes, rarely used for western soups, were a clever addition for a gentler taste.Let’s Sweets, conceptualised by Japan Foods Holding Ltd who brought us Ajisen, Fruit Paradise and Botejyu, looked set to score again with this cosy Western-Japanese dessert place.My suggestion would be to include Hokkaido ice cream and increase the buffet time. If I could take half an hour to savour a slice cake, surely I need more time indulge in the 40 desserts available.(Thank you to Mr Takahashi Kenichi and Ms Alix Tay from Japan Foods Holding Ltd for hosting this food tasting session.)200 Victoria Street #02-49 Bugis Junction Singapore Tel: 6338 0187
Opening Hours: 12.00pm–4.30pm, 5.30pm–10pmOther Related Entries
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
The Cheescake Café (East Coast)
Hairloom & Caramel (Shaw Towers)
3 Inch Sin (Bt Timah)
2010-08-17 00:00:00
Ootoya – The Art of Food Education
Define the odds. This is one Japanese restaurant with no ramen, sushi, sashimi, nabe or yakitori. This is one shop that actually has a queue in the persistently empty Orchard Central. This is one place that would tell you how many calories you have intake.Ootoya 大戸屋 served Teishoku 定食 or set meal in the menu. Teishoku is a standard for the Japanese eating experience – to include a main item, bowl of rice, miso soup and some Japanese pickles, usually served all together on a square platter.I tried the Ootoya Special Dish Set ($15.00, 990kcal) which was a combination of homemade croquette and deep-fried chicken with sunny side up egg. It tasted, healthy – which made me feel like I was having a natural, slightly plain, not overly salty or flavoursome set meal. The egg was the centre of attraction.The good was the set felt like home-cooked food (nutritious).  And the bad was it felt like home-cooked food (simple).The Charbroiled hamburg steak with grated radish and pickled plum ponzu sauce set ($16.00 1025 kcal) should delight most, if you ignored the calories intake. The patty was juicy and tender, without tasting overly manufactured, enhanced with a tinge of citrus acid in its flavours.If you think you had seen Ootoya in Siam Paragon, you were probably right. Ootoya had been a huge following in Japan and Thailand with more than 50 years of history. It was then I learnt that Ootoya’s philosophy was to serve home-made traditional Japanese food that combined the arts of ‘Shokuiku’ culinary, which meant ‘food education’.You would get ‘nutritious’ food like Grated Yam with Tofu (234 kcal), Boiled Spinach (121 kcal) and Chargrilled Chicken Salad (251 kcal) which could be too raw and basic for some peoples’ likings.  Cold Tofu with Raw Egg was too much for me to take, but an absolute delight to friend. (FYI – A single curry puff is higher is calory than any of these items.)No wonder Ootoya’s dishes tasted like a family-loving Obasan cooked it. With a refreshing menu, creative take on the usual boring dishes and healthy spin to deep fried food – Why not?Address: Ootoya, 181 Orchard Road #08-12 Orchard Central Singapore Tel:+65 6884 8901
Opening Hours: 12pm – 9.30pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Sho Teppan (Ion Orchard)
Tonkatsu (Mandarin Gallery)
SUN Japanese Dining (Chijmes)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
Aijino Chanpon (Plaza Singapura)
2010-08-16 00:00:00
Netsuretsu Ichiban-Tei – Good, or Rude?
The restaurant was almost empty on a weekday night. When I requested for a seat that looked more comfortable, I got a “No, There.”For why I was not allowed to, I did not know why. But the waitress reminded me of a primary school teacher reprimanding her children. Tall, slim, ponytail, but a face that looked like the whole world owned her money. I bet if even if you gave her $10 tip to smile, she won’t. I won’t say which nationality she belonged to.This ramen shop by the river had all the potential. A cosy feel, brilliant ambience and an air of Japanese all around with its hanging drapes of kanji.It is unfortunate really, that I do see more Japanese restaurants investing in décor, food, promotions but not in their service. And for a complete Japanese dining experience, an impeccable service is de rigueur.Back to the food, the Ramen served at Netsuretsu Ichiban-Tei, are not exactly ichiban, but certainly noteworthy enough and tastier than the average. The variety included the usual miso ramen ($11.00), Tonkotsu Ramen ($12.00) Chashu Men ($13.00) and a slightly rarer Super Tantan Men ($13.00), said to be one of their most popular.The springy yellow noodles, well-prepared runny tamogo (one of the best I tried), abundant sweet corn and thick salty broth did not take any my distraction from the unusually glum straight-faced silent waitress who muttered nothing more than “Your orders?” Even when the bowls were served, she just left them on the table and walked away.Something amusing did happen. As I paid up, I asked the manager (a Japanese lady) for the waitress’s name. She thought I was interested in her (??!!)I quickly shaked my head and waved my hands side to side indicating a ‘No.’ Then, I told her slowly and firmly that “The waitress was rude, very rude.”“Oh, Good? She was good? Thank you very much! Arigatoo Gozaimasu.” A tragic case of lost in translation.60 Robertson Quay #01-04 The Quayside  Tel:+65 6733 3923
Opening Hours: Mon to Fri: 11.30am – 2.30pm, 6.00pm – 11pm   Sat & Sun: 11.30am – 11.00pmOther Related Entries
Sapporo Ramen Miharu (Gallery Hotel)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
Marutama Ra-Men (Liang Court)
Ramen Santouka (Central)
Can You Name The Ramen?
2010-08-13 00:00:00
Shanghai’s Nanxiang – 3 Levels of Xiao Long Bao
[Shanghai] Xiao Long Bao is available all over Shanghai, with varying qualities. Most had thick chewy skin, and you kind of wondered if there was paper in the fillings. But there were some street side stalls that would throw off your footing, swearing to bring some back if you ever could.Shanghai’s most celebrated Xiao Long Bao could be found at 南翔馒头店, within the charming Yu Yuan 豫园 at the Old Town God’s Temple precinct. Amongst the scenic buildings, exquisite Jiuqu bridge, old trees who spoke stories and red autumn leaves, you could see one long queue. One really long queue.At Nan Xiang, there were 3 different levels of service and pricing. The ‘commoners’ would queue up on the ground level for 10 hot piping dumplings at 20 RMB. Most would just gobble the entire box once they grabbed their hands on one. An average queue time was about an hour, at least you could isten to street performers sing their lungs out.On level two, there was a long line with stools for you to wait for about 30 minutes. My advice: Guard your seat, ignore what the others behind tell you. They might tell you stories so that they could get in front of you. Remember.If you were willing to pay more, then go all the way upstairs and spend at least 150 RMB for an almost immediate seat.Nanxiang was a town near Shanghai where the Xiao Long Mantou was invented. Therefore, you MUST eat the Nanxiang Xiao Long Bao, so compact yet meaty that would splash up tasty thick soupy broth that might just scald your tongue and flow to your heart. The skin was almost paper-thin, ignoring fragility while you picked a dumpling up with your chopsticks.The King Size Nanxiang Crab Roe Steam Soup Bun was a winner in every way, while you first sucked up the broth through a straw, saving the best meat for last. A pity for the thick skin and mess anyway.Two specialist Xiaolongbao restaurants are often regarded as the most authentic, one of which is Nanxiang with 110 years of history.  Despite the wait, despite the extremely bad service (I shoudn’t talk about it), despite the old granny who cheated me of my seat, Nanxiang Xiaolongbao was well worth.Shanghai Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant, 南翔馒头店(豫园路店)  黄浦区豫园路85号 上海Other Related Entries
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
Grand Shanghai (Grand Copthorne)
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)

Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao
5 Things You May Not Know About Xiao Long Bao
2010-08-10 00:00:00
Nando’s – Queue Peri-Peri Long for this Chicken
No kidding – The name “Nando’s” can twinkle a sparkling eye, a short scream and fiery exclamation. Since its old Park Mall days, the return of this Peri-Peri chicken to Singapore spells nothing short of success.For those who had not been to Bugis Junction for some time, this store at the corner had been making waves, achieving a cult status, and creating snakes of queues with excited patrons since its opening in May 2010. 5306 friends on Facebook, that’s a feat.I was too lazy to queue for anything, but succumbed after all that hype, feeling so out-of-trend. 10 minutes was all it took on a weekday 2:00pm.Some background information: Nando’s (named after the founder Fernando) is a casual dining restaurant chain founded since 1987 which originated from South Africa with a Portuguese meets Mozambican theme. It is famous for its Peri Peri chicken. Peri Peri, also known as African bird’s-eye chili, is often used as marinades in Mozambican roast and grilled dishes, adding a spicy capsicum taste.The menu was slightly confusing as I flipped it up and down, lost in my choices of chicken sizes (found in the middle) , side items (found at the back) and Peri-Peri flavours (found at the front). I finally decided on a 1/4 chicken that was “Hot” in a hasty, over mild, extra hot or lemon and herb. The waitress first asked if I was Singaporean, and assured me that I should be able to endure “Hot”.Oh, it was hot indeed, with the tang lingering in my tongue for a long while after my first bite. It might leave it numb temporarily.  Unfortunately, water was NOT offered, and I had to make do with a out-of-this-world Crimson Cola. Who would have thought Pomegranate and Coke could go so well together? (Then again. It’s Coke, which could go well with lemons, salt and volka.)I was glad I did not queue more than 30 minutes for this. It was not too bad, but the chicken a tad too dry and chunky for my liking.The 4 bottled sauces did make this meal very experimental yet enjoyable, especially the Garlic Peri-Peri sauce which reminded me strangely of MacDonald’s garlic chilli. But somehow I might just place Nando’s in the same league, as say er… Kenny Roger’s?To fans, this is peri-perfect chicken. Though I heart the peri-peri sauce, but I do not intend to queue for peri-peri long. You?Nando’s, 200 Victoria Street #01-85 Bugis Junction Singapore Tel:+65 6339 65555
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Barcelos (Novena)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill  (Marina Square)
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
15 Minutes (Lasalle)
Rock & Ash (Marina Square)
2010-08-06 00:00:00
Vienna’s Figlmüller Schnitzel – Pork Chop Bigger Than My Hands
The beautiful beautiful beautiful city of Vienna, Austria – It is not only the musical birthplace of Mozart, Schubert and Strauss, but only the land of Schnitzels. If you know not what they are, Schnitzels are deep fried pork coated with breadcrumbs, similar to local pork cutlets or Singapore’s Hainanese Pork Chop.When in Vienna, go nowhere else but Figlmüller for your largest and most popular piece of pork schnitzels (€12). It was huge! With a diameter of around 34 centimetres, it was bigger than my plate, twice the length of the fork and probably four times the side of my palm. Warning: Do not attempt to eat this alone.Schnitzels are traditionally served with a lemon slice, lingonberry jam or cranberry sauce and either potato salad or potatoes with parsley and butter.  Patrons had rated this restaurant’s signature dish as “best schnitzel in Vienna”, “compulsory to have”, and “best in the world”.The Viennese would give the pork a good beating, literally, before it is fried. This is so that the meat will be really tender and easy on the bite. Cutting the meat apart, it would be about 3 to 4mm thick if I would have to use a ruler.Only the “rose” part of the pig was used, as the loin would be less sinewy and tough and would not puff up when fried. The meat was mildly salty and no other sauces would be needed to mask any porky taste.
According to my tour guide, to test a good Schnitzel, the skin should not stick to the meat and would be able to fall off easily. This did! Also, the orangey breadcrumb coated skin was exceptionally crisp, light and fragrant.The potato salad (€ 3,80) at Figlmuller was also a killer, meaning it had erased the taste memory of all the other potato salads I ever tasted in my life or those I felt embarrassed to have made during pot-lucks. Lightly coated with styrian pumpkin-seed oil, the soft potatoes would melt in your mouth to declare it a champion.Figlmüller had been around since 1905. In its fourth generation of family business now, it was located very close to the famous Stephansplatz and Stephansdom cathedral, down a little alleyway, to a charming little cottage-like cellar.I have came to realise for my pork chop, size does matters.Figlmüller, 1 Wollzeile 5, A-1010 Vienna Tel: 01/512 61 77   01/512 61 77, Fax: 01/320 42 57 20
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Sachertorte (Vienna)
2010-08-04 00:00:00
Sakura International Buffet – Underground By The Park
After a 42 minute train ride from town, and a 12 minute walk from Woodlands MRT station under the hot sun, I arrived at a patch grassland overlooking Republic Polytehnic. There was no restaurant in sight, only a big red signboard which sprouted out of nowhere of Admiralty Park.Only when you reached the sign (like an Amazing Race detour), you would then strangely realise there was a staircase which went below ground level. The surprise did not end there. As you walked in this buffet restaurant, the glass panes beyond revealed a park, pond and alfresco dining. And it was packed on a Saturday afternoon. How did these people find this place?Sakura International Buffet, priced at $21+ for a weekday lunch and $25+for dinner, offered 100 different varieties of food items from sushi, sashimi, dimsum, fried noodles, teppanyaki to cheesecake.The area was massive, with people piling up plates of everything. Of course the lobster, softshell crabs, prawns and scallops disappeared before you barely saw them appearing. Obese children were running around (and I think parents should stop bringing them to buffets but run at Admiralty Park), and some patrons looked like they have not eaten for a week. Maybe they hadn’t.Complains such as ‘low quality food’, ‘mediocre sushi’ and ‘slow service’ could be found in many web comments, but we really could not come expecting Shangri La. If you have tried one Sakura, you probably had a good idea how the other branches would fare. And nowadays, three red notes could not get us much.My tip would be, if an item looked bad, chances are it is. Stick to two reasonable cakes rather than struggling with the other six for the sake of trying. Also, save your calories for freshly fried food items, teppanyaki grills and hotplates as they at least arrived piping hot. When in doubt, use the distributed ‘clips’ where you could request for freshly-prepared food.Reasonably priced halal buffet places are rare. If you are in a navigation hunting mode, it is time to explore this ‘underground’ restaurant by the park.Sakura International Buffet, Admiralty Park, 31 Riverside Road, Tel:+65 6368 8197
Daily: 12pm–2.30pm, 6pm–9.30pmOther Related Entries
Fisherman’s Market (The Central)
Carousel (Royal Plaza on Scotts)
SUN Japanese Dining (Chijmes)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
2010-08-03 00:00:00
Sichuan Douhua UOB – High Tea with a High View
Life is a luxurious pleasure when you are served an Imperial High Tea at the 60th high storey of one of Singapore’s renowned banks.Gazing at the distant Marina Bay Sands, I took a sip of an aromatic “Long Jing”, also known to be the favourite tea of China’s top leaders. Drinking from a little transparent glass cup, tasting bits of the tea leaves, and taking a quiet moment could really be quite an up-lifting experience unlike other noisier Chinese restaurants.I attended this session as part of a blogging workshop and competition with the speaker being Dr Leslie Tay of ieatishootipost fame. Even though it was extremely stressful to eat with 15 other bloggers armed with cameras big and small (I could imagine that basket of siew mai screaming “Help!” all the time), we took time to share our culinary experiences over har kow.The imperial tea was paired with a selection of dim sum from Steamed Prawn Siew Mai, Steamed Crystal Prawn Dumplings, to Pan-fried Chicken Meat Dumpling. They were fresh-tasting, but unspectacular.I lost my heart to the house-special Pancake with Chicken Floss, which could only be found in the high-tea menu (which would have cost $20++ per person). Pan fried to a crisp golden brown and covered with abundant sesame seeds, a bite would reveal the sweet-salty fillings of meaty floss. The unique taste came from bits of dark green Sichuan sweet pickled vegetable, a specially imported delicacy.Dan Dan Mian, the classic Sichuan Peddler’s noodles, was given a slight modern twist here with thin hand-made noodles with a less oily but equally spicy sauce. The portion was small, but still packed a punch such that fellow patrons kept requesting for more water. (A fun thing to know would be that I held the chopsticks on my left hand, with the camera on my right. Extremely challenging!)Ending the meal with a Crispy Green Tea Glutinous Rice Ball, which came lightly fried with hot black sesame sauce bursting out once it popped into your mouth. I felt like I was on top of the world, in every sense of the phrase.Si Chuan Dou Hua
80 Raffles Place #60-01 UOB Plaza Singapore Tel:+65 6535 6006
Opening Hours: 11.30 – 2.30pm, 6 – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Royal China (Raffles Hotel)
Yan Ting (St Regis)
Grand Shanghai (Grand Copthorne)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
2010-08-02 00:00:00
Galley by the Straits – Super Ulu, Superb View, Superior Seafood
It was a 45 minute drive from town and a 5 minute walk in (plus signing in at the security counter), all for the sake of seafood with a picturesque view of yachts, amazing sunset and velvet sky.Galley By The Straits, located within the SAF Yacht Club, is certainly Ulu enough, so remote that a fellow food blogger who stayed in Sembawang did not know of its existence. Do you?I was recommended by an ex-colleague from Woodlands who said that the view was ‘can-die’, and fish head curry was a ‘must-try’. She was right. At about 7:15pm in the evening, people surged out of the outdoor restaurant armed with their point and shoots. It reminded me of Malaysia’s Kukup, and even my handphone reflected Cellcom instead of M1 occasionally.This time I was invited for a dinner with other food bloggers. The menu was extremely wide-ranging from Chinese, Western, seafood, BBQ, to grills. Jimmy the Managing Director, who used to be from Country Manna, revealed that he was determined to offer something entirely different after he was given the task to manage this Waterfront Restaurant.Start your meal with a Seafood Soup in Coconut ($14 each), with a prawn, scallops and mushrooms in a refreshing double-boiled clear soup with a tinge of coconut fragrance. I wished that the coconut had a bigger opening to scoop though.The other popular appetizer was the Galley’s Smoked Salmon Sashimi ($36), literally a mountain of cold-smoked salmon, fresh tasting enough to slip pass your tongue. The salmon was actually smoked in-house, thus ensuring a consistent quality.All the 3 times I was here, I had Fish Head Curry, considering I was never a Fish Head person because I liked to eat beautiful things. It was the strong coconut-based gravy which gave it a smooth and creamy textured body and unique aroma. Slightly sweet and not very spicy, good enough to have it on its own.When spoilt for choice, try the Yuan Yuan Prawn of cereal and wasabi combination ($7/100gm), Pipa Seafood Beancurd ($9), and delicious Black Pepper Crabs. This 8 year old restaurant’s speciality was really in its seafood, with the fresh king giant crispy prawns still fondly appearing in my food memories.Frankly, the location was inaccessible, menu mind-boggling, and identity and concept mixed. However, with wind breeze, incredible view, sumptuous seafood, and live piano music, Galley by the Straits is really hidden find for that romantic dinner and happy family outing.(BanBan’s task this month -Restaurants with a View. Do recommend if you have any.)Galley by the Straits, 43 Admiralty Road West SAF Yacht Club Tel:+65 6491 1388
Opening Hours: 11am – 10.30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
Ulu Food Places
More Ulu Food Places
Sunset Grill and Pub (Seletar Airbase)
Carousel (Royal Plaza on Scotts)
2010-07-28 00:00:00
The Daily Scoop – Fall In Love With It
Imagine sitting at a little cafe away from the cityscape. The rain just stopped and you were just looking out of the window at the drops trickling down. Lovers and small families sat around square white tables, just enjoying the quiet moment and a scoop of their favourite flavours of ice cream.You wondered at your two scoops of ice cream – Lychee Martini and Strawberry Shortcake – White, pink, sweet and childlike yet with a tinge of mischief.The bite of Lychee Martini was sorbet-y and creamy with bits of lychee lingering in your tongue. It reminded you of childhood days when you were scooping canned lychees with syrup, and also the partying days when you did not want to get too drunk.You also watched the ice cream being churned in front of your very eyes. Cherry Brandy, Passion Pinada, Banana Fantasy, Unusually Apple, Kahlua Krunch and Bailey’s Choc Chip all wanted to make you fall in love with them.It just made you enjoy the simplest things in life. So what if your best friends Ben & Jerry were not around. This smooth goodness made you proud enough to want to introduce this to your friends overseas.There were some words on the wall which said “Men cannot live on ice cream alone but woman surely can” You smiled and thought to yourself, “What utter rubbish, yet how true”It did not matter. The Daily Scoop indeed lived up to name – you can have one every day.The Daily Scoop, Blk 43 Jalan Merah Saga #01-78 Chip Bee Gardens Singapore Tel:+65 6475 3128
Opening Hours: Mon–Thu: 11am – 10pm; Fri–Sun: 11am – 10.30pmOther Related Entries
Island Creamery (Serene Centre)
Ice Cream Chefs (East Coast)
Udders (Thomson Road)
Little Ice Cream Kafe LICK (Tanjong Katong)
Once Upon a Milkshake (Maxwell Chambers)
2010-07-26 00:00:00
Keisuke Ramen – Prawn Ramen aka Hei Mee
There are people who go around hunting, and I mean HUNT (ie search, seek, track, chase, pursuit, quest) for the best ramen in this country. A friend said that I would likely fall into this group, and I would like to correct that.I had already found my favourites in Santouka, Miharu and Ippudo – and the rest was just to size up the competition, plus I don’t usually go back to the same place too often. Ramen, like everything else, is really personal.And if you were just getting bored with the Tonkotsu, Miso and the Shoyu stock base, this new kid on the block might blow your senses off with Prawn-based soup.Located at the Parco Millenia Walk, look for the shop with the second longest queue. The longest was Nantsuttei which I chosen not to sacrifice my time for. This was the first overseas store by celebrity ramen chef Keisuke Takeda, known for his shrimp consomme in French restaurants.Therefore, it would not be surprising that the whole store smelled of shrimp, which had a sweeter aroma than fish.The Keisuke Prawn Stock Special Ramen (S$19) was their recommended dish. Be ensured of a flavourful tasty stock as it took 300 Amaebi prawns to make 200 bowls. The soup was bitter-salty-sweet, a familiar taste which was a cross between the Singaporean Hei Mee and Lobster Bisque.You might find the bowl a little empty on its ingredients, with traces of Kombu (from Hidaka) and preserved vegetables, and two halves of a 80% hard-boiled egg taking centrestage. Big surprise – No prawns, only chicken meat. Prawn wantons would be additional cost.Keisuke Ramen offered very attentive service, bustling atmosphere, elegantly designed bowls and innovative take on the ramen. The ramen needed an acquired taste, and most consumers might just choose the close alternative of a $3 Hei Mee.Keisuke Ramen, 9 Raffles Boulevard #P3-02 Parco Marina Bay, Millenia Walk Singapore Tel:+65 6337 7919
Opening Hours: 10:30am – 9:30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Keisuke Ramen (Millenia Walk)
Netsuretsu Ichiban-Tei (Robertson Quay)
Sapporo Ramen Miharu (Gallery Hotel)
Ippudo (Mandarin Gallery)
Menya Kaiko (Ion Orchard)
2010-07-23 00:00:00
Bugis Street Ngak Seah Beef Kway Teow – One of The Best
Lavender Food Square, well-patronised by supper-goers and celebrity chef Andre Chiang, is known for two of its famous stalls – Wanton Mee and Beef Noodles.I am usually there for the Kok Kee Wanton Mee, and if the queue was too long (more than 10 people), would go to my next best alternative.The Bugis Street Ngak Seah Bee Kuay Teow, served a generous sumptuous bowl of beef noodles, attracting queues of people most of the times. The stall was not plastered with the usual newspaper reports or TV food posters, but nevertheless earned good word of mouth since its days at Bugis a decade back.The Beef Noodles came in thick white vermicelli noodles, well-tossed in thick gooey sauce, topped with evenly prepared beef slices. The light brown sauce was not heavy, and also stayed dense even after a long while, indicating that it was slowly stirred and prepared. I hated many served in the food court where the base would become watery.The beef slices were quickly heated over stock, such that it was not fully well-done, retaining its bite and tenderness. The hot soup had hints of herbs and flavoursome beef broth. Tasty.My only wish list was that they would use hand-made beef balls instead of pre-made ones that felt like it was from the supermarkets. That would mean a lot more effort, but also make the entire presentation more authentic and complete.Oh yes, sometimes, it would be the uncle behind the stall. He cooked it better.Bugis Street Ngak Seah Beef Kway Teow, Lavender Food Square #01-28
Opening Hours: Closed alternate WednesdaysOther Related Entries
Ah Guan Mee Pok (Syed Awi)
Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodles (Maxwell Food Centre)
Mien (Bukit Timah)
Ah Tee Ko Ko Mee (Golden Mile)
Top 73+1 Handmade Fishball Noodle
2010-07-21 00:00:00
88 Congee – Hotel Quality Hawker Food
88 粥品 (88 Zhou Pin) at Toa Payoh serves up a familiar yummilious taste of Hong Kong styled congee, the quality kind that you would find along the roads of Nathan Lane. On a fine breakfast outing, the single bowl relieved my cravings for Kowloon street food.The porridge was cooked thick and smooth – where the rice was cooked patiently till disintegrated into a silky texture that could be stirred evenly. No more clumps.What’s Congee without the good old familiar youtiao? The dough stick was freshly deep-fried on the spot and served one long stick on top of the bowl in its entirety. Not the usual soggy-limp or overly deep-fried overnight you char kway.Some of the recommended Congee included the Meat Ball & Century Egg, Prawn Ball and Meat Ball & Intestine Congee where the meatballs were home-made with a secret recipe.If you wonder why you could get hotel quality food in a hawker centre, that was because Chef Au worked in Westin Hotel, Raffles Hotel and Hong Kong’s Shangri-La before he moved up to set up his own stall.Dipping the whole youtiao into the hot piping congee, it again made me recall of that good old Hong Kong feelin’.88 Congee, Blk 127 Lorong 1 Toa Payoh #02-29 Singapore 310127 Tel:+65 94752678
Opening Hours: 0700 – 1500 (Tues-Sat), 0700 – 1400 (Sunday) (Closed Mondays)Other Related Entries
Zhen Zhen Porridge (Maxwell Food Centre)
2010-07-15 00:00:00
Koka Wanton Noodles – Opens only 4 hours at Night!
First things first, this Wanton Mee stall only opened 4 hours at night!On a visit at 10:30pm on a weekday, the entire food centre was filled with patrons, and only two stalls were opened – this and the drink stall. Benches were filled with couples, elders and solo customers splurging off the springy noodles. Be expected to wait more than half an hour.Koka Wanton Noodles 可口云吞面食– rated one of the best wanton mee by a local paper, had been passed down three generations since the Yip’s family first roadside stall at Jalan Besar.It’s distinctive feature was that very thin and QQ noodles, cooked al dente, swimming in watery spicy chilli sauce. For $4 a plate, you would get thinly-sliced pale looking char siew, chinese mushrooms, dry shreds of chicken and choy sum. The portion was small, though the variety of ingredients made the dish more exciting on the pellets.Overall it was not spectacular, at least not spectacular enough to warrant that 45 minute wait.Koka Wanton Noodles, North Bridge Road Food Centre Blk 10 North Bridge Road #01-99 Singapore 190010
Opening Hours: 8pm to 12am Closed on SundaysOther Related Entries
Pontian Wanton Mee (Far East Plaza)
Canton-I (Ion Orchard)
Hua Kee Wanton Mee (Old Airport Road)
Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodles (Maxwell Food Centre)
Ah Tee Ko Ko Mee (Golden Mile)
2010-07-12 00:00:00
Hua Kee Wanton Mee – Vs Cho Kee, Who’s Better?
Old Airport Road Hawker Centre is known for two competing Wanton Mee, both facing the road side. Hua Kee Hougang Famous Wanton Mee 华记后港祖传驰名云吞面 is the one without the electronic queue display.Years back during the Yummy King programme voting for the favourite Wanton Mee, neighbouring Cho Kee won the taxi drivers’ hearts, but it was this Hua Kee who earned the viewers votes to be Number One in Singapore.I ordered a bowl each from each stall, for a side by side comparison. Hua Kee’s version was firm chewy noodles topped with irregularly-sliced char siew lined with a fine proportion meat and fats, and medium-sized pork wantons.What really gave it its edge and extra bite was its fried shallot, chilli sauce filled with seeds and oily crunchy pork lard. The bowl was almost swimming in chill oil and flavoursome sauce, such that each noodle thread was well-covered with the robust taste. Definitely not for the health-conscious.This family-run business which started in Paya Lebar in the 1940 has a strong following, and even its very strong competition has not knocked it down.Hua Kee Wanton Mee, Blk 51 Old Airport Road #01-113B Old Airport Road Food Centre
Opening hours 12pm – 12am (Closed on Mon)Other Related Entries
Pontian Wanton Mee (Far East Plaza)
Ah Guan Mee Pok (Syed Awi)
Canton-I (Ion Orchard)
Koka Wanton Noodles (North Bridge Road)
Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodles (Maxwell Food Centre)
2010-07-09 00:00:00
Zhen Zhen Porridge 真真粥品 – 45 minutes of Waiting
Maxwell Food Centre had no less than 10 stalls selling porridge in the morning – what? And the stall where you had to wait the longest, the famous Zhen Zhen Porridge.Some numbers – 30 years of history, 6 chopsticks from the Makansutra Guide, and 35 minutes of waiting. Though there were less than 10 people in the queue. Be prepared to wait up to 45 minutes for your bowl of $2.30 pleasure at 12pm.The queue was not entirely the reason for the wait, but aunties inside took a painstakingly long time to cut up the ingredients and get orders.If you liked your porridge thick and dense, cooked with broken grains instead of whole rice, you would feel this pleasurable. Every spoonful of porridge I eaten was full of ingredients, such as chicken meat (or fish slices) and century egg, and other peripherals of spring onion, shallots and chopped preserved vegetables.  That made the porridge un-plain and exciting to eat.It was easily one of the better congees around with its smooth texture and varied constituents. Top it up with fresh yu-sheng for a complete meal.Delicious, yes. But worth all that queuing in the Maxwell heat, maybe not.Zhen Zhen Porridge 真真粥品, Maxwell Road #01-54 Maxwell Food Centre Singapore
Opening Hours, Wed–Mon: 5am – 2pm (Closed on Tue)Other Related Entries
88 Congee (Toa Payoh Lor 1)

Tian Tian vs Ah Tai (Maxwell Hawker)
Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodles (Maxwell Food Centre)
House of Rice Roll and Porridge (Killiney Road)
Tiong Bahru Teochew Kueh (Tiong Bahru)
2010-07-07 00:00:00
Ah Guan Mee Pok – Best Bak Chor Mee
Many like to make special requests when it comes to ordering their Bak Chor Mee at the foodcourt  – more vinegar, more ketchup, less lard, more chilli, less soya sauce. “Auntie Mee Pok  多醋，多茄汁，少油， 辣椒多多，酱油少少…” The list goes on.  Don’t tell me you are not one of them.At this shop off Jalan Besar, you can be assured to have your bowl of Mee Pok just the way it comes, without any additional or less sauce, because it is done perfectly in that way for 11 years.The sauce had been specially made, and kept distinctly dry so that the QQ mee pok would not be turn soggy.  So don’t ask for extra ketchup!Ah Guan Mee Pok ($3/$4) offered an atypical and appealing of mix of ingredients , unlike the usual minced meat, fish cake and miserable bits of mushroom.  You would get that plus pork liver, lean pork slices, a prawn, scallop and even crayfish (for additional $3).The scallop in its purplish shell was easily the highlight of the noodles.Also, the noodles were so well- mixed such that each shred was lightly covered with the part-spicy, part-salty, part-vinegary sauce. I hated those versions where more than half the noodles would turn up clumpy and dry, such that soup had to be added.The Mee Kia was also not the standard type, but one flat and thin, as though it was a third the breath of the usual Mee Pok.  That made the noodles springy and light.Since its days at Toa Payoh Lorong 5, every bowl of Ah Guan Mee Pok had been prepared for consistency and preciseness. So good, I went for it twice in a week.Ah Guan Mee Pok, 69 Syed Alwi Road Singapore Tel:+65 6296 0069
Opening Hours: 7am – 9pm DailyOther Related Entries
Ah Tee Ko Ko Mee (Golden Mile)
Top 73+1 Handmade Fishball Noodle
Bugis Street Ngak Seah Beef Kway Teow (Lavender)
Koka Wanton Noodles (North Bridge Road)
Hua Kee Wanton Mee (Old Airport Road
2010-07-05 00:00:00
Everything With Fries – 5 Different Fries for Tries
EwF isn’t exactly EVERYTHING With Fries, but You Should Order Every Burger With Fries.I heard so much about the two other Everything With Fries at Joo Chiat and Holland Village from the other food bloggers. This branch at Orchard Central was a spin-off from the restaurants, this being more fast-food in nature. The concept felt like a MOS Burger shop, with a simple and elegant plain white and pink decor.EwF was conceptualised by the people behind Awfully Chocolate, that deliciously tempting sinful chocolate cake makers who once sold only 3 cakes. Owner Lyn Lee stressed a lot on being natural and healthy. She ‘hated processed meats’ and would ‘never step into that fast-food restaurant’ (I won’t name which one). So meat patties and burgers at EwF were, made from scratch. Nice.The good news was (unlike the cakes) – you get more than 3 flavours of fries to choose from – Original, Garlic, Sour Cream and Onion, Salt and Vinegar and Curry Fries ($2.90 each pack). The shoestring pack of fries were not filling, but made a tasty finger-licking-good snack which complimented  the burgers. The Curry Fries, with a slight touch of spiciness and saltiness, were my favourite.(I almost told Lyn those fries reminded me of Mxx’s Shaker Fries, but kept my mouth shut.) My suggestion would be to have a larger variety of fries, such as crinkle, curly and thick-cut fries to make the store live up to its name. I liked my fries thick and bitey. And if they are game for it, how about Terikayi, Kimchi, Laska or Mee Siam flavoured fries? (Lyn: I am not joking.)The signature EwF Super Burger ($6.90) was superiorly delicious with its very soft burger bun that you could sink your whole mouth into. The premium beef patty, topped with cheese tomato concasse and gilled onion, was juicy and not overly done. Cute and manageable.Asian-inspired Chicken Tandoori Burger ($6.90) was made of chicken sandwiched between muffin buns (which reminded me of Mxx’s again), topped with not-too spicy tandoori sauce and pickled onion. The meat was tender and full as it was cut from a whole boneless chicken leg. But I wished the chicken was slightly more marinated to bring out that Indian essence.The entire meal of a burger, soft drink and fries was an affordable $11.90, considering its central city location. Remember to end your meal with a Nutella Slice ($3.50) or Butterscotch Milkshake ($3.90). The shake’s a killer. Trust me.Everything With Fries, 181 Orchard Central #01-24/25
Opening Hours: Sun – Thurs 11am-10pm Fri & Sat 11am-11pmOther Related Entries
Rock & Ash (Marina Square)
Most Original Burger MOB (Vivocity)
Burger Shack (Bt Timah)
Burger, Bench & Bar (Orchard Cineleisure)
Relish (Cluny Court)
2010-07-02 00:00:00
Most Original Burger MOB – Where’s The Cheese?
There never seems to be enough burger joints around. And when you have a name like “Most Original Burger” or MOB, you would expect their food to be… yah, original.The Goodfellas ($14.90) was their best-seller, formed by three 60 gram mini-burgers joined together, each with a different patty you could choose. There was a ‘bridge’ that linked all three, think Marina Bay Sands in a burger form. The fillings were mostly the usual suspects or Asian cuisine inspired such as Classic Beef, Grilled Salmon, Ebi Fry, Thai Chicken, and Smoked Duck.I had a Teriyaki Chicken, Beef Bulgogi (stir-fried sliced ribeye smothered in classic Korean Bulgogi Sauce) and The Sloppy Joe (grilled beef patty smothered in Bolognaise Sauce).I liked my burgers warm, substantial and meaty. So these burgers though cute, did not work for me. The portions were small, and fillings were ordinarily prepared. The burger was soft, fluffy and mildly sweet for me.My biggest regret was when the waiter (who wore an all black mobster uniform) asked if I wanted cheese to my burgers and bread with my soup, I said yes. He did not warn me about the price though, and upon seeing the receipt I was reminded of the Resorts World’s Sultan fish.The 4cm by 4cm almost non-consequential cheese was an extra $3, and the four pieces of thin garlic was $4, excluding taxes!  Where’s the cheese?The mushroom soup was already $7.90, and that meant the bread with a pathetic small square bowl of soup which was three quarter filled cost me close to 14 bucks.The mediocre cheesy fries were not piping hot and felt soggy. Again, where’s the cheese?My burger set, soup and drink set me back by…. $44. Initially, I did have faith in a home-growth brand of burgers. But with a fast-food like setting, my feedback would be for MOB to work something on their prices to keep themselves up to competition. And please give more cheese.Most Original Burger MOB, 1 HarbourFront Walk #01-52 VivoCity Tel: 6376 9681
Daily: 10am – 11pmOther Related Entries
Everything With Fries (Orchard Central)
Burger Shack (Bt Timah)
Burger, Bench & Bar (Orchard Cineleisure)
Relish (Cluny Court)
Tom N Toms Coffee (ICON Village)
2010-06-30 00:00:00
Purple Sage – The Outstanding Caterer of The Year
Purple Sage, known for its creative concepts, vibrant set-up and exquisite catered food, had invited me for a Bloggers Night. This sampling dinner was rather unusual, as it did not comprise of the customary corporate clients and journalists, and was more like a gathering of like-minded friends. This was another step to demonstrate the caterer’s innovative spirit and dare-to-try attitude.As how purple would signify the royalty, what was presented was not the standard carbo-loaded catered food, and Purple Sage chose up-market route to delight patrons who clearly wanted more.Before the course, the bread while looking thoroughly simple, was already a winner with its soft chewy texture, matched with a smooth light butter.The Wild Mushroom Soup came looking like a cappuccino cup, with frothy foam wrapping the top. It certainly added a layered dimension. And the mushroom soup was made mildly thinner and level like a dense drink. I welcomed the change, though I suspect this would be really time-consuming for preparation.The fish course was Poached Barramundi, with Confit frog leg, asparagus, and shimeji mushroom. This was a probably a case of a supporting role being the forerunner over the lead role. The fish and frog each had a distinct taste and feel, and fresh meat and preserved confit could be conflicting and clashing on the buds.After an intermezzo lemon sherbet, the meat course was a BBQ Short Rib with Tian of Potato with Mushroom Fricassee. The short rib was a crowd-favourite, tenderly delicious and marinated in a rather Asian tasting sauce which gave it an Eastern-French twist. The potato was well-baked and sliced which was a suitable complement.Being rather experimental, Chef Khng Ming Earn infused vinegar into chocolate as dessert. It was a love-hate relationship, and I personally found it peculiarly individualistic. My suggestion would be to incorporate the chocolate, with the potato puree and strawberry parfait all into a cup form, and lessen on the vinegar.This boutique caterer had already been rather well-known to the food industry, last won the “Outstanding Caterer of The Year” at the World Gourmet Summit 2009 and 2010. As Managing Director of Purple Sage Tony Seow indicated, he had greater heights in his mind, to be the likes of a Fortune 500 company. His strong team had already impressed me with their passion and dedication, and I wish them all the best.Purpley Sage, 5 Harrison Road #04-01  Tel:+65 6396 6990
2010-06-28 00:00:00
Golden Mile Claypot Rice – 30 Years and Going Strong
30 years in the claypot rice business, this couple team is still going strong at its original stall at Golden Mile. The owner was sheepishly proud that her stall was rated Number 1 over the other famous Chinatown and Clementi stalls on a local television competition.Golden Mile’s claypot rice was a classic – fragrant rice which was topped with tender marinated chicken pieces, tasty Chinese sausages, fresh green vegetables and light traces of salted fish. The winner was the soya sauce, thick and dark, yet not overly salty which would usually make one thirst.Added with a formulated sweet chilli sauce, the combination was aromatic and addictive. Cooked over charcoal for about 15 minutes, the moist rice was soft and fluffy on the bite. It complimented well with the slightly salty meat and sausage slices. One wished for some mushroom pieces for an added texture though.Although the ‘star’ of this Cantonese dish should be the ‘claypot’, I learnt that several patrons actually preferred to take-away. This would allow more time for the rice to absorb the various flavours and moisture.I noticed that the rice, oil and sauce brands were displayed prominently around the stall, and asked if they were afraid others would steal their winning formula. The owner replied that the secret to success was not only about what went into the claypot, but the experience behind the hands cooking them. Well said.Golden Mile Claypot Rice, Golden Mile Food Centre 505 Beach Road #01-65 Tel:+65 6295 8234
Opening hours: 5 – 10pm (Closed on Wednesdays)Other Related Entries
瓦 Wǎ  (Cineleisure)
Loy Kee Chicken Rice (Balestier)
Beach Road Scissor Cut Curry Rice (Jalan Besar)
Sin Kee Chicken Rice (Margaret Drive)
2010-06-25 00:00:00
Pontian Wanton Mee 笨珍云吞面 – Not Authentic, But Who Cares?
A friend from Hong Kong was kind of disgusted at Singapore’s wanton noodles. “I have never seen char siew so thinly sliced! It can break the record of the thinnest char siew ever.”Other than the roasted pork, Singapore’s version of extraordinary tiny and flat prawnless wantons can almost break that record too.Similarly, the Malaysian’s wanton mee is popular locally, with the “Pontian Wanton Mee 笨珍云吞面” brand appearing in several coffee shop stalls throughout the island. However, residents of Pontian (Johore) would tell you that those sold here are so unlike their familiar versions of “Heng Heng 兴兴云吞” and “8383 南荣餐室的新记云吞面”. So much for authenticity.But… 笨珍 Wanton Mee is almost everywhere in Singapore now! For fans craving that ketchup goodness in your wanton noodles in town, head down to youthland Far East Plaza. The Graffiti café from Heeren had moved here, with more graffiti, more space and more tables, selling the good-old famous Pontian noodles and drinks.The queue was long – and patrons had to take a number like a visit to an overcrowded clinic on a Monday morning. (While waiting, tou could probably spend your time reading mushy love messages written on the tables and walls.)There were three choices of the sauce base: ketchup without chili, chili or black sauce with chili.I found that the standard dropped from the first time when I tried it back at Heeren. The noodles were rather lumpy, and therefore did not mix well with the sauce. More sauce please.  Nevertheless, the deep fried wanton dipped in sinful mayonnaise sauce were still light crunchy and enjoyable.With the Hong Kong and Malaysian wanton mee quite distinct, have you wondered which brand would best represent the ‘Singapore Wanton Mee’? Kok Kee 国记, Cho Kee 曹记, Fei Fei 飞飞?Graffiti Cafe Far East Plaza Level 1Other Related Entries
Canton-I (Ion Orchard)
Top 73+1 Handmade Fishball Noodle
Black Pepper Char Siew Rice & Noodles (Maxwell Food Centre)
Koka Wanton Noodles (North Bridge Road)
Hua Kee Wanton Mee (Old Airport Road)
2010-06-23 00:00:00
Beach Road Scissor Cut Curry Rice – The Ugly Gooey Delicious Thing
Several Hainanese dishes such as the Chicken Rice and Yong Tau Foo has made it to the pedestal of well-known local dishes, and it is really time for the ‘Scissor Cut Curry Rice’ should be promoted food celebrity status. This rice is almost as ‘Your Singapore’ as it can get.美芝律剪刀剪咖喱饭 was one of the pioneers of Scissor Cut Curry Rice and the shop was recently renovated and expanded (though still looked very run-down!). It continued to attract queues of people for their dinner and supper hunt.The rice was gooey, unsightly, and gummy – probably the ugliest looking food around. When it was taken-away and opened, the content looked like a pack of messy orange-brown puke – But it was absolutely sinfully delicious.The colour came from the combination of Hainanese curry 咖喱汁and dark sauce卤汁, secretly concocted with over 20 different ingredients. If you had not tried the curry before, it was unlike any you ever tasted. When dumped on the rice, the sweet-spicy-gummy curry made the drenched rice good enough to be eaten on its own.The cutting of the meat with the traditional scissors created a ‘click-clack’ sound, and also the signature branding to this popular supper hunt.The absolute must-tries included the Braised Pork ($1), Cripsy Pork Chop ($1), Fried Cabbage ($0.60), Prawn Roll (0.60) and Fried Egg ($0.60). The meal was so cheap that 5-dishes for two persons cost less than $11.The Braised Pork, sliced into thin rectangular shapes, was meat in its most tender form. It was without the porky taste but instead oozed out the dark sauce that it affectionally absorbed.The cabbage was cooked till pale green and squashy, but tastefully soft.I also liked the prawn rolls for its crunchy bits of water chestnut, but was a tad too oily.You could spot several versions in the food court and they would probably be a lot better looking. But it is this ugly version that proves that taste can only be skin-deep as well. 80 years of history and 3 generations of popularity, somebody should put the scissors rice on our tourism ads!Beach Road Scissor Cut Curry Rice, 229 Jalan Besar
Opening Hours 11:00am to 3:30amOther Related Entries
Comfort Seafood Paradise
Pu Tien Restaurant (Kitchener Road)
2010-06-21 00:00:00
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Cafe (Orchard Central) – Magic Portion Milk Tea
How do you know you are in a Hong Kong café?Number 1, you spend the most time trying to figure out its menu. Number 2, you do not know what do order. Number 3, you end up regretting not ordering that something else that you missed at that corner of that confusing menu.The cannot-go-wrong Crystal Jade had opened another Hong Kong café 翡翠香港茶餐厅, this time at architecturally puzzling Orchard Central. To add to the menu-confusion syndrome, the selection was completely different from the Liang Seah Branch. Same name, different items!The food selection presented diversity from Italian pastas, Japanese ramen, Korean noodles, Vietnamese pho to Sushi and Chicken Rice. And you wondered what happened to the Hong Kong dishes?Every table at this Hong Kong Café would have a vase-like jug with an opening in the center – where mist flowed out from the dry ice. That was milk tea looking like a magic love portion – something they should have at every wedding dinner.The gimmick was intriguing, the taste smooth, and the portion overly small.If you were to come with a group of friends, you can try the Assorted Grill Set with lamb steak, chicken chop, fish fillet, eggs, vegetables and a big fat long juicy oozing sausage that all came sizzling on a hot metal plate. Very value-for-money.Otherwise, try the Ocean Basket which was – just another deep fried seafood platter. The good news was it had a bunch of items from crabstick, fish, mussels, prawns, calamari to fries. There were other dishes offered at this Crystal Jade where ingredients were dumped together, such as Giant Bowl Noodle – suitable for sharing.Wide selection but easily forgettable – the ambience, service and food at this Crystal Jade Hong Kong cafe was not the usual Crystal Jade chain’s quality.Still do not know what do order in a Hong Kong Café? Rule Number 4, when in doubt, just order the milk tea la.Crystal Jade Hong Kong Cafe, 181 Orchard Road #07-05 Orchard Central Tel:+65 6509 3118
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 11pm DailyOther Related Entries
Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong (TripleOne)
Old Hong Kong Tea House (Katong) 
HK Kim Gary Restaurant (Vivocity)
C Nai Hong Kong Cafe Xpress (Marine Cove)
Wong Kok Char Chan Teng (Bugis Junction)
2010-06-17 00:00:00
15 Minutes – Can You Believe This Is A School Canteen?
Updated: 15 Minutes has ceased operations as of 30 Nov 2012. The following is a message from 15 Minutes to their fans and customers:“Dear Friends and Fans of 15 Minutes,
It is with a heavy heart that we are bidding farewell to you. Today is the last day of our operations and we are moving out soon. It has been a fantastic and magical three and a half years. We have lived, learnt and laughed much serving you. In little ways, we hope we have created special memories for you.A big heartfelt Thank You to all who have supported us. Come down today if you like to taste your favourite dish for one last time!Till our paths cross again,
The 15 Minutes Team “My original review: There was a huge part of me who does not want to write about this place – Because I did not want other people to know about it! Call me selfish.15 Minutes should be considered a school canteen, and it puts all the rest to shame.A place where friends gather around long tables, enjoy good food and listen to indie performances such as ukelele playing – and huge space – does such a place even exist in Singapore?  It does!Gerald wanted to celebrate his birthday and brought a whole bunch of us from Bugis MRT. Of course we complained as it was a very, very long walk. But upon entering the art/music/design café at Laselle, you would feel rejuvenated straight away and wonder why wasn’t your school canteen ever ever like that? If 15 minutes was a person, he would be Jason Mraz, before he got really famous.The food won’t make you scream, but it was decent. The menu was a wide selection of starters, sandwiches, salads, pizzas, pastas, tapas – and all very affordable prices, like below $9.90 for a linguini.If you asked me what to recommend, I would say (errr……) Sotong Balls ($4.90 for 10). You might be thinking, “Of ALL these food you ever eaten, come on, Sotong Balls?” Other than the other delicious Southern Fried chicken wings appetizer, the balls arrived piping hot in the basket, juicy on the inside and spurting out salty goodness. School food should be simple and pleasurable.The other must-try was the Asian Duck Pizza ($11.90) which was a cross between California Pizza’s Kitchen sweet Beijing Duck Pizza and a thin-crust Japanese version. I had a Pepperoni ($9.90), where melting cheese and pepperoni resided on top on home-made crust, begging you to forget about your diet because they tasted so light and fluffy.The winner had really got to be its ambience which could transport you back to the old school days, minus the embarrassment. 15 minutes would make that chill-out place for the long-delayed class reunion outing.Co-owner Kelley Cheng said that the seating was purposely made into long benches so that customers could people-watch easily. Sometimes you can catch the occasional star such as Michelle Chia, Adrian Pang and Tan Kheng Hua. The school geek will say, “So cool can?”(Updated: 15 Minutes has ceased operations)
15 Minutes, 1 McNally Street Blk D, #01-01 LASALLE College of The Arts Tel: 6333 5915
Mon-Sat 11:00am to 11:00pm (closes 12:00am on Friday)Other Related Entries
TAB
Crazy World Cafe (Chinatown)
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Qafe (Tanjong Pagar)
2010-06-16 00:00:00
Ramen Play 拉面玩家 – Ramen by BreadTalk
Skeptical as I may sound, but any Ramen shops that required topless hunks to promote their eatery seemed a wee iffy. Moreover, these promoters were hanging around just outside Takashimaya, near strong competitor Ippudo.My friend was happily snapping away the hunks and ah lians then, but it worked because we landed up eating at Ramen Play.Maybe the ‘playful’ sales tactic got to do with the way ‘Play’. We made our way to Ramen Play 拉面玩家, found at 313′s Basement 3. Being established by the BreadTalk Group and the Sanpou group of restaurants from Japan, consumers would have certain confidence in our homegrown brand.The menu read ‘hand-massaged ramen’. Uh-huh. RamenPlay’s signature was the 三宝 Sanpou Ramen ($14.80++), containing the “three treasures” of toroniku (braised pork cheek), cha shu (pork loin in char siew sauce) and butakakuni (braised pork belly)。For the breakdown, noodles was QQ, soup thick and tasty, toroniku tender, cha shu miserably thin, butakakuni okay and egg disappointedly not runny. Fully cooked tamago was a no-no for me. Overall verdict – above average.The 12-hour prepared broth was addictive on the first few spoons, but the excitement strangely could not last the whole bowl.  And usually I would sip till the last drop.I was willing to give RamenPlay a second chance sometime later, only because I was lazy to queue at Mandarin. The Spicy Char Shu Ramen was still respectably decent, without the spiciness overtaking the flavours of the soup. Though I was bored with your noodles after a while, and added the fried garlic, chilli chives and seasonings found on the side.The side dishes such as the Gyoza and Dango (chicken balls) were neither calorie-wasters nor memorable.  The Gyozas felt very mass-produced with its messy presentation. The Dangos could have been bigger and meatier. Fortunately it came free with the credit card promotion. Even then, my friends had difficulty finishing them.RamenPlay was reasonably packed when compared to other ramen places in the same building. That also meant the poor bispectacled waitress was busy running around refilling drinks, taking orders, delivering orders… but not mine. They needed more staff!You might not have noticed this, but 313 could be considered “The BreadTalk Territory” with its foray of the entire floor of Food Republic, BreadTalk, Toast Box, and Din Tai Feng.  And with their track record on Xiao Long Baos, you know BreadTalk cannot go very wrong.RamenPlay do offer respectable ramen at decent prices. But competition, competition, competition is just a short distance away. Maybe mighty hunks could do the trick again.Ramen Play, 313 Orchard Road #B3-04/06 313 @ Somerset Tel:+65 66340051
Opening Hours: 10:00 am – 10:00 pm DailyOther Related Entries
Keisuke Ramen (Millenia Walk)
Yoshimaru Ramen Bar (Holland Village)
Ippudo (Mandarin Gallery)
Daikokuya (Orchard Paragon)
Menya Kaiko (Ion Orchard)
2010-06-14 00:00:00
Kopi Tiam 咖啡店  – $15.50++ Laska
The truth was – this was not my first choice for the selection of restaurants under the Feed At Raffles promotion. Fourth in fact. Who won’t be, as Kopi Tiam had a reputation of serving ordinary hawker food at extraordinary prices.With Hainanese Chicken Rice at $17++, Popiah at $7++ per roll, Nasi Lemak at $15++, Chilli Crab at $55++ per serving and Teh Tarik at $6++, this was no ordinary coffee shop.Despite the price, Kopi Tiam had been serving for more than 18 years, known as the up-market place that offered the best of Singapore local delights under one roof. The restaurant was quite packed on a weekend. I wondered, “Why did these people get their money from, and did they all have the same card?!”I saw enviously at these two tai-tais slurping on their fruit juices while I only only has the budget to order water. $8.00++ for a small glass you know?The Laksa ($15.50++) had been Kopi Tiam’s all-time favourite signature dish. It was not hard to imagine why. The big bowl came with huge prawns, chunks of fish cake, fleshy taupok swimming in oily thick ‘lemak’ gravy. The mouth-watering gravy would make you forget the need to control your cholesterol intake. Did I mentioned I guilityly finished every bit?Perhaps we had enough of eating diluted-gravy, ingredient-lacking and chopstick-deficient laska, the version at Kopitiam was a treasure find. Then again, it better be since it cost 5 times more than my coffeeshop laksa!Contrastingly, the Chicken Curry was disappointing. The gorgeous-looking gravy was marred by thick and dry dry dry chicken pieces were hard to swallow. The ‘lao hong’ papadum that came along with the rice lost its crisp, obviously left out for too long.The Braised Pork Kong Bak with Deep Fried Buns, a usual funeral dish for me, was a saving grace. The tender salty meat wrapped within the fluffy buns was satisfying, especially when fatty oil spilled out inadvertently.The best part of this meat was really the service. The waiter treated the customers like old-time friends. I commented to my friend about the unusual piped music. And he went, “Yes, Shi Xin Hui, not very popular one.”I came only because a friend had a Feed At Raffles Card. Now, would you pay that much for your daily hawker fare? This may be a suitable place to bring a friend from overseas who does not want to brave the heat. Kopi Tiam has some hits and misses – so know what to order. Other, go to the real kopitiam loh.Kopi Tiam 咖啡店, 2 Stamford Road 2F Swissotel The Stamford Tel:+65 6431 6156
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri 11.30am – 2.30pm, 6pm – 11pm  Sat, Sun, PH 11.30am – 11pmOther Related Entries
Singapore Food Trail (Flyer)
Carousel (Royal Plaza on Scotts)
Marina Mandarin 
Cz’Zar (Great World City)
Must-Have Zhi Char Dish
2010-06-10 00:00:00
Raindrops Cafe – A Ray of Sunshine at Scape
As the saying goes, “The first drops of rain always bring a smile on our faces “. Raindrop Café is the new kid of the block that will probably bring a smile to yours.Located at the corner of *Scape, Raindrops café was surrounded by green grass, tall trees and walled with glass, like a greenhouse found in the middle of cloud nine. The setting was intimate and cosy, amidst the hustle-bustle of the Orchard shopping district.Established by a group of 5 friends who knew each other since their university days, the food and ambience looked set to appeal to young working professionals who would like a chill-out time with their buddies. Suitable for a boys/girls night out.The food served were American-Italian, such as soups, salads, sandwiches, pastas, pizzas, desserts and wine. Some of the recommendations included the Open Face Beef & Shrooms Ciabatta ($12), Squid Ink Prawn & Scallop Roe Pasta ($14), Kurobuta Pork Rack ($24) and Chicken Leg Lemongrass with Pumpkin Risotto ($15)For appetizer, I was recommended the Tataki Tuna, pan-seared tuna which was lightly grilled on the surface, fresh and smooth on the inside. The Shimeji mushrooms added a complimentary bite.Being a creamy pasta person, I had the Mushroom Carbonara ($12) which was tossed with bacon, mushroom and egg yolk. The penne was suitably al dente, and not overly undercooked. Though the cream sauce was slightly on the salty side, it was not too thick that could make you queasy after a few bites.Burgers seemed to be the In-thing now, and you might want to try the Burger Droplets ($10), a sampler dish of three burgers with chicken, crab and beef patties. The crab was not available, but the tiny beef burger was cutesy juicy enough to make me glad.The dessert was a lovely creation of a green pear poached to purple with Cabernet Sauvignon, with a scoop of vanilla ice cream on the side. I was not exactly blown anyway by the taste, but more so by its artistic presentation.In fact, all the dishes I had were attractively-prepared, honed by culinary chef Alan Yeo who used to be from Swissotel Merchant Court, with graphic designer Ching Kai providing the aesthetical advice.Like how you would you sing cheerfully to “Raindrops keep falling on my head…,” Raindrops Café provides a beautiful surrounding, equally beautiful dishes and very affable service. It could provide a ray of sunshine to a sumptuous dinner with friends.Raindrops Cafe, 2 Orchard Link #02-38 *Scape Tel:+65 6834 4977
Opening Hours: 11:00 am – 1:00 am (Daily)Other Related Entries
Artease Café (Cineleisure)
Qafe (Tanjong Pagar)
Sun Coffee Planet (Killiney)
Charlie Brown Café (Somerset)
Crazy World Cafe
2010-06-08 00:00:00
K ki ケーキ – Some of the Best Cakes I Ever Had
It won’t be too exaggerating to say that I was touched when I found K Ki. Perhaps it had to do with my love for Japanese cakes. Or that K Ki gave us something not found anywhere else – A sense of tranquility, a touch of quirkiness, and most importantly a bolt of determination to make dreams come true.Husband and wife pair Kenneth and Delphine gave up their daily jobs to set up this modest and characteristic cafe at Ang Siang Hill. It shared the space with an equally distinctive The Little Drom Store, which sold knick knacks like cameras, bags, toys, accessories and what-have-nots like badges and cards.Entering the shop, which I would describe to have a country-side Muji ambience, was a breath of fresh air in this urban city. The cream coloured walls, wooden furniture, Delphine in a white apron and minimalist approach screamed ‘Japanese’.Be prepared. Four times I was there, twice the cakes were sold out. Sometimes cakes get snapped by 3pm!My love was Kinabaru ($8.00), layered with flavours of light coconut mousse, bright yellow passion fruit crème and a soft chocolate base. Its delicate taste would melt in your mouth, blow you away and send you to heaven.As baker Kenneth was aligning his creations carefully with a ruler at the counter, I asked which his personal favourite was. It was not surprising that his choice was the Mont Blanc ($8.50). Classy in outlook, the Mont Blanc had almond tart base is topped with sweetish sponge and twirls of chestnut puree, very Japanese in presentation and essence.One of the cakes was named after one of the co-owners Antoinette. The Antoinette ($8.00) was lady-like in its heart-shape, elegantly created with fluffy white chocolate sponge and mango fillings.While K ki’s cakes are considered pricey in relative, it has earned rave reviews from food bloggers and customers do keep coming back. That is because every cake is uniquely different, prepared with the baker’s love for perfection. This is a little humble cake shop full of character, heart and charm.K-ki ケーキ7 Ann Siang Hill #01-00  Tel:+65 6225 6650
Opening Hours: Daily 12pm to 7pm (closed on Mon), Sat 12pm to 4pmOther Related Entries
Dessert Cup (Raffles City)
Hairloom & Caramel (Shaw Towers)
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
3 Inch Sin (Bt Timah)
Let’s Sweet (Bugis Junction)
2010-06-07 00:00:00
The Academy Bistro – Buffet in the Supreme Court?
Somewhere within the familiar Supreme Court (aka “The UFO Building”) lays a precious and undiscovered gem, for diners. Few would know the existence of the Academy Bistro, housed on the ground level of the Supreme Court Building.Just think about it, the people who dine at the Bistro regularly include the Chief Justice, Judges of the High Court, Senior Counsels and lawyers. When faced with diners who have high standard, the Academy Bistro strives to serve only the best to satisfy selective taste buds.For the usual man on the street, you have to get past both a physical and psychological barrier – First in the form of stringent security checks for metal devices, cameras and recorders. The next is that the restaurant is housed in a formal and classy Supreme Court, and the fellow-diner next to you could very well be lawyers the likes of Subhas Ananadan or Davinder Singh.Celebrity Chef Jimmy Chok and his culinary team prepares a different menu each week, and recently has gone into buffet lunches priced at an affordable $15+ to appeal to a wider mass.The following review is based on the Academy Bistro’s French-Asian fusion set lunches.For starters, you would be given a choice between a salad and soup, both equally noteworthy. The salad was a simple toss of vegetables such as wild rocket and mushroom, drizzled with balsamic and truffle olive oil.Some of the soups such as the Tomato and Mushroom did not have the usual thick and lumpy texture, and felt like a synergic blend between a thicker ‘western’ potage and a flavourful and watery ‘Chinese’ broth. Some might not be used to thin Mushroom soup topped with spring onions for example, but it worked suitably well for me.When given a choice between fish and chicken, my choice would usually be the fish, such as a Pan Fried Seabream or Chilean Seabass. When the fish was sliced, you would appreciate the fresh, succulent and bright looking flesh, without the customary fishy smell and taste. I also liked the fact that the dish was complemented with colourful vegetable and roots, while keeping the sauce minimal. You could enjoy the essence of the meat without the need to pound with excessive chilli sauces and ketchup.The self-taught Chef Jimmy Chok was known for his demands for perfection, straight-faced when preparing his stuff in the kitchen. He saw his food creations as art, aimed to make the best of his ‘materials’. It took me some time to get used to what some might consider as basic and plain, but is a form of distinct and quality craftwork.The Academy Bistro, 1 Supreme Court Lane GF Supreme Court Tel:+65 6339 2827
Opening Hours: 8.30am to 6pm (Mon – Thurs); 8.30am to 10pm (Fri)Other Related Entries
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
The Ship Restaurant & Bar (Shaw Centre)
Infusion (Dempsey)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
Out Of The Pan (Raffles City)
<
2010-06-04 00:00:00
Jones The Grocer – Dining, People Watching and Grocery Shopping
Breakfast during the long weekends at Jones The Grocer within Dempsey Hill was a stimulating and lively experience. Jones was like a marketplace – People, people everywhere.Expatriates came with their polos and shorts, local families with their Straits Times, and couples were their cameras. Along with the hustle and bustle were serving staff, and I mean many many serving staff, dressed smartly in white and dark blue aprons.;Therefore, I was kind of surprised at the common complains on hungrygowhere – slow service, and long waiting times. Because there were at least more than 10 waiters ready to attend at any time (Notice the number of staff in a single picture). A case of a disorganized system?Jones the Grocer started in Sydney Australia back 1996, with a one-stop centre approach, seamlessly fusing the cafe scene with gourmet food products as such pastas, pastries, tea leaves, cookies, sauces, wine and recipe books.The concept was vibrant, lively and relaxing at the same time. Their tables were purposely made long and wooden, creating a familiar environment of communal eating.The Breakfast Sets I ordered consisting of Toast and Eggs (Scrambled or Poached) and add on Bacon and Sausage was respectable. The bread was fresh and lightly toasted to my liking, and the sausage suitably juicy and meaty. The scrambled eggs went well with the ketchup, created with a salsa tang. My only complain was that the bacon was slightly dehydrated and therefore tough.A price tag of a $20-$25 breakfast might set you off. But that’s Dempsy for you.Jones The Grocer offered a friendly and dynamic environment for dining, grocery shopping and people-watching, making you feel that you were all of this country. I enjoyed this breakfast experience.9 Dempsey Road #01-12 Dempsey Hill Tel:+65 6476 1512
Opening Hours: 9am – 11pm DailyOther Related Entries
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
Joe & Dough (Suntec)
Burger, Bench & Bar (Orchard Cineleisure)
Dapao (Far East Square)
15 Minutes (Lasalle)
2010-06-03 00:00:00
Comfort Seafood Paradise – Watch Soccer and Eat Zhi Char in Comfort
With the World Cup season just around the corner, fans who crave for a place for zhi char, drinks and live soccer telecast need not look further.Comfort Seafood Paradise was named 轻松海鲜馆 because the owner wanted patrons to dine in an easy and relaxed mood. If you come on an airy and starry night, you would appreciate the big patch of green field and a very open concept. No air-con, but very cooling.This is one of those ulu, unseen, unknown, undiscovered places that Singaporeans love venturing to. The patrons were generally families and group of friends watching their EPL telecast.It is about a 12-minute walk from Farrer Park MRT, and right next to Pek Kio Community Centre. You might just walk past it thinking it was a school canteen, not discounting that because the restaurant is right next to a private school hostel. It was an experience quite out of the ordinary, a cross between eating at a seaside restaurant and Community Centre mass dinner.And what was recommended here? The seafood.The calamari rings were chewy and deep-fried with a crunchy and crusty batter, irresistible matched with a simple mayonnaise sauce.My favourite dish of the night was a ‘yuan-yang’ prawns, a single dish with two extreme but complimentary flavours. On one side of the plate the deep-fried prawns were tossed sweetish light mayo and fruits, and on the other side sour Thai mango salad. The only difficulty was to decide which side was better!Other than the prawns, I realised that the chef liked to use a hint of Thai and Vietnamese influence in the dishes, as seen from the Steamed Fish. Steamed on banana leaf, you would also experience a balance of spicy, sweet, and sour with a touch of saltiness in the sauce.Do I have time to mention about the fish maw soup and crab with claws almost the side of your palm?Other than having my station’s reunion dinner, I came back to Comfort Seafood Paradise on two other separate occasions. The aunties were still sincere and friendly in their service. The verdict – cool environment, cosy corner, and comforting zhi char.Comfort Seafood Paradise, 40 Carlisle Road Tel:+65 6292 2177 (Closed)
2010-05-31 00:00:00
Tom N Toms Coffee – A New Korean Force
Other than Soapy Dramas, Rain and Wondergirls, Tom N Toms Coffee is another successful Korean export that has reached our sunny island. As the No. 1 Korean coffee chain, with 175 branches around the world, caffeine-lovers in Singapore would take pleasure to have yet another noteworthy choice.Unfortunately, the cafe used to be at Far East Plaza and Vivocity, and is now left with one solo branch at ICON near Tanjong Pagar MRT.Brought in by the people behind Wine & Dine magazine, Tom N Toms (탐엔탐스커피) use 100% premium Arabica coffee beans  roasted and grinded in Korea to ensure perfection for coffee lovers. The Café Americano, made by combining rich espresso and hot water, had a bitterer aftertaste that would linger around your tastebuds.I had an Ice Café Mocha, with premium chocolate melted into steam milk. I liked that you could still taste the strong and rich espresso, while maintaining its mild milkiness. With that said, I long for a smoother texture and more refined quality found in the more familiar brands.For non-coffee drinkers, they do have a wide substitute such as Cinnamon Chocolate, Milk Tea, Green Mint Hot Chocholate, Chai Latte and a variety of tangy smoothies.The strength of Tom N Toms is in its food though, as their pretzels, thick toast and pizzas are freshly baked. That is really a fresh alternative to the usual cold sliced cakes and sandwiches offered. The Tortilla Pizza came up piping hot, and was amazingly mouth-watering with its thin crispy crust and dizzled with simple but tasteful toppings. I finished it in 5 minutes. Irresistible.On my visit on a weekend evening, the branch was surprisingly empty, which was not a bad thing to customers. Perhaps ‘Korean’ has not been synonymous with coffee, and we are just spoilt with coffee choices. With fierce competition in the form of Old Town White Coffee just next door, let’s hope this Korean force will stay for a while.Tom N Toms Coffee, 12 Gopeng Street, #01-12 ICON Village, Singapore, Tel: +65 6225 6313
Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 24 hours (Closed Sun: 11pm – 7am)Other Related Entries
Sun Coffee Planet (Killiney)
OldTown White Coffee (Bt Timah)
Chin Mee Chin (East Coast)
Joe & Dough (Suntec)
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
2010-05-27 00:00:00
Astons – A Wagyu Burger with Aston Soon
Dinner with Aston Soon was at Keypoint, a lesser ventured venue next to the Beach Road market where army boys be familiar with. When asked why he would want to open a branch at quite an ulu venue, Aston said sheepishly with a proud sparkle in the eye, “The other branches are too crowded.”Sure enough, the branches at Suntec and Cathay have snakes of queue, especially during dinner and weekends. Aston, who is in his late 30s, achieved all this in a manner of few years. From a little coffeeshop stall at Katong, the chain expanded to an estimated 22 branches by the end of the year.The bespectacled Aston arrived for the interview in a simple blue coloured Adidas tee and jeans, but went on instructing his staff and went through the numbers before he could properly sit down. Despite his success, he was unassuming and very down to earth.This probably came from his humble beginnings as a kitchen staff at the now-defunct Ponderosa, and that was the start to the experimentation of various western cuisines. He explained that he was still very much a kopitiam and Asian food kind of person. He chuckled that he would visit his several wanton mee stall at Trembeling Road at least 10 times a month.When Aston opened his first stall, he only aimed to break even and at most a little profit. But it was quality steak at affordable prices that kept people coming back. All these years, no GST and no service charge. When asked about his secret to success, he gave all credit to his family, staff, suppliers and customers who kept supporting him.He also did not believe in keeping trade secrets from his loyal staff. He said he had no secrets. And would teach all he knew about cooking to his kitchen heads so that they could keep up with the same consistent taste.For this dinner, I ordered a Wagyu Beef Burger priced at an inexpensive $9.90 nett. This burger was nothing fanciful, but it was all about how this Grade 5 beef could just retain its juicy goodness, soft texture and uncomplicated taste. No sauces or major condiments needed.He urged me to try the iEat Super Burger the next time, perfected under the advice of Singapore’s most famous food blogger Dr Leslie Tay. Aston did not know who he was, but heeded his advice anyway. “I value my customer’s opinion, especially when they are serious about it.”This was perhaps the spirit of Aston’s as well. Its success is not about fanciful marketing or promotions (it had almost none!); it is all keeping everything simple, and giving customers what they want.Astons Specialities, 371 Beach Road #01-07 Keypoint Tel:+65 6295 6026
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Willin Low and His Favourite Hokkien Mee
Bakerzin’s Daniel Tay and His Greatest Regret
The 23-year girl behind Wow Wow West   
Interview with Francesca Scarpa Da Paolo
MOF’s CEO did not have enough to eat Lor Mee
2010-05-24 00:00:00
Flying Chillis – Not Very Crowded, Why Ah?
I find this rather peculiar. This restaurant is right smack at the centre of the crowded and popular 313@Somerset. The décor is open-concept with modern and cosy furnituring complemented with wide selection Thai cuisines.Yet, it is not as packed and accepted as it should be. And I know of many who would bypass this restaurant straight to the Level 5 foodcourt or Basement 3 eateries. And frankly, I would not be here if it wasn’t the impossibly long queue at Marche.The price is not cheap but not inexpensive either. A dish of Pineapple Fried Rice with Prawns ($10.90) and Clear Tom Yum Prawn Soup ($9.90) with a drink of frappe ($7.00) can set you back by more than $30 including the taxes.Flying Chillis which costs more than $1.5 million to set up, is by a Malaysia-based restaurant group which has gained quite a reputation across the causeway. The signature dishes include are those with a chilli padi icon on the menu, which helped me narrow the choices to Green Curry Chicken and Beef Noodles.The Green Curry achieves a balance between watery and lemak. Fans of a spicier version would appreciate its authentic taste.One would wish for a more flavourful and tasteful stock for the Beef Noodles though. While the tender sliced beef was welcomed, the large portions of carbs in proportion to the soup was not desired.It is okay-valued standard Thai food at a prime location. For such a price, perhaps Flying Chillis can up on its class factor. And people-watchers from outside and the occasional stray insects due to its open setting were not welcomed.Flying Chillis, 313 Orchard Road #01-29 313 @ Somerset Tel: +65 6509 6623
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 11.30am – 10pm; Fri–Sat & PH Eve: 11.30am – 11pmOther Related Entries
Porn’s (Liang Seah)
Suan Thai Restaurant (Killiney Road)
Coffee Stars by Dao (Wisma Atria)
First Thai (Purvis Street)
Thai Noodle House (Coronation Road)
2010-05-21 00:00:00
Yan Ting – The 6* Dim Sum Restaurant
One must take note to dress up more appropriately for this dim sum lunch – it is after all the main Chinese restaurant in the 6* St Regis Hotel.The impression after walking in was grandeur, with elegant table settings, classy chandelier, luxurious chairs and serving staff dressed in stylishly designed uniforms. There was a congenial East-meets-West synergy in its ambience, and one felt like going back in time to olden Shanghai, especially when there was piped music of Lin Dai’s. The fellow patrons were businessmen, Indonesian tai-tais, Japanese couples and European ladies dressed with pearls and floral. And for once, I felt extremely careful taking out my camera to snap.Yan Ting was highly recommended by fellow food blogger ladyironchef, which rated this as the best dim sum in Singapore, and repeatedly assured me that it was not that expensive. Food writer Wong Ah Yoke also said that the service was sterling, and I did think the waitresses were rather attentive and polite.The Char Siew Sou was an exceptional starter to the meal, with crispy fluffy skin adequately lined with sesame seeds and the barbequed pork still retained its moisture within. Yet, the skin does not crumble immediately and easily.The very basic order for me in any Dim Sum meal is the Siew Mai. The Siew Mai and Har Kao ($5.40 for 3 pieces) were above average in freshness and taste. But I wished there could be more exquisiteness in its presentation, and a more crystal clear skin and crunchier prawns would have helped it secure an edge over others. .We also had a Soup of the Day, where a tablespoon of the broth sipped slowly was delicate yet condensed with the flavours of pork, herbs and roots. Some soups can be overbearing and salty, but this soup is just natural goodness.As for an indication of the price, a dish of fried vermicelli noodles was about $16.00, and portions were adequately small, filling two small bowls. My bill came up to about $50 plus, and I pleasantly pleased with a credit card discount.Yan Ting offers a beautiful environment, excellent service and exquisite food. If price is of concern, come when you want to indulge in feeling rich.Yan Ting, 29 Tanglin Road The St. Regis Tel:+65 6506 6866
Opening Hours: 11.45am – 3.30pm; 6.00pm – 11.00pmOther Related Entries
Royal China (Raffles Hotel)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
2010-05-20 00:00:00
OldTown White Coffee (Bt Timah) – 两位帅哥请
The loud “两位帅哥请” might have made a difference to the dining experience there. These words do not usually work on me, but the serving staff at this branch appeared to be a lot more sincere and earnest (than one other branch). Hah.I liked the vibes here. Located at a rather ulu part of Bt Timah Yuk Tong Ave, the standalone shop had a more kampong feel in line with the Ipoh essence. And it kept playing those Sandy Lam 伤痕 and Jam Hsiao 新不了情 which would make you hum along while you sipped sweet sweet teh-peng. Quite a suitable place for a budget pa-tuo.It was 8:45pm and the value-for-money chi in me wanted to order a night snack set which could only be served from 9:00pm. The waiteress was 不行不行 for some time and until I gave in and said I would wait till the clocks strikes nine. Imagine my pleasant surprise when the food was served at 8:55pm. At least they knew how to bend rules for customers.The fish cocktail were smaller than nugget-size (Compare this with what was presented in the menu.) The food was probably some refrigerated packed fish, quickly thawed and deep fried, but I would not complain.Coincidentally, my elder brother then mentioned “That Jack Neo never make movies now ah, how, no money?” Then I revealed that the very white coffee he drank contributed to Jack Neo’s pocket.“Both Jack Neo and Mark Lee the 两位帅哥 are the owners. You mean you didn’t know?”OldTown White Coffee (Bt Timah), 9 Yuk Tong Ave Tel:+65 6467 4404
Opening Hours: Mon–Thu: 9am – 10pm; Fri–: 9am – 1am; Sat: 8am – 1am; Sun: 8am – 10pmOther Related Entries
Sun Coffee Planet (Killiney)
Chin Mee Chin (East Coast)
Tom N Toms Coffee (ICON Village)
Trung Nguyen Coffee (Vietnam) 
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
2010-05-17 00:00:00
Don Quijote Spanish Restaurant – Simply Delicioso
You know the sudden food craving you get after watching a movie? That’s what happened after watching Penelope Cruz’s Vicky Christian Barcelona and Broken Embraces. I just wanted anything Spanish. So that’s how I landed at Don Quijote, found at the quaint envioronment of Lorong Kilat, near Bukit Timah and Toh Tuck.I do not think you can enter a Spanish Restaurant without ordering Tapas. There was a wide variety of cold or warm appetizers which could fulfill the satisfaction of nibblers like me. The word is derived from the Spanish verb ‘tapar’ which means ‘to cover’. As to why Tapas became so popular, accordingly to legends a Castile king recovered from an illness by drinking wine mixed with small dishes. After recovering, the kind ordered all taverns that wine must be accompanied by tapa when serving.The Calamari Chopitos were so lightly battered and fried, and it did not leave much traces of oil. The batter does not ‘cut’ into your mouth and soft in its bite unlike some other squids if it is over-fried or dry.The Beef Cheek in a Red wine and Balsamic Reduction ($18) was a special feature of the month and a must-order. The beef was soft and tender enough to melt in the mouth, with the delicate sauce leaving a lingering wine taste.Most would consider the Valencian rice dish of paella as Spain’s National Dish. The Valenciana Spanish Style Rice with Seafood and Chicken ($28 for small serving) was pricey but simply Delicioso. As the paella came a round flat pan with two handles, you could smell the fragrance of fresh prawns and mussels. Every rice grain was deliciously flavourful without being over the top. Not being a carb lover, I finished every bit, including those strapped from the pan.Looking at the framed pictures of Barcelona and Madrid hanging by the wall, I sipped a light alcoholic and fruity Sangria, Ah, Life is good. Vamonos.Don Quijote Spanish Restaurant, 17 Lorong Kilat #01-09  Tel:+65 6465 1811Other Related Entries
The Mexican (Bras Basah)
Medz (Orchard Central)
2010-05-13 00:00:00
SoEZ – Brownie Baking 101
I would have loved to bake if I had a proper kitchen and time. Opening up a cake shop has always been a dream (Partners anyone?). Anyway, the following recipe was from a demo class from SoEZ – Thank you Chef June for teaching patiently.Dough
1.	Butter – 100g
2.	Sugar – 80g
3.	Dark Chocolate – 120g
4.	Egg – 2
5.	Vanilla Essence – 1/2 teaspoon
6.	Self-raising flour – 120g
7.	salt – 1/2 teaspoon
8.	Walnut (chopped) – 75gGanache 
1.	Cream – 50g
2.	Chocolate – 75gInstructions
1.	Melt butter, sugar and chocolate over a pot of hot water
2.	Add egg and vanilla essence
3.	Add flour and salt
4.	Add in chopped walnut and stir to mix well
5.	Line the tray, pre-heat oven at 170 degrees (To prevent burning the bottoms of your brownies, place the pan on a preheated cookie shee.)
6.	Bake for 35 to 40 minutes or till cooked (Can use a stick to test the dough. It should come out ‘dry’)Ganache
1.	Boil the cream, pour it to the chocolate and stir well until it melts
2.	Spread it onto the cooked brownie
3.	Chill it overnight before cutting.Other baking tips
1.	Roost the walnuts for 5-10 minutes, preheat 180 degree. This enhance the flavor of the nuts.
2.	You may add rum or brandy to the egg for the alcoholic taste
3.	You may use fine brown sugar as alternative
4.	For more shiny ganache, you can add an additional 20 grams of butter
5.	Brownies will be easier to cut if you place the pan in the freezer for several minutes. Dip a sharp knife in hot water, wipe it dry, and move it across the pan in an up-and-down sawing motion.
6.	You can refrigerate the batter for several hours, or up to two days, before baking. If you put the cold batter in a preheated oven, brownies will come out chewier.Other Related Entries
CNY Almond Cookies Recipe
Steamed Mandarin Orange Cake Recipe
Recipe of Grilled Slipper Lobster
2010-05-12 00:00:00
Daikokuya – Tah Mee Anyone?
While we are very used to ramen in hot flavourful broth, the Maze Ramen offered at Daikokuya is another attempt to be different and unique in this country sprouting up with many ramen eateries.The dry ramen noodles is seasoned with aromatic garlic sauce and topped with corn, wood ear mushroom, sliced char shu, bean sprouts and chopped scallions. The egg was hard boiled, and I would have preferred the usual soft egg with creamy yolk.Imagine eating Tah Mee at the hawker centre, with a contemporary and cosy edge. While the ramen is still evenly tasty, it is hard to visualise if people are willing to pay for dry ramen, Would you? Then again, there are people who pay more than $20 for noodles that they taste like instant mee.Another surprise find at Daikokuya was the Tokyo-style Ramen. While the ingredients were the usual char naruto fish cake, spinach, bamboo shoots and a dash of dashi, the winning formula was the chicken broth. Inspired by the ramen stalls found along busy streets of the Tokyo city, this soup is refreshingly light and delicate and would appeal to those who is not keen on thick salty broths. Sipping the soup, it reminded of how I would sip a fragrant cup of tea.If you find the texture of the Sapporo Ramen vaguely familiar like I did, that is because the Head Chef Lee Teck Kheong used to work with Bishamon Sapporo Ramen and he brought his years of experience to Daikokuya.And when I asked if the broth was indeed boiled for 12 hours, he said that his cooks would come in during midnight to prepare for the next day.Good location, good ambience and good Tokyo ramen. Now what this place needs is perhaps the most important – a good word of mouth.Daikokuya Ramen Dining, 290 Orchard Road #B1-47 Paragon Shopping Centre Tel:+65 6737 5416
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 10.30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Ippudo (Mandarin Gallery)
Ramen Play (313 @ Somerset)
Ramen Santouka (Central)
Menya Kaiko (Ion Orchard)
Can You Name The Ramen?
2010-05-11 00:00:00
Marutama Ra-Men –  How’s The Chicken Ramen?
Repeat the name of the shop three times, and it may sound like you are scolding a very bad word. That’s how some remember this Ramen store. I, call this, the basketball logo noodle shop.Both branches at Central and Liang Court has long queues, and fans of Marutama would not even give the other competitors Ippudo and Santouka a second taste.I was kind of perplexed, because chicken-based stock and cheap paper menus do not go well with me. Plus the Aka Ra-men, which is a mild spicy ramen with 7 kinds of group nut mixture with chicken soup, is rather steep at $15.When I had the Nama Karashi Ra-men twice ($12), it dawned on me that it was not really about the spicy stock or smooth charsiew, but the noodles. It reminded me of the Hong Kong egg noodles, or to some Mamee half its diameter. The thin curly noodles are a class on its own, very unlike the long straight Kyushuu or springy Hokkaido types. And you would probably only get this taste here.I was told to try the Tori Dango ($5), mildly spicy chicken meatballs which had better tasty sauce than meat.The highlight of my meal was the deep fried garlic which I lovingly poured over my chicken broth. Now, that’s some extra taste for a light soup. Marutama fans, sorry I’m not a fan, yet.Marutama Ra-Men, 177 River Valley Road #02-01 Liang Court Tel:+65 68372480
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Sapporo Ramen Miharu (Gallery Hotel)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
Daikokuya (Orchard Paragon)
Marutama Ra-Men (Liang Court)
Ramen Santouka (Central)
2010-05-06 00:00:00
Koi – Bringing The Bubble Tea Craze Back
The Koi force is formidable. My virgin experience with this drink was at its first branch at Toa Payoh in 2008. And that was THE bubble tea that brought me unforgettable feelings and memories of being in Taiwan again. It was on my Top 10 Food List that Year.It was not only the smoothness of the milk tea, but the chewiness of the bubbles that none of the local stores can quite replicate. Moreover, there was an option of selecting the sugar level of the milk tea (50% for a healthier choice), which was very ‘Taiwan’.Koi used to serve mini-pearls or mixed pearls which were my absolute favorites. The different sizes made it more fun to chew and experiment with idiosyncratic eating styles within, but unfortunately they only serve same-sized peals now.Koi had its humble beginnings as 50嵐, by a Mr馬瑞東 in the Tainan Province in 1994. It quickly gained popularity and expanded to the other regions. 2006 was the life-changing year when it expanded into coffee and when “Koi” was branded to target the trendy and overseas markets.If you have seen the queues at Toa Payoh, People’s Park, AMK and Marina Parade, you would know that Singaporeans have gone crazy over this. Last week, I dropped by Toa Payoh at 10.00pm on a weekday night, but the branch was crowded with people waiting for their bubble treasures. The good news for Koi fans is, I see one more branch coming up at Illuma.Koi Cafe, 190A Toa Payoh Central #01-562 Tel: +65 6256 1169
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Share Tea (Wisma)
Woobbee (Tanjong Pagar)
The Battle of the Bubble Teas
HK Gong Cha v SG Gong Cha
Artease Café (Cineleisure)
2010-05-05 00:00:00
Mellben Pasir Ris – Crabby Crabs
Travelled all the way to Pasir Ris for crabs. Nothing can make me do that but for crabby cravings and good friends. And why not the Ang Mo Kio or Toa Payoh branch? I was told you can get a seat easily here and true enough, the coffee shop space was relatively empty.There were a few interesting versions of crabs which include a Laska Crab Bee Hoon Soup, Curry Crab and Butter Crab. I was recommended by fellow reviewers that the Claypot Crab with Bee Hoon is formidability delicious.Now… I won’t say it is not delicious but I expected better. The crabby soup was only mildly tasty and thick, and had a tad too much of evaporated milk. Somehow the crab meat was not as tasty as I would have imagined and it felt that the flavours have flowed away somewhere else. To where I don’t know. Perhaps it could have been more flavourful if I ordered two crabs instead of one. We all gave the crab the benefit of the doubt.The Pepper Crab Dry Bee Hoon should have been the hot seller, though the presentation itself leaves much to be desired. They just anyhow put it on the plate. Anyway, it is unlike some other black pepper crabs where the spiciness would mask the taste of the crab. While the bee hoon was ‘dry’, there was sufficient soup for you to savour slowly. The soup was part peppery and part stocky, and no doubt that I would lick the plate if nobody was looking.The other must-recommend was the Guinness Stout Pork Ribs ($10/12/16), crispfully fried on the outside while the meat was still tender and moist. The faint beer marinade complimented well and it fortunately and almost single-handedly made the meal end on a high note.Will I travel again to Pasir Ris for this? Er…. maybe try Ang Mo Kio next.Mellben, Pasir Ris Drive 4 Blk 440 #01-13Other Related Entries
Cz’Zar (Great World City)
Must-Have Zhi Char DishGalley By The Straits (Admiralty Road)Fisherman’s Market (The Central)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
2010-04-30 00:00:00
Suanthai Restaurant – All You Can Eat Thai Food
Opportunity knocks only once. Similarly said, the best things in this buffet only come ONCE.This buffet would have scored more points with me, if only, all the good things in the menu could come more than once. So if you are aiming for Tom Yam Soup with prawns, Stuffed Chicken Wing, Chicken Satay, and Deep Fried Squid, take your time to savour because you are not going to get a second chance. Unless you can convince your friend to give up their entitlement.Oh, that reminds me of the Pandan Chicken. Oily it may be, but the tender and flavourful meat bursts out of the burnt and fragrant leave which will leave a satisfying smile. My table of friends went “HUH? That’s all?” when announced that ONE miserable chicken was all they could have.The Satay is also a must-try because the taste is rather unique, with a more peanuty Indonesia feel than Thai. The marinade somewhat reminds me of those at the Rice Table. But anyway, you will probably tick all those with an * on the menu.Other than the star selection, the rest of the dishes I would say is pretty much average. You know, the mass prepared taste.My favourite dish is surprising the Pomelo Salad, somewhat mediocre and unappetizing in its outlook, but a bite of it will make you crave for more. Made from fresh Thai pomelo, the sauce is of a combination of fish sauce, lime juice and chilli sauce makes the appetizer very refreshing. The salty dried shrimps sprinkled all around add an addictive crunch.This Standard Buffet at $18.90++ for dinner is quite a budget find, especially when you are near Somerset area. So if you are with one big gang of friends or need a venue for that class outing, this could be it. Also, it can fulfil Thai cravings since Bangkok is quite risky to go now.Suanthai Restaurant, 101 Killiney Road Tel: +65 6235 4126
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri: 11.30am – 2.30pm, 6pm – 10pm; Sat–Sun: 12pm – 2.30pm, 6pm – 10pmOther Related Entries
Coffee Stars by Dao (Wisma Atria)
First Thai (Purvis Street)
Thai Noodle House (Coronation Road)
Flying Chillis (313 @ Somerset)
Porn’s (Liang Seah)
2010-04-27 00:00:00
First Thai – We Don’t Need Interview
When I first asked if they wanted to be interviewed for my programme on radio, the lady boss of First Thai said “We don’t need Interview.” The phone hung up in the manner of seconds, and it took me a while to recover from that. Wah, so proud I thought?It is not hard to imagine why. The little coffee-shop-like restaurant is perpetually packed. They don’t need any more publicity from me! Opening hours are short. Reservations cannot be taken. It is closed on alternate Mondays. There are always queues in the evenings and weekends. So you better be there early!The last time I was there 6 plus in the evening, I met Xiao Ming (from Radio1003) helping to serve (and he was the one who strongly recommended me First Thai). But sorry no special privileges, and my friends still needed to wait about 50 minutes for a table. Some dishes were sold out, some dishes didn’t come.If you ask around for recommendations of authentic Thai food, First Thai would probably be one of the first places to be mentioned. The décor is very ‘Thai’ – lime green painted walls, lined with plastic pink orange flowers, Chinese paintings with random framed photos of Thai royalties and celebrities  (Dd I see a young Keanu Reeves photo somewhere?).My favourite thing in First Thai is not really any of the food, but a green (!) Bandung which is suitably milky. I always find the pink versions a little too sweet and artificial, and I know I am contradicting myself because green is not any less artificial. Strange I have never seen this during my numerous trips to Thailand.The mango salad was rather refreshing, and I liked that it came with crunchy peanut and onion silvers.Xiao Ming also said that the Tom Yum Gong was a MUST TRY with its big fresh prawns. Expect a bowl full of a variety of ingredients and spices. While the stock seems rather clear, the Tom Yum is really potentially potently spicy. Sweating is guaranteed and do get ready your tissues.Some may find that some of the Thai food in the malls feels rather refined and adapted to local taste buds. If you wish to have a selection Thai cuisines that tastes more home-cooked and street-like, this is it. Of course, the service is also rather… er… street-like?First Thai, 23 Purvis Street Tel:+65 6339 3123
Opening Hours: Daily 12–3pm (2.15pm last order), 6–10pm (9.15pm last order); (Sometimes Closed on Mondays)Other Related Entries
Porn’s (Liang Seah)
Suan Thai Restaurant (Killiney Road)
Thaksin Beef Noodles (Clementi)
Thai Noodle House (Coronation Road)
Flying Chillis (313 @ Somerset)
2010-04-15 00:00:00
Wendy’s – How’s The Breakfast?
Wendy’s first came to Singapore in Dec 2009, with long long long queues at Lau Pat Sat. It is true that I seldom bother to queue up for food, especially fast food. To fight with the crowd at CBD was also unthinkable. So I hoped over there on a Sunday morning for their breakfast.Wendy’s is well-known for its signature square burger patties. And the Breakfast Combos and Mornin’ Melt Panini with Chicken Sausage or Smoked Turkey are very popular overseas.With toasty sourdough bread with cheddar cheese, tomatoes, eggs and sausage, it ought to taste very delicious. As I took a big bite, the disappointment was difficult to erase. Somehow it was rather lukewarm and not as hearty a meal as I would imagine.The Breakfast Combo was a close alternative to Mac’s Big Breakfast, and I always wonder why it would cost so much more for the same ingredients in a Mornin’ Melt to be placed apart. I somehow find the colours rather muted and therefore unappetizing.Perhaps it was also the rather lazy, less-spirited ambience of the restaurant and staff which dulled the overall eating experience. Perhaps there was too high an expectation after all that hype.Brought in by the Kopitiam Group, the 3rd largest American fast food chain, it has plans to open another 35 branches over the next decade. Let us hope that it can push towards a very colourful and vibrant experience like what my friends get overseas. I will be back for lunch one day.Wendy’s, 18 Raffles Quay Unit #46 Lau Pa Sat Festival Market Tel:+65 6225 8335
Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 7.30am – 10pm; Sun: 7.30am – 12amOther Related Entries
Most Original Burger MOB (Vivocity)
Everything With Fries (Orchard Central)
McDonald’s Chicken McGrill
Popeyes Chicken and Biscuits (Airport T3)
ChicKing (Marina Square)
2010-04-08 00:00:00
Ramen, Ramen – So Many Types
Ramen, Ramen, can you tell them apart?Tokyo-style ramenThe distinct feature of Tokyo style ramen is in its broth – light and soy-flavoured chicken broth with a touch of dashi. It is said to originate from the old streets of Tokyo, where the soup is quickly sipped down. Good for those who are not keen on the salty and oily miso.Kogashi ramenKogashi means that is has a burned miso flavour, and is slowly gainly its popularity here. You will find a blackish aromatic oil made from charred crushed garlic found at the top of the broth. Topped with bamboo shoots and kikurage (wood ear mushroom), the result is simple yet amazing.Sapporo ramenSapporo is the most popular form of ramen, especially in Singapore. It is from the capital of Hokkaido. And as Hokkaido is known for its very cold winters, the broth is very rich and salty miso which warms the tummy in the chill. The ramen is typically topped with sweetcorn, butter, beansprouts, fine pork and garlic.Kyushu-styleFrom the southern island of Kyshu, this is one of my favourties. Milky white broth with extra extra straight and medium thin noodles. So it is a big contrast from the yellowish, curly, instant noodle lookalike Sapporo.Kitakata ramenKitakata noodles are thick, flat, curly and almost feel like you are eating a bowl of udon. It is served in pork and niboshi (drief baby sardines) broth.Hakata ramenHakata ramen originates from Fukuoka city in Kyushu, with a rich, milky broth because it is cooked with pork-bone for long hours. A distinct feature in its topping – sesame seeds, and others such as pickled greens and ginger left on the side.So, can you tell one ramen from the next yet?Other Related Entries
Ippudo (Mandarin Gallery)
Ramen Play (313 @ Somerset)
Daikokuya (Orchard Paragon)
Marutama Ra-Men (Liang Court)
Ramen Santouka (Central)
2010-04-01 00:00:00
Can You Name The Ramens?
Ramen, Ramen, oh you see them all around now, and there’s no stopping as more shops are opening up in this Sunny island.Now, have you been to a local Ramen store, not knowing the difference between the Sapporos, Hakatas, Wakayama and Kyushus? Just order from the picture lah! Same-same!Following my Pasta Quiz, here’s a Guess the Ramen Quiz – What are the following types of Ramens?They include:
• Sapporo ramen
• Kyushu-style (Tonkotsu) ramen
• Tokyo-style ramen
• Kitakata ramen
• Hakata ramen
• Kogashi ramenABCDEFA good test to see if you really know what you are eating… Make your Guesses here by leaving a comment. Answers will be revealed… next week! Hahaha.
2010-03-26 00:00:00
3 Inch Sin – Temptations are Hard to Resist
Never mind the rather naughty shop name. It’s not like what you think, really. The name comes from its signature molten chocolate cakes. About 3 inch in size I suppose. It may be too small for your liking, but large doesn’t always equate to good. The shop doesn’t sell a lot of things, but that’s what it’s supposed to be about. Specialise, and do it well.The molten cakes come in two sizes – 3 inch and the minis ($5 for 3). When eaten warm with vanilla ice cream, the blend of very ‘jelat’ Valrhona chocolate and oozing fillings can be quite a sensation. Even if you bring them home to refrigerate, the cold ones make a flavoursome yet light tea-time snack.There are 8 different flavours (bitter orange, coffee, mint etc) to choose from, my favourite being peanut butter as the taste is the most distinct. I last suggested a green-tea batter with fresh cream and azuki red bean fillings on their virtual flavour board. Let’s see if they will go ahead with that.Another popular choice was their Rrrroyal Chocolate Cake, spelt with 4 ‘R’s to suggest it’s rather Rrrrich. My preference is always with layered chocolate cakes. And this cake has soft sponge sandwiched with mousse and thin feuilletine, covered in velvety dark chocolate ganache to give it a smooth finishing.Perhaps I have to spend some time writing about the owner. Once an arts manager and a polytechnic facilitator, Celine Yeo decided to take a plunge one fine day to learn French pastry at Le Cordon Bleu Dusit in Thailand. That was not easy because she gave up a stable career to pursue her dreams. And opening up this little place at Cluny Court is a suitable step forward.Dreams are started small. Though it is opened for only a month or so, it has earned rather positive reviews among food bloggers and the small shop was filled with students on my Friday night there.To go for the max, end your meal with a delicious and ‘gao gao’ Ice Chocolate Drink which would definitely give you a chocolate high for the night.3 Inch Sin, 501 Bukit Timah Road #02-27 Cluny Court Tel:+65 6314 1217
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri: 12pm – 9pm; Sat–Sun: 11am – 10pmOther Related Entries
The Cheescake Café (East Coast)
Hairloom & Caramel (Shaw Towers)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
2010-03-17 00:00:00
Burger Shack – Ramly Any Good?
This new burger joint was highly recommended to me by various friends, especially if they were already fans of Island Creamery
. The local ice cream people have decided to start another burger place at Bukit Timah to target the student market.I must say that the customer service part did not start well with me. I called them to schedule for an interview, but received no follow-up at all. To me, no reply was worse than ‘no’ as a reply.I dropped them a visit nevertheless. The vibes was pretty pleasant and it was well-filled with Hwa Chong students (my great8 grand juniors!) on a Friday evening.The kitchen was also well in sight which added to a visual experience. The flip side is you would smell like burgers after 2 hours there, so please sit outside where is it a lot airier. Another minor complain: The sound system announcing your queue number was poorly wired up and created lots of interference though (like Burger King’s but a lot louder).The décor of chalkboard, contemporary wooden finishing was a tad too similar to Relish though. No wonder some thought this Burger Shack was opened by Willin Low, which is not.Burgers are priced from $5.70 (for original) to $7.70 (for a Mushroom Suisse). Add $3.20 for fries and soda. I ordered the Ramli burger ($6.20).It tasted nothing like the oily but tasty ones across the causeway at a third of the price. The spicy chilli was salah out of place and something sweeter and with mayonaise would have be a better blend. The egg was dry too. The consolation is that it was light with a fluffy bun and not overwhelming.The fries, seems inspired by Botak Jones, are a winner with its ‘specially connoted’ spicy Cajun powdering. If you do not like buns, you can also choose to swap your burger bun for garlic butter rice for free.Burger Shack, while not considered gourmet burgers, has a league on its own by targeting at the young students with its more affordable prices.Burger Shack, King’s Arcade #01-01 559 Bukit Timah Tel:+65 64663477
Opening Hours: Tue–Sun 12pm – 10pm (Closed on Mon)Other Related Entries
Island Creamery (Serene Centre)
Everything With Fries (Orchard Central)
McDonald’s Chicken McGrill
Burger, Bench & Bar (Orchard Cineleisure)
Relish (Cluny Court)
2010-03-15 00:00:00
Yoshimaru Ramen Bar – Ramen by Jumbo
Back in my JC days, there was the Yee Cheong Yuen Noodle Restaurant at Holland Village which served oyster sauce chicken noodles that I particularly enjoyed. Now that people’s tastes are becoming more sophisticated, I wasn’t that surprised that it had to ‘give’ half its space away to Yoshimaru Ramen Bar.In a ramen craze now, I got my old classmates to try this shop at Holland Village. (I probably ate like 3-4 bowls last week!) Anyway, Yoshimaru serves Hakata ramen. What’s the difference – You may ask. Hakata ramen is usually thin and straight, while using pork-bone for a milky broth. This is usually contrasted with Sapporo’s springy noodles and thick shoyu or miso stock.Looking at the pictures, you may realize there is something common among all of the dishes. Got it?Yes, sesame. There would be a little bowl of sesame seed for you to crush, mould, play and garnish over the ramen. Something to play with while you are feeling bored. The Shabu-Shabu Beef Salad and Spicy Char Siu Burger were sesame-covered.The Spicy Char Siu Burger seemed like a rip-off of MOS Burger. Therefore, I wasn’t particularly impressed as it was visually more exciting in the pictures, and I expected softer bread and juicier meat.Fortunately, both the pork and beef salads were saving graces, with the sauce having a mustard-sesame taste which was a suitable blend with the thin cold meat. Refreshing. Though I had the feeling I could very well make this at home on my own.As for the Ramen, it was just ‘like-that’. I won’t say it was particularly good or bad. Perhaps spoilt by the influx of choices, there was not one major selling feature that made it memorable, whether it was the noodles, broth or ingredients.As for the décor, it attempted to recreate an in-between contemporary-meets-traditional look, resembling Japanese counter bars. If this may interest you, Yoshimaru is started by Jumbo, attempting to diversify from its seafood business. Not particularly exciting, but it will probably ride well on the Ramen wave.Yoshimaru Ramen Bar, 31 Lorong Liput Holland Village, Tel:+65 6463 3132
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri: 11am–2.30pm, 6pm–10.30pm; Sat–Sun & PH: 11am–11pmOther Related Entries
Keisuke Ramen (Millenia Walk)
Sapporo Ramen Miharu (Gallery Hotel)
Ippudo (Mandarin Gallery)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
Ramen Play (313 @ Somerset)
2010-03-08 00:00:00
Sapporo Ramen Miharu – My Comfort Food
Miharu’s ramen was my ‘breakup recovery dish’. If the term does not make sense, it was where my friends brought me to eat after a breakup in order for me to ‘find comfort in food’.
They must have a lot of faith in this place. And that they know that very bowl of ramen can cheer me up again.Maybe you have not heard of Sapporo Ramen Miharu but it has earned its reputation purely through word-of-mouth. Firstly, not many people know of this haunt as it is not widely advised. Secondly, it is at a rather hidden corner of Gallery Hotel, a distance away from the bus-stops and MRT station.As I enter the little shop, I immediately had a sense of familiarly, with the setup reminding me of what I watched in those Japanese dramas and movies. It had this traditional and ‘rustic’ feel, where Japanese workers would hang out after a day of hard work. You can choose to see ‘kneeled’ (there’s a hole in the floor to rest your leg) or along the counter row.Back in 2008, perhaps I was too used to ‘mass market’ ramens. The first bowl of Miso Tonkostus ($13.00) I had was almost life-changing, and that to me was how ramen should taste like.The bowl contained chewy Sapporo ramen, said to be made with water from the well. These Japanese noodles come frozen from Japan and have to be thawed for a number of days to achieve the bite.And the soup was SALTY, full of miso and pork-flavoured fragrance. It almost felt like the all the goodness of the pork has been absored by the soup from the long hours of cooking. The broth was so tasty, my friend and I finished every drop of the soup.What’s more important to me was that unlike most commercial eateries out there, Sapporo Ramen Miharu has a very homely and calming ambiance about it, which makes you feel comforted. My friends did not recommend wrongly.Sapporo Ramen Miharu, 1 Nanson Road #01-11 The Gallery Hotel Tel:+65 6733 8464
Opening Hours: 12noon – 3pm, 6pm – 9pm Daily (Closed on Wednesdays)Other Related Entries
Netsuretsu Ichiban-Tei (Robertson Quay)
Keisuke Ramen (Millenia Walk)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
Marutama Ra-Men (Liang Court)
Ramen Santouka (Central)
2010-03-04 00:00:00
Ramen Santouka – Fancy Eating Cheeks of the Pig
Before Ippudo came to town, the most positively reviewed yet unnoticed ramen shop was Santouka. My friend recommended me as “the little corner shop near the escalator next to the Shanghai Noodle Shop” at Central.Central should be renamed “Ramen in Wonderland”. Finding Santouka in this maze can be quite a challenge for the unfamiliar, and yet there is already a long queue in line for the famed ramen. If you are lucky (like me), you can take a bench seat with a picturesque riverside view of Clarke Quay. How more romantic can you get.Santouka ever won the 1st place winner in the most delicious ramen noodle salt-flavoured soup category by the popular magazine “Hokkaido Walker” in the year 2006. And coming from colder seasonal Hokkaido, the ramen is the springy chewy type with a salty milky thick broth. If that’s your cup of tea.The house speciality is the Tokusen Toroniku, which comes with a piping hot bowl of ramen in broth, and the pork cheek on a separate plate. It is said to be limited to 60 servings per day. This is because a few hundred grams of pork cheek can be retrieved in each pig. No wonder the costly price tag of $19.90.Frankly, I had a hard time trying to get myself the mental barrier of eating ‘the face’ of a pig. To its credit, the pork cheek was superbly tender, soft, fatty and melts almost instantly in your mouth, see if you have the cheek to eat it all. Little Pig Little Pig, what tasty cheeks you have!Ramen Santouka, 6 Eu Tong Sen Street #02-76 The Central Tel:+65 6224 0668
Opening Hours: 11.00am – 9.30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Sapporo Ramen Miharu (Gallery Hotel)
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
Marutama Ra-Men (Liang Court)
Keisuke Ramen (Millenia Walk)
Can You Name The Ramen?
2010-02-23 00:00:00
Ippudo – It’s Worth The Wait
After a long wait, I finally decided to join the queue at Mandarin Gallery to see what the Ippudo fuss is all about. One Monday night, 20 people in line, and a 25-minute wait.A little caution: While you think the line outside is the only queue, there is one more inside where customers wait very patiently around a  table. To kill time, some customers can then decide their orders with the menus lying around.Many waiting customers whipped out cameras big and small for their blog moments, and the interior of Ippudo is quite worth picture-taking. It has a stylish fusion décor with bowls and utensils of red, white and black bringing out its signature colours.A little history on why all the fuss: It’s founder Shigemi Kawahara earned the title of Ramen King after three consecutive first place wins on a Japanese television show. The popular chain has 44 restaurants in Japan and opened with a big media bang at the revamped Mandarin late last year. And it is the only ramen restaurant in Singapore with its own factory, producing its own noodles and soup.To its credit, the queue moved along quite fast, and the serving staff (many speaking in Japanese-accented English) was prompt and attentive. I quickly ordered some appetizers: The Ippodu Shrimp Buns ($4) and Ippudo Home Made Gyoza ($6).The Hakata style mini gyozas were bite-sized pan-fried dumplings that somehow gave a feel of eating tidbits. With that said, the outside skin was crispy fried while the inside was flavourful with broth and meat. Small but packed and deliciousThe Shrimp Bun was like the usual “Kong Bak Bao” steamed bun that we were used to, with one shrimp deep-fried in a special Ippudo sauce. There was nothing that special about this bun, but the salty and crunchy batter was an appropriate blend with the soft bun.I had an Akamaru Modern with Egg ($17) which was served with pork belly. The serving staff would also ask if you would like your thin noodles soft or hard. My preference is always a little more ‘al dente’. Reviews had been mixed, and so I did not expect much – and was pleasantly surprised. The noodles were springy and bouncy. Ippudo’s soup may be light on the palate, but yet full of pork braised goodness. There are too many ramen soups out there that are just salty. I also liked it that it has chopped kikurage (wood ear mushroom) and scallions that added bite to the soup.If you prefer something more salty, try the 2010 Kyushu Miso Tonkotsu Special ($17) which had a very ‘brothy’ feel. While I had better and softer pork bellies and eggs elsewhere, its winning formula was really the noodles and soup. I finished almost every single drop!While fans of Santouka, Marutama and Miharu would argue that Ippudo is too hyped-up, it certainly spices up the whole ramen market in Singapore. And I am officially ippudoed.Ippudo, 333A Orchard Road #04-02/03/04 Mandarin Gallery Tel:+65 6235 2797
Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 11am – 11pm, Sun: 11am – 10pmOther Related Entries
Ippudo Tao (UE Square)
Sapporo Ramen Miharu (Gallery Hotel)
Daikokuya (Orchard Paragon)
Marutama Ra-Men (Liang Court)
Ramen Santouka (Central)
2010-02-12 00:00:00
A Little Difference to Your YuSheng
Thank you Chef Jimmy Chok from the Academy Bistro for the following tips to make your Yusheng just a little different from usual if you are making your own.1) Some plum sauce can be too thick and strong. You can consider adding some Mizkan sauce and Mirin to the Plum Sauce (recommended Woh Hup brand) for an added refreshing flavour and light sweet and sour taste.<<2) Some Yusheng ingredients sold outside can contain too much colouring, salt, and preservatives. You can consider adding some dried fruits like cranberry and orange peel for that same sweetish taste as a healthier alternative.<3) Or even mushroom for some crunch.<4) The main ingredient in an Yusheng is ultimately the fish. Do not go stingy on it. Add some fish roe or caviar if you are feeling extravagent. Fresh salmon should have a consistent reddish colour with a shiny and dry surface. If it is going bad, there is a greyish slimy surface.<5) If the stores run out of 'golden pillow' crackers, the usual cornflakes with Japanese crackers could be other crispy options. It's less fattening too!6) Some people choose to add cucumber of the green colour in your Yusheng. For a more authentic taste, just add green radish (rather than cucumber) along with your white radish and carrot.If you have listened to my radio interview with Chef Martin from So-Ez last week, he also recommended Lavender or Hibicus essence for a floral and romantic feel to the Yusheng sauce. After all, it's Valentine's Day too!
2010-02-11 00:00:00
8 Reasons Why I Like YuSheng
Of all the Chinese New Year dishes, I particularly enjoy eating Yusheng 鱼生. Admit it, it’s not because it is symbol of abundance, prosperity and vigor. Here are 8 reasons why it is just so popular.1) It’s for Dieting
This colourful dish seemingly gives people the impression that it is super healthy because it is made of ‘raw vegetable and fish’. Yah, right. The perpetually-on-diet Nancy says it’s “Healthy Chinese salad”. Whatever you call it Nancy, but please remove the oil and preserved vegetables to lessen your guilt. And don’t eat up all my crispy crackers!2) It’s for Fun! 
While your mother always tell you NOT to play with your food, YuSheng is probably the only one where you can have all your fun can have. Toss it high, nevermind, mummy will think its fine.3) It improves your Chinese! 
Have you tossed Yusheng with a table full of Chinese teachers? If not, find one. That’s when you can improve your Chinese by leaps and bounds by sprouting four words by four words of prosperity and health. 恭喜发财and万事如意 is way too cliché, So How about 16 words of 七星高照，八方来财，九九同心，十全十美?4) It can be a Game 
Or play a game where you have to connect the last word with the first word of the next one…一帆风顺， 顺利福气， 气势如虹，鸿运当头… Now who says eating Yusheng is boring?5) It can help impress others 
I am always particularly impressed with serving staff who can remember what every ingredient in the Yusheng. Nevermind if the waitress are making them up, as long as it sounds good and overly rehearsed. So to impress your prospective mother-in-law, maybe go memorise every item and its meaning yah? Don’t anyhow anyhow.6) It can build relationships  
Also Yusheng is probably one of the rare dishes where more than 10 people can ‘prepare’ together. Even if they toss the vegetables with that very same chopsticks they have eaten with. Ewwwww.7) It tells you about the eaters 
I love to observe people tossing yusheng as it shows the dynamics of the group. A very close knitted group of family and friends would probably cheer their hearts out and toss it as high as possible. While a more cordial and overly polite group, who barely toss it above 10 centimeters, probably needs more interaction.8 ) It is just freaking delicious.Happy Chinese New Year!
2010-02-08 00:00:00
Steamed Mandarin Orange Cake Recipe
As Chinese New Year approaches, here’s a little recipe for a simple dessert that can make 12-16 muffin-like cakes to be shared. With soft fluffiness, sweet aroma and the slight taste of Mandarin oranges, it’s an auspicious start to the New Year. This is good opportunity to use some of the Mandarin oranges that you do not know what to do with as well.Ingredients: 
3/4 Mandarin Oranges
3 Eggs
180g sugar (or custard sugar)
180g butter (unsalted and loose)
170g self-rising flour
1 tsp vanilla essenceSteps:
1.	Boil the mandarin oranges in one cup water for about 90 minutes. Remove the seeds of the mandarin oranges and mix into a pulp. Leave the skin of the oranges in.2.	Sift together self-rising flour, then add vanilla essence, set aside.
3.	In a mixing bowl, whisk together butter and sugar first.
4.	Then add in self-rising flour and eggs and whisk till ribbon stage. (Add in a little flour, then a little egg and a little flour in sequence, rather than all at the same time.)5.	Mix in mashed oranges, beat till combine.
6.	Line Muffin Cups with floor and butter.7.	Pour Batter into muffin cups.
8.	Steam over high heat for 30mins or till an inserted skewer comes out clean.Verdict
The cakes are healthier and store quite well. Some say that the texture reminds them of a mini and fluffier ‘Huat’ cakes. Serve them warm with vanilla sauce or ice cream and a slice of Mandarin orange. Yumz!Other Related Entries
CNY Almond Cookies Recipe
SoEZ Brownie Baking 101
2010-02-03 00:00:00
Sticky – Customised Candies for CNY & V-Day
It started with the wedding of Jamie and Kristin. They wanted a different and creative souvenir for their wedding guests, and what was more apt than their favourite candies from Australia customised with their names.Fast forward two years later, their daughter is a year old, and their Sticky shop at Central one and half years in operation. Jamie and Kristin left their day jobs and ventured into the risky franchise business of candy-making, doing what they enjoy eating.Although tucked at a little corner of basement one, it is hard to miss the bright pink walls and colourful lollies of various flavours. Sticky offers hand-made candies, and the lollies are created right before your eyes at their shop front. All confectioners have to go through a blind-test, making a batch of sweets from start-to-end blindfolded.You can choose from a varied mix of selections from Watermelon Rock, Acid Drops, Banana, Lychee Pillows and Strawberries & Cream. If you are wondering, yes, Durian is still in the making.And while typing this, I am trying their popular “Acid Drops”, probably inspired by our familiar “Super Lemon”. Take a first suck, and you would go “Wah” and immediately wake up if you are droned by boring work. And as you continue with your suck, you appreciate the citrus-sweet robust-zesty taste.For some sweet treats for the festive period next week, their Valentine “I Love You” or CNY “Tiger” are already available. Or customise some like “I Love XXX”, “Hug Me”. And yes, Chinese words inclusive. I saw a bottle with the words “Customer Satisfaction” within, and that’s quite a handful of words to be squeezed into a candy rock.Sticky, The Central 6 Eu Tong Sen Street B1-54/55, Singapore 059817 Tel : +65 6238 5178Other Related Entries
Candylicious Takashimaya
Candylicious (Resorts World
2010-01-25 00:00:00
Once Upon A Milkshake – A Fairytale Concept
In a white building filled with disputes, there is a little shop that offers sweet treats.It may seem to be a little mix-fit, but this reminds us that amidst the serious legal business, there’s always time for sugar comfort. Maxwell Chambers have become a place where arbitrators and lawyers come to settle commercial disputes, and Once Upon a Milk Shake aka OUAM (pronounced ‘ohm’.) is a milkshake and ice cream concept store right at the entrance.I was conducting a course for some foreign judges at the Chambers when a pamphlet of cartoon characters caught my eye. Agent Strawberry, Cerious Maple, Vainilla Pot, Pirate Queen Peach are just some of the stylistic characters and corresponding flavours of the milkshake and ice cream.Getting a scoop of Agent Strawberry, the gung-ho lady with pink hair, just adds more fun to the usual ‘strawberry flavour’. And my personal favourite is Nutty Peanut Butler that has a delightful crunch to a smooth milkshake. Overall, the ice cream has a milky taste and rich texture, a feel that many will enjoy.With an interior design that looks like it’s lifted straight from the IKEA catalogue, owner Alvin Teo perhaps brought the design element a level further. Call him a perfectionist or being obsessive, his purist take of the colour purple and eye for detail made this a café I would like to own. (Because I am one who likes to coordinate colours.) While you think that only the posters, décor, accents, bowls, untensils are purple, I observed that their table rags, pens and water spray for cleaning tables are also purple!He was one of the urbanites working at Tanjong Pagar that could not find something that satisfied his craving for ice cream. And he landed up opening one his own to cater to the working crowd at the CBD.The name of the cafe gives a clue of a fairytale concept, with the theme down to the butterfly-shaped bowls and butterfly wall design. A candlelight dinner on Saturday nights just adds on to a rather magical ambience. This may be irrelevant information, but the serving staff is a pair of very soft-spoken and sweet looking sisters who reminds me of princesses.Although OUAM has a rather out-of-the-way location, but with the exciting flavours and current whooping 8.0 rating on hungrygowhere, this niche milkshake and ice cream cafe may just have a fairytale ending.32 Maxwell Road, #01-08 Maxwell Chambers Mon-Sun: 11am – 11pm Tel:+65 98233779
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 12pm – 10pm; Fri–Sat: 12pm – 11pmOther Related Entries
Cold Stone Creamery (Orchard Central)
Island Creamery (Serene Centre)
Ice Cream Chefs (East Coast)
Udders (Thomson Road)
The Daily Scoop (Chip Bee Gardens)
2010-01-19 00:00:00
Burger Bench & Bar – Eat ‘Real’ Burgers
‘Bench & Bar’ is often related to judiciary and legal matters, and the name of this new Burger place gives you the clue that it is opened by a lawyer. Well, it is opened by none other than celebrity chef and ex-lawyer Willin Low, owner of Wild-Rocket, Wild Oats and Relish. You know, that handsome chap that always appear on TV.Burger Bench & Bar, otherwise known as B3, occupies where Subway used to be at Cineleisure, one of the most prominent spaces at this popular place. With tables shaped like school-canteen benches, it is a suitable hangout place for groups of friends. And the 3rd – B ‘Bar’ is because there is Asahi beer on tap. How wrong can a combination of burger and beer be?Now, at burgers priced at $8.00, a meal can off-set you by $11.80 with a $1 add-on for potato chips and $2.80 for a drink. That is a lot pricier than the fast-food restaurants around within walking distance.But people are willing to pay for ‘real’ food – because this is as close as gourmet burgers as you can get. I had a Saute Mixed Mushroom Beef Burger, and the beef patty was a lot more juicy, tasty and substantial than ‘those ordinary burgers’. I overheard a patron from the next table saying “This is Amazing!”The truth was I was a little suspicious when asked if I was willing to top-up a dollar for chips. There the imaginary of ‘those cheap packaged potato chips’ appeared in my head. I was wrong, and what I got were actually home-made yellow and purple russet potato chips that are crunchy and crisp with an authentic potato taste. And my friend couldn’t stop nibbling at my chips.The Japanese Curry Chicken Katsu Burger could do better with a sweeter curry sauce and more tender chicken, but this interesting recipe is still worthy of a try. And like a child eating his first big burger, I made a little mess, and wished there was some cutlery.Do not give the Dark Chocolate Soft Serve a miss. Jelat (rich), creamy and not as watery, it adds a final sense of satisfaction to end off the meal.Burger Bench & Bar BBB, 8 Grange Road #01-02 Cathay Cineleisure Orchard Tel+65 6737 9947
Opening Hours: 12pm – 1030pm DailyOther Related Entries
Willin Low and His Favourite Hokkien Mee
Relish (Cluny Court)
Most Original Burger MOB (Vivocity)
Everything With Fries (Orchard Central)
Burger Shack (Bt Timah)
2009-12-21 00:00:00
LENAS – No Prize for Guessing the Name of the Owner
When somebody names a restaurant after him/herself, you would figure that this place may mean a lot to the owner and can reflect the personality and taste.It is not surprising that you can often find Lena Sim, also the person behind the Japanese eatery and desserts chain Ministry of Food, hanging around the newly opened restaurant at Bugis.Starting with the concept, it sells every from American to Italian and ice-cream to beer. And upon meeting her, she gives a very gung-ho, dare-to-try vibe, yet with a touch of fun and casualness. Therefore, the wide variety of food here is not only to attract the mixed and varied crowd at Bugis, but to reflect the everything-must-try attitude of Lena.The handmade thin crust gourmet pizza I had was light and well-garnished with greens, suitable for those who want a guilty yet healthy treat. While the setting for the restaurant is casual, the taste of the food still indicated a certain quality expected at a finer restaurant.A special mention is the smoked duck salad. While I am not a total fan of duck meat because of its usual toughness, this version would melt in your mouth and the tangy sauce added a sweet flavour to balance it off.I was urged to try the Signature Ice Mint Tea – inspired when Lena Sim traveled to London and tried a similar version. This cooling thirst quencher with blended mint came in an over-sized mug, best for a hot day with a group of friends. Mind you, I only managed to drink my second cup, because Lena Sim ‘ordered’ her staff to switch the first one because it is not up to perfection.From the food to the decor, customers may feel that the theme is slightly messy and random. Also, reviews from various sites have been mixed, especially on the service. Perhaps it just needs a bit of time to fine-tune and understand what the customers want. This new cosy and homely restaurant has potential, and just needs a stronger branding to reach out to the Bugis crowd.200 Victoria Street #01-88/89 Bugis Junction Tel: +65 6336 7630
Opening Hours: Mon–Thu: 11.30am – 10.30pm; Fri–Sun: 10.30am – 11.30pmOther Related Entries
MOF’s CEO did not have enough to eat Lor Mee
15 Minutes (Lasalle)
Singapore Sling Chilli Crab Pizza (Clarke Quay)
Verve Pizzeria (One North)
Nando’s (Bugis Junction)
2009-11-23 00:00:00
Ebisboshi Shotengai – Order with a Talking Pen!
Order your food with a talking pen? Ridiculous it may sound, but trust the Japanese to come out with something like this.Ebisboshi Shotengai, the new gimmicky place which gathered 7 Japanese restaurants at Iluma, attempts to make your ordering a breeze. (I shall talk more about the food next time as it was surprisingly better than expected.)So here’s what happen
a) You scan the pen over the food on the menu to select the item you want
b) Scan over a quantity you want (1,2,3,4,5,6,7,8,9,10)
c) You get to review, cancel or confirm
d) Walah…. Job and food delivered, without even need a waiterSave cost, save time, save the trouble. That’s supposedly the Ideal situation. Supposedly.There were certain moments when I felt like a total i****, trying frenziedky to scan the pen over my Kani Nabe.  Waitress walked over and said “It’s really simple.” Nah-Nah.  She scanned for more than 10 times, gave up and got another menu. She didn’t have the choice to get a paper.Same waitress came to my table to check several times. Fortunately, I only wanted to order 2 items.  I wanted to cancel my drink actually, but gave up because I can’t find the word “cancel” or “order zero” on the menu.The pen talks and repeats your order by the way. You know, that robotic voice. Kind of amusing.I wonder what would happen if I wanted more vegetables, add an egg to my soup… oh, and with chilli power, two extra bowls, and iced water. Or can the talking pen explain to me what’s the Special of the Day?Apparantly, the entired Pen system cost about $160,000. It can reduce up to half of the serving team and cashiers. It was fun but a tad too frustrating.Share with me your experiences with this talking pen. Like it or hate it?Ebisboshi Shotengai, 201 Victoria Street, #04-08 Iluma @ Bugis, Singapore, Tel: +65 6835 7056
Opening Hours: Weekdays: 11am– 10.30pm; Weekends: 11.00am – 11.30pm
2009-11-20 00:00:00
Hairloom and Caramel – Cut Your Hair and Eat Your Cake
The very idea of having a hair saloon and a café together seems crazy. You must thinking what I am thinking – What happens if there is extra ‘ingredients’ in my pasta?Owner CK assured me that the hygiene standards are in place, and the hair cutting area is a distant away. Plus, having such combinations is a common sense in other countries. So bored boyfriends can surf and have their tea while their girlfriends have a makeover on the other side.This used to be a huge CD shop, which has given way to a very homely place merging hair services and food temptations.You may have seen Hairloom and Caramel in some fashion or entertainment magazines. It’s a colourful area of mismatched furniture which blended well together. The décor comprising of kopi tiam tables, upholstered chairs, hand-decorated walls and transformed sofas given new covers, is cutesy, whimsical and quirky.The owners, huge fans of Japanese food, spun up some West-meets-Jap menus with the likes of Soy Sauce Chicken Breast Salad in Plum Sauce Dressing, Unagi Sandwich with Crispy Seaweed and Japanese Mayo, Bacon Sandwich with Sliced Cheese and Japanese Mayo, and Chicken Spaghetti in Goma Sauce. Customers found the new take and experimentation hugely refreshing.The major selling point is the Cupcakes – always different and delightfully pretty. Custom-make yours for some occasions like birthday parties and weddings. You may have special flavour requests like their sinfully good Apple Crumble Cupcake, shhh…. Don’t say I told you.So Zar Pa Lang, It’s definitely one of Singapore’s most stylistic café.Hairloom and Caramel Cafe, 100 Beach Road #01-50/52 Shaw Towers Tel:+65 6295 2188
Opening Hours: Mon–Thu: 12pm – 8pm; Fri–Sat: 12pm – 10pm (Closed on Sun & PH)Other Related Entries
Dessert Cup (Raffles City)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
3 Inch Sin (Bt Timah)
Let’s Sweet (Bugis Junction)
2009-11-13 00:00:00
Little Ice Cream Kafe – Try it and lick it
Oh, ANOTHER Ice Cream Café selling local flavoured ice cream, but don’t we have Island Creamery, Udders, Ice Cream Chefs already?  LICK, short for Little Ice Cream Kafe, first caught my attention after many of my foodie friends became fans of the café on Facebook.Located at Tanjong Katong Road, the ice cream-makers got their location right considering the proximity to schools such as Tanjong Katong Girls, Tanjong Katong Secondary School and my alma mater Chung Cheng High. I went there on a Saturday, but could very well imagine the potential crowd it could attract, knowing how this can be a great and colourful hangout place for the young. And this, is one stretch of unpublicised shophouses where interesting food eateries assemble.When asked what the secret recipe to LICK was, the two owners just said it was a matter of try and error. And when they had the opportunity to open a shop, they had the “Just Do It” mentality. They had the passion and love for ice cream, which was their main driving force. Brave indeed.Therefore, armed with an ice cream machine and a year of experimentation, without attending any special classes or having a ‘shifu’, the sisters-in-law pair managed to come up with 30 different ‘local’ flavours. Their other selling point was to include mix-ins such as nuts, cereals and chocolates, blended together on a special granite slab.I bought 4 flavours of Kaya Toast/Nutella and Lychee/Mango combinations. The fruity mix was easily the more popular one among my friends, getting favourable comments that the ‘Hawaiian tasting combi’ was cooling, refreshing yet not too sweet. The Lychee flavour was unusually very creamy, done on purpose by the owners to differentiate from the lychee sorbets available elsewhere. The ‘Breakfast combi’ felt a little more ordinary, and some crispy toast mix-ins should add more crunch and oomph.The texture of the ice cream reminded us of those sold by those push-carts uncles when we were young – thick, milky and dense. Best tried by slowly licking indeed. Delightful in its own way.LICK gathered the winning formulas of the other ice cream cafes – proximity to schools, local-made flavours, mix-ins. cosy and colourful ambience, and a photo display board. My little take is this new kid on the block can be more creative on their flavours to the untried such as Ice Kachang, Bobo Cha Cha and Cheng Teng to get a winning edge. My take – not bad. Try it and lick it.LICK Little Ice Cream Kafe, 258 Tanjong Katong Rd Singapore 437460, Tel:+65 6440 8526
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 1pm – 11pm; Fri–Sat & PH Eve: 1pm – 12amOther Related Entries
Cold Stone Creamery (Orchard Central)
Island Creamery (Serene Centre)
Swensen’s Chendol Ice Cream
Ice Cream Chefs (East Coast)
Udders (Thomson Road)
2009-11-09 00:00:00
Watami – She knelt down to take orders
Some numbers for this entry: Queued at 5:30pm. Got in at 6:30pm.
Number of people left at the queue: 30 plus.Watami Group: founded in 1984 by Watanabe Miki at the age of 24.
This branch at Ion Orchard: 631th branch in the world. No joke.Number of friends in this group dinner: 6.
Number of dishes + dessert ate: 15.
Price paid each: $20.50 (Cheap! considering location)Number of dishes to be recommended: A few. Hotate Butter Yaki (Sinfully delicious), Sapporo Miso Ramen (Thick and salty), Sukiyaki Nabe (Tasty, but the portion can be better), Wafu Hotokuchi Steak (Tender), Irodori Sushi Grandeur (Colourful), Hot Choco Brownie (Must order!)Number of waitresses who served us: 3
Number of waitresses who knelt down to take orders: 2 (When asked why, she turned red-faced and she said it’s a show of good service standards and gratitude to customers.)
Number of hand waves to get attention of a Watami waitress: 6
Time needed for waitresses to walk over after acknowledgement: 70 sec (Too many people lah)The overall Watami experience was a pleasant one, due to the large variety of Japanese quality food. My friends and I decided that almost everything we tried were good, except the Tempura. The fried Ebi had the “I-can-fry-the-batter-better-at-home” taste, so give the Tempura a miss. Service can be a little slow due to the heavy weekend crowd. The interior design had a homely, cosy yet classy feel so it’s an appropriate place for dates or group outings.Watami Group’s slogan is “to receive the most number of thank-yous in the world”. I would say “Thank You”, and probably come again … when there’s no queue.Watami, 2 Orchard Turn, #B3-23 ION Orchard, Singapore, Tel:+65 6509 9366
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Pepper Lunch (Shaw House)
Tsukiji Gindaco (Ion Orchard)
Sho Teppan (Ion Orchard)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
SUN Japanese Dining (Chijmes)
2009-10-26 00:00:00
Men-ya Kaiko – A friend said it was very good
”I made my rounds around the basement 4 food maze of Ion Orchard, looking for that oiishii ramen from Hokkaido. Fred blogged that this was a MUST-TRY Ramen, better than the one upstairs, but having no other information except that the stall’s from Hokkaido.”Therefore, I was quite full of anticipation for several days, wondering if it was even better than Miharu or Marutama. And I found it at an inconspicuous spot, a little stall named Menya Kaiko (麺屋 開高). And later found out that Menya Kaiko has several stalls there in a city call Obihiro, as well as inside the New Chitose Airport at Sapporo.What caught my attention was the King Crab Ramen at $29.80. Who would pay that kind of price, really? Tell me if you would pay $30 to eat something at a basement food mall.I went by my theory of ‘When in doubt, just order the best seller or chef’s recommendation’. All right, Hokkaido Kaiko Ramen it shall be. Which comes in Red Miso, White Miso or Soy Sauce.I know my mother will scold me at I pay $12 to eat ‘instant noodles’, but she just doesn’t know that Hokkaido Ramen is DIFFERENT. Ah, the QQ texture and strong bite of the noodles, with a healthy shade of yellow. Some ramen just look sickly pale.When my Red Miso ramen arrived, I took a deep breath of the stock, trying to remind myself of the wonderful holiday I had in Tokyo. And first sip of the soup was……Ah. Not bad, not bad. Not as salty as some of the others, quite a bit of oomph, and thick enough to make you feel this is real stuff.Although I finished the whole bowl, I can’t quite say I liked it a lot so much that I must try again. Perhaps I was not happy with the egg (one dollar extra) which wasn’t as runny as I wanted to.And when I paid, the price was 30 over bucks for 2 bowls! Oh, service charge and GST really kills. Menya Kaiko is more tasty better than many ramen chains out there, with the service staff giving it a very ‘Japanese feel’. Maybe it’s just me. I feel that the basement 4 concept at Ion is just a ‘modified food court’, and I may not be that willing to pay premium prices for something I can have at a proper restaurant.For that kind of price, you would expect a more wholesome experience and in this case, the food alone can’t save.Men-ya Kaiko, 2 Orchard Turn, #B4-52/53 ION Orchard, Singapore, Tel:+65 6509 8150
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Ippudo (Mandarin Gallery)
Keisuke Ramen (Millenia Walk)
Ramen Play (313 @ Somerset)
Daikokuya (Orchard Paragon)
Can You Name The Ramen?
2009-10-13 00:00:00
Gindaco Takoyaki – What’s The Long Queue At Ion All About?
You might have seen the perpetual long queue for Takoyaki at Basement 4 Ion Orchard. But isn’t it just simple Tako Balls? Last week, there was a relatively short queue about 4 people and I took my stand to see what the whole fuss was all about.Takoyaki, the well-liked Japanese dumpling snack first popularised at Osaka, has been around Singapore for some time (first being at Takashimaya, I think) but none has popularity like this one.At the Gindaco stall, I observed two Tako chefs (who looked really like twin brothers) slowly dissolved the flour and eggs into the bowl, slowly filled the griddle with the mixed batter, slowly placed the octopus pieces into the centre of each ball, slowly added tenkasu (crunchy bits of deep fried flour-dough), dried shrimps, slowly flipped the balls over, and slowly shaped each individual ball. This was repeated many many times with the entire batch until the batter took a clear spherical shape and grilled to a deep golden colour.Ah, 4th in line, but 20 minutes in waiting.The 6 Takoyakis, contained in a boat shaped container said to absorb excess oil and prevent condensation, emitted a flavourful warm aroma. This is especially tempting when it was added with mayonnaise, aonori seasoning and shaved dried bonito. (I know of people who love these balls because of the ‘moving’ bonito.)The skin was indeed crispy-grilled, with the inside gushing out with warm batter that had a slightly more salty and unique taste than the usual ‘brands’. Better than any other Tako balls I have ever tried.You would feel that the constant turning and grilling was necessary to create the delicious constant between the exterior and interior of a seemingly simple ball. Matched with a cold Macha drink, this is a satisfying meal on its own.These Gindaco balls beat those pasar malam versions hands down, but are they worth the long wait? Well, YES.Tsukiji Gindaco, 2 Orchard Turn, #B4-64/65 ION Orchard, Singapore Tel:+65 6509 9038
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Sho Teppan (Ion Orchard)
Itacho Sushi
Watami (Ion Orchard)
Box n Sticks
Menya Kaiko (Ion Orchard)
2009-09-25 00:00:00
Canton-i…. But Truly Malaysia Noodles
The usual man on the street will think twice before entering any restaurants Level 1 and above at Ion Orchard. “Check the price first!”  While those below Level 1 are enjoying queue lines, the ones above are priced at the higher level as well.It was sheer curiosity that made me want to try out Canton-I, very chic east-meets west décor, and prices are a notch higher than Crystal Jade’s for the same kind of food. No queue, try lah.You can watch the chefs chop their roasted meat behind a glass room near the entrance, seated on white furniture with decorative white blossom motifs and pink accents.  I won’t exactly call it classy, a little to the ching-cheong side, but it has an air of richness within.What’s going to a Cantonese restaurant without trying it’s Wanton Noodles right? The Signature Prawn Wonton Noodles does remind me of those served in Hong Kong, the usual springy noodles with fat wantons wrapped with fresh scrimp. While it is certainly quite not bad tasting, it isn’t exactly something you never tried before.The Congee though, is one of the smoothest I have tried in this country. The texture almost makes you feel that you are eating beancurd, with the rice triggering down your taste buds. And the bowl comes warm, and makes you feel fuzzy in the cool air-con environment.My eating partner though lamented that the best thing in the restaurant that day was neither the main course or desserts we had, but the soya bean drink. Certainly says much.The meal for the two of us, came to a posh price of $40 plus! It’s a Blue note! So much for wantee mee and muay… And when you find out that Canton-i hails from our friendly neighbours at Malaysia and not Hong Kong, you really wonder how much is this in ringgit. So 3.5* for the food, but 2* for the price.The food materials come from Hong Kong though, but nay… Won’t make you go *BoomZ* There are similar choices available if I have a craving for Canton food, and really, Crystal Jade makes you feel a lot more at home.Canton-i, 2 Orchard Turn, #03-14 ION Orchard, Singapore, Tel: +65 6509 8368
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
Hong Kong Sun Kee (NEX)
Old Hong Kong Tea House (Katong) 
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
Noodle Star (Bugis Village)
2009-09-10 00:00:00
Sho Teppan at Ion – Cook your own Teppanyaki
This would be what I call Pepper Lunch meets Steamboat, where you cook your own Teppanyaki and Sukiyaki in a hot metal pot on an electric stove. It’s a fun concept. Though my mum will probably question, “Cook yourself, might as well eat at home.”With such a self-service system, Sho Teppan will therefore appeal to the young. The queue at Sho Teppan seems shorter than the other Japanese places at Ion Orchard, with ONLY a 15 minute wait. I would assume many ladies would be put off dining here for the smell that would be left on the clothes and hair, but it ain’t too bad. The décor feels like Mos Burger meets Pepper Lunch, with the same type of colour concept and clean look.Patrons seat at box shaped Japanese style counter. You can only possibly talk to the person sitting beside you. Those with big clutters of friends, better sit beside someone you can chit-chat with. If you are bored, you can also spend the time people-watching, observing strange eating manners of the shoppers right opposite.The two main type of dishes are the Sukiyaki and Teppanyaki – both come with wide choice of meats such as beef, chicken and seafood. The price range between $10 and $20, very affordable considering that even the food court is very expensive.I ordered a Hotate Sukiyaki. The soup was rather ordinary, and tasted like what you can get from the typical Japanese supermarket. No complains, what you pay is what you get. At least it’s not extremely salty like what other restaurants may offer. Refill is water instead of stock, so take note of that.But the next time I would order a Wayu Beef – yes they have it.Sho Teppan, 2 Orchard Turn, #B3-19 ION Orchard, Singapore, Tel: +65 6509 9969
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 9.30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Watami (Ion Orchard)
Fortune Cuisine (Sunset Way)
Chong Qing Hot Pot (Suntec)
Fisherman’s Market (The Central)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
2009-09-09 00:00:00
Yong He Eating House – May Close Down By The End Of The Year
Updated: The famous Yong He dough fritters which used to be many Singaporeans’ favourite supper place may close down end of 2012. According to its owner, business has been very bad and a group of 4 will only spend S$12 instead of only S$20. He has already retrenched 10 workers. He now currently has 30 left.If Yong He cannot find a new place with cheaper rent, it will be closed at the end of the year.Just a few years back at Geylang Lor 9, the beef horfun, frog porridge and Yong He’s beancurd enjoyed a ‘tripartite’ relationship, almost a formidable force for a great night’s supper. Now that the old Yong He location had gave way to a clothing store and they moved to a bigger location at Lor 27A, the usual fanfare and taste was apparently missing.Last week I was on my Taiwanese food craving again, and jio-ed some supper mates over to a very congested and ‘colourful’ Geylang. (There’s now a ‘China’ supermarket with 3 shopfronts near the present Yong He – very interesting.)Yong He had expanded its food repertoire to include more Taiwanese street delights from Braised Meat Rice, Taiwanese Meat Dumplings, and Stewed Pork Buns.The aunties were champions for speed. Right after I ordered, the food came within 45 seconds. Amazing. I was just on my way to wiping the chopsticks.Major mistake number 1: The dough fritters were COLD.
Major mistake number 2: The fried guotie was COLD.With the fried items tasting a little more rubbery than crispy, along with an old taste of oil and a clammy texture, my favourite dough sticks had dropped the ranks right to the bottom of the supper chart. No wonder the items came so fast, they must had been prepared way before hand. Wasn’t freshness the key?The other items had nothing to shout about. A more peppery than usual Mee Sua, and a very small portion and thus pricey braised meat rice … it made me wonder what happened to it’s formal glory.At least the soya bean milk was still very tasty. And I even tabao-ed some back home. My only consolation. Sigh…As to why Yong He would close, my rationale is a combination of
a) Its relocation to a less popular spot instead of Lor 9
b) Geylang becoming a really messy place with impossible parking
c) Its food standard dropping (cold and unappetizing looking food)
d) Rude staff (instead of the friendlier aunties in the past) who couldn’t care lessIt is sad. And let’s just hope that this is not the route other popular but declining supper spots would take.517 Geylang Road (Near Lorong 27A) Tel: Tel: +65 6745 5682
Opening Hours: 24 hours DailyOther Related Entries
Yong He Eating House (Geylang)
Ah Tai (Chinatown)
Eat May Know (Bendemeer)
Xi Men Ding (Vivocity)
I Love Taimei (Bugis)
2009-08-25 00:00:00
Ice Monster 冰馆 – If Jolin Says it’s Good, it Has to Be
If you want me to find an equivalent for 永康街 Yong Kang Street in Taipei, I probably can’t. It’s hard to pin-point what the exact charm is, and perhaps can be too ordinary to give a miss easily. The street comes out of nowhere, not vaguely near any train stations, and the nearest attraction is the Chiang Kai-shek Memorial Hall 国立中正纪念堂.People flock here for Ding Tai Feng 鼎泰豊, famous beef noodles 老张 and 永康牛肉面. And yet there’s still a peaceful quiet along the street with a park, coffee joints and schools.One of the main reason that brought me here is Ice Monster 冰馆. There is nothing really impressive about the décor of Ice Monster, with plastic black and yellow chairs decked out at a shophouse in the corner. The shop looks like it can fall apart any moment! The logo is a sweating grouchy ice man. Yet local Taiwanese, Korean and Japanese tourists will look out for the first empty bench so that they can quickly take a seat to sample some mango goodness. On a hot summer day, this is probably your best refuge.There are various combinations of deserts filled with mango, strawberry, and kiwi fruits to choose from, and friendly serving staff dressed in pale blue tees will get you your orders in a nifty. Ice desserts in Taipei are aplenty, but you haven’t tried the real stuff till you are here.With a hefty price of NT160, that’s $7-8 for mango ice kachang. Worth the price? The ingredients are simple – shaved ice, mango, mango syrup and specialty made condensed milk. But the combination will make you remember this refreshing taste for a long long time.Jolin Tsai says that Taiwan mangoes are the sweetest in the world and is a fan of this store. But of course, she is the ambassador. I won’t claim the mangoes best in the world, but certainly better than many I have tasted, including Thailand and Singapore and that makes a whole lot of difference. Perhaps that’s why the Singapore branches in Plaza Sing and Bencoolen Square hasn’t really taken the country by storm. Just fill it up with more mangoes!No.15, Yongkang St., Da-an District, Taipei City 106
106台北市大安區永康街15號1FOther Related Entries
Dong Qu Fen Yuan (Taiwan)
Deng Long Lu Wei (Taiwan)
Pork Pepper Buns (Taiwan)
Ah Zong Mian Xian (Taiwan) 
Hao Da Chicken Culet (Taiwan)
2009-08-19 00:00:00
Lu Gang Xiao Zhen 鹿港小镇 – Recipes from Taiwan, Portions for Kids
I finally had the time to visit the very happening Ion Orchard during the weekends. But as expected, it was almost impossible to get find a place to dine in as the queues were extremely long.And while I was still in a very ‘Taiwan’ mood, I spotted a 鹿港小镇 managed by Asian Kitchens which had NO QUEUE. 鹿港 is a little village on the west coast on Taiwan, and a up and coming brand name in China. I hear this has no relation to the ones at China.It has the try hard to be Asian look, red decorations with sepia tone village pictures as wallpaper. Quite a cosy environment. However, you can still clearly hear announcements if there is a road show or performance at the basement. Bad mistake in terms of design from Ion.The specialty is the Mee Sua 蚝仔面线 which cost $8.90+++ (!). Diluted, literally lukewarm, and small in portion, it’s a far cry from Ah Zong, and not comparable to the local Shilin, Xiao Ba Wang or Lai Lai.My friend had a small container of卤肉饭, generally tasty but also not piping hot or filling. Notice the size of the spoon when contrasted with the holder. I noticed the table next to us ordered some Lotus Leaf Glutinous Rice, and my first comment was “Wah, the portion is VERY BIG ah”. It was probably smaller than size of a handphone, and one could finish in two mouthfuls.The saving grace was the youtiao with pineapple, lightly fried with mayonnaise, but I probably could make this at home. I hear that the duck, though deliciously looking, was dry and could hurt those with dentures.Overall experience was OK. In the end, I was still hungry and had to buy buns from Provence downstairs to fill me up. I know the rental is expensive, but hopefully they can serve decent portions in future, not Happy Meal sizes.Other Related Entries
Ah Tai (Chinatown)
Lai Lai Family Restaurant (Bugis)
Xi Men Ding (Vivocity)
Yong He Eating House (Geylang)
Must Try Food in Taipei
2009-08-12 00:00:00
Deng Long Lu Wei 师大灯笼卤味 – Noodles with Everything Thrown In
One of the best ways to find out which is a stall worth visiting is from its queue. There are many stalls selling the same thing at 师大夜市Shi Da Night Market, but only one has a long queue. Super 超人气. The rest are just waiting for patrons.Shi Da Night Market is near the Taipei University, thus you will find this is a less visited and small (than Shilin and RaoHe) but a lot more vibrant and energetic. To get down here, take a train to 台电大楼站. There is quite a fair mix of yummilious street selection here, such 许记生煎包、烤玉米、碳烤雞排 and 阿鑫面线.You can’t miss 灯笼卤味. It has big red lanterns hanging, and a queue of people holding on to pink plastic baskets like those you wash vegetable with at home.First, grab a tong and basket aka how you would pick Yong Tau Hu. Then pick out food items that you enjoy. There is a least more than 50 picks, from the usual fish ball, tau pok, sausages, enoki mushroom to pig intestines, duck parts and some unidentified objects. The MUST PICK is a pack of 王子面 (Taiwan’s version of Mamee) for a salty carbo-load.Operated like a factory line, one auntie will count the items and get you to pay up, one auntie will chop the ingredients up, one auntie will dump the items into the 卤汁, and uncle will cook the mash of items. You better remember where your basket land up because nobody is going to keep watch for you. I identified mine only by the 2 sticks of Taiwan sausages.The items are cooked in 卤汁 and not just water, so items like tau pok will absorb the delicious sauce. After that, uncle will pour in a variety other special sauces and topped up with salted vegetable and spring onions. If you tapao, the uncle will pour it in one big plastic clear bag. Wah, so primitive, and certainly reminds you of Singapore’s Scissors Rice.You can eat in the air-conditioned eatery instead, but there is a minimum drink order of NT30 (That’s less than $1.50).What you pick is what you get, and the likely hood of you over ordering is quite high. That’s just too much. I had seen a group of friends share a massive plate with at least 15 ingredients! But tell you, it’s worth every bit of the wait. It revolutionizes the idea of “ugly-delicious food” because the mixture can look quite messy in plastic bag.师大灯笼卤味  – When Yong Tau Hu meets Kway Chap meets Lor Mee.Other Related Entries
Ah Zong Mian Xian (Taiwan) 
Pork Pepper Buns (Taiwan)
Hao Da Chicken Culet (Taiwan)
Dong Qu Fen Yuan (Taiwan)
Ice Monster (Taiwan)
2009-08-07 00:00:00
Pork Pepper Buns 福州世祖胡椒饼 – So Meaty and So Good
The usual suspects of the Taiwan Street Snack – Oyster Mee Sua, Fried Chicken, Tian Bu La, Taiwan Sausages… someone seemed to miss out Pork Pepper Buns!It’s the ONLY reason why I go to Raohe Street Night Market 饶河观光夜市. Not that there’s anything really bad with this street market. It just feels a little ‘oily’ to me.RaoHe, with an Owl mascot, is one of the oldest night market in Taipei and located near Songshan 松山Train Station. You can drop by if you have bought your clothes at Wu Fen Pu 五分埔, or take a cab from 101. This 600m long street has a penchant for northern Chinese noodle dishes and oily specialty snacks such as fried chicken and sausages. Along the sides are clothing, shoes, accessories and CD shops.Remember to go to the end of the street and spot a queue in front of 福州世祖胡椒饼. You can’t miss it. This is one of the most popular, if not, the most popular street stall in the Raohe Street Night Market.The secret of its success is the rich and juicy filling of its buns, made of fresh pork, marinated in a special sauce concocted using a secret recipe. The plentiful green onions and strong peppery taste is almost a perfect combination. The pepper buns, lightly sprinkled with sesame seeds on the crust, are crisp on the outside and piping hot in the inside.I used to just call it the ‘Pepper Buns’, but found out about the origins from it’s name which is福州世祖胡椒饼 Fu Zhou Shi Zu Pepper Buns. You may have eaten Fu Zhou fishballs and realised that it’s similar – big hot balls with moist meat filling. This particular stall added pepper to enhance it’s original taste, and also ‘Pepper’ 胡椒 in 闽南话 sounds like ‘Fu Zhou’ 福州.While queuing, tou can observe a line of workers, filling up the buns with huge portions, quickly doughing them to the round shapes. It’s then baked over charcoal to over 200 degrees, and best eaten fresh out of oven.You can probably see other imitations such as ×× 胡椒饼 around, but this is the real McCoy. Don’t miss it!Other Related Entries
Dong Qu Fen Yuan (Taiwan)
Hao Da Chicken Culet (Taiwan)
Ah Zong Mian Xian (Taiwan) 
Ice Monster (Taiwan)
Deng Long Lu Wei (Taiwan)</a
2009-08-06 00:00:00
Hao Da Chicken Cutlet 豪大大鸡排 – A XXL Big Piece of Chicken
It was THIS chicken that span the whole chain of Shilin XXL chicken chains around Singapore – which by the way, where are they now?Those who have eaten the Shilin-Singapore version would know that this is one big piece of chicken cutlet sprinkled with salty and spicy powder. The difference is the Taiwan version is not cut up and there are bones inside. So there’s where the Singapore version got it different and right.This stall is hardly to be missed when you are at 士林夜市, it’s the stall with a short queue facing the main road. (By the way, if you are taking the train over, please stop at Jian Tan 剑谭Station and not Shilin.) There are several branches around Taipei, so worry not if you don’t find this.More than 10 years of history. This chicken cutlet is extremely huge; flatten from a chunk of chicken breast meat. The bones are kept, so there is kind of an ‘authenticity’ there which does not make you feel you are eating some factory-made snack. Unlike some versions in Singapore, the chicken skin with light crumbs stick closely to the meat.Share this with a few friends. Because once you have this, you may not have appetite for other goodies at the night market. No doubt it’s tastier and juicier, but it’s too big for me to take. And I am glad the local version is really not too far off.Hao Da Chicken Cutlet 豪大大鸡排, Shilin Night Market 士林夜市, Taipei, TaiwanOther Related Entries
Ah Zong Mian Xian (Taiwan) 
Pork Pepper Buns (Taiwan)
Deng Long Lu Wei (Taiwan)
Dong Qu Fen Yuan (Taiwan)
Ice Monster (Taiwan)
2009-08-04 00:00:00
Ah Zong Mian Xian 阿宗麵線 – Best Mee Sua, No Seats
Imagine that it is about 39 degree Celsius out there.  You see a long line of people queuing up at a food stall. Each patron grabs a bowl of something and quickly dig their spoons in. As the hot air rises, the sweat trickles down.  You think that something must be very wrong with these people, or very good with what they are queuing for.This shop at popular Xi Meng Ding 西门町. No tables to place your food. No chairs for you to seat. (What? No chairs!) Just people hanging around this shop around – One hand holding a big bowl, the other slurping furiously. And for me, also wiping my sweat away. Only Ah Zong has this charm. I really can’t think of any other hot food that can make me stand in Summer.It’s almost crazy. Each time I go to Taipei, I eat Ah Zong at least 3 times.  没有夸张！Every time I eat Mian Xian in Singapore, there’s always something wrong – the soup is watery, the vermicelli clogs together, the pig intestines has a strange taste, or it just doesn’t have the oomph! 台湾人会说，好好吃喔！For Ah Zong, after you add the 3 sauces of vinegar, chili oil and garlic, it’s like something you never tried before with the fine blend the different spices. It’s so fragrant, and the intestines are soft yet chewy. Only best when it’s piping hot. And it’s cheap. Only 40NT for a small bowl, that’s less than $2.A friend who suspiciously think I was over-exaggerating is a convert now. And it’s almost as if the first place this friend to go after touching down is not the hotel, but Ah Zong. (Disclaimer lah: Mian Xian is really not everybody’s cup of tea, especially if you don’t eat 大肠.)While in the past, there was only one main store front, You can now find Ah Zong at Xi Men Ding 西门町(E-mei street across rows of sports shops), Zhong Xiao Fu Xing 忠孝复兴 (behind Sogo) and Shilin Market 士林夜市. I do like the branch at Zhong Xiao, at least I get to sit down on the bench to watch TV.Next time, I will go again during Winter, and I am very sure it will still taste as good as it ever did. So have you the so called Number 1 recommendation in Taipei?Ah Zong Mian Xian 阿宗麵線, No. 8~1 Emei St., Taipei (East XMD Pedestrian Area) 台北市峨嵋街8號之1, Tel: (02) 02-2388-8808, 2388-8182Other Related Entries
Dong Qu Fen Yuan (Taiwan)
Deng Long Lu Wei (Taiwan)
Pork Pepper Buns (Taiwan)
Hao Da Chicken Culet (Taiwan)Ice Monster (Taiwan)
2009-06-18 00:00:00
Relish – Is the Burger Worth $25 or More?
This was a celebration treat for my blog having 10,000 hits, so you know how back-dated this entry is. Better late than never, yes? And good friend Esther, who eats a lot more artas food than I do, had decided that Relish is one of her Top Ten must-try food list.When I first heard about the price about the burgers, my eyes were wide open like marbles, well, but not actually shocked because it came from Esther. “Gourmet burgers la! This is not your usual Macs or Burger King.”The Price
Say a usual fast-food Burger set meal is $6, here’s how Relish can justify a $25 price tag.
+ $2 – Carefully created by the famous lawyer-turned-chef Willin. Ah, the appeal of (ex) lawyers. A supposedly good-looking one as well. No wonder, harder to find. Lawyers don’t charge small fees you know?
+ $1 – A touching media story of a lawyer who gave up a lucrative career to pursue his dreams. We must support his dreams!
+ $1 – Plus, ex-lawyer always appears on TV as a guest judge, spokesperson for food programme. The chef is a celebrity!
+ $5 – Location is at Bukit Timah Cluny Court. Property very expensive you know.
+ $2 – Also means people who stay nearby include expatriates and rich tai-tais who send their pets to hair saloons (compared to my $10 quick haircut). Surely they can afford a gourmet burger for tea time snack.
+ $2 – A delightful unpretentious ambience with cheerful staff in orange tees. Always a happy place to chill out with good friends. 
+ $2 – Creative creations of ‘local’ delights such as Blue Cheese Beef Burger with Rucola, Poached Pear & Walnut Butter, the paper-thin omelet-wrapped Ram-Lee Burger, the Soft-Boned Char-Siew Pork Open Foccacia Burger & the Curry Chicken Burger.
+ $4 – REAL burger patties made from the chuck, shin, rib-eye, these are not rubbish parts okay?I ordered a pork burger simply because I wanted to be reminded of those delicious home-made ones my Ah Ma would prepare for me during my childhood days because we couldn’t afford fastfood. I would have liked the patty to be full of juicy goodness, and bread soft and fluffy. Though the burger wasn’t exactly what I imagined it to be, it was worthwhile to try something different when we were already accustomed to ‘cheap-tasting’ burgers elsewhere.The Verdict
We had a really enjoyable time, and that made it one of my more memorable meals. While some customers may complain about the hefty price, Relish really is about the very cosy ambience and not the usual mass-manufactured tasting burgers to make you feel special and right at home. Worth the $25? Let you think about it.Relish, 501 Bukit Timah Road #02-01 Cluny Court Tel:+65 6763 1547
Opening Hours: Mon–Fri: 12pm–3pm, 6.30pm–11pm; Sat–Sun: 10.30am–11pmOther Related Entries
Willin Low and His Favourite Hokkien Mee
Burger, Bench & Bar (Orchard Cineleisure)
Most Original Burger MOB (Vivocity)
Everything With Fries (Orchard Central)
Burger Shack (Bt Timah)
2009-06-10 00:00:00
Food Tasting at Marina Mandarin
Have been MIA for the last week due to a Conference I was organising. It all went well, many thanks to a great team I had and Marina Mandarin for being such hospitable and accommodating hosts. Mandarin has been known for its service and food – made known by the famous chicken rice and ladies in red traditional costume, and it is the only member of the Leading Hotels of the World in Singapore.So when my company’s organising team had to go for food tasting earlier last month, we had certain expectations in mind.The Appetizer 
We had the choice of a Fillet of Goatfish with Shaved Funnel and Baby Garden Greens, or Poached Supreme Breast of Chicken with Seared Peach Salad and Raspberry Dressing.Just a side note: I feel that the longer the menu and the more detailed the food item name, the more appetizing it sounds to the diner. Contrast say ‘Potato Salad’, with “German Potato Salad with Crisp Fragrant Bacon and Smooth Sour Cream Dressing”. It is probably the same thing. Yes?A rather busy dish to start the meal. The group was first figuring out what the red round cup was. It was a creative holder carved from a watermelon with salad and balsamic dressing. Rather fusion in taste, but the sweetness of the fruit with the vinegarish dressing didn’t work for me. The ‘critics’ on the table weren’t too friendly about the dry block of goatfish. It being a starter, some moisture or a wetter sauce would have helped.The Main Course 
There was a choice of a Pan-Seared Supreme of Chicken with Baked US Potatoes, Grilled Asaparagus, Tomato & Olive Compote and Sage Glazed OR Slow-Baked John Dory Fillet with Basil Mashed Potatoes, Garden Greens, Caper & Onion Salsa and Thyme Gazed.I appreciated that the carbs were almost well hidden in a decorative form behind or below the meat. Therefore, what seems to be a light dish could be rather heavy. Every dish is not only food, but an artwork as well. Some items chosen were probably there to increase the vibrancy of colour and taste of the dish. Though some design teachers will say, stick to 3 colours. For this crowded dish, less is more.The Desserts
Obvious favourites in the house, especially the Millefeuille of Chococolate with Forest Berries and Nougat Ice Cream. I liked that there are crunches of nougats sprinkled on top of the light ice cream in a little cup. The Hazelnut Parfait with Mocha Marble Sauce and Chocolate Chip Ice Cream was rather delightful as well.The Verdict
In the end, we requested the chefs to make modifications to certain dishes, and they did accordingly. During the Conference, the guests were very satisfied and 98% of respondents surveyed rated the food & beverage “Good” and above. Marina Mandarin instead scores in terms of its exceptional service. And I jokingly said that I would recommend friends here if they intend to have a wedding reception. Special thanks to Sheryl and the Banquet Managers for a wonderful job!
2009-05-19 00:00:00
Sin Kee Famous Chicken Rice – From the Good Old Margaret Drive
Margaret Drive is one of those areas that such a rustic charm that it may hit the history books soon. You may not believe that just not too long ago, it was like a little town with its own cinema, bowling alley, community library, polyclinic, supermarket and emporiums. Vibrant and Alive. There used to be so many good food stalls here, but slowly gave way as the population here starts to age and the place gradually forgotten.Now, what you see is peeling paint from buildings, a car sales house and the famous church. The thing is, people still come down in droves to eat the famous Sin Kin Chicken Rice here. Ah, the power of food. And my fear is that this hawker will be here today, gone tomorrow.The Stall 
Perhaps only regulars would really know how to find this place, but it shouldn’t be too difficult as it is on the 2nd floor of the Margaret Drive Hawker Centre (or Commonwealth Ave Food Centre). There are two sides of the 2nd floor, one side with a stall just featured on TV, selling Hot and Sour Soup and Pan-Fried Dumplings, and the other side almost just dedicated to the Chicken Rice stall. Other stalls worth mentioning is claypot rice, fruit juice, popiah skin stalls.There’s usally a line of queue, but you do not have to wait too long for your chicken rice.During my last visit there, I recognized the helper auntie who also part-times at Zion Road Hawker Centre. I said “Hello” to her, and she quickly urged me to get the half a chicken set as it is more value-for-money for two person rather than getting an individual set. She smiled.The Chicken Rice 
The one thing that draws me is neither the rice, nor chicken but the sauces. In my usual routine, I will pour the dark thick soya sauce over the chicken breast meat, mixed with a little of the smooth mélange of garlic paste, and with that spicy chili sauce on side, it will send thrills of flavours down your spine.The chicken is juicy and tender enough, evenly cut and placed on top of a layer of cucumber soaked in salty chicken oil. Though it’s not as memorable as the other usual suspects – Tian Tian and Five Star. The rice can be more fragrant and flavourful, and my resolution was to pour this oil over the rice. And I have another complain – where’s the soup? No soup?Sin Kee Chicken Rice has moved to 159 Mei Chin Road, #02-22 Singapore Tel: +65 6473 9525
Opening Hours: 11:30am – 8pm (Closed Mon)Other Related Entries
Tian Tian vs Ah Tai Chicken Rice (Maxwell Hawker)
瓦 Wǎ  (Cineleisure)
Loy Kee Chicken Rice (Balestier)
Beach Road Scissor Cut Curry Rice (Jalan Besar)
2009-05-05 00:00:00
Cookie Museum – $38 Cookies, $22 Cakes
Formally known as the V Tea Room, this room is one which I would automatically skip as I get to Esplanade via the Marina entrance. Strange, it’s as if the shop is on my blind-spot, and especially when I go to Max Brenner’s occasionally.Perhaps such class and grandeur was never meant for me. The Victorian style décor, screaming with Baroque furniture, and big gold plated chairs specially chosen and brought over by the owner from Italy. There are very friendly service staffs pushing sample-sized cookies in trolley for your sampling, and very willing to answer any queries you have. And it doesn’t come across being prententious.I asked this question straightforwardly, “Who’s your target customers?”
”Oh, that’s a very smart question……”
“I mean, I think mainly tai-tais will come here right?”
”Yes…. And no. There are foreigners, businessmen who like to have a cup of tea here.
The CEO of Esplanade just had a meeting here, right at that very seat.”
“Ok… I get the point.”The Cookies
Their signature cookies are the local delights, such as the hae bee hiam, nasi lemak, chicken rice and ikan bilis cookies etc, priced at a hefty $35 a tin. The staff explained that these were a very popular choice among the tourists, endorsed by the Singapore Tourism Board as one of Singapore best souvenir gifts.I was initially skeptical of a salty and spicy cookie, but didn’t find the taste that bad after all. You could taste traces of spices and fillings here and there, fragrantly baked with a light crisp, but savory cookies may not be everybody’s cup of tea.I first got to know about their cookies as a birthday gift from a friend – a tin of Cran Mango cookies. The cookies are tastefully baked with cashew nuts, with light bits of cranberry and mango that makes it just pleasantly sweet. With a fluff and crumply texture, it’s not like the usual Famous Amos cookies that people may be more used to. I won’t say that I am a convert, but I now appreciate my friend a lot better. It’s close to $40 a tin, mind you!But my friend can consider it money well spent as it is ‘limited edition’ – meaning they only produce 100 tins ever, each beautifully packed with an elegant design.The Experience
If you are in a chi chi tai tai mood, and want to indulge yourself in simple pleasures, you can consider some of the premium cakes such as Liqueur Wild BlueBerry, Honey Mango and Creamy Durian along with a aromatic cup of tea.It would be an absolute-fabulous-delight to just sit on a thickly-padded-wonderfully designed chairs, looking at the gold-carved mirrors with ever-zealous staff explaining every wonders of a simple cookies.The Verdict
I can see why the Cookie Museum works for some; it does have a unique class on its own. As for me, I am still the usual kopitiam and teh-c kind of person for my tea time snack.Cookie Museum, 8 Raffles Avenue #01-02/04 Esplanade Mall Tel:+65 6333 1965
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 12.30am – 10.30pm : Fri–Sat: 1pm – 11.30pmOther Related Entries
3 Inch Sin (Bt Timah)
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
The Cheescake Café (East Coast)
Hairloom & Caramel (Shaw Towers)
2009-04-28 00:00:00
Udders – Don’t Get Drunk On Ice Cream
David from Udders has done what I have always dreamed about – to own a little ice cream parlour serving happy people, with home-made flavours you can only think of, matched with a little blackboard for the classroom atmosphere.It is a huge career switch, from English teacher to ice-cream maker, but the risk taken has paid of. As David shared with me, “You only live once, why not do something you enjoy?” As he said it, he was humorously digging at his own weight, a result of his diet of ice cream since his childhood days till his constant experimentation now.In a way, I am a little envious of his success, yet happy because he seems to be a sincere and humble person from the last interview I had with him. I first got to know about Udders from Anna’s Omy Blog, though it wasn’t the ice cream that first caught my attention, but the blackboard. (Hey, I really did think about that idea. All right, it’s probably every teacher’s idea. Haha.)The Blackboard
Scribbled with many possible ice cream flavours you can think of, and I saw a few possible and likely-delicious ones like Ribena-Yogult, Milo-Dinosaur and Mojito. The very thought of it excites me. These are written by customers and the top voted flavour will get its chance to be R&Ded into the next possible sold flavour. I also saw some like Hokkien Mee and Ban Mian, but never say never if you have seen ice cream in Japan and Taiwan. Udders has just successful created a Choya ice cream. Ah…The Udder
An udder is the mammary organ of female cattle and some other mammals, including goats and sheep. And as David the “Chief Milkman” and Yan Li the store manager proclaims, the ice cream here is fresh as though it’s squeezed out right from the cow. Indeed, there is a milky dense taste with a smooth smooth texture, just suitably delicious for me.The Liqueur Flavours 
Well, Udders isn’t the first kid in the block with Asian and local inspired flavours, but it’s the alcoholic ones which probably attracted a lot of the working class and young adults to flock down in groups. As advised by the smiley counter staff, having 3 scoops of the alcoholic ones (Rum Rum Raisin, Bailey’s & Bourbon, Orange Choc Bitters, Amaretto Black etc) has alcoholic content equivalent to drinking one can of beer. Real-stuff, cannot bluff.The Verdict
During my interview with David, he kept emphasizing on the importance of catering to the needs of the customers. I think that’s probably the whole basis on this shop’s concept, to do things that people want. With another branch coming up next, the ice cream parlour full of life and heart is set to do bigger things. Great alcoholic ones, and yes, don’t get drunk on ice cream!U.d.d.e.r.s Ice Cream, 155 Thomson Road Goldhill Shopping Centre, Tel: +65 6254 6629
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 12noon – 11pm; Fri, Sat & Eve of PH: 12noon – 12amOther Related Entries
The Daily Scoop (Chip Bee Gardens)
Island Creamery (Serene Centre)
Ice Cream Chefs (East Coast)
Little Ice Cream Kafe LICK (Tanjong Katong)
Cold Stone Creamery (Orchard Central)
2009-04-22 00:00:00
A, B, C, D – Do People Really Care?
In a nation quite obsessed with grades, where ABCD mean a difference to self-worth and future to stressful students (and even more stressful parents) and whether you get that 1-3 months of PB for working adults. Other than hospital outlets which possibly had a red alert sign now, do the rest really care?The Unconcerned 
Consumers polled by a certain radio station were not concerned about the hygiene ratings for hawker stalls. A mini-poll among my friends reflected the same. Most said honestly that they did not pay attention to the grade that was displayed. Some hawkers don’t even display them prominently.  Grade A or not, one thing for sure, they are not eating Indian Rojak for some time. For some time, I emphasize.The Unmerited 
Would getting a Grade A really mean anything? I for once had found plastic sheets in my tempura crabstick at a famous ‘Grade A’ Japanese food chain, and surely you hear stories of unidentified ‘stuff’ found in food. It’s like bad students do exist in Raffles Schools (okay, bad analogy). Do consumers really kick up a racket, go to NEA etc (or do we even know where to go to) when we think there are hygiene problems?The ‘What’s Wrong With Dirty Food’
Some of the older generation have the ‘la sup jia, la sup tua’ (eat dirty to grow up) mentality. I  love to clear my fridge of expired food items, but my parents would even go to the extent of picking the food back from the waste bin and chide me for ‘wastage’. Leftover food? Can probably last for days on my dinner table.An older friend of mine even said that he would go to the extent of scouting for Grade D stalls, only because they are likely to taste better. He’s apparently not the only one who thinks this way.The ‘I Am My Own Judge’
Some would say that stalls may get demoted because of their peers but their level of hygiene is still acceptable. Fair enough. At the end of the day, consumers may make their own judgment at the stall helpers, kitchen and surrounding area.  All except the grade.As a food reviewer/blogger, I guess what we can do is to shoot pictures and for readers to make their own judgment call.I have been to several Grade A stalls for meals this week. While they did not give me a bad diarrhea, they gave bad service, bad attitude and baaaaad food.  Hygiene and taste – I do sense that this has really went down in recent years (ironically), and I really hope somebody does something about it.
2009-04-06 00:00:00
Pitstop Café – That Homely Feelin’
Talk about Boardgame cafes and you should be more familiar with Minds Café or Settlers Café, both considered to be ‘big brothers’ in the board game community.Pitstop Café, while considered fresh to many others, is not exactly a new kid in the block. In fact, they have diversified and even opened a branch in Malaysia last year. Started 4 years ago by very young local entrepreneurs, they breathe a gush of fresh air into what can be considered ‘boring’ board games.The Ambiance
Entering this little shop on the 3rd level at Circular Road (near Raffles City MRT station), you will be amazed at the number of photos there are on the wall. In fact, the walls contain almost nothing but photos and the menu. It once started as a small ‘graffiti’ corner for patrons to leave their photos as mementoes, and now it’s a testament on how popular this café is with big groups of people.With multi-coloured furniture and youthful helpers, you just can’t help feeling bright and cheery once again as you step in. In fact, this place felt a little like home – with friends sitting around, chatting, laughing their heads off at another silly mistake made on the board.The Food
While Pitstop has its staples of New Zealand’s Natural, Gourmet Coffee and usual bite snacks of nuggets and fries, a forte here has to be Mum’s Special. The chef is the mother of one of the owners (affectionally known as ‘Auntie’ to everyone there), and dishes she prepare like Paper-Wrapped Chicken, Sambal Chicken and Fish & Chips has the healthy yet flavoursome goodness of what your own mother will prepare.The Service 
If you get the chance to speak with one of the four bosses Astroboy, Eve, Tim or Mumu, they may just give you the best advice on how to play and win in a board game, and you have more than 200 of them to choose from. They are sometimes serious, yet sometimes cranky. They feel like… a friend you always had?The Verdict
Pitstop’s main disadvantage is at its hidden location. But if you crave for somewhere to chill out with friends and reminisce the good old days, this is the café to feel right at home.14B Circular Road Tel:+65 6535 5383
Opening Hours: Mon–Thu: 2pm – 11pm; Fri–Sat: 12pm – 3am; Sun: 12pm – 11pmOther Related Entries
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Egg3 Café (Mountbatten)
Charlie Brown Café (Somerset)
Joan Bowen Café (Macpherson)
White Dog Café (Vivocity)
2009-03-12 00:00:00
Chin Mee Chin – A Walk Down Memory Lane
When you talk about coffee and toast in Singapore, the names of “Killiney” and “Yakun” has almost become synonymous with the local breakfast culture. Of course after the franchising, they are now considered a lot more contemporary and commercialised. Then you know there is something missing…For a taste of the old-styled coffee shops where you can step back into the memory lanes, the residents of Katong should be more familiar with Chin Mee Chin Confectionery, otherwise known as CMC.The Hainanese coffeeshop along East Coast Road, presently owned by Mr. Tang See Fang, was founded by the owner’s father in 1925. There is a certain nostalgic charm in this little shop, with mosaic blue/white tiles, marble top tables, a mixture of wooden chairs and ceiling fans.The Food 
Other than kaya toast, this confectionary offers pastries like custard puffs, curry puffs, swiss rolls and fruit cakes, lined up in aluminum trays within old-looking metal shelves. People go for the hot piping tarts when they come out straight from the kitchen at the back, filling up the signature white boxes with delights for the family.My favourite is the French Toast with the thick slab of butter and sweet aromatic kaya hand-made in traditional style. The Custard Puffs, served in little plastic dishes, are also a draw with the dark yellow custard, lightly prepared and not too sweet to the tooth.The Ambience 
The smell of kaya, butter and coffee is prominent and in the air, and this isn’t a quiet place. The waitresses may nag at you to stay at a straight queue, and aunties at the back kitchen rattle on as they prepare the daily fix. I can never understand the queue system here (You pay before you get a table), and the shop being very crowded doesn’t really help. But the familiar residents of Katong seem to know how this coffeeshop system of ordering, serving and paying works, and blends in smoothly with the rustle-bustle.The Verdict 
Having a meal here can be a history lesson on its own for the young children, though I highly suspect they will much prefer chilling up at Starbucks and CoffeeBean. When I brought my friends here, they all thought they were tourists in their own country. So how well are you familiar with the rich and fading coffeeshop culture?Chin Mee Chin Confectionary, 240 East Coast Road, Singapore
Opening Hours: Tue–Sun: 8am – 4.30pm (Closed on Mondays)Other Related Entries
Sun Coffee Planet (Killiney)
OldTown White Coffee (Bt Timah)
Tom N Toms Coffee (ICON Village)
Trung Nguyen Coffee (Vietnam) 
40 Hands (Tiong Bahru)
2009-03-03 00:00:00
Curry Favor – Curry Buffet Anyone?
Curry Favor at Novena Square offers a unique curry buffet at $22.80. And you don’t have to worry you only get to eat katsu with 5 different curry sauces, because you do get a good mix of starters like tempura, karaage, croquette, agedashi tofu and unagi.Buffets are common, but a Curry Buffet, and Japanese for that fact does sound a little …. I don’t know… peculiar?A little information about Japanese curry: Though curry has its origins from India, the Europeans first introduced it to Japan in late 19th century during the Meiji Era (1869-1913) as a form of western food. Since then, Japanese curry has taken a form of its own and it is distinctly different from its origins. It is not as spicy and usually contains a tinge of sweetness not found in other forms of curry.And since there is no coconut milk in Japanese curry, it is also seemingly healthier and easier on the stomach compared to other curries.Curry Favor is the first Japanese Curry specialty restaurant in Singapore. But this branch at Novena is very different from the first store at Stamford House. While the main branch at Stamford had a more classic and rustic charm, this branch spells contemporary and clean-cut with the use of basic black and red. I wonder why the distinct differentiation in look and branding.General feedback I receive from patrons is that the Novena Branch pales slightly in comparison. Sometimes, it could be because it’s a branch and the whole ambience played a part.Well, according to Curry Favor, their curries are “carefully created by our Japanese chef in a process that spans more than 5 hours daily. Our signature curry sauce is the essence of our intense research effort, using only fresh vegetables to bring out the spectrum of flavors from carefully selected curry spices”.I have tasted better Japanese curries, but generally do agree that there is a certain standard in the taste and texture of their curries. Some can be a little too thin or sweet. And I went to one other store where my shirt smelt of curry after walking out.I have been to Hungrygowhere and noticed that their management team has left a note after a comment. Good work for being responsive. And if you happen to be reading this on my humble blog, I would like my curry to be warmer and appreciate if curries can be refilled. But I know the answer’s a “No”.While I have no major complains against Curry Favor, one wishes for more variety here. The very fact that it specialises may be a double-edged sword.238 Thomson Road #03-26/27 Velocity @ Novena Square Tel:+65 6255 2395
2009-02-27 00:00:00
Fortune Cuisine 八味坊 – Steamboat + BBQ + Japanese Food
The truth is, I haven’t got the chance to foray much to Sunset Way, other when I have ice cream cravings for Daily Scoop. Located at the far side of Clementi, this area does have its rustic charm, bringing a range of eateries from a Japanese restaurant, Thai restaurant, Pizza place, Hong Kong cafe to a seafood restaurant.This meal at Fortune Cuisine is a birthday treat from my ex-colleagues, and there’s got to be some good reason they brought me here.The steamboat business in Singapore is definitely booming, with many fighting a piece of the pie at Bugis and Geylang. They all taste similar (or worse), don’t they? Fortune’s just opened for a year plus, and this new kid of the block aims to bring something different to the platter.The Ambience
There is a choice of an indoor or outdoor seating area. Obviously, the outdoor area is a lot warmer. And the indoor patrons get their food stuff barbequed by the staff. But you may just want to indulge in the atmosphere and grilling your meat outside on charcoal.Well, even though it’s a self service buffet, it isn’t much the typical I-must-go-grab-that-last-plate-of prawn situation. Civil-mindedness is the way to go.The Food
Buffet dinner during weekends is priced at $23.80++. You can start off your meal with some light Japanese food the likes of sushi, sashimi and fried tempura. My personal favourite is the shishamo which is always freshly fried at the tempura corner.You choose two out of the four choices of soup available: chicken, tom yum, seafood and spicy, with tom yum being the most popular choice.The unique feature is the charcoal pot located at the side of the table instead of the usual Korean-style hotplate. While barbequing the satays and clayfish can be painstakingly slow, the fragrance and flavour is there. Make sure you have self-sacrificing cooking friends like mine.The Service
Eating here feels like eating at home and this is a major plus point. The auntie who came to fulfill our soup kept the dinner alive with her constant chatting, urging us to try this-and-that. There is another serving staff (whom my friend affectionally call “Xiao Pang”) who entertained us with cold jokes (leng xiao hua) like “Beware of the COLD soup!” (Huh?) But we appreciate his candidness.The owner Desmond was a shy but friendly person, being very pleased that his restaurant is always fully packed during weekends. “I will make sure my customers get a value meal that they can enjoy.”Fortune Cuisine, Blk 106 Clementi St 12 (Sunset Way) #01-38A/B Tel:+65 6777 8622
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 2.30pm, 5.30pm – 10.30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Imperial Treasure Steamboat Restaurant (TripleOne Somerset)
Chong Qing Hot Pot (Suntec)
Sho Teppan (Ion Orchard)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
2009-02-05 00:00:00
Royal China – Tiffany Blue Dim Sum Restaurant
When asked where the best dim sum place in Singapore is, my ex-colleague Laura immediately said “Royal China”.I must confess I haven’t heard of this place before this, and quietly imagined it to be a push-trolley noisy and boisterous restaurant along the likes of Red Star and Yum Cha. I heart that type of dim sum restaurant charm, full of zip with Cantonese sprouting aunties. Nevermind the bad service.When we were told to meet at Raffles Hotel, that signaled it was more than meets the eye. And little did we know that this dim sum place hailed from all the way from London, not even China or Hong Kong.Entering Royal China, you would immediately notice the Tiffany Turquoise Blue walls along with white furnishing Such class and elegance. Furniture was tastefully with an east-meets-European flavourThe Food
Before I get criticized for recommending such an ‘artas’ place in light of the economic downturn, the prices are surprisingly reasonable.The dim sum such as Steamed Prawn Dumpling, Glutinous Rice in Lotus Leaf, Baked Dubk Meat Roll in Portugeese Sauce and Steamed Cod Fish Roll with Golden Mushroom & Seaweed and Scallops Cheung Fun cost $4.80 each portion. (Compare this to those priced at a particular food court which is about the same.)I have rated the Har Kou as my top ten food last year. Just three succulent fresh prawns wrapped in thin skin. No lousy flour or meat fillings, but pure goodness which melts in your mouth. And that’s four in a basket.Other than the Cheung Fun which was tasted ordinary (thick skin and all), the rest of the food was consistently refreshing and fresh, served Western style.Special mention was this Peking-like duck dish, which had crispy duck fillings wrapped in thick sweet sauce.And did I say most of the soup are ‘thick-fully’ tasty? Indeed a royal treat without the royal price.Royal China at Raffles, 1 Beach Road, #03-09 Raffles Hotel, Singapore, Tel: +65 6338 3363
Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 12pm – 3pm; Sun & PH: 11am – 3pm; Mon–Sun: 6pm – 10.30pmOther Related Entries
Yan Ting (St Regis)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
2009-01-14 00:00:00
CNY Almond Cookies Recipe
What’s Chinese New Year without some baking of cookies? (I wonder where I found the time. Haha.) Sorry, I couldn’t make for all the OMY readers, but here’s a simple recipe you can try at home.Ingredients
1 egg + 1 egg yolk
6 oz castor sugar / icing sugar
7 oz butter
4 oz hoon kweh
10 oz plain flour
0.5 tsp baking powder
0.5 tsp vanilla essence
4 oz ground almond (optional)Method
Beat butter and sugar till light, then add in egg. Beat till combined.
Add in flour, essence and let dough stand in the fridge for half an hour at least.
Cut out cookies using cookie press.
Glaze with beaten egg if desired. Decorate with almond flakes and cherries.
Bake for 9-10 mins in 180C / 350F oven.And there you have it…. Happy Chinese New Year!Other Related Entries
Steamed Mandarin Orange Cake Recipe
2009-01-12 00:00:00
Pen Cai 盆菜 – A Basin of Goodies
It is only in recent years that 盆菜 Pen Cai has become a ‘staple’ during the Chinese New Year period in Singapore. And it wasn’t even a traditional CNY dish to begin with!It was said that Pen Cai (Poon Choi) was invented when Mongol troops invaded Song China. To feed the fleeing Emperor who escaped to Guangdong, the locals collected all their best food available. After cooking it, they put it in wooden washing basins as there wasn’t a bowl big enough for the army, coiling the term ‘pen cai’ (vegetables in a basin).Most would attribute the popularity of the dish to the Hakkas, who contributed root vegetables like yam and tapioca to the dish.As to what are the actual ingredients that go into it, there are really no hard and fast rules. Almost anything goes! The Cantonese are known to serve the basin with expensive seafood like abalone, scallops, dried oysters, mushrooms, duck, chicken meat and ham. Other versions could include ginseng, dried eel, fish maw, prawns and beancurd.The main difficulty is not in cooking, but presenting. Every ingredient has to be layered and stacked up properly. Chicken and duck meat are usually placed on the top, implying that birds return to the nests. Though those who know would reach for the bottom where the gravy trickles over the ingredients.Pen Cai is associated to events that unites the entire community. It is a symbol of cohesion, such that everybody who eats from the common pot are equals, therefore making it a popular dish during the New Year.And the best thing is, you can eat it over a few days. Sometimes the more you simmer it, the tastier it becomes as the different ingredients blend together absorbing the rich flavours.Chinese restaurants such as Crystal Jade, Wan Hao, Min Jiang, Lingzhi Vegetarian Restaurant and Zi Ran Seafood Restaurant serve reasonably good Pen Cai with a rough estimate of the price ranging between $200 and $300.Tell me which is your favourite!
2008-12-30 00:00:00
Carousel – Buffet for New Year’s Day
Think of the word ‘Carousel’, and you would imagine amusement parks and Merry Go Round with little ponies. This unique dining place at Royal Plaza on Scotts may not have the kind of childhood entertainment you are looking for, but the ambience sure is very uplifting.This buffet meal I had was a Christmas-New Year treat from my ‘students’, and you may just like to consider coming here to welcome 2009. Lunch is priced at a rather affordable rate of $37.00 ($39.00 for weekends) and $47.00 ($56.00 for weekends). Check for the separate credit card promotions as well.Carousel exudes an aura of excitement and delight, as you walk in to rows of macaroons, tiramisus, fruits tarts and mousey cakes. The dining sections are divided into four areas: and The Living Room, The State Rooms, The Verandah and The Terrace, with the buffet spread right smack in the centre so that you are not too far off from the adventure.Oh, there’s even a clown jester (who looked kind of bored) taking care of children in a playroom.Most people would be enticed by the colourful spread of seafood, sushi and sashimi. Other than the Japanese fare, the spread is made up of Mediterranean, Asian, French Rotisserie and a rather impressive dessert station. Plus the food’s Halal too.So your typical buffet plate can be filled with California Makis, Peruvian Scallops, Snow Crabs, Boiled Slipped Lobster, to Roasted Duck Meat, Beef A La Bourguignon, Baked Wild Rice, to Hainanese Chicken Rice Balls, Thai Red Curry, Dim Sum to Prawn Noodles. Now, that’s really a huge spread.Though there was not a single dish that left a great impression, most of the food was consistently fresh with above-average quality. Be selective in your food selection, because you are just not going to finish every single thing there.No buffet is complete without a sweet ending. The desserts are generally light and not too sweet, with many selection coming in delicate cups. My favourites were the Black Forest Gateaux and Jasmine Chocolate Gateaux, with a mixture of tastes that could slowly trickle down your throat.If it’s your friend’s birthday, the crew would surprise the birthday boy/girl with their Can’t Take My Eyes Off You version of a birthday song. Though it was a little out-of-tune, it’s a packet full of cheers. (Thank you Tim, Wai Leng, Cindy, Elaine, Edwin and Siew Nah for the treat!)Here’s a candid shot!Easily one of the better buffets around at Orchard Road. Come on for a merry-good-time.Carousel, 25 Scotts Road GF Royal Plaza on Scotts Tel:+65 6589 7799
Opening Hours: 6.30am–10.30am, 12pm–2pm, 3.30pm–5.30pm, 6.30pm–10.30pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
Royal China (Raffles Hotel)
Zhou Kitchen (Far East Square)
2008-12-19 00:00:00
Looking Back 2008 – What’s Not Hot?
Not x 3 – Taiwanese Fried Chicken 
The deep fried chicken which hailed from the famous Taiwan Shilin Market, sprinkled with spices, salt (or plum powder), has ceased operations at several places. Prices have went up and the chicken has been drier and smaller. Stop cutting that small piece off my original chicken. Hao Da at Taipei is consistently big and crispy, and that’s the way we like it.Not x 2 – Mega Burgers 
If one’s not enough, make it two. No, four! But that’s not the point. The health conscious Singaporeans can’t wait to hit the gyms and here there is a 1000 calories burger with 4 dry patties. Army boys on their book out days may want to sink into one of them, but lets keep away from saturated fat and sodium.Not x 1 – Donuts 
Despite having hundreds of calories, many teaspoons of sugar and trans fat in a single ring, the glazed donut has become the Singapore’s latest addition to the long list of food fads. Getting a box of Donut Factory was the pride of those who waited hours at Raffles City, but with the entry of J.Co and Munchy, the queues are long gone with the wind. You can’t eat them for breakfast, lunch and dinner, so what’s the fun? Even Donut King Krispy Kreme ended its operation its Hong Kong.
2008-12-15 00:00:00
Looking Back 2008 – What’s Hot? What’s Not?
Looking back 2008, it’s interesting to see how many some food has managed to reinvent itself to be the next HOT item. We have seen the likes of bubble tea, coffee buns, and egg tarts come and go. So which are some of the food that left an impact this year?Hot x 3 – Steamboat 
It’s a combination of the influx of foreign friends, and the increase in popularity of value-for-money buffets, steamboats of every kind have raided the streets of Bugis and Geylang. Most do not have consistent quality, and despite the country being very hot and humid, crowds have been forming at every such restaurant. 7th Storey may be demolished, but their steamboat remains strong.Hot x 3 – Buffets
It could be the popular TV programme, it could be that Singapore’s quest of value-for-money-meals never stopped. Buffets, Buffets, Buffets. Just one can shoot you up the weighing scale, but the numerous variety and seemingly ‘luxurious’ food at afforable price seems to good to be missed. Triple 3, The Line, Melt, Straits Cafe and Olive Tree offer some of the favourites amongst hotels.Hot x 2 – Japanese Pizzas and Pasta 
It’s ironic that while there is still some debate on whether the pasta comes from China or Italy, the Japanese versions have quietly penetrated the country. Pasta De Waraku and Shokudo with their creative menu, colourful décor and reasonable prices have managed to attract many youths to try a lighter version of this Italian favourite. Thin crust pizzas with tekayaki chicken, and cabonaras with shitake, fusion food has never tasted hippier.Hot x 1
The ice cream flavours available here never tasted this exciting. We are not as adventurous as compared with the Japanese. But from Tiger Sorbet (Island Creamery), Utterly Avocado (That’s gula Melaka with avocado), Chilli Choc, Wasabi Mango (at Daily Scoop), DIY ice cream (Ice Cream Chefs), MaoShan Durian and Cempedak (Udders), it’s enough to spice up our lives. Being cool and different is hot!So what is your HOT food of 2008?(What’s Not in next entry…)
2008-12-12 00:00:00
IVINS Peranakan Restaurant – Chor Chor May Not Want To Wait
The endless cooking on Little Nyonya made me crave so much for authentic Peranakan cuisine. And many good friends have recommended Ivins, renowned for its ‘home-cooked’ Peranakan specialties.Their story began with the owners’ dream to present affordable quality Peranakan cuisine to one and all, and the couple first started their first eatery at Ladyhill Hotel and subsequently Far East Plaza. Backed with a strong customer following, Ivins has now expanded to two restaurants – at Bukit Timah and Upper Thomson.The Ambience
Though I wasn’t amazed at the long queue of customers; I was more surprised with the lack of system and waited quite a fair bit because the cashier came over to attend to us.It’s a waiting game. Although I was first in line, I waited about 15 minutes for our table, and another 20 plus minutes for the food. And they came only after my friend reminded the rather impatient looking waitress that those behind us have got their dishes. (Minus Points.)The restaurant was probably family-oriented and therefore décor was minimalist, with discolored frame photos, dirty green ‘carpeted’ floor and a smell of curry in the air. Serving staff wore baggy clothes which reminded of some eatery at Batam.The Food
Prices are rather affordable and the smaller portions would benefit big families or friends who would like to share food. Some of the signature dishes are Ayam Buah Keluak ($5.90), Assam Pork Rib ($4.90), Curry Fish Head ($13.20), Udang Sambal ($5.00), Papaya Titek ($4.50) and Itek Sioh ($5.50).Of the 5 items I order, they didn’t have Beef Rendang, Otak Otak Pangang and Buboh Cha Cha. (Minus more points!)The saver for the meal was surprisingly a Penang Char Kuay Teow ($4.20), broad rice noodles stirred fried with fresh seafood. The overall texture wasn’t too dry or moist, unlike most other versions which could be too soggy.The Ayam Curry ($4.90) though rather spicy had thick gravy to my liking. The chicken unfortunately was dry and bony which made the eating experience rather inconvenient. (Chor Chor won’t be happy because older people would like tender chicken.)For a change, I tried a Bakwan Kepeting which had bamboo shoots and crabmeat stuffed in minced pork. The balls didn’t have the overwhelming porky taste, and the clear stock could be refreshing after eating the other spicy dishes.You may want to give the Nonya Chap Chye a miss and the dish just further reminded me how good my Ah Ma’s version was. The vegetable wasn’t simmered long enough, and had a strange faint sweet taste with pale tau kee.The Verdict 
The restaurant is probably more known for its affordability more than its taste. After all, Peranakan food is very rare here. (Daughter in laws should be reminded not to bring Chor Chor here, unless she’s in a very good mood.)IVINS Peranakan Restaurant, 2/4 Jalan Leban Tel:+65 6451 4622
Opening Hours: 11am – 3pm, 5pm – 9pm; Closed ThursdaysOther Related Entries
Jason’s Penang Cuisine (ABC Market)
Penang Road Cafe (Novena)
Chinta Manis
2008-12-08 00:00:00
Where To Find Nonya Food?
With the telecast of Little Nonya 小娘惹 on TV (let’s not go into the acting….), it will certainly cause an increased interest in Peranakan food around Sinapore. This cuisine is a mixture of both Chinese and Malay influences and certainly known to be most eclectic, a blend of spicy, tangy, herbal and sweet dishes.The fact is I seldom try Peranakan food outside because Nothing beats the cooking of my late grandmother. Her rempah was almost unbeatable and she took days and pains to prepare a dish of laksa and otak otak. Of course some of the other signature dishes included Ayam Buah Keluak (which can take up to a week to prepare the nuts) and Itek Tim a soup with an interesting blend of duck and salted vegetables.For your interest, here are some restaurants in Singapore where you can find Peranakan Food.Guan Hoe Soon Restaurant
Guan Hoe Soon Restaurant in Joo Chiat Road is known to be one of the best in Peranakan food. These folks have officially been in this food business for the last 45 years. Unofficially, they have selling their ayam buah keluak to the Japanese since Singapore was Syonan-to. Their specialties include Ayam Buah Keluak, Babi Panggang, Sotong Sambal, Udang Sambal, and Beef Rendang.Nyonya & Baba
Tucked away at the corner of Vivocity, Nyonya & Baba where one will be able to treat their taste buds to true-blue Peranakan cuisine though it’s easy to miss this restaurant. With chefs of Peranakan descent, this restaurant ensures authenticity for a satisfactory dining experience with its well done up décor. (I don’t think it has any relation to the famous Nonya & Baba which used to be at River Valley.) You may like to try the Ayam Buah Keluak and Ngor Hiang.Ivins 
Compared to other Peranakan restaurants in Singapore, IVINS pales in comparison with their minimal décor and ambience. The green floor, ordinary lighting and simple furniture of the restaurant can be a turn off to some. They can be found at Binjai Park Bukit Timah and Jalan Leban at Upper Thomson Rood. The food is so-so but the crowd is overwhelming. Maybe I ordered the wrong dishes.True Blue Cuisine 
True Blue Cuisine used to occupy the Katong area which reflected the rich heritage of the dwindling Peranakan community, but it has moved on to Armenian Street near the museum. Some of the recommendations include Beef Rendang, Bayam Pais, Curry Fish as well as Daun Kadok. The ambience makes it a comfortable eating experience, but be prepared to pay for its heavy price tag (average $40 per person) though.The Blue Ginger 
Located at Tanjong Pagar, The Blue Ginger has a Nyonya -themed design with traditional ornaments fusing with current artistic paintings. Its interior is based on dark brown and cream as its main colours and gives one a soothing yet contemporary feel about the atmosphere. You can try the Assam Puteh which is the peranakan version of the famous Thai Tom Yam seafood soup, and Babi Hong which is braised pork knuckles with premium soya sauce and flavoured with cinnamon bark.Other Related Entries
Chinta Manis
IVINS Peranakan Restaurant (Jalan Leban Road)
2008-11-27 00:00:00
Lose Weight by Drinking Soup? Think Again.
The popularity of soup can be seen from the expansion and opening of several soup stores opening at the Central Business District and City Hall area. A bowl of soup plus bread and butter seems like a much healthier alternative than a meal at the food court. And of course at a steeper price.What we may not know is that soup you crave can have as many calories as a Big Mac. Gasp. And on top of the surprising amount of fat and calories in some brands, there is more than half a day’s recommended amount of sodium in some types of soup.Canned Soups
Grocery store soups are quick and easy, but many of them are high in trans fats and sodium, and a surprising number contain MSG. The dietary guideline for a full day’s intake of sodium is 2,400mg, but some flavors have more than half that amount in a single serving.Generic condensed tomato soup contains 151 calories and 1,383mg of sodium per cup. Read the fine print on those labels.Powdered Soups
Because of the artificial additives present in powdered soup mix, these packets can be worse than canned soup.One serving of powdered cream of vegetable soup (prepared with water and not even full cream milk) contains 107 calories and 1,170mg of sodium.Creamy Soups
These soups are rich tasting, but they won’t be too kind to your waistline. Their texture comes from whole milk, cream or cheese added to vegetable and meat ingredients, which can add more than 14 grams of saturated fat per serving, or three quarters of the recommended daily limit.A New England clam chowder can contain 624 calories and 42 grams of fat.Add-Ons
Resist the temptation to grab that fistful of croutons, crackers or add a dash of salt. A bowl of French onion soup, served with cheese on top and bread on the side, can top 700 calories.To stay healthy, avoid fatty soups, look for clear soups with lots of vegetables, or make your own and go easy on the salt.(Adapted from Newsweek article.)
2008-11-24 00:00:00
Must Try Hong Kong Drinks
While Hong Kong is generally known for its variety of food, we should not ignore another key attraction – the Drinks. Afternoon tea and Tea with Milk are two of the legacies left by the colonial rule in Hong Kong.The Chinese is used to drinking clear and unsweetened tea. However, the sweet Hong Kong style milk tea is a unique blend of several tea leaves with evaporated milk. Most would call it the pantyhose tea, but worry not as it’s definitely filtered from sackcloth.(Previous Entries on HK Tea. Secrets and Local Versions.)Here are some of the Must-Try drinks.Mango Drinks 芒果冰 
Nobody makes the Mango Drinks quite like Hui Lau Shan 许留山 does. It’s Mango-Mania here! They have a huge range of mango puddings, mango sago, mango jellies, mango glutinous balls and drinks.The drinks come in layers of coconut, hashima jelly aloe, aloe vera, red bean, ice cream or fruit puree depending on your selection. Colourful, delectable and will send thrills as you enjoy a drink with fresh fruit bits of mango and strawberry. Although it is rather pricey for HKD20 for a cup, one is never enough.As it started off as a herbal-tea house, you would also find varieties of liang teh, bird’s nest and gui ling gao.Yuan Yang 鸳鸯
When you would never imagine some drinks to be mixed, the Hong Kong people would do it. Yuang Yang is a popular beverage made from a mixture of Hong Kong style milk tea and coffee. Though I hear some people who practice Chinese medication and believe in perfect blends of ying and yang would not encourage drinking it, especially the cold version.Although the combination is said to be fifty-fifty of each, most cha cha tengs cannot get the proportion right. You can try some at Kee Hing Café (Santin) or King Bakery (Central).Another popular mixed drink is Hot Coke with Ginger and Lemon, often said to be a cold remedy but has seen become a refreshing beverage.Iced Red Bean 红豆冰 
No Kong Kong eating experience would be complete without desserts, and one of the most widely known is Iced Red Bean.The local concoction is based on the Hot Red Bean Sweet Soup, but it was modified when cafes add shaved ice into it.With azuka red beans, rock sugar syrup, evaporated milk and ice, it makes a great quencher during the humid summer. Try some at 98ºc found along Lock Road Kowloon.
2008-11-19 00:00:00
More Must Try Food At Hong Kong
Other than main dishes, Hong Kong is also known for many light bites that can be found in their cha chan tengs, bakery houses or yum-cha restaurants. Suitable for people who wants to try out a variety yet not getting too full, or some who just wants a morning or afternoon tea-snack.Egg Tarts 蛋挞
An English pastry with a Cantonese twist. Replace the butter and shortening with some lard and the filling from custard to egg, the traditional custard tarts have a ‘new’ form.When these egg tarts are served warm, the crumbly crust and the soft sweet filling is a pure delight with every bite. While there are many different flavours from white, green tea, honey, mocha, coffee to bird nest’s, my favourite is still the original kind.Tai Cheong continue to draws in the crowd at Hong Kong (they closed and opened again), while I don’t mind those served at King Bakery found at Pottinger Street at Central.Pineapple Bun 菠萝包
Don’t be mistaken. There’s no pineapple in this bun! It is named so because the toased top resembles the surface of a pineapple. The top is made like a sugar cookie, while the bottom is a chewy soft dough.One of the best way of eating this is slapping with a dollop of butter inside, served hot! With milk tea! Some of the variants come with custard, red bean, or roasted pork in the centre.Though note it can be high in saturated fats and cholesterol and has been declared as one of the top 10 most harmful snack foods in Hong Kong.Dim Sum 点心
Literally, it means ‘from the heart’ and it has certainly captured my heart and is a must for breakfast every time I visit Hong Kong.I normally go for the usual Siew Mai and Har Gau, and it’s the simpler things that tests the skills of the chef. Most of the Har Gau I tried in Hong Kong is just filled with shrimp, with no minced pork or minced prawn. Every piece is a delicate one with three fresh shrimps wrapped in the inside.It’s also the ambiance of aunties pushing around metal trolleys, shouting out their treasures in the bamboo basket. You will find Hong Kong citizens young and old chit chatting, enjoying their papers (or horse betting books), Chinese tea or hobbies (eg knitting) while indulging in their morning chow. Very noisy but atmospheric!Other Related Entries
Mak’s vs Tsim (Hong Kong)
Must Try Hong Kong Drinks
Must Try Food at Hong Kong
2008-11-17 00:00:00
Must Try Food At Hong Kong
Hong Kong, also known as the land of “Gourmet Paradise” and “World’s Fair of Food” is one of the best places to find quality food, having variety in their east-west combination, and ambience from roadside stalls, cha can tengs to restaurants.Here are some of the MUST TRY food when you are there:Wanton Noodles
This is a classic, first introduced in the 1940s by Guangzhou chefs who came to the country to establish their own noodle houses. Singaporeans should be more familiar with our own local version – which have miniature wantons and extremely thinly sliced char siew. Some even come in ketchup.However, the Cantonese-style wanton is huge and wrapped with succulent shrimps and minimal pork. The noodle is full of bite, and is just heavenly when served with fresh stalks of kai lan. The version normally comes in soup, and do ask for lao mian (lo mein) if you want your noodles dry.Barbecued Pork/Goose
You can probably spot many BBQ pork eateries calling themselves San Duo, no thanks to A Kindred Spirit (Zhen Qing).Char Sao literally means having meat attached to skewers which are placed over a fire or covered oven to be roasted. The pork usually has a slightly charred-burnt smell and a taste of honey, spices, rice wine and soy sauce. So soft and tender. Again, my general ‘complain’ of the local version is that it lacks substance as the slices are too dry, thin and coloured too red with food colourings.For the renowned Roast Goost, look for Yung Kee right at Central (near Lan Kwai Fong) which is recently voted as Asia’s Top 20 restaurants.Sampan Congee (Tang Zai Chuk)
My favourite congee are those with century egg and pork, along with freshly fried you tiao dough sticks. I first came across the Sampan Congee at Crystal Jade, though I don’t think this style is particularly popular locally and therefore you won’t find it in your normal foodcourts.Sampan Congee, originated from Guangdong, contains a mixture of everything – pork, minced fish, dried squid, dried jellyfish, lettuce and peanuts. In the past, people were fond of riding in beautifully decorated boats that featured entertainment. As they cruised along, hawkers in sampans would sell congee to the boat riders. Quite an interesting origin.You can try Hai Huang along Yau Ma Tei, but nothing beats street hawkers found in back alleys.(More tomorrow….)Other Related Entries
Must Try Hong Kong Drinks
More Must Try Food at Hong Kong
Mak’s vs Tsim (Hong Kong)
2008-11-07 00:00:00
Thai Noodle House – Authentic Thai Delights
Thai food remains one of my favourite cuisines, for its rich flavours of spicy, sour, sweet and salty, yet not being too overwhelming. The seemingly harmless tom yum soup that can send quivers down the spine, and Pad Thai which is the ideal example how 4 flavours can go together on a noodle dish and still taste perfect.The hunt for Thai food is never ending. From the stalls at Beach road, to eateries contemporary twists found in mall, they just do not feel the same as those found in the land of smiles.A friend recommended this little family-based eatery tucked away at the side of Coronation Plaza. It is inconspicuous and would most likely be missed. Look out for “Thai Noodle House” with rows of scrumptious looking Thai cuisines picture at the entrance.The Ambience
Interestingly, it was an instant memory trip back to Bangkok upon entering the shop. With yellow and green walls, Thai cravings and relics, pictures of the Thai King, and a framed red Premier League shirt bearing autographs, you can almost say there is neatness in this ‘mess’.Opened by a Thai couple Madam Achara Siripong and her husband, you can be assured of a certain authenticity in its food selection.The Food
The recommendations include Tom Yum Noodle Soup ($7.00), Thai Green Curry Chicken Noodle ($7.00), Thai Belachan Chilli Fried Rice with Chicken and Egg ($8.50), Fried Beef and Basil Leaf Over Steamed Rice ($8.50).I had a Thai Olive Rice ($8.50), Fried Sambal Kangkong ($7.50) and Thai Green Chicken Curry ($8.50). Although I am not a rice lover, the olive rice with its generous portions of Chinese black olive and minced pork has a right fluffy texture with light fragrance. It didn’t taste like the ‘normal’ Thai rice we were used to eating, and was right to the bite without the dryness.The rice went with the fried kangkong, which was fried properly so that it wasn’t too soggy or crunchy.The green curry had a decent amount of ingredients, wasn’t too spicy but could be a little too ‘lemak’ (coconut taste) for some. The Thai Ice Tea ($3.00) on the contrary was slightly diluted for my liking, but would please those who do not like it too sweet.  There is more good news – no GST or service charge.The Verdict
For this no-frills family eatery, with its signature Thai friendly service, I would gladly pay for service though. Definitely a place for authenticity and good Thai memories.5 Coronation Road #01-03 Coronation Arcade S(269406) Tel:+65 64670104
Opening Hours: Tue-Sun: 11:30am – 9:30pm (Closed on Mondays)Other Related Entries
First Thai (Purvis Street)
Lerk Thai Restaurant (Novena Square 2)
Flying Chillis (313 @ Somerset)
MBK Foodcourt (Thailand)
Porn’s (Liang Seah)
2008-11-04 00:00:00
Cz’Zar 新品味小厨 – Hawker Food At A Restaurant
One could only imagine what kind of food a restaurant called Cz’zar would sell. Italian? Egyptian? Located at Great World City next to up-market fashionable furniture store iwannagohome, you could envisage fine European dining.Correction. It simply means ‘zhi char’ – in Mandarin literally ‘cook and fry’, in reference to the de rigueur use of frying dishes in woks.So it’s hawker food in an atas restaurant …  With exquisite interior design of the signature black and red, along with hanging designer lights, and serving staff tucked in au courant uniforms. No more sweaty uncles and irritable aunties for a change, and of course that comfort comes with a price.For the more affordable range, try the value meal of Stew Beef in Claypot ($14.80) which is served with the house special baby octopus dish, soup of the day, fruit and steamed rice. The Cz’zar Curry Chicken ($12.80) is served with steamed egg (think Chinese chawanmushi), sotong ball with chilli sauce, fruit and rice as well. The dishes felt slightly cold, and lacked the warmth that would be generated from wok-frying with a strong fire.One of the recommendations was the Longevity Mien Shien ($11.80) generosity garnered with assorted seafood and meat. Without being too oily or salty, the dish tasted better than those commonly found in hawker centres.Other common fares such as Fried Rice ($9.80) with special in-house sambal belachan and Hor Fun ($11.80) with fresh garoupa fish fillet was slightly above average as well.But it was really nothing to scream for. So you would really wondered about paying three or four times more to what it would cost, at the Zion Road hawker stall right opposite (though without the aircon comfort).With other dishes costing $10 or more, be prepared to about $30 per person. Simply said, you are paying for the ambience, and not really the food.  So are you willing to pay for this?Cz’Zar 新品味小厨, Kim Seng Promenade #01-37 Great World City S(237994) Tel:+65 68362520
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm (last order 9.30pm)Other Related Entries
Must-Have Zhi Char Dish
2008-10-29 00:00:00
Out Of The Pan – Dine by the Fountain
It’s hard to miss Out of the Pan if you are a frequent shopper at Raffles City Shopping Centre. Located at basement one surrounding the central fountain, it serves a variety of unique crepes (pronounced ‘krep’ and not ‘creeps’) and sinful desserts, suitable for those seeking a light meal.Although the concept is open air, the dining area does not feel crowded or noisy, offering customers a chance to people-watch, or to be people-watched. With its warm lighting and contemporary décor, small groups of friends will find it enjoyable to share crepes or waffles right next to the water feature.The Food
My choice was the ‘Mega Menu’ which included a salad, savoury crepes, and a beverage ($20.00++). Crepes originate from France, but the menu here is modified to with international and local flavours which would appeal to those who love variety.Some of the recommended crepes include Yum Yum Mushroom ($12.50) filled with sautéed shiitake, straw and oyster mushroom, Fish Masala ($15.50) inspired from Indian spices, Seafood Jungle ($15.50) packed with crabmeat, prawns and citrus fruits, Korean BBQ Pork ($12.50), and Beef and Bell Peppers ($13.50).One of the best sellers is Peking Duck Crepe ($14.50) with thin whole wheat crepe wrapping around roasted duck with sambal olek, lychees and plum sauce. The result is an interesting union of dark salty-sweet sauce and roasted duck which is not too fatty. The lychees provide extra sweetness and juice to the combination, but are too few to make a significant difference.The Green Garden Salad is a standard starter of seasonal greens with balsamic and olive oil. The Iced Tea is a surprisingly refreshing beverage which has a light fragrance and is not too sweet.There are only two versions of the sweet crepes when compared to the savory choices. Opt for the Chocolate Mania ($11.50) of glazed banana wrapped in chocolate crepe with dark chocolate ice cream or the Strawberry Cream ($11.50) toped up with custard cream and vanilla ice cream. The succulent strawberries and light custard are sinfully unforgettable.My main gripe about the food was that the portions are too small for the price to pay. Unless there is a promotion, the individual items added up will cost quite a bit up to $30 per person. Also, while it is enough for an after-meal dessert, customers who want a full meal may go hungry.The Service
While the waiters serve with a smile at times, there are too few of them to go around. During peak hours, they are almost too busy to notice your requests.The experience may be nothing divine, but Out of the Pan’s versions of crepes can be said to be creative and out of the box.Out Of The Pan, 252 North Bridge Road #B1-45 Raffles City Shopping Centre S(179103) Tel:+65 6431 6103 Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 10am – 10pm; Fri–Sat: 10am – 10.30pmOther Related Entries
Aerin’s (Raffles City)
Rock & Ash (Marina Square)
Infusion (Dempsey)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square) 
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
2008-10-23 00:00:00
Ice Cream Chefs – ‘Fry’ Your Ice Cream
Imagine having your Ice Cream made in front of your very eyes. And you can choose whatever you want in it. No kidding.The one thing unique to this ice cream place at East Coast is the Chef’s Rock. Otherwise known as an ice-plate, this freezing cold sheet of metal allows you to mix and match any combination of munchies into a personalised treat. And the ‘chef’ will ‘fry’ your ice cream right there before you.Ice Cream Chefs was started by 2 partners who loved desserts and would travel hours just to satisfy their sweet tooth. While they were in the United States, they chanced upon a popular ice cream parlour with such concept and thought that it would be a great idea if Singapore had one.This concept was then started in Singapore, but with an extension of having the ice cream home-made freshly everyday and catering to the local tastebuds.The shop is cutesy violet and small, and almost always crowded. The walls are plastered with printed photos and you may spot some celebrities’ leaving their mark in the pictures. (Like Island Creamery)First pick your favours such as Beanie Vanilla, Milo Peng and Mocha Madness, with the top 3 most popular flavours being Chocolate & Hersheys, Durian Decadence and Kaya Lotee.Then choose your mix-ins, from the usual Oreos, Kit Kat, M&Ms, Koko Crunch and different type of nuts to be blended together. I hear that the maximum mix-ins they ever had was 8!  And it had to be served on a bowl since it was hugh and overflowing.Customers have brought their own items for mix ins! Like potato chips (surprisingly nice!??), gourmet chocolates and truffles (from overseas). One even brought in French fries (What was the person thinking?) But the parlour generally ONLY allow dry food.There was also once where they were catering to a group on the mobile unit and they requested to mixing in some bee hoon noodles and rice that they were having. (!) Fear Factor yah?The conservative me had a Mrs. Smith with Banana Nut Crunch. The result was a smooth creamy rich ice cream with sweet/sour apples and a great chomp as your teeth sinks in to the crunchy bits.It’s better than the usual, say cookies and cream because the its fresh and the fillings still retain the bite. (Not lao4 hong1 yet)Ice Cream Chefs, 520 East Coast Road  #01-06 Ocean Park Tel:+65 6446 6355
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 12noon – 10pm; Fri–Sat & PH: 12noon – 11pmOther Related Entries
Cold Stone Creamery (Orchard Central)
Island Creamery (Serene Centre)
Swensen’s Chendol Ice Cream
Udders (Thomson Road)
Little Ice Cream Kafe LICK (Tanjong Katong)
2008-10-16 00:00:00
Where’s the Best Beef Hor Fun?
Though Beef Hor Fun is never termed as one of the local delights, this popular dish has huge fans throughout. Still, it’s very easy to go wrong on this one. Clumpy Hor Fun (not stir fried well), white in colour (this is not San Lao!), tasteless and thin sauce (not enough seasoning), tough beef (too long on the wok) and lack of the flavour (control of the fire which only seasoned chefs can handle).Here’s a round-on on some of the more popular Hor Funs in Singapore.Geylang Beef Kway Teow (Geylang Lor 9)
This was once THE Beef Hor Fun. Once unarguably the best. Once. During my uni days, my hall mates would drive all the way down from NTU just to eat this at Geylang. I remembered that first bite. It was as though this was the most wonderful thing that I had ever eaten in my entire life. All the stress of the exams would be gone with a taste of the thick black sauce and tender beef. A life changing experience.10 years down the road. While I still enjoy it, the quality has dropped tremendously. In the past, the sauce would stay thick all the way. But the last few times, it became diluted after a while. The horfun’s not as chao tar as before, and the whole flavour just wasn’t strong enough. The impossible parking and rude waitresses don’t help at all.Bee Kia Seafood Restaurant (opposite Thomson Medical Centre)
My family’s favourite Beef Hor Fun. Termed as Geylang’s closest competitor, its edge will be the succulent beef full of bite, compared to Geylang which may be overly soft and tenderised. You feel there is substance. Plus, it’s value for money – $4 for a reasonable portion.The sauce is less distinctive than Geylang’s though. The black bean sauce, sprinkled with chilli has a lot of texture. What’s missing is that X-factor.Por Kee Eating House (Block 69, Seng Poh Lane #01-02)
A surprise find, since I am usually there for the other zhi char dishes such as Champagne Ribs and Braised Tofu. The Black Bean Sauce Beef Horfun was surprisingly good.The wok hei flavour, thick sauce and chewy tender beef suggested that the cooks were very skilled in frying them and controlling the fire so that it is not overcooked. The friend said it was even better than Geylang’s anytime, but the corn’s out of place. At $7 a plate, the heavier price may put some people off.Hong Kong Street Chun Kee (125 Bukit Merah Lane 1)
I like my Beef Hor Fun with a lot of greens, and this version manages to balance the proportion quite well. While this eatery is more famous for  their San Lao and Seafood Horfun, the Beef version is certainly above average compared to many of the others. The portion’s huge and there is always enough sauce to go around. And it’s black enough.The Verdict
Geylang’s still the biggest name in horfun, but Por Kee reaches for a surprise win.
2008-10-10 00:00:00
Can You Name The Pastas?
Ever been to a Pasta place and not sure of the difference between a Fettucine, Linguine or Spaghettini?If you are confused about your pastas, just remember there are a few basic types which are the Spaghetti (noodle-like thin cylinders), Macaroni (hollow cylinders), Fusilli (swirls) and Lasagna (sheets).Though it is commonly thought that Marco Polo brought pasta from China, some study show that it was originally introduced by the Arabs! During Marco Polo’s time, pasta products were already made. Hmm…Here are some of the commonly seen pasta types in Singapore:
Agnolotti – Semi-circular and stuffed
Conchiglie – Sea shell shaped
Farfalle – Bow tie or butterfly shaped
Fettuccine – Thick and flat, literally means ‘little ribbons’ in Italian (some friends call it mee pok!)
Fusilli – Two or three-edged spiral, usually in mixed colours with green and orange
Lasagne – Wide sheet noodles with fluted edges
Linguine – Flattened spaghetti
Orecchiette – Bowl or ear shaped pasta
Penne – Medium length tubes with ridges, remember they are shaped like pens!
Pipe – Larger versions of macaroni
Ravioli – Usually stuffed with cheese or other stuffings
Rotelle – Wagon wheel shaped (I love it dry fried)
Spaghetti – Round-rod pasta
Spaghettini – A thinner form of SpaghettiGuess the Pasta Quiz – What are the following types of pasta?a)b)c)d)e)Make your Guesses here. Answers will be revealed… next week! Hahaha.Other Related Entries
The Verve (Gillman Village)
Youmenya Goemon (Marina Bay Link)
Singapore Sling Chilli Crab Pizza (Clarke Quay)
Verve Pizzeria (One North)
2008-10-09 00:00:00
The Verve – From Barracks to Cinema to Italian Dining
When The Turquoise Room closed some time back, fans of this Italian casual dining joint hidden at Gillman Village were disappointed.  Me inclusive. There I was recommending my friends to try it, and then it ceased operation after the owners left the country.Karen, a fan of the room, thought the same too and bought it over! (I wished I had the energy and money (!) to do it.)From Gillman army barracks, Regal Cinema, Turquoise Room to The Verve, this place has definitely come a long way.The condominium sounding new name represents Vigour, Spirit and Style. We can see it instantly in the new owners and décor. The owners were young, full of energy and positive vibes, and you could immediately feel they care a lot about this place. It’s like their baby.As for the ambience, gone was the very casual feel, replaced by a more up market, romantic and classic look.  Guys looking for a venue for their first dates, or girlfriends wanting to have a sweet martini together after work will find this the perfect place to chill out.Fans of the old Turquoise Room need not worry as The Verve retained the last chef, and  even added new creations to the menu.For starters, I had the Calamari Fritti ($16). Most eateries would serve their calamari in ring form, and this is prepared quite differently with different parts of the squid. The result is chewy and succulent, best tasted with specially prepared garlic crème.The signature thin crust pizzas are creatively named, from Vitto, Appolonia, Lucca Marinara, Mancini, and Romano. (Make a wild guess and I may give a prize to the 1st correct answer!) Corleone would be a giveaway.Some of the favourites here include the Enzo ($19 for 8”, $24 for 12”), with Peking duck spattered generously on fresh handmade dough. Once you get over the barrier of having Hoisin sauce on your Italian pizza, you will be in for an East-West synergic treat.I had the Confit of Duck fettucine ($26), which had lean scrumptious duck served with olive oil, garlic, topped with wafer-thin crispy prosciutto. Prepared Al Dente style, the pasta has a suitable bite, without being overly oily or dense.The desserts certainly looked very suitable for adults – Vanilla Cognac ice cream and Mojito Sorbet. Oh…. Don’t get drunk on desserts! Have your ice cream with a hot homemade Calvados Apple Crumble and feel the spirit in it, literally.Other than Dempsey Road, The Verve is a fresh alternative for trendy dates and wind down drinks.7 Lock Road, Ground floor Gillman Village Tel: 64733655 (closed)Other Related Entries
Verve Pizzaeria
2008-09-30 00:00:00
SUN Japanese Dining – Hokkaido Crab Bao? Heavenly
Need a holiday at Hokkaido but can’t book a flight there? The next best thing to experiencing Hokkaido and happy holidays, is to savour their delicacies.Stepping into Japanese Dining SUN at CHIJMES, one is immediately transported into a tranquil and elegant setting. The restaurant is tastefully designed in contemporary Japanese style, with dark colors and subtle mood lights. An open style kitchen takes centre stage.The restaurant features traditional and modern Japanese dishes, with the Hokkaido Gourmet Experience of Autumn (till 30th Oct) and Winter (to till 1st December) themes to reflect its seasonal beauty.The first dish blew everyone away. The Steamed Hokkaido Snow Crab (Zuwaigani) imported from Japan looked deceptively simple but the real magic lay in its taste. Dipped in the home-made ginger vinegar sauce, the delightful and natural sweetness of the crab meat is brought to the fore, making this a very refreshing starter. And, you don’t even have to worry about soiling your fingers.The Grilled Leg of King Crab with Salad Cream Sauce (Tarabagani) did not disappoint as well. The salad cream sauce brought out the sweetness in the lightly grilled crab leg, and the juicy and chewy succulent meat was a delight to the palate. This dish is also available with a spicy cream sauce.I was pretty intrigued with a ‘bao’ served in dim sum style, under the impression that ‘bao’ is not very Japanese. Manjyu is actually a popular traditional Japanese confection, though said to be brought over by the Chinese. The heart-shaped Snow Crab Bun (Zuwaigani Manjyu) is a marriage of Hokkaido carb, with locally inspired sauce, encased in chewy ‘bao’. Just imagine warm crab gravy seeping out of soft bun. Warning – this dish can be spicy to some, and is definitely addictive!The Tuna Belly & Japanese Pickles Sushi Roll (Torotaku Roll) is refreshing, and the beautiful pink and yellow sushi roll is truly inviting.Fancy some big charsiew? The Ramen Noodles in Soy Sauce Stock and Big Charsiew (Sapporo Shoyu Charsiew Ramen) is to die for! Although soy sauce stock ramen is commonly available, this is a class above the rest. The Shoyu stock is rich and flavorsome without being overly salty, and tastes like it has been brewing forever in grandmother’s pot in the kitchen.If that’s still not enough, a selection of desserts is available. We tried the Light Camembert Cheesecake which, true to its name, was quite light but without surrendering its Camembert undertones. The Pumpkin Pudding which was subdued and not overly sweet, with the pumpkin flavor taking centre stage.Service here is attentive but discreet, with Japanese attendants amongst the staff. With quite a following of Japanese clientele and chichi tai tais, the food here must be authentic if not excellent.30 Victoria Street, #02-01 Chijmes, Singapore, Tel: +65 6336 3166
Opening Hours: Mon–Sun: 12pm – 3pm; Mon–Thu, Sun & PH: 6.30pm – 11pm; Fri, Sat & PH eve: 6pm – 12am
2008-09-29 00:00:00
Island Creamery – Chendol, Teh and Milo in your Ice Cream
Somebody gave me two tubs of ice cream during my birthday – this friend certainly knew what BanBan craved for.I still distinctly remember it said ‘Pineapple tart’ ice cream in a cute white little tub. It was a life changing experience. Crunchy butter bits with sweet strips of pineapple danced a waltz with vanilla ice cream, and this new year goodie never tasted the same again.Island Creamery is located at Serene Centre, and constantly visited by young people (eh-em like me) and tertiary students, most coming from nearby my old school (Hwa Chong Ke Ma Ma!). There is so much positive and energetic vibes here, and I do aim to open a café like this one day.The girls serving ice cream are usually cute and bubbly, but with an occasional bitchy one (could hear her complain and gossip constantly!).  You may spot the friendly looking owner Uncle Stanley right behind, who started this shop to provide quality local flavoured ice cream.Chendol, Horlicks, Tiger Beer, Bandung, Burnt Caramel, Black Forest, Apple Crumble, Reverse-O and Cookies & Cream are some of the usual flavours. Many adults would throw their calorie-counter out of their windows (temporary), and get excited over so many favourite childhood dessert flavours.I heart the Pulau Hitam. Somehow it never registered with me when it’s a hot piping dessert, but the cold creamy version was a familiar and sweet experience. Yummy.Strangely, I never liked Nutella on my toast, but it being in an ice cream sent bursts of excitement if you want something to compliment your chocolate ice cream.In my most recent visit, I had a Milo Ping Pong and Teh Tarik combination ($4 for 2 scoops) as I wanted to try how my two flavour drinks would taste frozen. Unfortunately, there were too many marshmallow in the Ping Pong ice cream (inspired by Lee Jia Wei is it?) and the Teh Tarik ice cream lacked a strong tea taste. So it felt neither-here-nor-there.People come here from various reasons: to people watch, to study, to catch up with old friends or to look at pictures. And here’s one of mine I spotted on the wall taken two years ago! (Sigh. When we were still young…) With such delicious ice cream, being here is almost always a happy experience.Island Creamery, 10 Jalan Serene #01-03 Serene Centre, Tel:+65 6468 8859
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Ice Cream Chefs (East Coast)
Udders (Thomson Road)
Little Ice Cream Kafe LICK (Tanjong Katong)
Once Upon a Milkshake (Maxwell Chambers)
The Daily Scoop (Chip Bee Gardens)
2008-09-26 00:00:00
Chong Qing Hot Pot – Hot! Hot! Hot!
Steamboats are everywhere now – Geylang, Chinatown, Tan Quee Lan, Kitchener Road. Hotpots are associated with winter season, but yet springing up in perpetual HOT summer Singapore.Other than offering diverse China students a chance for a gathering (esp at Bugis area), this could very well be the only few food opportunities that gives the feeling of togetherness. Not every person likes to talk in dinner, this busy activity is likely to keep the quiet people like me (haha) feeling active with my hands (other than texting and shooting).Options are plenty, but quality (and hygience) may be otherwise. But Chong Qing Hotpot, a renowned pioneer in Singapore since 1993, still remains one of the most popular.The buffet dinner is priced at $30.90++ during weekends. It’s almost double the price of those offered at nearby Bugis, but the added service and consistent quality makes the eating affair more worthwhile. (If you are going to gain calories, may as well gain it happily right?)5 Ways to Enjoy Your Chong Qing Hotpot @ Suntec
1) Select 2 choices of soup: Ma-La, Faithful Chicken, or Preserved Sour Vegetable. My recommended are the first two.  To prevent my buds from getting too numb, I go for a 80% chicken broth/20% spicy combination.2) Dip your thin sliced meat into the four different sauces: sesame seed base, sesame oil, sweet chilli and chilli with garlic for that additional kick.3) To ease that buffet guilt, add lots of vegetables and mushroom (especially yummy soft Golden Mushroom) to balance that oily intake.4) Save space for the complimentary one standard serving of Sliced Salmon, Fu Zhou Fish Balls, New Zealand Mussels, Sliced Squid with Abalone Sauce and Chicken Sausage (well, maybe you can leave this out.) The dishes came quite late after we are almost done eating!5) Save MORE space for some fried items such as Meat & Chives Dumpling, Fried Buns and Cripsy Spring Roll which came at the end of the meal. Eat it before you call Surrender. You can give the Xiao Long Bao a miss if you mind the thick skin.After handling raw meat with chopsticks, be sure to dip the chopsticks in the boiling broth to kill any microbes. Or use a separate one for the pot.The meal came up close to $40 per person (pricey for a poor person like me). I did enjoy the experience though – an opportunity for good friends to gather and friendly service from aunties who can’t wait to stack up your table with plates of meat.Chong Qing Hot Pot, 3 Temasek Boulevard #B1-061 Suntec City Mall Tel:+65 6337 6921
Opening Hours: 12 pm – 2.30pm, 6 pm – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Sho Teppan (Ion Orchard)
Fortune Cuisine (Sunset Way)
Fisherman’s Market (The Central)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
2008-09-25 00:00:00
Sunset Grill & Pub – Singaporeans can travel ANYWHERE for food
This extremely ulu place is almost impossible to find. (Yes, I am going for my round island search after the previous entry onulu places)You have been warned: Girls, don’t come alone at night. No bus will reach here. I wonder if cabs will want to drive in. And don’t even try to walk. It’s at least a few kilometers from the main road. It’s like one of those places you watch in movies where kidnappers would hide at.Yet, it’s fully packed! The carpark was almost full. This is absolute proof that Singaporeans can travel ANYWHERE for food. People travel here for different reasons: It could be because we need a breathing space out of the city buzz. It can certainly fulfill the adventurous streak of some, just like finding a treasure on the map. There is a certain old-school charm which brings out a nostalgic spirit in us.The Ambience
Located at Singapore Flying Club at Seletar Air Base, you can even catch a plane take off at a distance. Guys can bring your dates here to this dimly litted place to pa-tuo, but make sure you don’t get lost yourself.Sunset Grill reminds me of the Spec Mess at my old Army camp – run-down, makeshift tables, stone chairs, mosquitoes and rustic. You almost feel that you are in a different country.The Food
The menu came in a dirty clear holder file, and my heart stopped a second when I saw the price. This is no army canteen price.The highlight of this pub is the Buffalo Wings which is supposedly tongue torching and tonsil sizzling. There are even 20 levels to choose from (like some 20 level Shaolin/E-mei martial arts). A Level 1 ($17.50 for half a dozen) is only mildly spicy, while a Level 12 is unimaginable.This is the PERFECT forfeit for the act-gungho friends who say they can eat ANYTHING hot. Alas, even when I can pride myself for eating chilli padi on its own, my skills are only up to Level 3. Tough men who ordered a Level 7 are known to be reduced to tears and conceded defeat.The chicken tasted like frozen wings deep fried in chilli, with the meat not providing any sense of freshness or satisfaction. I wasn’t thoroughly thrilled by most of the other dishes. The Deep Fried Button Mushroom ($13.50) which were dipped in beer batter were tasted ordinary and lackluster.The Clam Chowder ($8.00), thick and creamy, was the saving grace. Add a BBQ Pork Ribs ($29.80) if you are not feeling satisfied. The Nacho Chips ($17.50) and Cheesie Fries ($8.00) was a notch better than cinema food.The Verdict
Get a map, find this treasure, then practice your skills of 20 levels.140B Piccadilly Seletar Airbase S(797754) Tel:+65 64820244Other Related Entries
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
Galley By The Straits (Admiralty Road)
Ulu Food Places
More Ulu Food Places
2008-09-23 00:00:00
Astons Specialities – Low Price, High Dining
Over at The Cathay at Handy Road, moviegoers would sometimes complain about the lack of eateries at the Cineplex. The good news is that Astons has arrived.Astons Specialties, Prime and Express have already left their mark at various locations (including NUS), earning rave reviews for its value-for-money steak and western cuisines.Named after the founder Aston Soon, he started this business in a coffeeshop without much thought on how should i name it. So, he decided on putting his name on the signboard and hopes to be remembered with his cooking.The Ambience
The restaurant was crowded during a weekday lunch – bad news for us. My course mates and I couldn’t find a seat at a more cosy and dimly-lit interior and had to settle for the outdoor area. I am sure it would be a romantic affair if it’s at night under the stars (minus the construction crane).The Food
Our gang was kind of pleasantly surprised at the prices here. Grillworks Chicken are priced at $6.50, fishes are about $7.20, a Prime Sirloin is $11.50 and Prime Ribeye is $13.90, all inclusive of 2 side dishes. Be prepared to wait though.I had a Grill Fish with Herbs ($7.20) with Coleslaw and Baked Potato. The fish was rather fresh, and lightly grilled. One plus point is there isn’t a strong fishy smell. The Black Pepper Chicken ($6.50) was standard ‘Western food’ fare, but the huge portion and sides of Onion Rings and Garden Veggie make it value for money. In fact, the total bill of 3 of us was only about $21.When asked about how they keep prices so competitive, Aston said that over the years they have work very closely with their suppliers. They have shared Aston’s vision in providing quality food at value for money pricing. Other factors such as high volume of orders have enabled themselves and our suppliers to negotiate with the producers around the world for a better pricing.Compared to substandard Western food at many foodcourt, I would definitely pay just that dollar or two more for the ambience and quality.The Verdict
Doesn’t hurt your pocket – Aston Scores!Astons Specialities, 2 Handy Road #04-03 The Cathay, Tel: +65 6887 5889
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 11.30am – 10pm; Fri–Sat & PH Eve: 11.30am – 11pmOther Related Entries
A Wagyu Burger with Aston Soon
Relish (Cluny Court)
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
Sunset Grill and Pub (Seletar Airbase)
15 Minutes (Lasalle)
2008-09-19 00:00:00
Pepper Lunch – What’s the Secret?
I know many people who enjoy eating Pepper Lunch. It gives those who cannot cook to save their lives a legitimate reason to say “Hey, I can cook!”; Or an opportunity for grown-ups to play with their food before eating.The way I like my Pepper Lunch: spreading a little butter, dipping some garlic soy sauce and pouring lots and lots of honey brown sauce. Mix, mix, mix. (Lick off the spoon every time a new sauce is added if you must). With sizzling and slightly burnt meat, the ‘cooking’ injects FUN into the whole eating process.Now, revealing the SECRET of Pepper Lunch: How do they actually heat the plate?Some people I asked thought it worked on the usual hot-plate principle, or that the iron plate is injected under extreme heat. The Japanese actually used a electromagnetic cooker through induction (remember your Physics?) to heat up the iron plate to 260C in 70 seconds. Pepper Lunch is the only eatery so far to use this patented technology.You know how meat can lose a bit of their flavour if they are overcooked. The meat grilled this way remains succulent and juicy, and the food is warm more than 15 minutes. In fact, the Shimofuri (marbled) beef is so tender that it melts in your mouth. Rare or well done – you decide!The Food
For the first time, there is a Spicy Sizzling Special just for Singaporeans up to the end of October. The Spicy Mexican “Taco” Rice ($12.30 for a set, $10.90 with coupon) was a novel change from the usual. When the minced beef mixed together with fresh tomatoes and lettuce, the rice looked like fiery fried rice with the array of colours, matched with a zesty taste. Warning: It IS really spicy (unless what most other fast food would claim for their ‘spicy’ meals).The Wasabi Pepper Steak ($17.20 for a set, $14.90 with coupon) is the standard fare with a punch by dipping the steak pieces with wasabi on the side. Some may complain about the high price for a ‘fast food restaurant’, but the premium meat from Australia and New Zealand assures freshness and tenderness.If you still have space, cool down your fiery meal with a Goma Black Sesame Soft Ice Cream ($1.60). Some like it fully mixed, but I like mine spoon by spoon.Pepper Lunch, Isetan Scotts, 350 Orchard Road Basement Level Shaw House
Opening Hours:  11am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Sho Teppan (Ion Orchard)
McDonald’s Chicken McGrill
Popeyes Chicken and Biscuits (Airport T3)
ChicKing (Marina Square)
Aijino Chanpon (Plaza Singapura)
2008-09-17 00:00:00
Pete’s Place – A Well Hidden Gem at Orchard
We all know the saying “the older the wine, the finer it gets”. Restaurant Pete’s Place has been in operation at the basement of Grand Hyatt since the 1970s without a change in location. For something beyond the mediocre pizzas and pasta some of us have been eating, look for the authentic Italian flavours that Pete’s provide.The Ambience
As you walk down the flight of stairs near the entrance of the hotel, you will walk into a hostelry-styled restaurant of bricked walls, black and white photographs, dim lighting and dark wood furniture.The fact that it attracts tourists, expatriates and upper-middle class locals might of course also make you feel like you’ve transported to a European city. The matching checked blue and white table-cloth and napkins, and folded paper menu add to the unique essence of the place.The Food
If you go during lunch time, you can choose from the salad or pasta buffet range from $20 to $30. There are four main components to the menu – the appetizers, pizzas, main course such as pasta and desserts.>The Caesar Salad ($15) we ordered was refreshing with romaine lettuce, bacon and croutons. The greens are very fresh and provide a crunchy bite with the flavourful dressing.>
 
If you are on Atkins, then stay off the bread buffet which is complimentary. Offering a wide selection of whole-wheat, sunflower seed bread and walnut doughs, you can say goodbye to your ‘off-carb’ plans. Other than the typical olive oil and vinegar, the herb butter and sun-dried tomato butter has a distinctive blend three ‘S’ – sour, sweet and soft. Delizioso!Instead of a ‘normal’ flat pizza, I ordered a Pam Pam ($19) which is a half calzone filled with mortadella (Italian cold cut calume), mozzarella and ricotta (a type of Italian whey cheese), and a half pizza with minced pork sausage meat, garlic, fresh chili and mozzarella. Beyond the crunchy slightly burnt yet soft outer crush, the succulent meats, cheese and tomato sauce makes every bite a luscious treat. Being freshly prepared and over-baked, it offered a hot and hearty meal.The Service
The serving staff, clad in uniform black maintained the standard of what a restaurant in a hotel should provide. They were prompt in serving requests and refilling of water.
 
Although there were some sentiments that the pasta was overcooked and thus soggy, the dim lights, checkered tablecloths, tomato butter, still makes the whole eating experience here a satisfying one. Italian food seldom tastes this good in Singapore.The Verdict 
More than 30 years of history can’t be wrong.Pete’s Place, 10, Scotts Road The Grand Hyatt Hotel S’pore S(228211) Tel:+65 64167113
Opening Hours: Mon–Sat: 12noon–2.30pm, 6pm–10.30pm.Sun: 11.30am–2.30pm, 6pm–10.30pmOther Related Entries
Singapore Sling Chilli Crab Pizza (Clarke Quay)
Verve Pizzeria (One North)
Carousel (Royal Plaza on Scotts)
2008-09-12 00:00:00
More Ulu Food Places
It’s always fun to try out exciting new places to explore. Here are 5 more places to satisfy the adventurous streak in you.6. Halia Restaurant at the Singapore Botanical GardensCuisine: Fusion set meals, sandwiches and salads
Price: $35-40 for a decent mealVery “atas”, lovely greenery. What more can you ask for? You can enjoy the views of Botanical Gardens through glass windows, while you are seated in aircon setting.7. Farmart at Chua Chu Kang HillCuisine: Snacks, kopitiam food, seafood and Zi Char
Price: unknownWith a whole variety of different farms (including bee, koi, lotus, quail, orchid, ornamental fish, lobster, frog farms), it’s very educational for children especially those who have never seen a live chicken. A whole lot of hands-on activities, such as farm tours available as well.8. Beach Culture at Pasir Ris ParkCuisine: Western
Price: $25-30, more if you order alcoholIt’s near the beach, so you have got fabulous view, especially in the evening, food is fabulous, pretty good variety of drinks, call to reserve seats as they can get rather packed in the evenings (be sure to ask for seats on the outside for alfresco dining). There’s even a jazz band on some evenings.9. Galley by the Straits at SAF Yacht Club (Admiralty)Cuisine: Chinese food (Zi Char style)
Price: $20-25 per person (depending on how many going)Other than enjoying the food, strong breeze and fresh air, you can look far upon at one of the yachts and imagine you own one.  Great place to day-dream.10. Restoran Asli (in Johor Bahru)Cuisine: Seafood, Zi Char-style
Price: $10-20 for a very satisfying seafood mealIf all else fails, travel with bunch of kakis across the causeway.  It’s perfect for Singaporeans who are always on the hunt for cheap and good food.Other Related Entries
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
Galley By The Straits (Admiralty Road)
Ulu Food Places
Sunset Grill and Pub (Seletar Airbase)
2008-09-11 00:00:00
The Ulu Food Places – Where Are They?
Being in Singapore, I always have this question during the weekends – where should I eat? It seems that it is usually formulaic and boring. Let’s see, there’s Orchard area, Raffles City /Marina /Suntec area,  Vivocity or we just stay at home to avoid the crowds.My colleague Vicky has come out with a list of places worth exploring. Of course it makes it easier when you have the car, but there are always the taxis and good friends.Presenting the off-the-radar places…1. Sunset Grill & Pub at Seletar AirbaseCuisine: Western food, famous for Buffalo wings and Clam ChowderPrice: $15-20 per personIt’s very VERY ulu, and a tad creepy to get there (you have to drive through a long stretch and unlit narrow road). Not sure if any cab driver is willing enough to bring you there, but the clam chowder was extremely worth the effort. You may even catch a private plane taking off.2. Bliss restaurant at Punggol ParkCuisine: Western and Italian pastaPrice: $15-20 per personGood and affordable food (plenty of raving recommendations on the internet), nice view of pond (which may smell a little, you have been warned) and relaxing atmosphere.3. Bottle Tree VillageCuisine: Seafood (Zi Char style)Price: $20 – 25 per person (depending on how many people going)It’s ulu enough (you need a car to get there, taxis may not be able to get you there in one piece, or so I heard), ambience is highly rated and you can take photos with the bottle trees there and show off to your friends. Bottle trees are native to Australia and these were specially flown in at $30,000 each4. Canopy and The Green Room at Bishan Park IICuisine: Western (Canopy) and Organic Vegetarian (The Green Room)Price: $25 – 30 per personCanopy has fantastic dessert. The Green Room has fabulous vegetarian choices. Plus point – great ambience, perfect for nature lovers as both places are nestled among lovely greenery. Bar starts operating from evening onwards, so you can sip your martinis while enjoying the ambience.5. The Olive Ristorante at Labrador ParkCuisine: Seafood, Italian food, famous for seafood platterPrice: $40-50 per person (warning: food comes in small portions)Secluded and wonderful view from Labrador Park, visitors can go and explore Labrador Park (and its famous tunnels) or even exercise there before heading off to have some food.We don’t believe that there is any where too far in this country, and Singaporeans are known to travel all around just for food.  For dating couples who want a quiet time, friends in search of good makan, and nature lovers, there are treasures hidden in our little island!Other Related Entries
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
Galley By The Straits (Admiralty Road)
Ulu Food Places
More Ulu Food Places
Sunset Grill and Pub (Seletar Airbase)
2008-09-09 00:00:00
Cookhouse Food – Great, Satisfactory, or Lousy?
“Wah, cookhouse food not bad siah,” said my reservist buddies. Having just returned from a 3-week long In-Camp-Training, most of the perpetually hungry NSMan were surprised with the improvement of cookhouse food.Rewind the shoddy days as a recruit. Fish balls bounced like ping pongs, meat broke plastic forks, rice looked like rocks, and vegetables were yellow.Guys may remember a decade ago when some grouchy angry ‘chefs’ shouted “f***” all the time. Pure added misery. Now, they are all replaced with smiley uncles and aunties who make you feel right at home.This ICT, we were practically bombarded with variety from Western Food, Satay Bee Hoon, and Bak Kuk Teh. Plus syrup drinks. Plus desserts. Plus ice cream. Enough to make us fat.Cpl (NS) Sim remarked, “Sure, got survey lah. Every time got ice cream means survey.”He was right. There is a difference though. But the receptivity of the feedback have been encouraging, with most respondents saying SAF food was ‘satisfactory’.  Somehow after a survey, the food went back to boring chye peng.Furthermore, as soldiers were computing responses, they were watched eagle-eyed by a Master Sergeant and a supervisor.Cpl (NS) Quek grudgingly complained about every meal but said, “Don’t want to key Lousy. They right behind watching. Paiseh .”There is this auntie who walked around with a clipboard file every meal and sat beside me one lunch. “Boy, like the food? Auntie and uncle came in 3am to prepare you know. Very xin ku, you know?  By the way, tomorrow got survey ah.  You know?“I definitely know. Both acts were subtle hints to convey You-better-know-what-to-do.With credit given, I commented to her that there was at least colour in the meals (no longer all pale green), and I no longer have to eat that same chicken patty every meal.How many eateries out there actually conduct regular surveys to keep on improving? How many restaurant surpervisors would go the extra mile to speak to their customers? Unforunately few and lacking. Having free food dutifully prepared by dependable cooks, what more can I ask for? Let’s not complain too much.By the way, I keyed “Great”.Other Related Entries
Army Cookhouse Food
2008-09-08 00:00:00
Just Acia – The Cheapest in Town
Question. Where can you get set meals at Orchard Road, with free flow of coffee, soft drinks and ice cream, all at an incredible price of $5.90*?Just Acia is the place for the budget conscious, in light of escalating prices everywhere. Calling themselves the ‘Best of Asia’ may be a forthright claim, but they do serve Asian stuff from Thai Tom Yam Chicken Soup, Korean Spicy Kimchi Beancurd Udon, Herbal Chicken Soup to Chicken Teriyaki.With side dishes ranging from Xi-An Spinach Tofu, Fukien Prawn Roll and Chawanmushi, that’s what I call ‘japalang’ (variety).The Ambience
Of the my little survey of 5 people, 80% cannot figure out where Dhoby Xchange is, with one vaguely knowing where but not sure how to get there. Most assumed it’s the revamped buzzling food basement of Plaza Singapura. Not quite right.But once you find out where it is located, you will be quite amazed at this little find, and on how every shop around seemed to be converted to this open concept eatery.On an afternoon lunch, it can be relatively filled with working executives but finding a seat shouldn’t be much of a problem given its obscurity and vast space.The Food
My course mates was only initially excited having a free flow of ice cream, but I think non low-fat low-sugar may not appeal that much to working (read: weight conscious) adults more. But they can probably fill the less discerning children up.
 
I would briefly describe the food here as better than a food court, but still a distance away from restaurant standards. It could be the symptom of “Jack of all trades but master of none”.The Tori Katsu set ($5.90) had reasonably crispy chicken skin, and they even took the effort to garnish the dish for that cheap price. Kudos to that. But the rest of the meat and rice was too dry and I wished they would use fluffy short-grained rice.As for the Just’s Steam Dumpling Set ($5.90), it tasted just (no pun intended) like manufactured dumplings – standard, plain and bland.You may have better luck with the noodle dishes with its affiliation with Just Noodles at Suntec City. At least the ramen were springy and soup tasty.The Verdict
This Jack of all trades is no ‘Best in Asia’, but is certainly value for the budget conscious working in Dhoby Gaut area.Just Acia, 11 Orchard Road #B1-17 Dhoby Ghaut MRT Station Tel:+65 6338 8071
Opening Hours: 11.00am – 10.30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Ya Zhou Café (Suntec)
2008-09-04 00:00:00
White Dog Café – Nothing to Bark About
The only reason I am eating here is because it’s called ‘White Dog Café’.I thought that this could be an interesting theme café, half expecting to have ‘doggy meals’ served in a serving dish.When I asked the serving staff why the place is called White Dog Cafe, the response was “There’s no reason. It’s just so.”That was quite an anti-climax from my initial excitement. At least they didn’t cook up some fake stories about a dead best friend.The Ambience
Black walls with circular motifs, white floor with strips, red booth seats, and purple chairs – this café does suffer an identity crisis with its interior. On last count, there were only 1, 2, 3 dogs in the whole place. No paws, no bones, no spots, nothing.The Food
Even though it’s called a café, it serves heavy going main dishes such as Tenderloin Steak ($28.90), Herb Lamb Chop ($23.90), Pork Knuckle ($19.90) and Texan Beef Ribs ($25.90).For starters,  I had a Clam Chowder ($6.50) which was described as ‘a delicious and flavourful potage’.  No to potage, but yes to thin broth. Although dashed with some bacon bits, the soup lacks favour and is too diluted for the experience to be wholesome.It’s hard to find a signature dish on its menu, so I ordered a White Dog’s Chef Salad ($12.90). The salad was a hearty mix of honey-baked ham, smoked chicken and duck laced with tangy orange mayonnaise and greens. I must say the portion was generous, but this simplistic salad is not something I cannot whip up at home.The Mango-Chicken Delight ($15.90) was a combination of chicken thigh, breaded and deep-fried till golden brown, and sweet mango filling then coated with a light lemon butter sauce. The blend was interesting enough, but the taste (or lack of taste) of frozen chicken dipped fried was a downer.White Dog Cafe, Harbourfront Walk #02-131/132 VivoCity S(098585) Tel:+65 63769970
Opening Hours: 11.30am – 9.45pm DailyOther Related Entries
Crazy World Café (Chinatown)
Raindrops Café (*Scape)
Egg3 Café (Mountbatten)
Qafé (Tanjong Pagar)
Charlie Brown Café (Somerset)
2008-09-01 00:00:00
Popeyes Chicken & Biscuits – It’s Not the Sailorman
To look for Popeyes Chicken & Biscuits, we have to go the distance, literally.If you need a quick bite before you fly off to a foreign land, try this fried chicken fast food restaurant (since it’s located at Terminal One and Three). I first fell in love with Popeyes at a foreign country a decade back, and wondered when it would arrive to our shores.The Ambience
This is the airport right? So I kind of expected some kind of vibrancy and service, because this is what we need to show the tourists (must at least wayang a bit). Apparently, it’s no difference from the heartlands and even felt a tad cold.The signage screams the 5 ‘F’s: Food, Flavour and Fun for Family and Friends. Although said to be n New Orleans style, it seemed to be lacking in friendliness and fun.The Food
Other than Sandwich and Seafood Combos, the must-tries are the Chicken Combos.  They come in other spicy or mild version, along with signature sides of Cajun Fries, Mash Potatoes, Cole Slaw or Red Beans & Rice.The 3-piece chicken combo with a biscuit, side and drink is $8.90. Add another side, and it will be more than 10 bucks. The country’s inflation has certainly hit a new high.Unlike some other places with supremely oily or flakey chicken skin, Popeyes had crisp, firm and crunchy exterior that can give a ‘cracking’ sound on first bite. The meal was so-so without the succulent and freshness I expected. I tried my friend’s mild version, and there really wasn’t much difference with my spicy chicken. But yes, it still taste better than ‘the other’ chicken.The Mashed Potato ($1.80 on its own) has a rich potato taste with bits of spices and potato pieces, and not overly blended and synthetic.As for the other highlight- the Biscuit, it is similar to a cold and tasteless scone which needs more buttlemilk and jam for a richer flavour. A pity.The Good To Know
The chain was initially named after detective Jimmy ‘Popeye’ Doyle in the movie The French Connection, and NOT Popeye the Sailorman.
 
Popeyes Chicken & Biscuits, 65 Airport Boulevard, Basement Level 2 South, #B2-LF1 Changi Airport T3, Singapore
Opening Hours: 9am – 2am DailyOther Related Entries
ChicKing (Marina Square)
Ayam Penyet Ria (Lucky Plaza)
Nando’s (Bugis Junction)
Barcelos (Novena) 
Waroeng Penyet (Marine Parade)
2008-08-28 00:00:00
Waroeng Penyet – Sedap Indonesian ‘KFC’
Simply said, this is Indonesia’s answer to KFC. While Ayam Penyet (Flattened Fried Chicken) hasn’t exactly taken Singapore by stomp, it has increasingly gained its following over the last two years.The word “Waroeng” means a traditional hut in Indonesia that serve reasonably priced food, while “Penyet” means flattened.You may find this little shop located at Marina Parade Central rather similar to Ayam Penyet Ria at Lucky Plaza. They were previous co-owners, but different directions and targeted markets made the young boss Edy Ongkowijaya venture on his own.While the Lucky Plaza eatery mainly appeals to families, Waroeng Penyet is obviously attracting the younger crowd with its red/green interiors, cutesy chicken logo, colourful menus and young staff.The Food
The Ayam Penyet (S$5.50 with rice not included) served in baskets, has a generous portion of chicken fried in crunchy batter with fried tempe and tofu on the side. The flattening makes the chicken more manageable to eat, and surprisingly dry. The loosen meat from the bones actually makes it a non-oily affair as it becomes possible to eat chicken without using hands.The highlight is the sambal chili which is available in hot and mild versions. The faint-hearted may just find it too much to handle, while the chilli lover in me has an upsurge of adrenalin after the blast of spice.  They also serve other forms of ‘penyet’ such as Empat (beef), Bawal (pomfret), Udang (fried prawn), Lele (catfish) and Baskso Goreng (fried beef balls) with prices being very affordable at $4.50 to $6.00.The other yummies served include Ayam Panggang (grilled chicken), Sate Ayam (Chicken Satay), Soto Ayam (Javanese chicken soto) and Gulai Ayam (Infonesian chicken curry).My personal favourite is the Sate Ayam which has a different texture and peanut paste from the regular satays we are used to. The difference is that the grilled meat sprinkled with fried shallots more succulent and tender, and the sauce smoother and less spiced.End off your meal with Iced Cendol ($2.50) or Avocado Juice ($3.00), a green, sweet and thick creamy drink which has high nutritional worth due to its rich vitamin 86 and carotene.The Good To Know
The owner Edy has just reached 30, but has 4 shops under his belt since he opened this first branch in 2007. He is full of smiles, life and potential, just like Waroeng Penyet which looks set to expand beyond.Waroeng Penyet, 81 Marine Parade Central #01-638 Marine Parade Promenade S(440081) Tel:+65 63441235
Opening Hours: 11am – 9pm DailyOther Related Entries
Ayam Penyet Ria (Lucky Plaza)
Nando’s (Bugis Junction)
Barcelos (Novena) 
ChicKing (Marina Square)
Popeyes Chicken and Biscuits (Airport T3)
2008-08-25 00:00:00
Sun with Moon Japanese Dining & Cafe – Cake in a Cage
It’s amusing to see many ladies after their fill of main courses, still having much room for sweet treats. “There is another stomach for desserts. It’s a separate space.” exclaimed a female colleague. I believe.
 
Yes, not when your supposedly sinful treat arrives in a little bird cage, ready to escape right into the gastronomical pleasure of the owner.Contemporary Japanese dining takes place at Sun with Moon Japanese Dining & Café. ‘Sun’ represents the main dishes, while ‘Moon’ appeals to the other and softer side – The desserts.The FoodThe delightful Tofu Cheese Cake ($5.50) is a must-order for many ladies. The homemade cheesecake with a crunchy biscuit bottom already scores in presentation ,as it comes cooped in a mini-cage with a paper crane within. If you don’t favour the cheesier American version, this light and petite one may just soften in your taste buds, sending the beancurd essence all around.Here are my Top 3 favourites:1. Matcha Tiramisu ($6.00)
Tiramisu means ‘pick me up’in Italian. I swear this piece right in front of me says the same. “Pick me up! Pick me Up!” If you have tried making a Tiramisu your own (like I did), you would have realized it’s extremely challenging to have up fixed. While the Matcha Tiramisu stands firmly up, the soft and delightful cream crumbles right in your mouth.2. Goma Pudding ($5.50)
It could be my penchant for anything black sesame, but the Goma Pudding does achieve the taste to the right combination. Sprinkled with white sesame seeds on top, the black sesame is neither too sweet or bitter.3. Matcha Ice Cream ($3.50)
Soft and milk green tea ice cream with azuki red bean paste on the side… Life’s pleasures can be a simple thing.The Japanese desserts are not only delicious, but pieces of art. Imagine sharing with your loved one a stick of mochi, looking at the bumboats at Clarke Quay and listening to the waves of the Singapore River. Life is Good.Sun with Moon Japanese Dining & Cafe, 01-170/71/72, 6 Eu Tong Sen Street, The Central Singapore 059817 (Closed)Other Related Entries
SUN Japanese Dining (Chijmes)
Sho Teppan (Ion Orchard)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
Pepper Lunch (Shaw House)
2008-08-21 00:00:00
5 Things You May Not Know About Xiao Long Bao
The first time I had 小笼包 (Xiao Long Bao XLB) was at China, in a 2-storey eatery which sold nothing but XLBs. That was a life-changing experience.XLB No. 1 was popped unsuspectingly into the mouth, making me cry aloud for a glass of iced water, yet enjoying the hot juice which exploded and then trickled slowly down the throat.XLB No. 2 broke immediately after my bad chopstick pierced across the translucent delicate skin, sending spills all over the bamboo basket.XLB No. 3 was carefully placed on a spoon, and I learned about the magic of sucking the soup right from the top of the dumpling. I went on to finish all 10. During which, each of the other 7 were carefully examined at how the delicious stock ‘entered’ into the dumpling.5 Things You May Not Know About Xiao Long Bao1. The broth inside is created by placing some meat gelatin inside before steaming. So it’s not injected in like what many think.2. The original Shanghai Xiao Long Bao was sold in Nanxiang, which is why Nanxiang’s XLB is considered most authentic.3. There are exactly 18 folds in each Din Tai Fung’s XLB. Go count them the next time!4. Each XLB normally weights about 21 gram and is steamed for 4 and a half minutes.5. The owners of Din Tai Fung originally sold oil at the store, and the steamed dumplings were just a side business.The next time you eat your XLB, dip them into one part soy sauce to three parts vinegar along with the ginger slivers to truly enjoy this experience.Other Related Entries
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Ju Hao Xiao Long Bao (Lavender)
Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
2008-08-20 00:00:00
Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao – Delicious but Dull
Ah… 小笼包… This ‘little basket dumpling’, seemingly small and harmless on the outside, but will burn the tongues of the unknown by the hot piping soup squirting all over in the mouth. Such pleasure and joy.Eating Xiao Long Bao is a test of your chopstick skills, a testimonial on how a ordinary looking ‘bun’ can send one up to the heavens sucking on the broth and meat wrapped delicately within. Adults have cried over split soup literally, when their rough finger-works break the skin.One of the most popular chains of restaurants in town, the Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao is constantly packed at all its branches, one can say due to the assurance of some standard quality whenever you dine there. It’s famous for its Lanzhou style noodles, northern style Chinese cuisine, and of course their steamed dumplings.Expect prompt albeit curt service, and tasty but standard fare that you can trust, like steamed and pan-fried dumplings, soups and staples.Start your meal with a selection of xiao cais (appetizers) and cold dish such as Steamed Chicken in Sichuan Style ($7.00), Mixed Century Egg and Beancurd ($6.00), or Nanjing Smoked Duck ($7.00). For something a little spicy, try the Hong You Chao Shou, steamed meat and vegetables wantons dipped in a concoction of spicy chilli oil, black vinegar and soya sauce.The signature Xiao Long Bao or Shanghai Steam Pork Dumpling ($3.60) that came in fours, looked a little sad and dull. Still, these meat dumplings were succulent and filled with piping hot, tasty broth.  We were however a little dismayed to receive a couple of them with the dumpling skin broken i.e. the soup inside had come out already. The dumplings taste best served with ginger slivers in vinegar, which removes the meaty aftertaste.The Pan Fried Pork Dumpling in Hot Plate ($4.20) is an original and novel take on the traditional steamed version, served in a hot plate on top of a thin bed of fried egg.  The only detectable difference is a much firmer skin, which had a better texture. The egg at the bottom is sadly oily and bland.The Double Boiled Chicken Soup ($6.50), on the other hand, was rich and robust, full of flavors of chicken essence in the stock and of the Jin Hua Huo Tui (cured ham – a Chinese delicacy).Another favorite is the Dan Dan Mian ($6.00). The Sichuan originated La Mian (Hand-Pulled Noodles) were springy, topped with a minced meat and mushrooms in a thick savory sauce.  The sauce was flavorsome enough, though a tad too thick.Meant more for small families and couples, the décor at this Sunetec Branch is cosy and warm lighting with serving staff tucked in a complementary dark maroon. Like all Crystal Jade outlets, it was a little too noisy, and service, although courteous and brisk, a little too brusque. Be prepared to wait up to 30 minutes just to get a table during peak hours.Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao, 3 Temasek Boulevard #B1-027 Suntec City Mall Tel:+65 63376235
Opening Hours: 11am – 9.45pm DailyOther Related Entries
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
Paradise Dynasty (Ion Orchard)
5 Things You May Not Know About Xiao Long Bao
2008-08-18 00:00:00
The Eastern Restaurant – Go Zha Jiang Mian!
Since Beijing is all talk of the town now due to the Olympics, let’s have a look at some familiar Northern Cuisines.Zha Jiang Mian 炸酱面, otherwise known as meat sauce noodles or ‘Chinese spaghetti’ is a popular noodle dish, though there are many variations. The usual version comes with minced pork stirred fried with fermented beans.Do you know the style in Beijing can be very different?Eating Zha Jian Mian at an authentic restaurant there can be as interesting as watching a performance. The waiter would come with a huge tray containing bowls of ingredients ranging from diced garlic, tofu, shallots and yellow soybean paste. After selecting the ingredients (pick ALL if you are indecisive), the serving staff will throw each ingredient into a large bowl of noodles at an amazing speed, along with clanging sounds of the bowls. An eye-popping experience.Though we have none of this clanging here, you can try a very good bowl of Noodle with Minced Meat & Mushroom in Spicy Sauce ($7.80) at the Eastern Restaurant.Although it is termed Shanghainese, the selection is the typical noodle, rice and dumplings. The Zha Jiang Mian is one of the best I had, with an abundance of brown sauce over hand-pulled noodles, along with crunchy cool cucumber on the side. While most other versions can have very dry pork or tough noodles, this one comes warm and moist.The Xiao Long Bao ($4.00 for 4 pieces) doesn’t disappoint as well. As their signature dish, it promises to be succulent with hot juice spurting out once you have a full bite into the dumplings.Some of the other dishes are a let down though. The appetizer peanuts were cold, hard and tasted past its best. The Yang Zhou Fried Rice ($9.50) was also dry and lacked the fragrance and almost felt like I was eating stale rice.The aunties were very friendly and made us feel at home, and even offered to change our order of fried rice after we ‘complained’. This restaurant has potential, with some hits and one excellent Zha Jiang Noodles, but is unfortunately chucked at a cold and sorry state of a corner behind an escalator at Centrepoint.The Eastern Restaurant, Centrepoint, 176 Orchard Road Singapore 238843  Tel:+65 6736 2638
Opening Hours: 10:00 am – 10:00 pm (Daily)Other Related Entries
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Ju Hao Xiao Long Bao (Lavender)
Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
2008-08-08 00:00:00
The Best HK Milk Tea
The best way for me to test the authenticity and taste of a Hong Kong Café is the tea they serve. It is somewhat of a ‘litmus test’ my friends and I have devised to distinguish the many shops due to the flourishing ‘Cha Can Teng’ emergence in Singapore over the past two years.Hong Kong-style milk, also known as ‘silk stocking milk tea’ is known for its darker brown colour, and thus a very slight bitter aftertaste. It also has a thickness in the texture which I would find similar to the teh tarik.So which are my favourite HK tea here? In no particular order…a) Old Hong Kong Tea House (available at Katong and Marina Square food court).
The signature is the Hong Kong Milk Tea, apparently made from 5 different tea leaves, filtered water and imported evaporated milk. The blend was perfect along with a smooth texture, ending off with a slight bitter tea aftertaste.b) Central (available at Takashimaya and Vivocity).
This version comes with red beans and chin chow which makes drinking a chewy and sweeter experience. Strange it may sound, it combines the best of both world of chendol and tea.c) Crystal Jade (available at Liang Seah opposite Bugis).
The Ice Milk Tea ($2.50) claims to come with ‘magic cubes’ – which is actually frozen cubes of tea. So that when the ice cube melts, the tea still retains its thickness. That’s quite unlike most which becomes overly diluted after minutes. A smart idea.Other Related Entries
Must Try Hong Kong Drinks
More Must Try Food at Hong Kong
Must Try Food at Hong Kong
2008-08-05 00:00:00
C Nai Hong Kong Cafe Xpress 师奶茶餐厅 – Crowded Café with a Crowded Menu
“The one at East Coast. Daniel, you must go and TRY!”When Melissa saw that I was writing on a whole series on Hong Kong cafes, she very excitedly told me to venture to the Far East. “The fried squid’s very good.  Number  430. So is the chicken in hot plate. That’s 403. Don’t get confused. Braised E-Fu Noodles too! 101.”She’s that good that she remembers the number. I don’t know how she does that especially when the items on the menu are jumbled.The Menu
A claustrophobic one with different forms of icons –TV/Media Recommended. Chef’s Recommended. New! Must try. Best Seller. Authentic Singapore. Authentic Hong Kong Best Seller. Healthy & Refreshing.No kidding. If looking at the menu doesn’t give you a headache, selecting what to eat will because almost everything is recommended.The Food
I first had the XO Sauce Fried Seafood Instant Noodles ($8.50). It resembled a plate of Mee Goreng, glazed with a layer of shiny oil with every strand of the noodles. My noodles glistered in the bright light. The addition of fried shrimps raised it from the mediocrity of ‘just another plate of Hong Kong noodles’.My friend’s HK Café Claypot Rice ($11.80) arrived close to 15 minutes later (that’s 20 minutes in total). That assured me that the rice was cooked in the claypot from scratch and not from the rice cooker. Alas, the whole dish was like a paler fairer cousin of the ones I am familiar with. Without the fragrance of Chinese sausages or dark soya sauce, the generous servings of chicken, dried scallops and mushroom didn’t save the day.The Service
The staff here has definitely went through some form of training as they were a lot more prompt and friendly. Despite the food, this can be a relaxing place to unwind after your cycling session at East Coast.C Nai Hong Kong Cafe Xpress 师奶茶餐厅, 1000 East Coast Park Marine Cove S(449876) Tel: +65 64440123
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 12pm – 12am; Fri–Sat & PH Eve: 12pm – 2.30amOther Related Entries
Xin Wang Hong Kong Café (Cineleisure)
Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong (TripleOne)
Streets Café Restaurant (Raffles City)
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
HK Kim Gary Restaurant (Vivocity)
2008-08-01 00:00:00
Tong Shui Café – Shanghai Eclectic Pink
Shocking pink and lime green walls - if ‘clash’ is the word, then clashed it shall be. With interiors said to be inspired by the Shanghai-French experience, Tong Shui is all out to make that difference.Raymond Khoo, Managing Director of Tong Shui says, “Whilst the recipes are all something that you can fix in your own kitchen, few would dream up the fun concoctions that we have”.The Ambience
With hanging red lanterns, a Chinese signboard, mahogany furniture and shockingly contrasting wall colours, the design screams “Shanghai Tang”, but without the chi chi customers or heavy price on the menu.Without accessible public transport, customers at this Zion Road branch are generally the cinema-goers at Great World, clubbers at Zouk, and executives who drove down to River Valley. Opened till 6am daily, this is definitely a place to be people-watch (or to be watched), and to watch Hong Kong movies reruns.The Food
With ‘fun’ as their main focus, the selection may surprise many with mish-mash combinations you could never imagine: Thick Toast with Melted cheese over Beef Bolognaise sauce, Yu Char Kueh with black pepper sauce, French Toast topped with Baked Beans and Luncheon Meat, Toast with D24 Durian Puree, and Fried Rice with Wolfberries… Some sounding extremely ’wrong’, now that’s a test of creativity and taste.The two best seller drinks are the HK Milk Tea, and 8-Treasures Tea. When I wrote in to enquire, they explained that there are actually more than 8 ingredients in the tea. This tea is normally served in 5-star restaurants in China, but they want customers to get that experience as well. Served in a long tumbler, the tea was rather diluted and bland, and I figured it was more of a gimmick.Chef Chiong had a special recommendation, and I felt game enough to try their Ma Lak Shanghai Chix Chop Noodles ($7.88) even though it sounded ‘suspicious’. Thank goodness it wasn’t overly spicy-fiery, and felt the chef did manage to adapt this dish to local taste.I am rather fond of their “Yum Cha Delights” – such as the Paper Wrapped Chicken and Crispy Mango Prawn Roll.  The sweet taste of the fruit complimented well with the fresh texture of the prawns. It’s also garnished with some dou miao that added some light crunch to the snack. Remember to eat your dim sums with their chilli sauce, perfectly created with fermented beans. So sedap I could eat it on its own.Tong Shui Cafe, 54 Zion Road S(247779) Tel:+65 67376946 (Closed)Other Related Entries
2008-07-30 00:00:00
Xin Wang Hong Kong Cafe (Marina Square)
The Mummy Returns at a Hong Kong Cafe. Almost quite so. You can drop by The Marina Square’s Xin Wang with terracotta warrior figurines and plaster pictures of old Chinese officials around. It’s like the Red Cliff meets The Mummy Returns 3.  High score on the interior design.This is my second write-up on Xin Wang Café. Open 24 hours on weekends and till 2am on weekdays, the café has become a popular hangout for cinema goers and ktv-poppers after a night’s out with good friends.When my friends arrived from London, I thought that the red and comfortable circular booths, and the ontemporary meets traditional ambiance would quite interest them. Wrong move apparantly.The Service
Let me make something clear first: I have nothing against the waiters and waitresses. But the major pitfall is when the serving staffs most often do not understand their customers, and are not willing to go the extra mile.My foreign friend described the waitresses here like locals cabs just before midnight. You do not see them around, or no matter how desperately you wave, they do not see you, or pretend not to see you. On the average, they take about 2-3 minutes to from the point you raise your hand to reach you. No kidding and the cafe was not even very crowded. Perhaps we were blocked by the terracotta warriors.The Food
We ordered the Mango Snow Ice with Condensed Milk ($6.90), Condensed Milk and Peanut Butter Thick Toast ($3.90), some Tim Sum and drinks. If you are very thirsty, the cold beverages cannot be thirst quenchers because they are full of ice. The Hong Kong tea was half filled with ice, and so very diluted after a while (aka tea-flavored water).The Mango Snow Ice is surprisingly refreshing with an interesting texture, unlike the normal ice-kachang you found find. The mangos are not too sour, and the overall sweetness level well balanced.  The portion is huge enough for 2 to 3 friends to share.The condensed milk and peanut butter serving was also generous. The toast was rather just standard fare and could have been softer and fluffier. As the dim sum, either it never comes, or it comes with a greasy after-taste. So stick to the micro-waved ones from your local supermarkets.The general consensus among my group of friends was that while the main dishes taste mediocre but the desserts can still draw in the young crowd.The Verdict
Service is the weakest link. The emperor would not be pleased.Xin Wang Hong Kong Cafe, 6 Raffles Boulevard #01-04/05, Marina Square S(039594) Tel:+65 63375297
Opening Hours: Mon–Thu: 11am – 2am; Fri: 11am – 4am; Sat: 10am – 4am; Sun: 10am – 2amOther Related Entries
Xin Wang Hong Kong Café (Cineleisure)
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
HK Kim Gary Restaurant (Vivocity)
C Nai Hong Kong Cafe Xpress (Marine Cove)
Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong (TripleOne)
2008-07-29 00:00:00
Wong Kok Char Chan Teng 旺角茶餐厅 – Endorsed by Ah Wang
Hong Kong’s Roger Kwok (郭晋安) better known to many as idiot-boy Ah Wang on the HK drama series endorses this café. For a hefty 7-figure sum. Now, that’s worth a lot of baked rice.Located at the Bugis Junction’s extension, it’s hard to miss this café with a huge cupboard figure of a welcoming Ah Wang.The Ambience
Predominantly orange and white with warm lighting, the Malaysia-originated café has many booth seats which is typical of Hong Kong cafe. The feel is quite right. Serving staff are dressed in matching brown uniforms, which adds to the look for professionalism.The Food
Once again, consumers are overly spoilt for choices with the very diverse menu. 510 types to be exact. For milk teas alone, they have names ranging from Sherklock, Stocking, Original, Coconut and Royal Shaker, whatever they all meant.For an appetizer, the Bacon Roll with Sweet and Sour Sauce ($7.90) was a lot more exciting than expected. The thin and fatty bacon wrapped around fish meat with a crunchy vegetable in the middle. With a slight sweet taste on the outside, the moist fillings spills like a succulent fish cake. It’s quite unlike what I have ever tasted.The Cheese Baked Rice with Pork Chop ($9.50) was disappointingly average and failed to live up to the expectations. There is a choice of sweet corn white sauce, Italian red sauce or Portuguese sauce. Wanting to be different, I picked the Portuguese sauce which tasted like curry powder from instant noodles mixed in rice.  They could be more generous with the cheese and sauce to prevent the rice from being powdery dry.The waitress recommended the Crispy Noodle with Shredded Pork in Spicy Soup ($7.30). Strange combination. It’s like drinking a mild Sichuan sweet and sour soup. I won’t call this dish delicious, but interesting enough.Executives who work nearby would be pleased with the value set lunches, each day having 3 sets to choose from. With $8.80, you can get a selected main course, soup, fruits and milk tea. I would certainly come back to give this café a second chance.The Good to Know
If you are celebrating birthdays, do inform the serving staff for a complimentary giant sized Iced Milk Tea. Ah Wang would have been very happy too.Wong Kok Char Chan Teng 旺角茶餐厅, 200 Victoria Street #02-50 Bugis JunctionOther Related Entries
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
HK Kim Gary Restaurant (Vivocity)
Central Restaurant (Vivocity)
Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong (TripleOne)
Streets Café Restaurant (Raffles City)
2008-07-28 00:00:00
Central Restaurant – Hong Kong Pick Up Sticks
It’s peculiar to see how the same brand name can differ so much in another location. Central at Takashimaya is always filled with crowds, but this branch outside Giant Vivocity is a lot quieter.The Food
The unique feature of this branch is the Pick Up Sticks, signature of what you see in the street stalls at Hong Kong. They probably were ‘inspired’ by the people at Old Hong Kong Tea House at Marina Square.Each stick costs $1.80, and 3 sticks for $5. The variety includes pig skin, octopus, fried wanton, beefball, fishball, cuttlefish, pig’s intestine, hokchew fishball, tofu fishcake and prawnball, either plain or dipped in mild curry sauce.  It’s lamentable how the sticks cannot be ordered from the menu. I was told to unsettle from my seat to step outside the restaurant to order from the kiosk, competing with those who might be buying taking away.Three out of three of the best sellers were not available – a major spoiler. Little wonder why I had to walk out to choose. The foodsticks tasted bland and it almost felt as if we were eating the same item prepared in different textures. The available dipping sauces (peanut, chilli, mustard and sweet sauce) were also a let down. Apart from the predictably safe chilli and sweet sauces, the other two were watery and mild, completely failing to rescue the food sticks.The Fried Chicken with dan dan noodles ($8.50) alone was a borderline saviour to an otherwise unsatisfactory meal. The fried chicken was not crispy although it seemed to have been cooked not too long before it was served, nor succulent. It could also have been cut into smaller bite-size pieces. The noodles sat in a spicy sauce, but it was simply hard to be enjoyable as every bite was oozing with oil.Another distinctive feature here are the durian dishes – Durian Fried Rice ($8.80), Durian and Grass Jelly ($4.00), Durian and Beancurd ($4.00), and Durian with Sago Cream ($4.00). It’s fine to be creative at times, but some things just don’t go well together.The Service
I was told off not to take pictures as I was framing the tofu. But I was just shooting the food! Apparently, many other reviewers faced the same fate. There could be a better way to approach, a sign, or a polite request. My friend suggested, “Probably there is something to hide”.Central at Takashimaya had a more vibrant and colourful ambience, serving hearty fare. And with better competitors at Vivocity, people may just give this one a miss.Central Restaurant, 1 Harbourfront Walk #B2-13/14 VivoCity S(098585) Tel:+65 63768270
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pmOther Related Entries
HK Kim Gary Restaurant (Vivocity)
C Nai Hong Kong Cafe Xpress (Marine Cove)
Xin Wang Hong Kong Café (Marina Square)
Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong (TripleOne)
Streets Café Restaurant (Raffles City)
2008-07-24 00:00:00
The Secrets Behind Hong Kong Milk Tea
I won’t pretend to be an expert, but Hong Kong Milk Tea is my ‘must-order’ every time I go to a Hong Kong café.My criteria for a fulfilling cup of 香港奶茶 are the 5 ‘S’s – silky smooth, satisfying, sweet, and ‘siap’ (slight bitter aftertaste). =)Q: Why is it called 丝袜奶茶？Do they really use woman’s stockings to sift the tea?!
A sackcloth bag with countless tiny holes is used to filter the tea leaves. The bag, reputed to make the tea smoother, gradually develops an intense brown colour which looks like a pantyhose.Q: What type of tea leaves is used? Why does the tea taste so different?
Different restaurants use various combinations, some having around 15 kinds of tea leaves mixed and fried them. A must is said to be Ceylon black tea leaves.If you want to try at home, you can use 1 tablespoon English Breakfast, Assam Black tea, Irish Breakfast, Pu-erh and Lychee black tea (which can make two cups).Q: How about the milk?
Holland “Black and White” evaporated milk is claimed to be smoother and more aromatic.Q: The proportion of milk?
Generally 1/3 of a cup. If you make a single cup, 1/3 should be evaporated, with 1 tablespoon of sweetened condensed milk.Q: How about iced milk tea?
Most cafes I notice add in ice cubes, which is not the ‘right’ way. After the ice melts, the tea will become very diluted. Some better cafes use cubes made of tea, or simply cool the tea in the fridge.Whereas most of the time, we add milk after tea is brewed, for Hong Kong tea, it’s usually the reverse. To make the tea smoother, pour it back and forth like ‘teh tarik’ Be careful not to spill your tea. Enjoy!Other Related Entries
Tsim Chai Kee (Hong Kong)
Must Try Hong Kong Drinks
More Must Try Food at Hong Kong
Must Try Food at Hong Kong
The Best HK Milk Tea
2008-07-23 00:00:00
Streets Café Restaurant 街头茶餐厅 (Raffles City)
Within the last few years, there are just too many Hong Kong Cafes sprouting around following the success of a few. While Central, Xin Wang and Tong Shui have gained a following with their distinct look and theme, I am not too sure about Streets Café Restaurant.With already two other branches at IMM and Bukit Panjang Plaza, I would not have noticed it if it wasn’t beside the prominent Shokudo at Raffles City.The fact that it is named “Streets Café Restaurant “ sound like an oxymoron, each term having its own unique feature. If an eatery wants to go Street, then think ‘dai pai dong’  大排档 where the selling point of such hawker food is in its fragrant and tastiness of the ‘wok hei’. Such food is strongly flavored due to the smell from frying in a very heated wok.The Food
The selection here doesn’t differ much from the usual ‘cha can teng’ 茶餐厅. Snack munchies, dim sum, Hong Kong style pasta, western, thick toast, nissin noodles, baked rice and fried rice are rather typical.Their difference is their menu of ‘exotic street specialities’ – Sweet and Sour Pork ($8.80), Spicy Hunan Spare Ribs ($10.80), Shanghai Style Stir Fried Chicken ($8.80), and Szechuan Style Prawns ($14.00). Hardly exotic, though very Chinese.The Cheese Baked Rice with Pork Chop ($8.50) was unsatisfactory as the meat was tough, with rice rather dry.  It could do with a richer portion of the creamy white sauce. I find that cheese baked rice should arrive very hot so that you can still taste the melting cheese blend with the moist rice.The Nissin Noodles with Chicken Chop and Egg ($6.50) was a better choice. Though you may say that people can’t go wrong with instant noodles, many eateries tend to overcook their noodles. This version still retains its bite, and the brown sauce complimented well with the meat.I ordered a Steamed Pork Siew Mai ($2.80) as I wasn’t feeling very satisfied. But the small size and mass-manufactured taste reminded me that I could be better off buying the pre-packed ones.The Service
A lot more prompt than many of the other Hong Kong cafes I have been to, it’s the main serving grace.While I couldn’t pin point anything extraordinary bad about here, the reverse is also true. Sometimes it’s more dangerous to stay in the middle, and being rather unmemorable and forgettable.Streets Cafe Restaurant, 252 North Bridge Road #B1-44C Raffles City Shopping Centre Tel:+65 63387445Other Related Entries
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
HK Kim Gary Restaurant (Vivocity)
C Nai Hong Kong Cafe Xpress (Marine Cove)
Xin Wang Hong Kong Café (Marina Square)
Wong Kok Char Chan Teng (Bugis Junction)
2008-07-18 00:00:00
HK Kim Gary Restaurant – Found My Favourite Hong Kong Café
Readers who noticed my constant critical reviews of the Hong Kong cafes told me to try Kim Gary at Vivocity. I did notice the constant queues outside and figured it was not worth the waiting. The interior design for one was not as attractive as its competitors like Xin Wang but there must be a reason for the queue.The Ambience
The ambience reminds many of a fast-food restaurant in Hong Kong – uniform green and white hard plastic cards with reflective silver decorations around. If you are lucky, you will be seated near the windows where you will be promised a view of the offshore Sentosa. The ventilation is still rather open, so it does not get too noisy even though it is constantly crowded.The Food
The menu offers a wide variety: From Hong Kong Specialty items like Minced Beef and Fried Egg Spaghetti ($6.90), Shanghai Style Vegetable Rice ($6.90 to $7.90), Hong Kong Chinese Mushroom Rice ($6.90 to $7.90), Hong Kong Spicy Noodles ($7.90 to $8.50), to Korean Spicy Mushroom Noodles ($6.50).For the budget conscious, order the Hong Kong Style Baked Rice with Cheese Combo (which range from $10.90 to $11.50) which includes a Borsch or Cream Soup, Baked Rice and Drink.The Chicken Chop version I ordered came in a timsum basket, with a choice of cream or red sauce. The cheese was lightly burnt, rice moist enough, and chicken soft and tender. The lotus leaf at the bottom added fragrance to the warm rice.  It was definitely a better version that other dry and cold rice elsewhere.The hotplates were also a popular choice, with succulent western-styled meat and chips served on a sizzling plate. The meat was nicely cooked, without being too raw or overdone. Furthermore, it was not too oily and greasy to the taste.The selection of desserts may not be as varied as some of the other cafes. I ordered a Red Bean Snow Dessert ($4.50) which really looked like a small hill of abundant red bean. I was quite thrilled until I tried the ice, somewhat coarse and unrefined, which can be described as a more expensive version of local ice kachang.The Service
There are two things I find quite memorable about Kim Gary. Firstly, the Hong Kong tea tastes like Hong Kong tea and not just tea-flavoured water. Secondly, the waitresses can speak to us politely, and offered to clear our tables. Appropriate service and understanding of English is such a rarity in other Hong Kong cafes.The bill came to below $30 for two people, and can be considered value for money in terms of its location and food. I would definitely come again, well ok – maybe if there is no queue.HK Kim Gary Restaurant, 1 Harbourfront Walk, #02-128 VivoCity, Singapore, Tel: +65 6376 8183
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Streets Cafe Restaurant (Raffles City)
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Cafe(Bugis)
Wong Kok Char Cahn Teng (Bugis)
Xin Wang Hong Kong (Cineleisure)
Xin Wang Hong Kong (Marina Square)
Central (Vivocity)
C Nai Hong Kong (East Coast)
Tong Shui Cafe (Zion Road)
Wan Chai Hong Kong Tea Room
Old Hong Kong Tea House
2008-07-15 00:00:00
Xin Wang Hong Kong Cafe – The Hang Out Place of Cineleisure
This Hong Kong Café has named itself quite aptly “Xin Wang”, which means ‘new’ and ‘prosperity’ when you look at the two words separately. Indeed, when you are forced to walk past level 2 of Cineleisure, you would almost notice queues every weekend.They know who their target crowd is - youths hanging out with their friends for light supper or leisure tea and desserts after a movie upstairs.The Ambience
The environment is very conducive for friends to chit chat till wee hours of the night. They have big red circular booths suitable for small groups from four to six, and cushioned seats which are cozy comfort for their customers.The Food
With over 200 items on the menu, their four main sellers include the Cheese Baked Dishes, French toast, Snow Ice Series and ‘Hong Kong-Style’ Western food.My friends and I ordered a Fried noodles ‘Macau style’ ($6.90), Pork Chop Cheese Baked Spaghetti ($8.90), Fried noodles with Black Pepper beef ($7.90). Ham and Egg (originally $5.90 but came as a $1 promotion), and some appetizers.Since I am very particular about Hong Kong tea, let’s start with the tea. Some may describe it to be an innovative attempt of selling tea in army-like metal mugs, while others would call it army-style tea-flavoured water. I swear that the three-in-ones taste better.The Fried Wantons we had were sadly over-fried and shriveled. The interesting thing was the waitress came over and pointed out that their wantons were… ‘different’ the moment she served it. She was friendly enough to replace them with another plate, less burnt but equally shrunk.If you are wondering what ‘Macau style’ noodles are, let me enlighten you that it is the same version of what you will get by frying instant noodles with cai xin, mixed peas, carrot and corn, two deep fried luncheon meat and ketchup-like sauce. The point is: I can also fry this at home.The Pork Chop is extremely Hard with a capital ‘H’ and be ready to make full use of your utensils. The fried beef noodles were the best choice that night, tasty but just a tad too oily.The Service
Although there has been general complains that the service staff who come from China has to be better informed of their menus, brush up their English, and smile a lot more, the waitress who served us was quite prompt and courteous. If anybody do not understand your orders, use numbers or just point!Despite all I have said, I am still a frequent customer of Xin Wang because of the convenience and environment it provides. Their target market which are the youths hanging out at Cineleisure probably do not mind the quality of the food that much as well.Xin Wang Hong Kong Cafe – 8 Grange Road #02-11, Cathay Cineleisure Orchard S(239695) Tel:+65 6235 6480 Opening Hours: Mon–Thu: 11am – 2am Fri–Sun: 24 hoursOther Related Entries
Old Hong Kong Tea House (Katong) 
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
HK Kim Gary Restaurant (Vivocity)
C Nai Hong Kong Cafe Xpress (Marine Cove)
Xin Wang Hong Kong Café (Marina Square)
2008-07-11 00:00:00
Hong Kong Cafés – Which is the Best?
Hong Kong Cafés here, there, and everywhere – they have proliferated in our country!We are not complaining. They provide us with hundreds of items of the menu. Nevermind if they are even authentic or Cantonese to begin with. From toasts, tim sums, tea-time snacks, baked rice, Nissin noodles and dessert, you can eat these food all day long. Some are even open till wee hours of the morning.我中意香港茶餐厅. How about you?We are spoilt with many options…… Old Hong Kong Tea House, Xin Wang, C Nai, Central, Kim Gary, Hong Kong Café, Wan Chai, Tong Shui, Wong Kok…. Which do you think is the best in Singapore? How do they compare to their Hong Kong counterparts?.Leave a comment and tell me why.
Also, look out for a series of HK café reviews from next week here too!.
2008-07-10 00:00:00
Ya Zhou Café 亚洲茶餐厅 – Food Court Food in a Café
It’s kind of strange. When you patronize an eatery called Ya Zhou (Asia) Café, you kind of expect a variety of Asian food such as tomyum, pho, curry, sushi, dan dan noodles or something like that.The ‘Asian’ essence of this place is that Chinese people serve Korean food in a space at Suntec City previously occupied by a Hong Kong café. Talk about globalization.The Ambience
Pity the bispectacled Chinese waitresses who have to don up in pink Korean costumes, serve food, then mop the floors with huge buckets of water. I hope they are paid well.The cafe needs a better interior designer. Black and white checked floor, violet walls, red rose pictures (something’s really wrong?), along with stacked drinks, utensils, an old metal cupboard and mops. It’s messier than my kitchen! No space in their storeroom? I don’t wish to think how the cooking space is like.The Food
Their promotion sets priced from $9.00 to $9.50 includes a hotplate dish/ramen/bibimbab/fried rice, a side dish and a lime juice. “不可以换! (cannot change)” was the reply I got when I wanted the ‘abalone’side dish changed to some dumplings.Surprise, surprise, the food was better than expected, and comes in metal chopsticks. How ‘authentic’.  The Fried Chicken Chop Ra-Myeon  炸鸡扒拉面 ($6.00) had the fried chicken placed in a separate place. The meat was rather crispy and flavourful, with the noodles not overly cooked.My Kimchi Chicken Ra Myeon ($5.00) tasted just like those served in ABC and XYZ food courts. You can probably replicate that same taste if you get the hot and spicy Shin Bowl instant noodles from the supermarket. The consolation is, they cook their instant noodles well.The Mandu (otherwise known as guotie/gyōza depending on which culture you look at it) was nicely deep-fried, but that’s not the pan-fried dumplings we have expected. And yes, they probably come from the pre-packed ones from NTUC. So don’t ever bring your Korean friends here.Ya Zhou Cafe, 3 Temasek Boulevard #B1-058A Suntec City Mall
Opening Hours: 10am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Just Acia (Dhoby Ghaut )
2008-07-08 00:00:00
Shokudo Japanese Food Bazaar – The Japanese Food Court
Marche and Villagé…… The former vacated its former space at Heeren; the other came, imitated and left. Enter the new kid of the block: Shokudo, a Japanese concept Marche, now occupies a huge space at the revamped Raffles City basement.Meaning ‘dining room’ and conceptualised by the Thai Express people, Shokudo has continued to attract queues of people at all times of the day.The Ambience
It took me JUST 10 minutes before I got my place on a weekday night. After taking a payment card (be careful not to lose it or you will pay a $100 fine), my friends and I were brought in to what I felt was like playground.Like a wide-eyed young child looking amazed, I skipped around to check out the various visual stimuli of the bazaar. Wah, there are segments of harajuku cityscape, manga art, children’s playground, contemporary modern and even neoprint machines. A different setting for everyone.Plus point. The energy is quite high in the whole bazaar, and you sense the very positive and lively vibes around. The vibrant and colourful mood makes you want to eat more.The Food
Every type of cuisine is sold in separate booths and mostly freshly prepared. You can find almost every common Japanese favourites here: from sushi, teppankayi, yakitori, pasta, dons, ramens, shashimi, hot pots, soups, tempura and the popular omelette rice. Shokudo know their competitors well, and even serve Marche-famous rosti. But few do it as good as the original.Many bloggers feel that this is an overhyped place with mediocre food. Common complaints were that service is also less than desirable.My friends and I had major greviences, except that the cream soup was too thin and don rice rather dry which needed more sauce. The three of us ordered A LOT, and spent about $20-25 per person. Quite reasonable.  It is no Japanese restaurant standard, but certainly beats going to a food court anytime. As to which are the recommended stalls, look out for the queues.This bazaar is probably targeting at the working executives and youths. It’s quite a suitable place to hold class outings, lessening the problem of splitting cash. Don’t expect too much, and you may be pleasantly surprised. Shokudo may be considered a fad, but I certainly hope it doesn’t land up like Villagé.Shokudo Japanese Food Bazzar, B1-44E Raffles City Shopping Centre Tel:+65 68373793
Opening: 11:30am – 10:00pmOther Related Entries
Medz (Orchard Central)
Fisherman’s Market (The Central)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
Let’s Sweet (Bugis)
Ebiboshi Shotengai(Bugis Illuma)
2008-07-07 00:00:00
Loy Kee Best Chicken Rice – For Your Hainanese Fix
Wanting to satisfy my chicken rice cravings, I went to the Loy Kee’s main branch at Balestier and was greeted with a warm smile and a nod from this lady behind the cashier.The shop is plastered with pictures of celebrities like Michelle Yim, Martin Yan and Charmaine Sheh (but somehow I wonder ‘why always those few celebs’ haha). And that’s when I realised that the same bespectacled lady is Mrs Loy (Mdm Jane Tan) herself! Like a little fan, I whipped out my camera for a picture together.Other than the framed celeb pictures, this coffee shop-like eatery oozes out some nostalgic charm with marble tables, big chairs and swirling fans.Loy Kee has been one of the names synonymous with the famous local Hainesese dish. Once voted as the Best Chicken Rice in Singapore in the 1990s, it has expanded far and wide to several food branches. With an amazing heritage and reputation since 1953, the common complaint is standards have dropped ever since.Other than the standard sets which comes with chicken, vegetable, rice and soup, they have varied to serve breakfast, lunch and dinner. The menu includes Curry Chicken Rice, House Laksa, Roasted Pork Noodles, Nasi Lemak and House Macaroni.Despite all the competition, I still enjoy the chicken meat, being thin and tender with a slight touch of oil and succulence (some chicken can be too thick or dry). The rice is slightly on the dry side and I would prefer it to be a tad oilier. But the truth is, chicken rice is very subjective and there are probably different camps on separate side.The noodles were springy. I like.I also had the Seafood Mini Steamboat which had a mixture of pork organs, abundant bean sprouts and some seafood served in a claypot bowl constantly heated up with a burning flame. With two slices of fish and prawns, you can literally count the seafood.Ever since Loy Kee first started out at Whampoa Drive, it still attracts a loyal following. But we shall await for omy voters to decide  which is their favourite chicken rice seller.Loy Kee Best Chicken Rice, 342 Balestier Road (Next to Shaw Plaza) Tel: +65 6252 2318
2008-07-03 00:00:00
Whatever Cafe – It’s Vege-Paradiso at Whatever
Vegetarians can rejoice at Whatever Café (not to be mistaken for that ‘Whatever/Anything’ canned drink), a diner fronted by the “mystical” Whatever Yoga/Bookstore/Healing Space along the very hip Keong Saik Street.Dining amidst mystical New Age books, Tarots, Astrological charts, enchanting Angelic charms, Wiccan spells and healing crystals, the menu features healthy, organic salads, hearty soups, nutritious and organic pastas, pizzas and sandwiches, as well as guilt-free cakes.The Food
My dining partner and I sampled the Grilled Vegetables Salad, the Mushroom and Potato Soup and the Roasted Veg Oven Baked Lasagna.The Roasted Antipasto Salad (S$10.90) was a feast for the eyes and was as tasty as it looked. Large strips of red and yellow bell peppers, chunky pieces of zucchinis, pumpkins and aubergines, grilled with olive oils, amidst a pile of fresh and invigorating rockets, crunchy greens, cherry tomatoes and onions, dressed generously with balsamic vinegar and extra virgin olive oil. Roasted garlic cloves add a delicious aroma to this very refreshing yet appetizing dish.Blended mushroom, potatoes and garden herbs make up the dairy-free Mushroom and Potato Soup (S$7.90).  The soup was really rustic in taste and presentation, full of the earthy flavor and heady fragrance of the mushrooms, with the potato lending a little starchiness and wholesomeness to the soup.The Roasted Veg Lasagna ($11.90) looked a little sloppy in presentation but was surprisingly original in taste and delicious.  We found thick slices of pumpkin, zucchinis, aubergines, between layers of hot pasta sheets and tomato sauce, capped with gooey, sinfully-rich, melted cheese and sprinkled with grated parmesan cheese.Under “Lifestyle Enhancements” in the menu are freshly squeezed juices (S$7.90) in an array of interesting and adventurous combinations. Equally exotic are their names, like Oriental Magic (coriander, ginger and pineapple), Red Eye Special (melon, mint, parsley, spinach) and High Flyer (apple, beetroot, carrot and spinach).The Carrot and Walnut Cake (S$6.50/slice) was dairy-free, glutten-free, wheat-free and egg-free, as most cakes offered in the selection, but surprisingly did not lack in flavour. We suggest pairing it with any Numi Organic fruit tea (S$5.00).The Service
Service staff was friendly and efficient, making this visit an enjoyable one. At Whatever, it is not just the food, but the whole experience which counts.20, 29A & 31 Keong Saik Road Chinatown S(089138) Tel:+65 62210300 (Closed)
2008-07-01 00:00:00
The Ship – Come Aboard for the Old School Supporters
You can call me an old fuddy-duddy in a young man’s body. I listen to the Carpenters and Air Supply, and still enjoy Channel 5’s rerun of Growing Up. My idea of a romantic dinner can be very old school – at somewhere like The Ship.Like love’s endless maze, you probably have to navigate your way through to Level 4 of Shaw Centre till the end of the ship. Be pleasantly surprised. The Ship should probably enter Singapore’s history book one day.The Ambience
With dimly lit interiors, candle lighted tables, red booths and white table cloths, The Ship emulates the inside of a marine vessel.  The whole décor probably didn’t change much since it started 27 years ago. It was like a travel back in time when I enjoyed Western treats at Jack’s Place and Han’s with my mum. This is where you would may want to bring someone for that romantic first date.The Food
The Ship is well-known for its steak. Some recommendations are the Ship Steak ($34.90) a US sirloin served with rich black and white mushroom sauce and flamed with brandy, the Chef’s Special ($30.90) from New Zealand, and New York Steak ($31.90) sirloin with maitre d’hotel butter served with vegetables and potatoes.For the budget conscious, they also have combination meals, and set lunches/dinners . With taste of its authentic Hainanese origins still remaining, the chicken rice and sliced fish noodle lunch sets are popular among executives.I had the Fish and Chips ($18.90) and Chicken Spaghetti with White Cream Sauce ($18.90) sets which comes with soup and coffee/tea. The fish was quite good stuff – succulent and fresh without being too oily. The chicken though tender, reminded me of the ones I had at Han’s. Good or bad, you decide.The Ship Restaurant & Bar 船餐厅酒店, 1 Scotts Road, #04-34 Shaw Centre, Singapore, Tel: +65 6235 2235
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Infusion (Dempsey)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill (Marina Square)
Astons Specialities (Cathay)
Relish (Cluny Court)
Sunset Grill and Pub (Seletar Airbase)
2008-06-30 00:00:00
Pu Tien Restaurant 莆田菜馆 – Delectable Flavours of Simple Village Life
Seeking a Chinese restaurant for family meals, one often finds it hard to find a suitable place: too crowded, too expensive, or too flavourful. Pu Tien, however, should be a suitable solution. Mr Fong who started this restaurant a few years back, wanted to cater to the minority Heng Hwa dialect group staying in Singapore.I used to intern nearby, and have seen this little shop expand from a little eatery to the well-known restaurant it is now. And many of the waitresses have remained the same.The two-storey restaurant is tucked away at the run-down shophouses at Kitchener Road near Mustafa Centre. They have recently renovated with an identity mismatch. Opt for the classier Chinese contempory look on the 1st storey, or the earthy Chinese restaurant feel on the 2nd. Do not be confused with a similar sounding ‘Pu Tien Seafood’ just few shops away. This is the real McCoy.By the way, if you like the interior design downstairs (but not upstairs as it is done by a different designer), it’s the same ID who did up my place (http://loydpek.blogspot.com/). So eating at Pu Tien feels like eating at home!While you expect most waitresses at such a busy place to be rude and impatient, the service staff was adequate and ready to explain their recommendations. They were also quick to clear dirty plates and divide food portions for the table.This restaurant is known for ‘Pu Tien’ specialties, a city in Fujian famous for seafood and beehoon products.  Heng Hwa cuisine, characterised by simple dishes that brings out the true flavours of the ingredients. Its specialties include Bamboo Herbal Prawn, Steamed Soon Hock, Fried Egg Plant with Pork floss, Stir Fried Yam and Steamed Razor Clams in Rice Wine.You know how you always get sweet and sour pork which is more flour and fat than meat elsewhere? The Lychee Sweet and Sour Pork offer pieces which are and succulent tender, finished with the sweet taste of lychee. Perfect combination.The Stir Fried Yam is deceivingly simple, but you can’t stop eating the yam cubes with its crispy sweet coating and soft inside.Most herbal soup items elsewhere would have been too strong with a heavy smell. With fresh succulent prawns boiled with herbal soup in a bamboo container, this signature dish of Bamboo Herbal Prawn is both novel and light to the taste.If you are a fried bee hoon fan like me, you have not tried the best until you tried the Heng Hwa Bee Hoon. It is cooked in stock with minimal ingredients like peanuts and clams, garnished with strips of seaweed.  The surprisingly thin and tasty bee hoon is imported all the way from China, which assures diners of its traditional taste and quality.Even though the restaurant has earned rave reviews, they still keep their prices low which range from $8 to $25 a dish, and only $4 for the bee hoon. If your family does not order too much seafood, the price can come to below $20 per person.Pu Tien is a value-for-money restaurant suitable for family lunches and dinners, offering a simple yet scrumptious fare from this lesser-known dialect group.My nephew Zhi Ying at Pu Tien. Cute or Not?127 Kitchener Road, Desker Road Conservation Area Singapore 208514 Tel: +65 62956358
Opening Hours: Lunch: 12pm – 3pm; Dinner: 6pm – 11pmOther Related Entries
Zhou Kitchen (Far East Square)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Noodle Star (Bugis Village)
2008-06-27 00:00:00
Grand Shanghai 大上海 – In The Mood of Old Shanghai
Enter the world of Grand Shanghai and you will be transported back into the olden city in the 1960s. Red cloth, dark wood, green lanterns, and black and white photos are central to the thematic decor. Immerse in a musical journey as the live jazz band plays the evergreens of Teresa Tseng and Cai Qin, belted by a songstress with a mesmeric voice and beehive hair.You can choose to come with your family of ten, or strike a business deal at the cosy cushioned corner suitable for four to five. The serving staff is dressed in a uniform of maroon top and black bottoms, and ensures that your jasmine tea is always filled.The elaborate decor and price is an indication that this is a dining place for businessmen to sign deals or for that special family celebration. The specialty dishes include Crispy Duck ($48 for whole), Baked Rice with Crab ($38 per portion), Deep Fried Prawn with Special Sauce ($8 per 100gm), Braised Superior Sharks Fin in Brown Sauce ($45), and Wuxi Spare Ribs ($7 per piece). You can opt for the set menus which range from $48 to $88 per person.Shanghai dishes are usually characterized by the use of heavy and highly flavored sauce. Although the chefs hail from Shanghai, the food is modified to suit local taste, and thus not typically ‘Shanghainese’.  They also serve specialty dishes from Yunnan, Beijing to Wuxi.Despite the rather hefty prices to the dishes, the food here was slightly disappointing. The Crispy Duck, which is a cross between ‘kong bak pau’ (pork in dark soya sauce) and Beijing Duck, was not crispy and too bony for my liking.The Wuxi Spare Ribs could have been a lot softer, and still had a slight lingering smell of pork.  Although there were bean sprouts which added some crunch to the sharks fin soup, the taste was not exquisite enough and the stock was bland enough to need more flavours.The consolation was the Deep Fried Prawn with Special Sauce, lightly fried with a unique salty taste of hot sauce within the shell. I suspect that the restaurant is also better at their cold dishes such as Crispy Eel ($14) which was sweet and light to the crunch, and smooth and tender Drunken Chicken ($12).If you want to spend the night ala Wong Kar Wai’s “In the Mood for Love” style, you would appreciate the setting which looks transported from his movie set. The nostalgic atmosphere will be suitable for mothers who sing along to Teresa Tseng’s Xiao Cheng Gu Shi . This is a place you pay for the lovely ambience and experience, but not for the food.Grand Shanghai, 390 Havelock Rd Level 1 Grand Copthorne Waterfront Hotel Singapore 169662 Tel:+65 6836 6866
Opening Hours: Tue–Fri & Sun: 11.30am–2.30pm, 6.30pm–10.30pm; Sat: 6.30pm–10.30pm (Closed on Mon)Other Related Entries
Zhou Kitchen (Far East Square)
Royal China (Raffles Hotel)
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Noodle Star (Bugis Village)
2008-06-24 00:00:00
Crystal Jade Kitchen 翡翠小厨 (Causeway Point) – Generous Duck Servings with Generous MSG
Crystal Jade is becoming like MacDonalds. Its everywhere, with 10 branches of ‘Kitchen’s alone. However, we can still fall back on the brand to provide us with reasonable food, especially when you are at Causeway Point where quality food is rather deficient.A little background info on this particular meal: Apparently, I give special luck on my closed ones, from good friends, colleagues to dates. (Hah, but I have never won before in this 4-number game.) My office roommate Ah Chek was nice enough to give some of us a treat after striking again (again, and again) in lottery. (The identity of Ah Chek will be kept secret to protect him from money loaners.)The Ambience
The Crystal Jade ‘Kitchen’ concept has a Hong Kong slant – serving Dim Sum, BBQ pork, Congee, Noodles and other Cantonese Cuisines. I have a particular liking for Cantonese food, for its rich flavours (zhong kou wei) and fragrant roasted meat.This restaurant is crowded and noisy, catering to large groups of families and office workers. With Cantonese sprouting waitresses, and the frequent use of red, green and gold on their slightly old-fashioned décor, I felt as if I was transported to a Kowloon restaurant.The Food
Their signature dishes rarely fail. If you order the Dim Sum, Noodles and Congee, you would expect a certain taste that is quite consistent in the different branches.The group of us had a Peiking Roast Duck set ($58) for a change. While the duck skin was crispy and oily, the black sauce that accompanied was quite salty and masked the natural flavours of the egg wrap and duck meat. The vegetable sticks lacked the cool crunch which would give the refreshing aftertaste.For the rest of the duck meat, we were recommended by the friendly waitress for it to be fried with eggplants. The picture says it all. The visual presentation was shockingly hideous, and the extremely bony duck made the eating experience rather cumbersome. But to be fair, it tasted a lot better than how it looked.Unfortunately, the other claypot chicken with yam had more bones than meat too, nothing like those served in other branches. Even if the Cantonese dishes are generally more flavourful comparatively, this branch may be too generous with their MSG. No jackpot for this Crystal Jade.Crystal Jade Kitchen 翡翠小厨, Woodlands Square #04-43/44, Causeway Point Shopping Centre S(738099) Tel: 68935505
Opening Hours:Daily 11am – 10pm (last order 9.45pm)Other Related Entries
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
Crystal Jade La Mian Xiao Long Bao (Suntec City)
Pu Tien Restaurant (Kitchener Road)
The Eastern Restaurant (Centrepoint)
Nanxiang Steamed Bun Restaurant (Plaza Singapura)
2008-06-20 00:00:00
Aerin’s – Dive For The Desserts
Sex and The City in Raffles City? Well, close. Just imagine 4 women hanging out Aerin’s, gossiping and enjoying the chic bistro dining next to the Raffles City fountain. They would sip their latte, gasp over the delectable European cuisines, and laugh at men in the open-setting.Well, almost. I didn’t fall into that category. Eat yes, but talk no. But in a very rare occasion where the four ‘reality junkies’ (who my ex colleagues call ourselves) met, we did dine, talked and laugh over ridiculous contestants in American’s Next Top Model.Aerin’s, named after the daughter of the owner (the same person behind Whitebait & Kale), is a great eatery to unwind after a day’s work or shopping for shoes.  This can also be the place to people-watch and be people-watched.The Food
The menu is quite wide-ranging, offering main courses, salads, sandwiches, pasta, gourmet tea, desserts and cakes that could get you coming back at all times of the day.I had a set pasta ($23) which offered Pumpkin Soup, Linguine with Salmon Trout and Cherry Tomato in Capers Cream Sauce, and a Cecilia’s Creation of the Day.The Pumpkin Soup was delightfully light and not too creamy. With freshly grated nutmeg on it, there was a slight fragrance of butternut pumpkin as well. The different main courses the four of us had ranged from ordinary to suitably delicious.Now the highlight of the night: The desserts! The ladies went “ga-ga yummy yum yum” over the Warm Chocolate Pudding ($5.80). Before savaging the nicely textured raspberry swirl ice cream, it was appealing to see it blend with the oven baked valrjona manjari while it was still steaming hot. My friend Serene said, “Better than the one at B***’s Inn”. Heavenly!Hold your horses for the Baked Apple and Rhubard Pie, because you must kill time for 15 minutes after ordering. It’s really worth the wait. After finishing the vanilla bean ice cream at the top and removing the crispy over-baked pug pastry, you can dig into a sweet-sour mix of granny-smith apples. The ladies’ faces really changed to a wider smile, the kind of look when they spotted a desired pair of shoes at half-price.The Good To Know
Do not bring outside food in, and I mean DO NOT. One forum customer complained that he was charged $2.50 for a donut brought in. There’s even a sign outside which said they would charge a certain amount. I won’t reveal the amount, but I feel that’s quite uncalled for.252 North Bridge Road #B1-11/12 Raffles City Shopping Centre S(179103) Tel:+65 63372231
Opening Hours: 11am – 10pm DailyOther Related Entries
Rock & Ash (Marina Square)
Infusion (Dempsey)
Hippopotamus Restaurant Grill  Marina Square)
LENAS (Bugis Junction)
Out Of The Pan (Raffles City)
2008-06-19 00:00:00
Ji De Chi 记得吃 – Remember To Eat
Walking along Liang Seah Road, I would always notice this space currently occupied by “Ji De Chi” (JDC), translated as ‘remember to eat’. This shop space has probably changed hands several times in a span of three years, from a bao stall, mango dessert place to bak kut teh shop from what I can remember.The Food
JCD serves the typical desserts from Sesame Paste, Almond Paste, Walnut Paste, Red Bean Paste and even Yin-Yang (a black-white combination of sesame and almond paste). The price is very reasonable at about $2.00 for a bowl. Its specialties include Ginger Juice with Fresh Milk, Mango and Grapefruit Juice with Herbal Jelly and Mango and Hasma, ranging from $4.00 to $5.50.The desserts are tasty, but easily forgettable. It can probably fulfill your sweet tooth craving, but it’s not a place you would come back again and again. The main factor is perhaps it lacks of a unique selling point or signature dish.They serve some food items like Yam Cake, Carrot Cake, and Hakka Yam Abacus. But the few times I went, they were seldom available except one or two items.  You shouldn’t expect restaurant quality service, but the ‘aunties’ here are patient with orders, adhering to special requests for combinations (such as glutinous balls in almond soup).The Ambience
The major put-off would be the ambience – white washed walls, grey floors, and shaky tables. Little money was spent on interior décor unlike its previous owners. Don’t get me wrong. The desserts are definitely edible. But remember there’s Ah Chew opposite which are definitely more popular.Ji De Chi 记得吃, 8 Liang Seah Street #01-03 S(189029) Tel: +65 63399928
Opening Hours: Sun–Thu: 11am – 11pm; Fri–Sat: 11am – 11.30pmOther Related Entries
Ah Chew Desserts
Swirl Art (Liang Seah)
Honeymoon Desserts (Vivocity)
Dessert Cup (Raffles City)
2008-06-16 00:00:00
Fish & Co – Masters of the Sea
Fish & Co. has been around for 10 years! When it first opened at Plaza Singapura, it scored with us (the youths then…sigh) immediately with its generous and succulent portions of fish served in a pan. While most other eateries diversified, they stood to what they did best – just seafood, and very fresh indeed.It became a place where I had several class gatherings and fond memories. And since my friend Jinquan would be leaving the country,  for his ‘last meal’ with us, he picked Fish and Co at The Glass House (previously occupied by T.G. I. F).The Ambience
Designed to feel casual, relaxed and warm, Fish & Co. is popular among students and young executives. This main store remains cheery, noisy and vibrant. It was not the most ideal choice for this gathering as we could not hold a decent conversation in the noise.If you have a friend celebrating a birthday, do get the staff to sing their signature ‘Fish and Co’ birthday song for that special touch. Other than that, there is always a live band performance for dedications. And as we expected, our ‘ge shen’ Jinquan took over the mike and sang “You’re Beautiful” with loud cheers from the crowd.The Service
The staff remains cheery and do attend to your needs, on the condition that they are free and DO notice you. For that refill on the cup, be prepared to work your triceps and wave for a long, long time.The Food
The favorites here are the Grilled or Fried Calamari ($9.50), Fish and Chips ($13.90), Seafood Platter for Two ($37.90) which is a platter of seasonal fish, calamari, prawns and mussels in creamy garlic and lemon butter sauce. They have some latest additions such as Baked Ginza Salmon ($17.90), Peri Peri Catch ($15.90) and pasta dishes from fettuccini to spaghetti.While diversifying into pasta is an aim to please varying customers, the result may not be ideal. I tried the Prawns Fettuccini with Chilli Cream ($14.50). The pasta was not well cooked, and the half-spicy sauce did not blend well with the seafood.The Seafood Platter is now a combination of shrunk fish, rubbery sotong, overcooked prawns and less buttery rice. The overall freshness and fragrance it used to have seemed to have faded away. I suppose that is inevitable with the expansion.As to Jinquan’s choice of his ‘last meal’, we joked that this should be the last mistake he would make here.The HCJC Choir gang @ Fish and Co The Glass House 2008The HCJC Choir gang @ Fish and Co Plaza Sing 9 years ago!Fish & Co, The Glass House, 9 Penang Rd #01-24, Park Mall S(238459) Tel:+65 63341858
Opening: 11:30am – 10:00pmOther Related Entries
Manhattan Fish Market (Plaza Singapura)
2008-06-13 00:00:00
Yong He Eating House 永和豆浆油条大王 – They Shouldn’t Have Moved
Most would say the best place for suppers in this Singapore is Geylang. Beyond the sleazy lanes, colourful lights and you-know-what, this is the place for ‘sinful indulgence’.My supper kakis and I have our usual routine – round 1 claypot frog porridge, round 2 beef horfun, or dim sum and always ending off with Yong He soya bean. For the longest time, we wondered where the familiar Yong He has moved to, and we finally found it at Lor 27A.The new location is definitely more spacious, clean and airy. Thank goodness we found a parking space almost immediately. Well, this is Geylang so don’t expect good service (errr… not otherwise), but the aunties will respond if you wave or call them loudly. Some are actually quite friendly if not busy.The regulars would order a sweet soya bean drink ($1.20), dough sticks ($1.00), toasted bun with egg and pork floss ($2.80) and steamed dumplings ($5.00). The new shop has some latest additions of sweet and sour soup ($2.00), fried beehoon ($2.50) and braised meat rice ($2.50) available lunchtime onwards.If you are really adventurous or want to play a sabotage game with your friends, you can try the saltish soya bean ($1.70). This ‘drink’ comes in bowl and will be an experience of a lifetime. Good or bad, you decide. (No pictures or description provided because I think it’s better for a surprise.)My favourite item here is the long youtiao which is always cripsy and fluffy. Unfortunately, the standard of some items have dropped a little. The soya bean drink was thin and sweet (Tiong Bahru’s Teck Seng anytime), toasted bun dry and cold, and Taiwanese mee sua too starchy and peppery.  Inflation has also set in on every food item.The brand name ‘Yong He’ has been synonymous with quality soya products in Taiwan and China. In Singapore, we have our alternatives.517 Geylang Road (Near Lorong 27A) Tel: Tel: +65 6745 5682
Opening Hours: 24 hours DailyOther Related Entries
Yong He Eating House (Geylang)
Ah Tai (Chinatown)
Lai Lai Family Restaurant (Bugis)
Xi Men Ding (Vivocity)
I Love Taimei (Bugis)
2008-06-11 00:00:00
Wan Chai Hong Kong Tea Room – Your Favourite Neighbourhood Café
If you have noticed, almost every key district in the up-market Hong Kong Island has been used to name the tea cafés in Singapore. So when “Central” and “Causeway Bay” are both taken, the next better known (or lesser known) district is “Wan Chai”.The Ambience
The interior is nothing to scream about. With a typical pictorial wall featuring a black and white Hong Kong skyline, and wooden and plastic chairs, you wished the café has more character.The Food
Termed as “Your favourite neighbourhood café”, the fares served include the standard noodles, baked rice, thick toast and desserts. Just to be unusual, I ordered a “Yuan Yang” (mixture) item from each of the sections.The cheese baked Yuan Yang Rice ($8.80) had a combination of pork chop and seafood. The white creamy part with servings of fish, mussel and unshelled prawn was the better tasting side as it still had a savour of seafood freshness. The red side was unevenly mixed, resulting in the rice being very bland and dry.One would expect the dessert Yuan Yang Cream ($2.80) to look like an authentic taijitu (yin yang symbol). Unfortunately, it came unsightly looking, with the gobbets of black sesame cream over the almond looking like more droppings. While it’s thick and grounded daily, the cream could have been more evenly stirred for a smoother taste.The hot coffee-tea ($1.40) was the saving grace with the appropriate blend of the two. Do be warned that the cold version ($3.00) would be topped with ice cream, although it was not mentioned in the menu.The Good To Know
There is no service charge and GST has already been included. Value! If you are familiar with the Hong Kong MTR, my personal ranking for these 3 Hong Kong cafes would be in line with the route. Central, followed by Wan Chai Hong Kong Tea Room, with Causeway Bay Cafe the bottom of the lot.Wan Chai Hong Kong Tea Room, 9 Bishan Place #01-49 Junction 8 S(579837) Tel: 62504450
Opening Hours: 8.30am – 9.30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Crystal Jade Hong Kong Café (Orchard Central)
C Nai Hong Kong Cafe Xpress (Marine Cove)
Wong Kok Char Chan Teng (Bugis Junction)
Imperial Treasures Windows of Hong Kong (TripleOne)
Streets Café Restaurant (Raffles City)
2008-06-09 00:00:00
The Manhattan Fish Market – Yes to the Seafood Platter
With their signature fish and chip served in shallow metal pans with three types of sauces, Manhattan Fish Market is often seen as the closest rival to the other fish company, Fish and Co. Their similarities are uncanny, from the menu, décor to price. Both also had their first flagship store at Plaza Singapura.A little on the background: Manhattan Fish Market’s director was a former operations manager in Fish & Co and started out an outlet at Malaysia during 2002, and subsequently in Singapore. After being sued and lost to Fish and Co during a court case last year, Manhattan had changed their serving pans and modified their ingredients as directed.Expect to wait from 15 minutes to half an hour for a table during peak hours. The guys at Manhattan also seem to know that service is just as important as the food they serve. Service was prompt and the waiters were quick to serve and refill water. Although they seemed somewhat nervous at times, the young crew was generally friendly and took initiative despite the heavy traffic.The Food
Manhattan Fish and Chips ($9.90), Alaskan Pollock and Chips ($10.90), Grilled Norwegian King Salmon Fillet ($15.90), and Almond Fried Shrimps ($10.90) are some of their signature dishes. Unfortunately, they do not have the Baked Fish in Garden Herbs anymore, nor the Barramundi topped with Sambal Sauce which are served in their Malaysian branches.For a safe choice, opt for The Manhattan Fish and Chips with fish which is freshly fried in light batter, and does not have a strong fish smell. The straight fries, which are not too fat and thick, stay crispy for a long time.The Manhattan Seafood Platter for Two ($29.90) is an all-time favourite for customers who want value for money. The portion is huge which includes one piece of battered fish, 4 flammed prawns, fried calamari, fried oysters, chips and garlic rice. The weakest link however is the garlic rice which is slightly dry and unsavory.One major selling point of Manhattan is a gimmicky ‘flaming’ of the grilled and seasoned prawns, done right in front of your very eyes. This ‘flaming’ makes a sweet mayonnaise-like sauce melt over the prawns and the rice, bringing out the fragrance of the buttery platter. This unique (and albeit a bit gimmicky) process made the prawns very juicy on the inside, and crispy with a touch of soot on the shells. A nice torch. (Pardon the pun!)The Ambience
Can be too crowded and extremely noisy. The last time I went, there was this group of girls whose chattering were simply deafening! Quiet girls! (The school I shall not name. Brrr…)The Manhattan Fish Market, 68, Orchard Rd #06-07, Plaza Singapura S(238839) Tel: +65 6835 9310
Opening Hours: 11am – 9:30pm DailyOther Related Entries
Fish & Co (The Glass House)
2008-06-07 00:00:00
Lerk Thai Restaurant – ‘Select’ in Thai
Many people still call the ‘Lerk’ Thai chain of restaurants ‘Jerk’ Thai, no thanks to the logo.  The chain is started by the Select Group Ltd, which many should be familiar with their catering business and ‘cai peng’ (Chinese rice). And to no surprise, ‘Lerk’ means ‘Select’ in Thai.The Food
Some of their recommendations include the Gai Hor Bai Toey (Deep Fried Pandan Leaf Chicken), Nuer Prik Thai Dum (Beef with Black Pepper), Gaeng Kiew Whan Talay (Green Curry Seafood) and Pla Muerk Nung Manow (Steam Cuttlefish with Hot, Sour and Spicy Sauce).The dining experience was destined to be a mediocre one with a bad start of the Thai Ice Tea. It lacked of the unique Thai ice tea flavour and was very diluted like drain water. Even the Nescafe version I made myself tasted a lot richer.The Pahd Thai (Fried Thai Kway Teow) was rather ordinary and bland. My guess was there wasn’t enough seasoning used such as the fish cause and tamarind juice. What I like about this dish is that the peanuts and bean sprouts supposedly give the extra crunch to the light noodles.  The peanuts must have been left in the open for too long, and therefore tasted ‘lao hong’ (airy)!Even the cashew nuts on the Thai Olive Rice was ‘lao hong’.  But to be fair, the rest of the rice was quite tasty.The greatest disappointment was the Peek Gai Sod Sai (Boneless Chicken Wing Stuffed with Minced Chicken and Thai Herbs) which came in an seemingly artificial orange colour. The chicken had a strong chicken taste, which felt rather raw as it lingers.
 
The Service
The consolation was that the service staff was friendly and attended to requests quite promptly.Lerk Thai Restaurant, 10 Sinaran Drive #02-65/66/67 Novena Square 2 S(307506) Tel:+65 63972282 (Closed)Other Related Entries
Thai Noodle House (Coronation Road)
Flying Chillis (313 @ Somerset)
Suan Thai Restaurant (Killiney Road)
Thaksin Beef Noodles (Clementi)
Coffee Stars by Dao (Wisma Atria)
2008-06-05 00:00:00
Lai Lai Family Restaurant 来来红烧牛肉面 – For Taiwanese Street Fare
While Hong Kong eateries are springing up all over Singapore, the same cannot be said for Taiwanese food. To curb cravings for authentic Taiwanese beef noodles, the most decent place would be Lai Lai Family Restaurant which is conveniently located along Liang Seah Street.I ordered the Best Value Set A ($12.20 nett) which included the specialty beef noodles, one side dish and a bubble tea. The origins of this signature dish supposedly hails from the Sheraton Hotel in Taipei and is made up of fresh egg noodles, dark beef broth, accompanied by three different cuts of beef shins.The broth is strong in herbs and spices, very flavourful and somewhat spicy with its pepperish undertones. (Okay, my friend complained it was too herbal though.) It tastes best if you add in the preserved vegetables and dried chilli, a combination which can mask the taste of the beef. Though I am not a fan of carbs, the noodles is tangy and not too thick. Few eateries can cook beef well as they are either too raw and rubbery, or well-done and tough.Some of the popular side dishes include Pepper Salt Chicken, Flower Squid, Braised Pork Slice, Century Egg Tofu. As a fan of Taiwanese fried hawker fare, the Pepper Salt Chicken was my first choice.My take is: Too much salt and too little pepper. The chicken were slightly too dry and would have been much better had they been chunkier and juicier. The Century Egg Tofu, if served very cold, can be an interesting blend. More pork floss would have made it perfect though.  As for the other two, the Flower Squid is more rubbery rings than crispy calamari. While the braised pork slice is neatly and thinly cut up, the slices do not melt in your mouth immediately.The restaurant can get rather crowded during peak hours. But do not take the seats upstairs. As it is an enclosed place, it can become a too noisy due to poor architectural acoustics. Plus they were blasting Jay Chou the last few times I went. So if you are not a fan…Lai Lai Family Restaurant, 20, Liang Seah St S(189041) Tel: +65 68371556Other Related Entries
I Love Taimei (Bugis Village)
Ah Tai (Chinatown)
Lu Gang Xiao Zhen (Ion Orchard)
Yong He Eating House (Geylang)
Xi Men Ding (Vivocity)
2008-06-04 00:00:00
The Cheesecake Cafe – A Slice of Heaven
With a tagline such as “A Slice of Heaven”, and rave recommendations from many, a trip down to this little cafe at Siglap is necessary for cheesecake lovers.The Ambience
The Cheesecake Café has scored immediately in its unique take on interior décor, embracing a cherubic character different from other cafes. The Victorian theme was rather prominent, featuring replicates from the Italian Renaissance such as the Mona Lisa, angelic clay sculptures, lighted candles, and a little fountain amongst the yellow painted walls.The Food
The selections include the specialty Peach Jelly Cheesecake, Rum and Raisins Cheesecake, Peanut Butter Cheesecake and American Cheesecake, each costing about $6.90. If cheesecakes are not your cup of tea, you have a choice of Chocolate Truffle, Chocolate Banana and Tiramisu.Friends have generally given varying positive comments, ranging from “to die for”, “unbelievable” to “a spiritual experience”. That could be a little exaggerating, but I thought that the cakes’ texture had a balance between heavy and light, and wasn’t overly diabetic.In a recent visit, I tried the Strawberry Oreo Cheesecake which added a light gentle sweetness to an already familiar taste. The Chocolate Banana though, was slightly ‘jelat’ (rich) to my liking but would appeal to chocolate lovers.  Although it is probably mass-produced, you get the impression that each slice served to you was prepared lovingly just for you. (I did send a mail to ask about their cakes but didn’t get a reply.   )The Service
The vibrant, attentive and youthful staff makes this place a great hang-out. One even kneed down to serve me a slice! Iced water is constantly re-filled with genuine smiles.The Cheesecake Cafe, 685 East Coast Road, Frankel Estate, S(459054 ) Tel:+65 64487725
Opening Hours: Sun/Wed/Thu: 3.30pm – 12mn; Fri/Public Holidays: 4.30pm – 12.30mn; Sat: 3.30pm – 12.30mnOther Related Entries
K-ki (Ann Siang Hill)
Hairloom & Caramel (Shaw Towers)
My Fat Lady (Haji Lane)
3 Inch Sin (Bt Timah)
Let’s Sweet (Bugis Junction)
2008-06-03 00:00:00
Zhou Kitchen 周庄 – Chinese Buffet That Screams Value
My family can eat a lot. And I mean, A LOT. With a penchant for Chinese food, we are always on a lookout of value buffets, as ordering ala carte can be a costly affair for us.With the ala carte lunch buffet costing only $18.80++ during the weekends and public holidays, ($15.80++ during weekdays!) Zhou’s Kitchen周庄 is one place my whole family really enjoyed. Moreover, the cuisines are based on Andrew Tjioe’s family treasured recipes and so you will be assured of a certain quality.If the name ‘Andrew Tjioe’ does ring a bell, yes, he is Tung Lok Group’s founder.Branded as a casual Chinese dining restaurant, this branch is probably marketed to the working executives. It has a very clean look, neat with white walls and furniture, matched with yellow peony décor and green bamboos.The buffet offers a selection of 36 dishes from appetizers, dim sum, soup, desserts, rice, noodles and fuss-free fares such as prawn paste chicken and deep-fried tilapia. Amazingly, our family of six (plus 2 kids) finished every single dish on the menu and more. (We ordered about 50? Gasps)Other than a few ‘upsets’ of being too salty or oily, overall the dishes are of a reasonable Tung Lok standard. The food isn’t exceptionally amazingly, but we are not complaining.With 6 diners, you get a complimentary Steamed Glutinous Rice with Crab. The rice is especially soft and tasty as the juices from the crab seeps in, giving it a fragrant flavour. Wrapped in lotus leaf, the taste wasn’t too heavy going and oily as well.My personal favourite would be the Traditional Homemade Herbal Tea, free flow at a charge of $3.00++ per person. Unlike many which have a strong medicinal taste, this tea is light and sweet, matched with a slight hint of the herbal goodness in it.While some of the service staff seemed a little frazzled by the weekend crowd, we were still ‘assigned’ one waitress to our table who served our frequent requests patiently. The assistant manager also came to check from time to time if we were satisfied with their food. All you can eat for $15.80++, this Kitchen screams Value, Value, Value!7-10 Amoy Street #01-01 Far East Square S(049949) Tel:+65 68771123
Opening Hours: Lunch: 11.30am – 3.00pm; Dinner: 6.00pm – 10.30pm; Hi–Tea: 2.30pm – 5.30pm (Sat, Sun & PH)Other Related Entries
Carousel (Royal Plaza on Scotts)
Sakura International Buffet (Admiralty Park)
Si Chuan Dou Hua (UOB Plaza)
Royal China (Raffles Hotel)
Cz’Zar (Great World City)
2008-06-02 00:00:00
Ayam Penyet Ria – That Most Famous Shop at Lucky Plaza
“Ayam Penyet” is really the ‘IN’ thing now. Several eateries, hawker centre stall, and even my school canteen is selling this popular dish.Ayam penyet which hails from Indonesia, is a fried chicken dish flattened with a wooden pestle. It is a simple dish which is served with fragrant rice, some vegetables such as cabbage and potent sambal chilli sauce. Some serve the dish with fried tahu (beancurd) and tempe (soybean cake) on the side.If you want to try out the original, Ayam Penyet Ria located at the 4th storey of Lucky Plaza is one of the first few places which brought this dish in. Do note that it is often very crowded during the weekends, so expect to wait in line with locals and Indonesians alike.Well, since it is in Lucky Plaza, do not expect a glam-up place. You may be chucked into one of those long tables, so thinking about having a proper conversation in a quiet surrounding is almost impossible.The signature dish Ayam Penyet with Nasi is fragrant with crispy bits of batter sprinkled on top of the crunchy chicken thigh. Get hot, hot, hot with the sambal chilli, the highlight dish which felt like fiery flames down the throat. If you can’t take spiciness, then you are missing out on THE best thing.One common complain is that the chicken is too dry, and needed some kind of a gravy or soup to add some moisture. Unfortunately, there was none.You can also opt for the Empal Penyet (smashed beef), Ikan Bawal Penyet (smashed pomfret), Sop Buntut (oxtail soup), Soto Ayam (chicken soto) or Rawon (beef soup surabaya). The Gado-gado, a vegetable ‘salad’ of greens, long beans tofu, tempeh with peanut sauce dressing is delightfully crisp, unlike some which can get too soggy and mushy. With an affordable price at $5,00 – $6,00, it is an inexpensive alternative to other restaurants in the vicinity.The desserts such as Es Cendol (Ice Cendol), Es Campur (Indonesian ice mixfruit), and Es Kacang Hijau (Green beans) are rather disappointing though. Too sweet and too lemak (coconut milk added). That’s if the dry chicken plus sambal didn’t make you thirsty enough. (Could be a tactic to make customers buy more drinks hah)304 Orchard Road #04-25 Lucky Plaza S(238863) Tel: +65 62356390Other Related Entries
Waroeng Penyet (Marine Parade)
Popeyes Chicken and Biscuits (Airport T3)
ChicKing (Marina Square)
Nando’s (Bugis Junction)
Barcelos (Novena)
2008-05-31 00:00:00
Tom Ton – This Pricey Black Pig is Simply Oishii
While many of us are familiar with ‘normal pigs’, I was really very curious about the “black pig” at this Japanese restaurant and wondered what’s all the fuss about.The Berkshire black pig (Kuro Buta) is actually a rare breed of pig originating from Windsor Britain, but reared in America by the Japanese for their ‘exceptional flavour’. The meat is said to be the perfect combination of juiciness, flavour and tenderness. (The famous Napoleon in George Orwell’s Animal Farm is actually a Kuro Buta!)The Ambience
Walking into this branch at Central, I felt that I was transported right into Tokyo once again. The décor was in an old timber Japanese home style, along with a sashimi counter with Japanese sprouting chefs. I chose the very comfortable booth seat, but you might prefer one with a Singapore River view.The Food
This branch’s specialty is in their Shabu Shabu and Tonkatsu, though common complaints from customers are that they don’t serve enough noodle dishes.Rarity comes with a price. The Top Grade Black Pig Curry Rice comes with a steep cost of $25.60. But my friend literally stopped for seconds and felt like he went to heaven after eating the pork culet. Although it sounded very wrong, he remarked that the pork tasted as succulent and tender as chicken. Sure enough, the luscious meat within the special bread crumbs, dipped in mild spicy curry was simply oishii.The Black Pig Sukiyayi ($18.90) came surprisingly in a little gas cooker, not the typical lighted ones which would flame out in minutes. True enough, the pork tasted like beef! Along with sweet tasty soup, firm udon noodles, the extremely thin pork slices trickles down your throat. There also isn’t the typical pork taste you often get in other dishes.The Price
The signature Tom Ton Special A Course Set for 2 Pax at $160 would give you an indication that this is not your everyday Japanese food.Tom Ton, 6 Eu Tong Sen Street #03-88/89 The Central @ Clarke Quay S(059817) Tel:+65 63277887 (Closed)Other Related Entries
Tonkatsu (Mandarin Gallery)
Ootoya (Orchard Central)
SUN Japanese Dining (Chijmes)
Watami (Ion Orchard)
Box n Sticks
2008-05-30 00:00:00
Old Hong Kong Tea House – Good only when you need a late night supper
I first came into contact with this Hong Kong café at Marina Square Food Loft, serving superb Hong Kong milk tea but sad looking trolley noodles. Opened by Victoria Lee, a Honger Konger who moved to Singapore, she brought in a team of Hong Kong chefs to ensure authenticity.The truth is I did hesitate a little before traveling all the way to Katong, due to the bad experience at Marina. (Though the strange thing is I order the milk tea there regularly without fail.) It’s hard not to miss Old Hong Kong Tea House as it is located within the preserved Katong Village with white walls and striking maroon signboards.Upon entering the ‘cha chan teng’, you feel like you traveled back in time framed pictures of Hong Kong celebrities from the 70s and 80s, such as Danny Chan, Leslie Cheung and Jacky Cheung. It is interesting yet ‘cheap’ because the décor designs are obviously torn from old magazines and records. This is what I call ‘fei wu li yong’ (recycling).Customers patronizing such Hong Kong cafes often get spoilt for choice, as this particular one offers more 500 dishes! Old Hong Kong’s specialties include Trolley Noodle, Bamboo Basket Baked Rice, La Mian (hand-pulled noodles) and their drinks.Trolley Noodles is one of the more prominent street hawker fare. You can choose a base noodles ($2.20) with additional ingredients costing between $1.00 to $2.00. Unfortunately, it is no where close to the piping slurping noodles you will have in the streets of Kowloon.This café obviously does not care about the art of food presentation. The Braised Ee-Fu Noodle with Brown Sauce ($8.80) was sickly looking in its flaxen yellow, with curry sauces spilled at the side. The brown sauce was also obviously M.I.A. A through disappointment.The dim sum was actually quite tasty, but unfortunately losing out in its appearance with undrained oil on the plate.The signature is the Hong Kong Milk Tea, apparently made from 5 different tea leaves, filtered water and imported evaporated milk. The blend was perfect along with a smooth texture, ending off with a slight bitter tea aftertaste. So good that I ordered another round.If you crave for after midnight supper, rest assured this café is open 24/7 for the entire year. With no service charge included, prices are still rather affordable.Old Hong Kong Tea House, 86 East Coast Road #01-09/10 Katong Village S(428788) Tel: 63451932
Opening Hours: 24 Hours Daily
2008-05-26 00:00:00
Ah Chew Desserts 阿秋甜品 – One of the Best Local Desserts
I used to work in the Bugis vicinity. Many times, female colleagues would look for their ‘chew-ge’ after lunch, jokingly saying his papaya dessert would make their skin smooth. Working in the corporate world came with a high level of stress, and somehow what ‘Ah Chew’s treats had become my comfort food.This dessert shop hidden among a row of eateries at Liang Seah is really a treasure. Do you know it used to take up just half the space, with the rest being taken by a Indian newspaper seller.  Fast forward a few years, and the treasure has finally been undiscovered through word of mouth. Just look out for the never-ending queue of people eagerly waiting to have their sugar fix.With yellow menu tags hanging behind the counter, hard ebony wood furniture, and Chinese paintings adorning the store’s walls, the décor goes well with the offerings and would remind many of dessert stores found in Hong Kong and Taipei. Be prepared to brave the heat for a seat.Some of the recommendations include: Rock sugar white fungus with papaya ($2.50), Red bean paste with Lily Bulb ($1.80), Mango Sago and Pomelo ($3.80), Yam with Sago ($2.00), and Fresh Milk Steam Egg with Red Bean ($3.00).Rest assured that the Mango Sago and Pomelo is made of fresh fruits as I have seen the staff cutting the ingredients on the spot. In this variation, a touch of coconut cream is added on top of the usual evaporated milk, giving it fragrance and extra texture. The sweetness of the ripe, juicy mango chunks is complimented by the refreshing, citrus pomelo pulps that bursts and crunch at every mouthful!  Just like Hong Kong’s ‘Hui Lau Shan’.The Fresh Milk Steam Egg is so smooth that it trickles down your throat. You have the option of having it coffee-flavoured, or red bean-flavoured which would give it some bite.For local favourites, the Yam and Sago was inspired by the owner after a trip to China. If you can forget about your calorie count, the yam is velvety and tasty, and the coconut milk does not have a sour aftertaste. Thinking about it already puts a smile on my face.Ah Chew Desserts, #01-11, Liang Seah Place 1 Liang Seah Street S(189022) Tel: +65 63398198
Opening Hours: Tue–Fri: 12.30pm – 11.30pm, Sat–Sun: 1.30pm – 11.30pm (Closed on Mon)Other Related Entries
Ji De Chi (Liang Seah)
Swirl Art (Liang Seah)
Honeymoon Desserts (Vivocity)
Dessert Cup (Raffles City)
2008-05-26 00:00:00
Daniel’s First Entry
I eat, therefore I am.As a kid, I grew up as someone who loved to gobble up his food, and even licked up the plate at the end. Armed with a big pack of chips on one, and a drumstick on the other, it had set me on a straight road to the T.A.F club. Ironically, for someone who claimed he loved food, he never really appreciated it.It was Moses Lim who taught me the art of eating, how we should understand and value what’s on our plate. As he said, “We are what we eat.” That opened a new window of appreciation and enjoyment. Sure enough, I took time to capture, look, think and write about this important aspect of my life.Food and taste can be one of the most subjective things in the world. I will not call myself a critic, but someone who loves to share his dining experience. Hope you can share your love for food with me too.Welcome to My Food Diary. Bon Appetit!
function crawl takes 2587.643541
